;date;sermon
0;2019-02-01;"
DATE: 01.02.2019
       [pic]RIFQ (GENTLENESS): ALLAH LOVES GRACIOUSNESS IN ALL AFFAIRS
    Honorable Muslims!
    The Almighty Allah states in the verse that I  have  recited,  ""And  not
equal are the good deed and the bad. Repel [evil] by that  [deed]  which  is
better; and thereupon the one whom between  you  and  him  is  enmity  [will
become] as though he was a devoted friend.""[i]

    The Prophet Muhammad (saw) stated in the hadith that I  have  read,  ""He
who is deprived of gentleness is deprived of good.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    Faith, worship, and good morality make the basis of Islam. Gentleness is
one of the moral  virtues  that  enables  human  to  have  higher  value  in
presence of Allah and  among  the  society.  Being  gentle  means  having  a
smiling face, a sweet tongue, and being humble. It means being  someone  who
gets along well with others, who does not  behave  rudely  and  harshly,  or
break hearts. It means not falling for  anger  that  darkens  the  mind  and
results in frustration, and being patient and calm.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Allah loves us to act  in  all  our  affairs  with  gentleness.[iii]  He
commands all believers to be forgiving and tolerant,  as  expressed  in  the
verse, ""Take what is given freely, enjoin what is good, and turn  away  from
the ignorant.""[iv] In  another  verse,  He  counts  ""restraining  anger  and
pardoning people"" among the characteristics of people who have fear  of  Him
and have the good news of forgiveness and paradise by Him.[v]

    Dear Believers!
    The Messenger of Allah (saw) is the finest example for us to  have  kind
behaviors. He treated kindly and compassionately not only people,  but  also
all that exists. He  always  sought  to  facilitate  all  his  affairs,  and
avoided causing any difficulty and hurting the people  around  him.  Instead
of punishing those who made mistakes, he opted to be forgiving.  He  advised
not being oppressive and overwhelming, but rather any constructive  behavior
that fostered love and respect. Thanks to such virtues bestowed upon him  by
Allah, Muslims held together around him.

    In this respect, the Almighty Allah states in the Holy  Qur'an,  ""So  by
mercy from Allah, [O Muhammad], you were lenient with them. And if  you  had
been rude [in speech] and harsh in heart, they  would  have  disbanded  from
about you. So, pardon them and ask forgiveness for them and consult them  in
the matter...""[vi]

    Honorable Muslims!
    Believers who take the Prophet Muhammad's morality  as  an  example  for
themselves conduct all their relations with gentleness.  Such  believers  do
not avoid being compassionate even for  the  smallest  living  beings.  With
their austerity and elegance, as well as  polite  and  considerate  manners,
they represent the noble values and the high morals of Islam.  They  refrain
from any kind of extremism, rudeness, and violence.  In  this  respect,  the
Prophet Muhammad said, ""Believers do not insult the honor of  others,  utter
curses, go to extremes, or nor do they foul""[vii]

    Dear Believers!
    Today, at a time when neglect of  responsibility  and  values  of  being
human is increasing, and violence  is  threatening  humanity  regardless  of
religion, language, ethnicity or geography, we should know that any  attempt
fueling violence has nothing moral, humane, or Islamic in  it.  We  need  to
refrain from  committing  any  act  that  damages  human  honor  and  grace;
approach and treat our parents, spouses, children, relatives, and  neighbors
with gentleness, compassion, and in a friendly  manner;  be  forgiving  even
when we are right, and be patient even when we are angry. In  this  respect,
the Prophet Muhammad (saw) said, ""The strong-man is  not  one  who  wrestles
well, but the one who controls himself when he is in a fit  of  rage.""[viii]
We should also know,  however,  that  standing  up  rightfully  against  any
attack targeting our national and religional  values  is  a  noble  sign  of
moral excitement, religious sensitivity, piety, and loyalty to homeland.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Who has rifq has compassion for  others,  and  who  has  compassion  for
others has Allah's mercy. Who abandons rifq heads to violence  and  violence
results in frustration on the Day of  Judgment.  Then,  we  should  not  let
anger seize our mind and conscience, nor should we  let  impatience  cast  a
shadow over our eternal  salvation.  We  should  always  bear  in  mind  the
following saying of the Prophet Muhammad  (saw),  ""Allah  is  gentle,  likes
gentleness,  and  gives  for  gentleness  what  he   does   not   give   for
harshness.""[ix]
-----------------------
[i] Fussilat, 41/34.
[ii] Abu Dawud, Adab, 11.
[iii] Bukhari, Adab, 35.
[iv] A'raf, 7/199.
[v] Al-i Imran, 3/134.
[vi] Al-i Imran, 3/159.
[vii] Tirmidhi, Birr, 48.
[viii] Muslim, Birr, 107.
[ix] Muslim, Birr, 77; Abu Dawud, Adab, 11.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
1;2018-03-02;"
LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE
DATE  : 02.03.2018
[pic]

   ETHICS OF COMMERCE IN ISLAM

   Jumu'ah Mubarak, Dear Brothers and Sisters!
   The Messenger of Allah (s.a.w.)  occasionally  went  to  the  market  in
Madinah to buy his needs. He watched people shopping and  had  conversations
with them. One day when he was  walking  around  the  marketplace,  a  wheat
salesman caught his attention. The wheat pile looked dry but when  he  stuck
his hand in it, he found that the  bottom  of  the  sack  was  not  what  it
appeared to be. The fingers  of  our  Prophet  got  wet  and  he  asked  the
salesman why. The man said the wheat got wet by  the  rain.  Therefore,  our
Prophet (s.a.w.) said, ""Then shouldn't you have put  the  wet  part  up  for
people to see it?"" and warned him: ""Whoever deceives us is not one  of  us!""
[i]

   Honorable Believers!
   Our religion deems it essential for a person to live his/her life  self-
sufficiently and provide sustenance for his/her family. To  show  an  effort
to earn one's sustenance through halal and lawful means  and  to  engage  in
business and trade is worthy of praise. However, any  kind  of  trade  where
one does not respect Allah's countenance, the  debt  to  others  and  halal-
haram sensitivity is forbidden in our religion. Indeed,  our  Almighty  Lord
enjoins in the verses I have recited at the beginning: ""Woe  to  those  that
deal in fraud. Who, when they take a measure from people, take in full.  But
when they have to give by measure or weight to men, give less  than  due...""
[ii]

   Brothers and Sisters!
   Islam has provided the humanity a roadmap for a peaceful,  balanced  and
righteous life. It has also set some principles for the ethics of trade  and
commerce. Undoubtedly,  the  most  important  principle  of  the  ethics  of
commerce is earning through halal means. A Muslim not only cares  about  the
earthly profits, but also cares more about  the  investments  made  for  the
Hereafter and about avoiding any haram to stain his/her earnings. S/he  does
not sell the things Allah Almighty forbids. S/he  does  not  acquire  wealth
through  haram  means.  S/he  avoids  ill-gotten  gains,   interest,   black
marketeering, abusing public property and  tax  evasion.  S/he  would  never
accept a monopolistic and opportunistic attitude which destroys  others  and
tries to wipe out  competitors.  S/he  does  not  embrace  selfishness,  but
embraces altruism. S/he acts  in  accordance  with  the  idea  that  his/her
brothers and sisters should also gain.

   Esteemed Muslims!
   Another principle  of  the  ethics  of  commerce  is  righteousness  and
honesty. It is being explicit and transparent in trade, and  avoiding  lies,
tricks and deception. In this  respect,  our  Prophet  (s.a.w.)  said:  ""The
truthful, trustworthy merchant is with the Prophets, the truthful,  and  the
martyrs."" [iii]

   Being a trustworthy person who speaks the truth is an essential  quality
of a believer. A believer carries the consciousness of  worship  in  his/her
every step while s/he  strives  to  earn  halal  income.  Acting  with  this
consciousness, our ancestors formed the ""Ahi-order"" tradition and made  sure
that ethics were respected in bazaars and markets as well as the  law.  This
tradition equipped every craftsman, artisan or  merchant  with  good  morals
and spirituality besides the professional skills. Throughout  history,  many
communities were influenced by the commercial ethics  of  Muslim  merchants,
thus were honored by Islam.

   Dear Brothers and Sisters!
   Our Prophet (s.a.w.) said: ""It is not permissible for a Muslim  to  sell
his brother goods in which there is a defect, without pointing that  out  to
him.""[iv] Because hiding the defects of goods destroys the trust  of  people
and takes the blessing out of trade. The seller who conceals the truth  ends
in defeat, even though he seems to  make  a  profit  in  the  short  run.  A
believer who is aware of this fact does not consider every  means  allowable
for gaining profit, and does not trade temporary earthly goods with  eternal
bliss in the Hereafter. S/he does not gain profit or interest from the  loss
of others. S/he does not resort to  disrupting  the  market  with  deceptive
advertising and unfair competition.

   Brothers and Sisters!
   Another important matter we must pay attention in commerce is  that  the
occupation of trade should not interfere with  our  duties  to  Allah  as  a
servant. In fact,  our  Almighty  Lord  enjoins:  ""[Are]  men  whom  neither
commerce nor sale distracts from the remembrance of  Allah  and  performance
of prayer and giving of zakah. They fear a Day in which the hearts and  eyes
will [fearfully] turn about.""[v]

   Unfortunately, we can see that virtues like sensitivity to halal income,
contentment, modesty, honesty and fairness weaken  day  by  day.  Greed  and
avarice,  the  fondness  for  wealth  and  property,  luxury  and  excessive
consumption grow like a snowball.

   Let's review our lives to put an end to this situation. Let's  construct
our earnings on truth and sincerity. Let's invest in things that are  halal,
good and clean. Let's close the roads to haram, evil and fraud.  Let  us  be
believers who earn for the countenance of Allah and spend  their  income  on
goodness.

-----------------------
[i] Muslim, Iman, 164; Darimi, Buyu', 10.
[ii] Mutaffifin, 83/1-3.
[iii] Tirmidhi, Buyu', 4.
[iv] Ibn Majah, Tijarat, 45.
[v] Nur, 24/37.
                        Issued by: General Directorate of Religious Services


"
2;2019-12-27;"
DATE: 27.12.2019
                                    [pic]
    A LIFE FULL OF CONTEMPLATION
    Honorable Muslims!
    In the verse I have recited the Almighty Allah (swt) states,  ""And  this
worldly life is not but diversion and amusement. And  indeed,  the  home  of
the Hereafter - that is the eternal life, if only they knew!""[i]

    In the hadith I have recited the Prophet Muhammad  (saw)  says,  ""Be  in
this world as if you were a stranger or a traveler.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    We all have a limited number of  days  called  life  regardless  of  our
current ages. One day that Allah knows only and not a moment  earlier  or  a
moment later than the predestined hour we all will leave  this  world  after
He takes our life entrusted to us. No other  provision  will  we  have  than
faith and a record of good deeds  with  us  on  our  way  to  the  place  of
resurrection where we will give an account for all we did in the world.

    How lucky we are if we were able to know the value of time, the  meaning
of life, the importance of youth, and the gratitude for  the  blessings  and
health we have! Shame on  us  if  we  wasted  our  days,  spent  our  wealth
extravagantly, poisoned our mind or body, hurt our loved  ones,  and  failed
to properly perform our worships!

    On these days with the beginning of a new year  around  the  corner,  by
goes another year in our life, a step closer we  are  getting  to  our  end.
Then it is time for contemplation! Come, let us contemplate  about  what  we
have done in the previous year and about what spiritual abundances  we  have
had and divine trials we have come through.

    Dear Muslims!
    At the beginning of the year about to be gone by we  welcome  the  Three
Holy Months. We celebrated Raghaib as the first blooming flower of mercy  in
the Three Holy Months, then Mi'raj as the clarity of our mind and  the  ease
of our heart, and finally Night of Bara'ah as the peak of  forgiveness.  Did
we truly regard these sacred days and nights as opportunities to  refer  our
wishes to Allah (swt)? Did we truly hold fast on to performing  the  prayers
that the Prophet Muhammad (saw) called as ""the light of my  eyes""[iii]?  Did
we show true regret for our faults and sins and repent for them?

    Dear Believers!
    As in every year, we were honored with Ramadan in this passing year.  We
reached the Laylat al-Qadr, more virtuous than a thousand months,  and  made
it to the Eid al-Fitr. No matter how much gratitude we  show,  it  is  never
enough!  Because  the  holy  month  of  Ramadan  provided   us   with   many
opportunities to help and share with others while allowing us to  enjoy  the
taste of spending in the way of Allah and treating well  all  creatures  for
the sake of Allah (swt). We attained abundance with suhur time, health  with
fasting, enlightenment with Qur'an, and  peace  with  tarawih.  Let  us  ask
ourselves: Did we truly offer help and  solution  to  the  problems  of  our
oppressed and needy brothers and sisters  through  the  year  after  getting
blessed with the abundance of Ramadan? Did we  truly  continue  to  live  by
Qur'an after the month of Qur'an came to an end?  Did  we  truly,  with  our
tongue  uttering  the  name  of  Allah,  heart  feeling  thankfulness,  mind
contemplating, body enduring, get accustomed to these fine virtues?

    Honorable Muslims!
    Also in this passing year,  we  celebrated  the  Eid  al-Adha  with  our
sacrifices for Allah that express our loyalty, thankfulness and  submission.
We observed the rights of  our  neighbors,  relatives,  the  poor,  and  the
orphan.  We  felt  the  Eid's  atmosphere   of   peace,   tranquility,   and
brotherhood. Did the past Eid al-Adha truly strengthen our devoutness,  love
and obedience for Allah (swt)? Did we truly maintain the  spirit  of  giving
charity and spending in the way of Allah through the  year  after  the  Eid?
Did we truly get happy when we shared out?

    Dear Believers!
    Towards the end of this passing year, we celebrated the  Mawlid  al-Nabi
Week for the memory of the Prophet Muhammad (saw)  honoring  the  world.  On
the  occasion  of  the  Week,  we  paid  more  careful  attention   to   his
recommendations about family.  We  came  to  think  again  that  compassion,
fairness, trust and consultation were prevailing virtues in his family.  Let
us ask ourselves: Did we truly embrace our family  values  in  his  example?
Did we truly protect our families we put our love to build through  fairness
and mercy? Did we truly solve  our  problems  through  common  sense,  never
resorting to violence?

    Dear Muslims!
    The life in this world is a  road  to  the  Hereafter;  the  humans  are
travelers loaded with responsibilities; and the set number of days  in  this
world is a challenging yet precious journey. Let us then not forget that  we
are merely travelers in this world. Let us live in a such a way as to  value
the worldly belongings as little as a traveler would  need  to,  keeping  in
mind that our ultimate purpose is to enter heaven. Let us be  aware  of  our
life and the blessings in our possession. Let us spend every single  day  in
such a way as would be approved by Allah (swt), doing useful deeds,  with  a
good cause and without wasting the treasure of contemplation.
-----------------------
[i] Ankabut, 29/64.
[ii] Bukhari, Riqaq, 3.
[iii] Nasai, Ishrat al-Nisa, 1.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
3;2017-08-25;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 25.08.2017



SACRIFICE: THE SEARCH FOR
BEING CLOSE TO ALLAH

Honorable Believers!

Our Lord Almighty commands in the verse I have just recited: “Say: ‘Indeed, my prayer, my rites of sacrifice, my living and my dying are for Allah, Lord of the worlds.’” 

Our Prophet (pbuh) says in the hadith I have just read: “A human does no action from the actions on the days of sacrifice feast more beloved to Allah then sacrifice…”

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Our hearts are once again filled with the excitement of the sacrifice feast which helps us to spiritually get close to Allah Almighty and strengthen our brotherhood. Endless praise and thanks be to our Almighty Lord who let us reach these blessed days. Next Friday, we Muslims are going to observe the feast together. With the delight of good deeds we obtained through our sacrifices and the joy of the feast, we will try to achieve our greatest desire together: the countenance of our Lord.

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

Sacrifice is the search for being close to Allah Almighty. Sacrifice is the name of submission and loyalty, love and faithfulness, sacrifice and sharing.

Sacrifice is a spiritual journey full of wisdom and lessons. In this journey, we recall Habil and Qabil, the sons of Adam, who were tried for their sincerity and truthfulness. Sincerity and modesty won, while insincerity and greed lost in this trial. Because the condition of acceptance for all prayers sincerity and truthfulness.

Brothers and Sisters!

The memory of Ibrahim and his son Ismail is embedded in the ritual of sacrifice as an example of loyalty and submission. In this trial, Ibrahim and his beloved Ismail showed that anything that we have could be sacrificed on the path of Allah without hesitation. From that day to this, the believers see the ultimate loyalty in Ibrahim and the ultimate submission in Ismail.

And indeed, there is the faithfulness, sacrifice and generosity of our Master Muhammad Mustapha (pbuh) in the ritual of sacrifice. For his ummah, sacrifice has become the name of the trial for sharing, helping and being brothers and sisters.





Dear Muslims!

Our sacrifices get us close to our Lord while giving some meaning and profoundness to our humanity. Sacrifice reminds us our responsibilities above all. It helps us to review the values that we forget in the course of our daily lives and to patiently walk on the straight path. Sacrifice actually implies that we should not be the prisoners of our desires and wants but climb the steps of servitude with sincerity. Because our sacrifice is a statement of sincerity and servitude that we offer to our Lord. Our Lord informs us about this truth with this verse: “Their meat will not reach Allah, nor will their blood, but what reaches Him is piety from you.” 

Brothers and Sisters!

Sacrifice is a demonstration of our awareness of helping and sharing on the path of Allah. Sacrifice is putting a smile to the faces of the needy, the poor, the destitute and the desolate. It is to share the joy of the feast with those who can’t observe the feast. Sacrifice is getting close to our Lord, while also getting closer to our neighbors, relatives, kith and kin, in short to each other. From this perspective, sacrifice is a touch of brotherhood, a helping hand that we extend towards our brothers whom we don’t know and never seen before, in so many countries that we don’t even know the name of.

Brothers and Sisters!

Just as salah, zakat and fasting; sacrifice is a distinctive ritual. Just as helping the poor, desolate, the needy and doing good; sacrifice is a beautiful prayer. This ritual has conditions and elements of its own. The essential condition in sacrifice is that the person who has enough money or possessions must personally sacrifice the animal that meets the necessary conditions for the countenance of Allah. Therefore, the ritual of sacrifice cannot be transformed to financial aid.

Brothers and Sisters!

The Directorate of Religious Affairs and Turkiye Diyanet Foundation arranged an organization of sacrificing by proxy this year as before. The sacrifices of our generous and benevolent people will be given to the downtrodden and destitute brothers and sisters, both inside our country and abroad. Thus, the bridges of brotherhood will be supported and strengthened. Each sacrifice that our honorable nation give to our brothers and sisters in need will be the proof that humanity and brotherhood are not dead; that the compassion of humans is not exhausted. The sacrifices that show the generosity of our nation will say “We are here” to the helpless, “We are with you” to the needy and “We are together” to the poor.

Brothers and Sisters!

Sacrificial animal donations will be accepted until October 1, and our offices of mufti will continue to serve you on holidays. With this feelings and thoughts, I ask our Lord to let all of us reach the feast in peace and accept our sacrifices."
4;2019-10-25;"
DATE: 25.10.2019
[pic]

              FOR OUR SOLDIERS (MEHMETCIK) ARE ALL OUR PRAYERS
    Dear Muslims!
    In this blessed hour when the prayers are  accepted,  I  would  like  to
mention about someone I know. A young  man  who  is  ready  to  give  up  on
everything when it comes down to the defense of homeland...

    You know him as well, he is the hero whom we  named  after  the  Prophet
Muhammad (saw), the Honor of the Universe, thus ""Mehmetçik""... Some  of  you
may recognize him from the history. A strong, bold,  intelligent,  skillful,
and fearless young  man...  Always  up  for  fighting  on  the  forefront...
Restlessly, tirelessly... While rushing from one battlefield to another,  he
would sometimes leave behind his leg, sometimes his arm, and  sometimes  his
eyes; yet, he would always hold the love for the homeland on the  forefront,
and say, ""All for the homeland to live long!""

    Dear Muslims!
    The Prophet Muhammad (saw) said, ""Allah guarantees  to  the  person  who
carries out Jihad for His Cause and nothing compelled him to go out but  the
Jihad in His Cause, and belief in His Words, that He will either  admit  him
into Paradise or return him with his reward or the booty he  has  earned  to
his residence from where he went out.""[i] With this  glad  tiding  in  mind,
our Mehmetçik has hit the road once again. Out of seasons  he  loves  spring
the most; out of months August; but, he walked on these days of  October  as
well. To bring peace to those victimized by terrorism, to bring  tranquility
to those at unease, to lighten those whose hearts are in flames...

    Calling his walk ""Peace Spring"". Together with his  friends,  relatives,
brothers... They are the sons of some of us, the brothers of some  others...
They are the sons of all of us, and the apples of our eyes...

    Dear Believers!
    Mehmetçik keeps walking day and night, regardless of time  and  place...
Mehmetçik rewrites the history with his sweat and blood. Along  the  borders
he protects, not only is our homeland safe, but also the  fate  of  humanity
is saved from chaos.

    The verse ""So do not weaken and do not grieve, and you will be  superior
if you are true believers.""[ii] in the Holy Qur'an gives hope to our  heroic
army in this walk of peace in such a struggle for the  better  of  humanity.
This is such a great faith and  love  for  homeland  that  the  Holy  Qur'an
describes those who were martyred for this love  as,  ""And  never  think  of
those who have been killed in the cause of Allah as dead. Rather,  they  are
alive with their Lord, receiving provision,  rejoicing  in  what  Allah  has
bestowed upon them of His bounty.""[iii]





    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    There is no doubt that with the  help  of  Allah  (swt),  the  plans  of
treachery will be disrupted, the traps and cheats  of  the  oppressors  will
become thorn in their own sides. As Mehmetçik guards the entrenchments,  the
dreams and plans of all our  enemies  and  their  servants  who  infiltrated
among us will confront with our reality, their traps  with  our  faith,  and
they will be drowned in their own flood of terrorism that they pump. As  our
army moves forward and progresses for the cause of peace, all the  innocent,
the women and the children will gain safety and peace  under  the  shade  of
our flag.

    Dear Believers!
    Mehmetcik is the star shining above us, our gem and  treasure  on  earth
under the shadow of our flag... Our heroic saga as one heart  and  one  soul
for the homeland, flag, nation, and state... On the front for  the  good  to
prevail the world and for the sake of humanity. And all our prayers are  for
them while they are rushing and struggling, shoulder  to  shoulder,  on  the
land or in  the  air  whether  near  or  far,  for  the  oppressed  and  the
victimized who are deprived of their rights and  freedoms  May  their  sweat
become mercy;  may  their  blood  become  grace...  For  them  are  all  our
recitations of the Surah al-Ya-Sin, al-Fath, and al-Fatihah... And for  them
are all our utterances of amin.

    Amin! O Allah, al-Aziz and al-Karim! O Allah,  al-Rahman  and  al-Rahim!
Here we are at Your door, humbly asking Your Highness for help, asking  Your
Majesty for mercy. By uttering Your name and with  our  helplessness  before
Your presence. We ask for Your help for our soldiers  and  victory  for  our
army. Save their lives from grueling and hazard, and  protect  their  bodies
from exhaustion and from being caught off guard.

    O Lord, You are Who lets armies exist in the world as per Your name  al-
Jalal, and You are the Most Beloved, Who lets the martyrs be honored to  see
Your face in the Hereafter as per Your name al-Jamal. In Your Existence  and
Oneness we believe, and in You we trust and seek  refuge.  Do  not  let  the
Muslim ummah be challenged among themselves, and let not  the  innocent  get
burnt in the flames of sedition. Save the oppressed from the darkness,  wake
those deeply asleep in negligence up from the morningless nights...  Do  not
make our friends sadden, do not make our enemies happy in this road. Do  not
cease Your mercy on our heroic army, do not take away Your divine  abundance
of blessings from our heavenly homeland. Make us sure about what  we  worry,
and make us the representatives of Islam illuminating the darkness in  tough
times. Frustrate and destroy the masters and the servants of terrorism,  set
those oppressors against each other.

    O Allah, Who is above  all  defects!  Bestow  Your  blessings  upon  our
martyrs, and bestow speedy recovery upon  our  wounded  soldiers.  Ease  the
pain and griefs of those who in pain, and  bless  our  hopes  with  victory!
Treat our prayers as those made in the Ka'bah. We are  begging  You  not  to
take away Your compassion from us, not to withhold Your mercy from  us...  O
Allah, do not silence our adhans. Do not let  anybody  and  anything  divide
our homeland, o Allah! Do not let anybody pull our flag  down  the  pole,  o
Allah! Do not let us bow down to anybody  but  You,  o  Allah,  protect  our
soldiers from any kind of evil and harm! Let  them  gain  victory  and  turn
back safe and sound with glory and peace as soon as  possible.  I  wish  our
mercy to our martyrs and veterans who founded our state and made  this  land
our homeland. Amin, all praise and thanks be to Allah...
-----------------------
[i] Bukhari, Tawhid, 28.
[ii] Al-i 'Imran, 3/139.
[iii] Al-i 'Imran, 3/169-170.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
5;2018-03-30;"
 DATE: 30/03/2018
                                                                       [pic]
    THE FIRST MESSAGE OF REVELATION TO HUMANITY: READ!
    Jumu'ah Mubarak, Honorable Believers!
    The first verses revealed to our  Prophet  at  Cave  Hira  are  those  I
recited at the beginning of the khutbah.  In  those  verses,  Allah  states:
""Read in the name of your Lord who created - Created  man  from  a  clinging
substance. Read, and your Lord is the most Generous - Taught man that  which
he knew not."" [i]

    Our beloved Prophet, who was the addressee of this command, declared  in
a Hadith: ""Whoever goes out seeking knowledge  is  in  Allah's  cause  until
s/he returns.""[ii]

    Brothers and Sisters!
    As a noble creature, man is bestowed with the unique gift of  intellect.
It is intellect, the ability to discern good from evil, that  separates  man
from other beings and imparts him with value. Intellect  is  the  source  of
man's sense of responsibility and his tool in  choosing  between  right  and
wrong. Servants of Allah realize His message through intellect  and  set  it
as their guide in life. They understand and fulfill  their  responsibilities
to themselves, to Allah, and to those  around  them  using  intellect.  They
learn, teach, live and let live by means of their minds.

    Esteemed Believers!
    The one purpose of man worth toiling, suffering, and laboring  the  most
for is knowledge acquisition. Knowledge is the treasure that enlightens  the
path of mankind and wisdom is the most honorable rank  for  man  to  attain.
Thus begins the first book of the last revelation with  the  words  ""Read!"".
For reading is the  pursuit  of  virtue.  Reading  is  reaching  the  truth.
Reading is the closest companion of people on their journey  of  exploration
of the meaning behind  creation,  life  and  the  universe.  Our  Holy  Book
suggests, [pic] ""Are those who know equal to those who  do  not  know?""[iii]
to emphasize the value of knowledge and the indispensability of  wisdom  for
mankind. Our gracious book the Qur'an, the divine spring of  wisdom,  orders
us to think, to use our intellect  and  reach  true  knowledge,  criticizing
ignorance  with  warnings  such   as,   [pic]   ""...turn   away   from   the
ignorant!""[iv] [pic] ""So never be of  the  ignorant!""[v]  For  this  reason,
reading in order to learn our religious  and  social  responsibilities,  and
embracing the Book and knowledge in  order  to  discern  between  right  and
wrong, is the essential obligation of all Muslims.

    Venerable Muslims!
    Knowledge is for man. Man is  exalted  with  knowledge.  With  the  true
knowledge from the correct sources, he  reaches  righteousness,  steers  the
society and shapes the world. Wisdom grants peace,  happiness,  and  earthly
and  heavenly  prosperity  to  man  whereas  ignorance  brings   shame   and
deception, and leads to faults and harm.

    Beloved Believers!
    Al-Masjid al-Nabawi, built in Madinah by our Prophet, is  a  center  for
learning. Our Prophet (s.a.w.) invited all believers to his masjid, men  and
women, the young and the elderly, and heralded that  Allah  would  ease  the
path of heaven for those dedicated to learning.[vi]

    In our civilization,  scholars  are  the  ones  who  present  knowledge,
wisdom, morals, manners, righteousness and the truth to all  humanity.  They
embody  and  represent  these  graces.  For  scholars  know  that  knowledge
untempered by wisdom and not embellished by scholarship is bound  to  create
a heavy load in the Hereafter.

    Honorable Believers!
    We live in the age of information and technology. But mankind has  often
used these not for ensuring good on  earth  but  instead  abused  them,  and
acted immorally. As knowledge is  detached  from  morality,  so  are  people
detached from their inherent value as  human  beings.  Many  of  the  youth,
deprived of  the  spirit  of  education  and  the  meaning  and  purpose  of
knowledge are sent towards bigotry, violence and terror.

    It is our duty to ensure peace and security  in  the  Islamic  geography
plagued by oppression and ignorance, and to offer a new civilization to  the
world as Muslims. In this regard, it is  our  collective  responsibility  to
pursue the true knowledge and correct sources,  to  receive  knowledge  from
competent origins and to act in accordance with what we learn.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    Let us, as parents, raise our children with the conscience of faith  fed
by the Qur'an and Sunnah, with love of worship and the  sense  of  morality.
Let us strive for them to be good people and  exemplary  believers.  Let  us
not deprive our children, whether boys or girls, of  education  provided  by
schools, mosques and Qur'an courses.

    I would like to share a final consideration while ending my khutbah.  It
is the National  Libraries  Week  in  Turkey.  Libraries  are  a  source  of
learning and knowledge as they support  the  love  of  reading  and  reading
habits. They are the places that instill us book-love. So let us  appreciate
their value. Let us all share the  joy  of  spending  our  time  reading  in
libraries.

-----------------------
[i] Alaq, 96/1-5.
[ii] Tirmidhi, 'Ilm, 2.
[iii] Zumar, 39/9.
[iv] A'raf, 7/199.
[v] An'am, 6/35.
[vi] Tirmidhi, 'Ilm, 19.
               General Directorate of Religious Services


"
6;2018-10-05;"
DATE: 05.10.2018
                                    [pic]
     FUNERAL ETIQUETTE: LAST DUTIES FOR THE TRAVELER OF THE ETERNAL LIFE
    Jumu'ah Mubarak, Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Our Almighty Lord (swt) states in the verse I have recited: ""Every  soul
will taste death. Then to Us will you be returned.""[i]

    Our Prophet (saw) says in the hadith I  have  read:  ""The  rights  of  a
Muslim on the Muslims are five: to  respond  to  the  salam  (greeting),  to
visit when they  are  sick,  to  attend  their  funerals,  to  accept  their
invitation, and to wish mercy for them when they sneeze."" [ii]

    Honorable Believers!
    As life is a divine grace, death  is  an  inevitable  fact.  Every  born
person will live the life preordained for them,  and  will  eventually  die.
Death will surely catch every person no matter where  they  are,  no  matter
how much they try to escape, or no matter  how  much  they  try  to  find  a
remedy.[iii] Although it seems  like  leaving  behind  the  world,  parents,
children, and the loved ones; death is actually the name of the  reunion  of
the believing servants with their loved ones in the presence  of  Allah  the
Almighty (swt). It is the beginning of a new and eternal life full of  peace
and happiness for those performing their duty of servitude to Allah (swt).

    Esteemed Muslims!
    As believers, we have some religious and humanistic responsibilities  to
fulfill while seeing  off  our  brothers  for  the  Hereafter.  Our  primary
responsibility is not to leave our brother/sister on their  deathbed  alone,
to accompany them till their last breath,  and  to  utter  the  kalimah  al-
tawheed aloud to help them breathe their last by acknowledging  the  kalimah
al-tawheed. The Messenger of Allah  (saw)  says,  ""Exhort  to  recite  [pic]
'There is no god but Allah' to those of you who are dying.""[iv]

    Honorable Believers!
    There is sorrow in the heart and tears in the eyes  of  the  person  who
loses a loved one. Our beloved Prophet (saw) also shed tears  when  he  lost
his son Ibrahim as a baby. But  at  that  moment  when  he  faced  with  the
reality of death which is full of  lessons,  he  (saw)  said  the  following
words: ""Our eyes shed tears and our hearts are filled with grief, but we  do
not say anything except  that  by  which  Allah  is  pleased.  By  Allah,  o
Ibrahim, we are grieved for you.""[v]

    Both death and life are created by Allah (swt). A believer's part is  to
submit to the command of Allah (swt) no matter how fresh and great the  pain
is,  without  screaming  or  revolting;  and  to  hope  to  meet  in  heaven
inshaallah, and asking patience from Allah. Belief in  our  Almighty  Lord's
divine address of [pic] ""Indeed we belong to Allah, and  indeed  to  Him  we
will return.""[vi], is cure to the pain of  hearts,  and  a  remedy  for  the
longing of hearts.

    Honorable Muslims!
    One of the arrangements to be made  for  a  deceased  person  is  called
""tajhiz and takfin"", which includes the washing and  enshrouding  the  body,
performing the funeral prayer (salat al-janazah), and burial. When a  person
passes away, their relatives,  friends,  neighbors  and  other  Muslims  are
informed. The body is washed and enshrouded carefully with due attention  to
privacy. The closest relative or suitable persons who are appointed  by  the
closest relative attend the washing of the body. If the deceased person  has
outstanding debts, their debts should be paid  off,  by  funeral  prayer  if
possible, from the property left behind, and their bequest, if  any,  should
soon be realized.

    Honorable Believers!
    Another religious responsibility for us is to attend the funeral  prayer
of our deceased brother/sister and  pray  Lord  Almighty  (swt)  to  forgive
him/her while leaving off  the  mortal  world  for  the  eternal  life.  The
Messenger of Allah (saw) said, ""When you  perform  funeral  prayer,  make  a
sincere supplication for the deceased.""[vii]

    Sorrows decrease when shared.  Being  a  brother  in  religion  requires
condoling with the deceased person's relatives  and  wishing  them  patience
and fortitude. Condolences should not be delayed, and any word  or  behavior
to hurt the deceased's relatives should  be  avoided.  Our  beloved  Prophet
(saw) says, ""Make a mention of the virtues of your dead,  and  refrain  from
(mentioning) their evils.""[viii]

    Esteemed Believers!
    It is not appropriate nor expected of mourners who are in grief of their
loss to be further bothered and busied  by  the  preparations  of  food  for
people coming to deliver their condolences. It is the Sunnah of our  Prophet
(saw) that the neighbors and  relatives  prepare  and  offer  food  for  the
mourners and their guests. As a matter of fact, hearing the news  about  His
cousin Ja'far's martyrdom in the  Battle  of  Mu'tah,  our  beloved  Prophet
(saw) said, ""Prepare  some  food  for  the  family  of  Ja'far,  for  indeed
something has happened to them that will keep them busy.""[ix]

    Valued Muslims!
    The Beloved Messenger (saw) says, ""Frequently remember 'the destroyer of
pleasures', meaning death.""[x].

    Death, then, has a language that preaches, teaches, and  warns.  Funeral
ceremonies function not only as an opportunity to  pray  for  the  deceased,
but also to look at ourselves and review our lives. One day we will run  out
of our life-span capital, and each one of our deeds, no  matter  how  small,
will get their reward.

    We as believers have always husn adh-dhann (good assumption)  about  our
Lord (swt). We expect His forgiveness, mercy,  and  compassion.  We  believe
that death will leave the hope of eternal spring  to  our  faithful  hearts.
While so, we also endeavor to stay on the straight path of Islam and  strive
to live our lives with integrity. Only then becomes death a  greeting,  from
Allah (swt), of eventual meeting with Him and a door opening  to  the  realm
of everlasting peace.
-----------------------
[i] 'Ankabut, 29/57.
[ii] Bukhari, Jana'iz, 2.
[iii] Nisa, 4/78; Jumu'ah, 62/8.
[iv] Muslim, Jana'iz, 2.
[v] Muslim, Fadhail, 62.
[vi] Baqarah, 2/156.
[vii] Abu Dawud, Jana'iz, 54, 56; Ibn Majah, Jana'iz, 23.
[viii] Abu Dawud, Adab, 42; Tirmidhi, Jana',z, 34.
[ix] Tirmidhi, Jana'iz, 21.
[x] Nasa'i, Jana'iz, 3.
           General Directorate of Religious Services

"
7;2018-03-23;"
DATE: 23.03.2018
                                                                       [pic]
                        WORSHIP & THE SPIRITUAL WORLD
   Jumu'ah Mubarak, Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
      Praise and glory to Allah  the  Almighty  who  has  again  granted  us
reaching the three blessed months. Last night we experienced the Laylat  al-
Raghaib. Our prayers and most sincere wishes of  forgiveness  were  directed
at Him alone.

   Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
      Mu'adh b. Jabal was honored with Islam at a young age. He was  amongst
the prominent Sahabah. The Prophet (s.a.w.) loved Mu'adh greatly, and  often
expressed his love and gave him advice. One  day,  the  Messenger  of  Allah
asked the young Sahabi: ""Mu'adh, do you know  the  right  of  Allah  on  His
slaves and the right of His slaves on Him?"" Mu'adh answered, ""Allah and  His
Messenger know better"". The Prophet (s.a.w.) then explained, ""The  right  of
Allah on His slaves is that  they  worship  only  Him  and  never  associate
anything with Him. The slaves' right is that Allah not punish those  who  do
not associate anything with Him.""[i]

    Brothers and Sisters!
     Our Almighty Lord created man as the  noblest  of  all  creatures  and
equipped him with superior capabilities. He put everything in  the  universe
into the service of mankind. And in return for  bestowing  the  most  unique
abilities to him, He only asked for worshipping Him. Being a slave of  Allah
requires that we attach to Him sincerely using our  morality  and  freewill,
use all our means and abilities for the countenance of Him, and abandon  the
desires of our nafs and follow the rules decreed by our Lord.

   Worship, explained as ""The  right  of  Allah  over  His  slaves"",  is  a
phenomenon that makes  man  dignified  in  the  presence  of  al-Rahman.[ii]
Worship is obedience, submission, and devotion to  Allah  Almighty.  Worship
is thanking Allah for the blessings He has bestowed upon  us.  It  means  to
communicate with our Lord. It is when man, always in need of  the  Almighty,
presents himself to Him without mediation. For  this  reason,  the  believer
turns to Allah saying[pic] ""It  is  You  we  worship  and  You  we  ask  for
help.""[iii] in every prayer. They accept their own  weakness,  ask  Him  for
help and beseech Him. That is the awareness of worship  and  the  conscience
of servitude. The believer attains  nobility  above  all  creation  by  this
awareness, earning happiness and peace on this world and  eternal  salvation
in the afterlife.

    Beloved Brothers and Sisters!
    Worship is also a shield that protects  us  from  all  evil.  Those  who
prostrate before Allah and fast, give alms (sadaqah) and perform  the  tawaf
for His sake are  cleansed  from  bad  characteristics  such  as  arrogance,
selfishness, envy and excessive ambition. Worship protects  our  souls  from
desolation and the fatigue of worries and sorrows. In this regard,  Almighty
Allah states, [pic] ""Verily, [only] by the remembrance of Allah  hearts  are
assured.""[iv] Believers in sincere worship get closer  to  their  Lord  with
every step, and strengthen their faith, trust, love and respect for Him.

    The Messenger of Allah draws our attention to the  fundamental  acts  of
worship by saying, ""Islam is based  on  five  principles:  to  testify  that
there is none but Allah to be worshipped and Muhammad is His  Messenger,  to
offer the prayers, to pay  Zakat,  to  perform  Hajj,  and  to  fast  during
Ramadan.""[v]

    In addition, any effort  for  goodness  and  struggle  against  evil  is
worship as well. To behave kindly and greet others is worship.  Serving  and
honoring one's parents, providing the material and spiritual needs of  one's
family, wiping the tears of the needy, showing compassion to orphans,  being
on the side of the oppressed and injured are all acts of worship.

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Turning the worships into good deeds  and  habits  is  as  important  as
performing them without material expectations or vanity.  In  this  respect,
it is stated in the Holy Qur'an, ""Worship your Lord  until  there  comes  to
you death.""[vi] And the Prophet (s.a.w.) said, ""The  most  regular  constant
deeds even though they may be few [are beloved the most by  Allah].""[vii]  ,
advising consistency and resolve in worship.

    Honorable Believers!
    Our lives, entrusted to us by Allah, shall eventually end and  we  shall
be judged for our actions. We must appreciate the value of living and  being
a servant before  our  fortune  of  life  runs  out.  We  must  not  deprive
ourselves of the peace, blessing and  pleasure  of  worship.  Let  us  bring
meaning  to  our  lives  with  the  awareness  of  worship  and  seize   the
opportunity of the three blessed months, the  season  of  mercy,  grace  and
worship. Let us cling to worship with patience, gratitude and submission  to
Allah. Let us keep performing our prayers in awe. Let us read and be  guided
by the Holy Qur'an. Let us open the doors of  benevolence,  and  compete  in
good deeds. Let us purify our speech of lie, gossip  and  slander,  and  our
hearts of grudge, hate and discord.

    I would like to end the  khutbah  with  this  prayer  from  our  beloved
Prophet: ""O Allah! Help me in remembering You, giving  thanks  to  You,  and
worshipping You well.""[viii]
-----------------------
[i] Bukhari, Jihad, 46, Muslim, Iman, 48.
[ii] Furqan, 25/77.
[iii] Fatiha, 1/5.
[iv] Ra'd, 13/28.
[v] Bukhari, Iman, 2.
[vi] Hijr, 15/99.
[vii] Bukhari, Riqaq, 18; Muslim, Musafirin, 215.
[viii] Abu Dawud, Tafriu Abwab al-Witr, 26.
                    General Directorate of Religious Services


"
8;2019-07-05;"DATE: 05.07.2019

	PRESERVATION OF FAMILY ENVIRONMENT: A RIGHTEOUS AND PEACEFUL FUTURE

Honorable Muslims!

The Almighty Allah (swt) states in the verse I have quoted, ""O people! Indeed, We have created you from a male and a female, and made you into tribes and nations so that you may get to know one another. Surely, the most noble of you in the sight of Allah is the most righteous among you. Allah is truly All-Knowing, All-Aware.""

The Prophet Muhammad (saw) says in the hadith I have quoted, ""O people! Your blood, property, and honor are sacred to one another like the sanctity of this day of Eid al-Adha in this month of Dhu al-Hijjah in this city of Makkah.""

Dear Muslims!

We are born, when the Almighty Allah (swt) appreciates, to the mother and father that are predestined by Him, and again with the gender designated by Him. The creation of human beings in two genders as male and female is one of the proofs of Allah’s (swt) existence and power. In this sense, it is Allah (swt) Who has bestowed different abilities and superiorities upon to man and woman, made them spouses to each other, and had them have children since Adam (as) and Hawwa (ra). 

The creation of human beings as male and female is the predestination of the Almighty Allah (swt) and a condition reqired by the laws of Allah, which bears many wisdoms. What falls upon us as His servants is to respect His disposition, display respect to both genders, and establish and sustain justice and compassion between them.

Honorable Muslims! 

The Exalted Allah (swt) wants us to live a life in accordance with the wisdom underlying our creation, and the honor and dignity of being human. He wants us to get married, have a family, and bring up strong and faithful generations. Protecting our children and safeguarding our future are the duties of all of us as His believing servants. The security of our children is as much valuable and inviolable as the security of our lives and properties. Our chastity, dignity, and efforts to live by halal means are sacred.

Dear Believers!

The most valuable institution that help protect the chastity, respectability, and rights of both man and woman is family. Family life establishes the bonds of trust and peace between us. All kinds of opinions and behaviors that ignore family and destroy family structure, in fact, target social bonds.

In order for a society to look at its future with hope, the first thing to is to encourage the young people of marriage age to get married and set up legitimate relations. For family is the oldest, the most deep-rooted unit, and the strongest tower for humankind to continue living in a proper way, from past to present.

Dear Muslims!

Marriage is the most blessed contract concluded pursuant to the commandment of Allah (swt) with reference to the Prophet Muhammad (saw). Marriage means both happiness and responsibility for man and woman. Extramarital relationships and ""unrestricted approaches"" diguised under the name of ""sexual freedom"" are far from respecting the rights and integrity of men and women. Living together without a legal and recognized marriage is prohibited by Allah (swt). Nothing good results from a wrong path full of haram. For haram always causes misperceptions and is destructive; it harms people and damages society.

Honorable Muslims!

Allah the Exalted (swt) has predestined our gender just like our race, skin color, and lifetime. Trying to change the codes of human nature and the innate characteristics of genders are against the laws of Allah (swt). The attempts to interrupt genders and the efforts to promote genderlessness would destroy not only individuals but also the entire generation eventually. Disregarding the divine will by presenting the choice of gender as if it were an individual freedom and choice means to step out of line and deviate from servitude to Allah (swt). All beliefs have rejected and cursed such understandings throughout the history.

Honorable Believers!

Nations survive thanks to their religious and moral values. When these values are weakened, the society starts to be dissolve, and our future will be endangered. The Almighty Allah (swt) informs us of the destruction of many communities throughout the history because they ignored the revelation and went through moral corruption and perversion. According to the Holy Qur'an, the Prophet Lot addressed his people of corrupted human nature, “We had sent Lot as a prophet. He scolded the men of his people, ""Do you commit a shameful deed that no man has ever done before? You lust after men instead of women! You are certainly transgressors!""

Dear Muslims!

Let us draw a lesson from the tribes that were destroyed because of their depravity and stepping out of line. Let us strive to live a decent life in compliance with our nature. Let us protect the honor and dignity of humanity by considering them as our dearest and most precious values just as we protect our lives. Let us stay away from extremisms and improper practices that may harm the honor of man and woman. Let us value and show due care to our daughters and sons as they deserve. Let us remember that we are all responsible of bringing up proper generations, which is only possible through educating our children and young people against perverted understandings, raising their awareness, and protecting them."
9;2018-06-13;"
DATE        : 13.06.2018
                                    [pic]
                        JULY 15 - REBIRTH OF A NATION
    Jumu'ah Mubarak Honorable Believers!
    The homeland we inhabit is not just a piece of soil. It is the  land  of
our forefathers. It is a trust from the martyrs. Homeland is the land  where
we cherish heartily and for which we sacrifice our lives  so  that  we  move
forward to the future with firm steps.
    We have held to our  homeland  with  affection  and  loyalty  throughout
history. We walked towards martyrdom for our sacred values  without  batting
an eyelid. We had a matchless fight for survival despite poverty and  penury
at Çanakkale and at the War of Independence.  But  we  never  retreated.  We
rendered our chests  as  armors  against  many  disgraceful  assaults.  With
Allah's (s.w.t.) grace and help, and our  courage  and  dedication,  we  won
great victories.
    On the night of July  15,  the  salas  we  recited  until  the  morning,
takbirs, prayers and  beseechings  united  with  the  prayers  of  believing
brothers of ours from all corners of the world  for  the  salvation  of  our
nation. United wholeheartedly as a nation, we flooded the squares. We put  a
lid altogether on  this  treacherous  assault  directed  at  our  unity  and
solidarity, at our independence and future. With that spectacular spirit  we
derived  from  our  faith  and  love  for  the  country,  we  rebutted   the
treacherous desires. With our foresight, vision and equanimity, we  returned
from the threshold of a huge disaster.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Our Lord Almighty (s.a.w.) enjoins in the verse I have  recited  at  the
beginning of my khutbah, ""And when  it  is  said  to  them,  'Do  not  cause
corruption on the earth', they say, 'We are but reformers.'  Unquestionably,
it is they who are the corrupters, but they perceive [it] not.""[i]

    Dear Muslims!
    The invasion attempt we were subjected to on the night of  July  15  was
cloaked in the guise of religion. Seeming to favor  the  truth  yet  serving
the falsity, the terrorist organization FETO abused  our  faith,  our  moral
sensitivities, our love for the Prophet (s.a.w.),  our  zakat  and  sadaqah,
our sacrifices, in short all our religious values and concepts. They  had  a
design against our nation, our unity and solidarity, and the future  of  our
country for their own interests.
    These traitors tried to separate children from their families and remove
their love for the country and  the  awareness  for  the  Ummah  from  their
hearts. They dragged our people into the swirls  of  insecurity  by  abusing
religious feelings in the guise of peace and betterment. But,  as  expressed
by our Prophet (s.a.w.), ""Muslim is the one from (the harm of) whose  tongue
and hand (other) Muslims are safe, and the believer is the one  whom  people
trust regarding their lives and their wealth.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    We have a book, in which not even a single letter has  been  altered,  a
prophet whose whole life is known in  its  clarity,  and  a  religion  whose
basic principles are quite obvious. Those  who  try  to  build  a  so-called
Islamic world upon dreams, mysteries and devious plans will  never  succeed.
It should be noted that those who  abuse  our  religion  for  their  hideous
purposes by mentioning  Allah  (s.w.t.)  and  His  Messenger  (s.a.w.)  will
always end up in disappointment. This  disappointment  will  seize  them  in
abasement in this world, and in torment in the afterlife.

    Venerable Muslims!
    Our duty is to not  establish  a  sublime  truth  such  as  religion  on
individuals in order to prevent any recurrence of the  July  15.  We  should
not entrust our intelligence,  our  will,  and  our  conscience  to  anybody
without questioning. We should learn Islam from the  correct  sources,  from
rightminded and  trustworthy  people.  We  should  live  our  lives  in  the
guidance of the Holy Qur'an and the Sunnah of our Beloved Prophet  (s.a.w.).
We should know that all approaches except the  prudent  path  on  which  the
majority of Muslims, from the generation of the Companions to this day,  are
deviant of the true path. We should not give credit to those who  invite  us
to servitude to themselves instead of to Allah (s.w.t.). We  should  protect
the Anatolian wisdom, which came into being for centuries  in  our  homeland
and sustained our religious life.

    Honorable Believers!
    In this hour when Our Lord (s.w.t.) accepts prayers, let us all  beseech
Him.
    O Lord! Protect us from all internal and external disasters to undermine
the perpetuity of our religion, our country, our  nation,  and  the  Islamic
World.
    O Lord! Do not give a chance to those who desire to  burn  us  with  the
flames of  disorder,  and  have  designs  against  our  dignity,  honor  and
brotherhood.
    O Allah! Protect us from all kinds of  disunion,  discord  and  violence
which overshadow our unity, amity and affection.
    O Allah! Do not deprive this honorable nation, who believe  in  You,  of
your help, your grace, your support and your mercy!
    O Lord of the Worlds! Bestow mercy upon our martyrs who sacrificed their
lives for the perpetuity  of  this  sacred  homeland  and  bestow  upon  our
veterans health and a benevolent life for the sake  of  Your  name  al-Shafi
(the Curer).
    O Allah! Grant us the chance to be a generation worthy of them!
-----------------------
[i] Baqarah, 2/11-12.
[ii] Tirmidhi, Iman, 12.
General Directorate of Religious Services

"
10;2018-05-18;"
DATE: 18.05.2018
                                                                       [pic]
    AL-QUDS: OUR NEVER-CEASING PAIN
    Jumu'ah Mubarak Honorable Believers!
    In the verse I have recited, Our Almighty Lord enjoins, ""And never think
that Allah is unaware of what the wrongdoers do. He only delays them  for  a
Day when eyes will stare [in horror].""[i]

    In the hadith I have read, our Prophet (s.a.w.) says, ""...Be  afraid  of
the curse of an oppressed person because there  is  no  screen  between  his
invocation and Allah.""[ii]

    Brothers and Sisters!
    Al-Quds is an ancient city of the humanity. It is a blessed, sacred  and
celestial town. It is a sacrosanct place. It is  forbidden  to  violate  its
honor or to harass its safety. This holy city - the first qiblah of  Muslims
-has been home to many prophets in the past. The land of al-Quds bears  dear
memories of many prophets.

    Masjid al-Aqsa, one of the oldest  and  most  precious  mosques  in  the
world, is also al-haram al-sharif. This noble  masjid  hosted  our  Prophet,
and has sent him off for Mi'raj.

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Al-Quds has been the symbol  of  a  firm  stand  on  faith,  a  resolute
approach, and an affectional loyalty to the sacred  throughout  the  history
of Islam. Just as Mecca and Madinah are the soul and love  of  Muslims,  al-
Quds is the blood flowing in our veins.  Al-Quds  is  the  keystone  in  the
""building of unity"" of the Ummah.

    Al-Quds is  not  an  ordinary  land.  Al-Quds  and  Masjid  al-Aqsa  are
entrusted to us by Our Prophet. Al-Quds  does  not  only  belong  to  people
living in Palestine and its surroundings, but it is also the  apple  of  our
eyes as all Muslims in the world, and  a  common  value  for  the  humanity.
Today, however, al-Quds is a test of conscience, law and  morality  for  the
Muslims and humanity.

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Called ""Dar as-Salam"" throughout history, meaning the  center  of  peace
and tranquility, al-Quds is facing a barbaric invasion today. People  living
in al-Quds  and  its  surroundings  are  being  exposed  to  oppression  and
violence, and are being subjected to inhumane practices.  Tens  of  innocent
people bearing nothing but faith and  courage  in  their  hearts  have  been
brutally murdered before the eyes of the entire world in the  Gaza,  on  the
eve of the holy month of Ramadan. In the  land  of  prophets,  guns  do  not
cease to fire, and continue spreading blood, tear and tribulation.

    The duty on each of us in this test of al-Quds is to not  condone  these
atrocities, and to not yield to oppression and injustice in  whichever  part
of the world, and on whomever it is being committed. It  is  to  not  remain
silent when people's freedom to life and faith is inhumanely  bereaved,  and
the adhan is silenced in the city blessed with Revelation. Today, our  noble
nation will take sides with the oppressed against the oppressors, as it  has
always done. But history will keep these flagrant attacks as a  disgrace  in
its memory, and those threatening peace and tranquility will  be  sooner  or
later punished.

    Honorable Believers!
    Let us learn from these calamities, oppression and  suffering  befalling
upon our brothers and sisters, the Islamic world and all innocent  humanity.
Let us strengthen our brotherhood in faith with the awareness of Ummah.  Let
us seek ways to overcome difficulties together. Let us not give a chance  to
the  movements  of  dissension  threatening  our  unity  and  harmony,   and
weakening our strength. Let us not refrain from telling  the  truth  in  the
faces of those oppressors who turn our region into the  land  of  blood  and
tears. Let us be on the side of mercy with all we have both  materially  and
spiritually. Let us keep alive the awareness for al-Quds, for faith and  for
justice.

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    In this holy month, on this holy day, at this holy place,  let  us  open
hands for praying to our Lord and implore:  O  Allah!  Have  mercy  for  our
brothers and sisters who are martyred in Gaza. O Allah! Unite our hearts  in
this season of peace in Ramadan, the month of mercy. Never  let  pull  apart
our ties of love with Masjid al-Aqsa. Keep alive our trust, love  and  faith
in each other.

    O Allah! Bestow upon us vision, foresight and wisdom! Do not let  us  be
of the band of oppressors even for a blinking of an eye! Do not  let  us  be
of those who remain silent to injustice, lawlessness and cruelty!  O  Allah!
Do not give a chance to those attempting to invade Masjid al-Aqsa! Help  our
Muslim brothers be freed very soon, of the predicament they are in!  Destine
us to uphold justice as a mighty Ummah again! O Allah, accept our prayers!
-----------------------
[i] Ibrahim, 14/42.
[ii] Bukhari, Zakat, 63; Muslim, Iman (Faith), 29
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services


"
11;2018-12-14;"
DATE : 14.12.2018
                 [pic]MERCY AND FORGIVENESS DOOR: REPENTANCE
    Esteemed Believers!
    Adam (a.s.) and his wife, our mother Eve, had  done  a  mistake  in  the
heaven. Immediately, they became aware of their mistake  and  regretted  it.
Our Sublime Lord, had blessed  them  with  the  virtue  of  repentance,  the
virtue of returning from their  mistake.  They  also  voiced  their  regret;
""They said, ""Our Lord, we have wronged ourselves, and if You do not  forgive
us and have mercy upon us, we will surely be among  the  losers.""""[i],  They
wished forgiveness from Allah. Thus, humanity learned the first instance  of
repentance from Hazrat Adam and his wife.

    Valuable Muslims!
    We're all human. Throughout our lives, we struggle with  the  devil  who
gives us evil suggestions, and our evil self which  tries  to  refer  us  to
mistakes.  In  this  struggle,  sometimes  we  fulfill  the  needs  of   our
servitude; sometimes we experience skids, heedlessness and  error.  When  we
make a mistake, we do not give up hope from Allah and we open the  gates  of
mercy with the key of repentance.

    Valuable Believers!
    Repentance is the gospel of salvation and purification,  which  Almighty
Allah favored to His servants. It is the remembrance  of  the  Lord  by  the
servant, expression of weakness and asking  forgiveness  and  mercy  of  The
Supreme Allah. This is the servant's asylum  to  Almighty  Allah,  the  most
Merciful of the merciful. So to speak, repentance is a  treat  for  us  from
Our Lord, to start life again, to open a clean page. For  the  believer  who
is caught in temptation, it is the most important guide that determines  the
way and direction.

    Esteemed Muslims!
    Allah has many names, meaning  forgiveness  and  pardoning.  He  is  the
Tawwab; The Ever-Pardoning, Ever Relenting, he  is  the  great  accepter  of
repentances. He is Afuww; The Pardoner, The Forgiver, he who forgives  those
who take refuge in  his  great  mercy.  He  is  Ghafur;  The  All-Forgiving,
forgives who wishes to be forgiven and whom he  wills.  He  is  Sattar,  The
Veiler, He veils errors and flaws.

    The Supreme  Allah  never  turns  those  who  turn  to  Him  and  repent
sincerely, empty handed. He never embarrasses those who sincerely submit  to
him. He graces His servants with His mercy. Thus, Our Sublime  Lord  in  The
Holy Qur'an commands so: ""...Except for those who  repent,  believe  and  do
righteous work. For them Allah will replace their evil deeds with good.  And
ever is Allah Forgiving and Merciful.""[ii]

    Honorable Muslims!
    The essence of the repentance is  a  sincere  and  cordial  appeal.  Our
Sublime Lord commands, ""O you  who  have  believed,  repent  to  Allah  with
sincere repentance...""[iii].

    The essence of repentance is the regret  we  feel  in  our  hearts.  The
Magnanimous Prophet (s.a.w.), has expressed this fact in  a  hadith,  saying
""Regret/remorse for the sin is repentance""[iv].

    The essence of repentance is to realize our mistakes and sins as soon as
possible and to turn to Almighty Allah. As  it  is  commanded  in  the  Holy
Qur'an: ""The repentance accepted by Allah is only for those who do wrong  in
ignorance [or carelessness] and then repent soon after. It is those to  whom
Allah will turn in forgiveness, and Allah is ever Knowing and Wise.""[v].

    The essence of the repentance is perseverance to not to  return  to  the
sins, and not to be a  slave  of  whim  and  ambition.  Our  Master  Prophet
(s.a.w.) described repentance as ""To leave  the  sin,  never  to  return  it
again.""[vi].

    Valuable Believers!
    The repentance door is wide open. It will remain  open  until  the  last
breath. So, our duty is to seek the ways of sipping  the  sea  of  mercy  of
Allah. With sincerity, with regret, with determination  to  take  refuge  in
His mercy and miracle. In the chaos of everyday life, it is  to  purify  our
hearts and our minds. May Allah give us  all  awakened  hearts,  forgiveness
and mercy, happiness in the world and Hereafter as beneficence.

    I am finishing our khutbah with the prayer of Our Prophet (s.a.w.):

    [pic] ""O Allah, You are my Lord, there is none worthy of worship  except
You, You created me and I am Your slave. I am adhering to Your covenant  and
Your promise as much as I am able to, I seek refuge in You from the evil  of
what I have done. I admit to You your blessings upon me, and I admit  to  my
sins. So forgive  me,  for  there  is  none  who  can  forgive  sins  except
You.""[vii]
-----------------------
[i] A'raf, 7/23.
[ii] Furqan, 25/70.
[iii] Tahrim, 66/8.
[iv] Ibn Hanbal, I, 423.
[v] Nisa, 4/17.
[vi] Ibn Hanbal, I, 446.
[vii] Tirmidhi, Supplication, 15.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
12;2019-05-10;"
DATE: 10.05.2019
[pic]
    RAMADAN AND INFAQ
    Honorable Believers!
    The Almighty Allah (swt) states  in  the  verse  I  have  just  recited:
""Believe in Allah and His Messenger, and donate from what He  has  entrusted
you with. So those of  you  who  believe  and  donate  will  have  a  mighty
reward.""[i]

    The Prophet Muhammad (saw) informs us in the hadith qudsi I have recited
that the Almighty Allah (swt)  states:  ""O,  Children  of  Adam,  Spend  (on
charity) and I shall spend on you.""[ii]

    Dear Muslims!
    Infaq means that believers spend out of their wealth to have the consent
of Allah (swt). It is to help spouses, fellows, relatives and needy  people.
It is to let others benefit from the wealth bestowed to him by Allah  (swt).
It is to win the heart of his brother, to help the ones  who  are  in  need,
and to offer the ones who are not in need.  Prophet  Muhammad  (saw)  points
out in a hadith that infaq and sadaqah will not be unreciprocated  and  will
be rewarded: ""Without doubt sadaqah eases the wrath of Allah and  saves  you
from dying in a bad way.""[iii]

    Honorable Muslims!
    Infaq enables humans to adopt a balanced  attitude  towards  wealth.  It
prevents  both  being  stingy  due  to  ambition  of  owning  property   and
squandering unwisely. It develops the feelings of brotherhood  and  sharing.
The happiness and satisfaction of the  needy  people  turn  into  peace  and
relief in  the  heart  of  the  people  who  spend  in  charity.  Therefore,
believers reach to benevolence truly. In  this  regard,  Allah  the  Exalted
(swt) states in the Holy  Qur'an:  ""You  will  never  achieve  righteousness
until you donate some  of  what  you  cherish.  And  whatever  you  give  is
certainly well known to Allah.""[iv]

    Dear Believers!
    Islamic civilization that is built on iman, knowledge, wisdom and  skill
is also a civilization of  infaq.  Sharing,  collaboration,  solidarity  and
infaq are at the center  of  the  lives  of  Muslims.  Because  our  Beloved
Prophet Muhammad (saw) advised this ummah to be like bricks of  a  building,
organs of a body, and teeth of a comb.  Muslims  share  their  savings  with
their relatives, neighbors, close or distant coreligionists  and  the  needy
members of the family of humanity. They live by the principle in  the  verse
of ""Those who (in charity) spend of their goods by  night  and  by  day,  in
secret and in public, have their reward with their Lord: On  them  shall  be
no fear, nor shall they  grieve.""[v]  They  think  of  both  their  and  the
society's goodness while working by day and night.

    Honorable Muslims!
    How sad  it  is  that  today  we  are  combating  with  the  disease  of
secularization which makes wealth the objective of life and fails to use  it
as a means.  Selfishness,  fondness  for  property,  passion  of  power  and
interest, and lives based on show-off have been the disasters of  this  age.
The virtues such as  collaboration,  solidarity  and  making  sacrifice  for
others have been damaged. In such  an  age,  the  interminable  desires  and
ambitions into which humanity is dragged can only be overcome  by  means  of
the awareness of infaq and collaboration. Those who are stingy  and  do  not
give the poor, needy, orphan, almsman,  and  people  who  are  in  financial
difficulties and stranded their due will drag themselves  and  the  humanity
into calamity. Our Beloved Prophet (saw) warns us in his  hadith:  ""Children
of Adam say: 'My wealth, my wealth.' Do you own of your  wealth  other  than
what you eat and consume, and what you wear and wear out, or what  you  give
in sadaqah (charity) (to those who deserve it), and that what you will  have
in stock for yourself?""[vi]

    Dear Muslims!
    The month of Ramadan is a unique opportunity  for  infaq,  collaboration
and sharing. In these days of Ramadan when we  show  our  servitude  to  our
Almighty Allah (swt) by means of various deeds, let  us  take  needy  people
under our wings with our financial worships such as zakat  and  sadaqah  al-
fitr. Let us ease the pain of our brothers and  sisters.  Let  us  give  our
charity without show-off and only for having the  consent  of  the  Almighty
Allah (swt). Let us avoid the attitudes that may hurt honor of our  brothers
and sisters while giving charity to  them.  Let  us  pay  attention  to  the
statement of Allah the Exalted (swt): ""O believers! Donate from the best  of
what you have earned and of what We have produced for you  from  the  earth.
Do not pick out worthless things for donation, which  you  yourselves  would
only accept with closed  eyes.  And  know  that  Allah  is  Self-Sufficient,
Praiseworthy.""[vii]

    Honorable Believers!
    Our Presidency of Religious Affairs  determined  this  year's  theme  of
Ramadan as ""Ramadan and Infaq"". With this occasion, the subject of infaq  is
going to be kept on the agenda in all aspects  with  the  activities  to  be
organized in homeland and abroad and it will be tried to create  sensitivity
about this subject. Thus,  it  will  be  tried  to  keep  the  awareness  of
collaboration and sharing alive and to expand the ethics of  infaq  further.
Let us remember that the charities we give by observing the consent  of  our
Almighty Allah (swt) are  going  to  be  our  most  beautiful  food  in  the
Hereafter.
-----------------------
[i] Hadid, 57/7.
[ii] Muslim, Zakat, 36.
[iii] Tirmidhi, Zakat, 28.
[iv] Ali 'Imran, 3/92.
[v] Baqarah, 2/274.
[vi] Muslim, Zuhd, 3.
[vii] Baqarah, 2/267.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services


"
13;2019-06-21;"
DATE: 21.06.2019
[pic]
    FAITH IN ALLAH
    Dear Muslims!
    The Almighty Allah (swt) states in  the  Surah  al-Ikhlas  that  I  have
quoted at the beginning of the khutbah, ""Say: He is Allah  Who  is  One  and
Only; the Sustainer needed by all; He neither begets nor is born; and  there
is none equivalent or comparable to Him.""[i]

    In the hadith I have quoted, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) states, ""Whoever
sincerely testifies that none has the right to be worshipped but  Allah  and
Muhammad is His messenger, Allah will save him from the Hellfire.""[ii]

    Honorable Believers!
    Allah the Almighty (swt) is the Lord of the worlds. All kinds of  praise
and thanks, power and magnificence, supremacy  and  superiority  pertain  to
Him. Whatever exists in the heavens and on earth is owned by Him. Allah  the
Exalted (swt) has an absolute power and endless wisdom. He is  the  one  who
creates death and life, bestows property and  authority,  and  glorifies  or
abases those whom He desires. He is the one Who  creates  and  continues  to
create. He is the one Who lets people live, gives livelihood  to  them,  and
feeds and protects them. He is the only one Who dominates in,  executes  and
manages every field and moment of life. Thus,  it  is  stated  in  the  Holy
Qur'an, ""Of Him seeks (its need)  every  creature  in  the  heavens  and  on
earth: Every day in (new) splendor doth He (shine)!""[iii]

    Dear Believers!
    Faith in Allah is the first  condition  of  being  honored  with  Islam.
Believing in Allah's (swt) existence, oneness,  uniqueness,  and  having  no
equivalence and partner, that is to say, adopting tawhid  is  the  basis  of
principles of faith. The greatest right Allah (swt),  Who  created  us  from
nothing and lets us live with His endless  blessings,  has  over  us  is  us
having faith in Him.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Faith in Allah (swt) requires following the  Prophet  assigned  by  Him,
living by the Holy Qur'an sent down by Him, and showing  submission  to  His
commands and rulings. Muslims do  not  consider  faith  in  Allah  (swt)  as
uttering some words only. On the contrary, faith in  Allah  (swt)  makes  it
obligatory to know Allah (swt) by means of  both  the  verses  of  the  Holy
Qur'an and the hadiths of the Prophet Muhammad (saw) and to live a  life  in
line with this faith. Having faith in Allah (swt) adds meaning to the  lives
of Muslims,  guides  their  ideas  and  decisions,  and  affects  all  their
relations with all living and non-living beings. Therefore, faith  which  is
uttered by Muslims  and  takes  root  in  their  hearts  is,  in  fact,  the
assurance of benevolence on earth.

    Dear Believers!
    Those who believe in Allah (swt) observe the  consent  of  the  Almighty
Allah (swt) in everything they do. They protect the rights of their  family,
relatives, neighbors, and employees. They fulfill every job undertaken  with
the consciousness of trust.

    Those who believe in Allah (swt) know that even the smallest benevolence
will be rewarded and even the smallest evil will be punished.  They  do  not
attach more importance to the world than the  Hereafter,  and  they  live  a
life for which they can account.

    Those who believe in Allah (swt) cannot be rude and oppressive.  On  the
contrary, they value consultation in all their endeavors. They  adopt  mercy
and compassion as principle.

    Muslims who believe in Allah (swt) are tightly bound to their  homeland,
fellow citizens, religion, and values. They  may  sacrifice  their  property
and even their life, but they do not turn away from their sacred values.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Faith in Allah (swt) is a reliable guide to lead us to the true path  in
the world, and take us to heaven in the Hereafter. Our faith  in  Allah  the
Exalted (swt) is our most  precious  treasure  as  us  being  His  servants.
Spending a life with faith in Allah, accompanying our deeds with our  faith,
uttering the words of  faith  in  our  last  breath,  and  leaving  faithful
generations are all our desire.

    I would like to conclude with the following words of the Prophet Ibrahim
(as) as stated in the Holy Qur'an, ""He is the One Who  created  me,  and  He
alone guides me. He is the One Who provides me with food and drink.  And  He
alone heals me when I am sick. And He is the One Who will cause me  to  die,
and then bring me back to life. And He is the One Who, I hope, will  forgive
my flaws on the Day of Judgement.""[iv]
-----------------------
[i] Ikhlas, 112/1-4.
[ii] Bukhari, 'Ilm, 49.
[iii] Rahman, 55/29.
[iv] Shu'ara, 26/78-82.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
14;2019-03-15;"
DATE: 15.03.2019
                                    [pic]
    THE TURKISH VICTORY OF THE BATTLE OF GALLIPOLI AND THE ESPRIT DE CORPS
    Dear Muslims!
    What is called as homeland is the land where people live  in  peace  and
security, enjoying the grace of independence  and  sovereignty.  It  is  the
home for those people who sacrifice  themselves  for  the  same  values  and
build the future for the same  ideals.  It  is  the  legacy  of  people  who
sacrifice their lives, becoming martyrs, and who give up on  their  physical
integrities, becoming war  veterans,  to  protect  their  religion,  nation,
honor, and dignity.  As  a  matter  of  fact,  the  return  of  keeping  and
defending such a legacy shall be freedom.

    Honorable Believers!
    The martyrdom, the name for giving souls for the  sake  of  holy  values
ordered by Allah (s.w.t.) to be  protected,  is  one  of  the  most  supreme
positions since a martyr takes the risk of abandoning all such beloved  ones
as his mother,  father,  wife,  and  children  for  the  sake  of  religion,
homeland, nation, state, and freedom.  In  return,  the  reward  of  such  a
unique sacrifice is to be honored by endless kind  treatments  and  honoring
of the Almighty Allah (s.w.t.).  In  this  respect,  He  refers  to  such  a
supreme position to be reached by martyrs as follows: ""And  never  think  of
those who have been killed in the cause of Allah as dead. Rather,  they  are
alive with their Lord, receiving provision,  Rejoicing  in  what  Allah  has
bestowed upon them of His bounty, and they receive good tidings about  those
[to be martyred] after them who have not yet joined them - that  there  will
be no fear concerning them, nor will they grieve.""[i] Moreover, the  Prophet
Muhammad (saw) described the rank position of martyrs in  the  Hereafter  as
follows: ""No one accepted to the Heaven shall desire turning back  to  earth
even if everything on earth belongs to them.  Only  a  martyr  shall  desire
turning back to earth and being a martyr again and again thanks to the  kind
treatments and honoring he experienced.""[ii]

    Honorable Muslims!
    For centuries, our ancestors have protected the lands we live on through
their faith in Allah (s.w.t.), their love for homeland, their  courage,  and
sacrifice. In no period of the history have  they  capitulated  their  faith
and freedom, nor have they  ever  surrendered  to  any  tyranny.  They  have
battled for every corner of the homeland with the understanding ""I shall  be
a martyr if I die and a veteran if I survive,"" and  under  no  circumstances
have they let the enemies in our homeland that they took  as  more  precious
than their lives. The history is  full  of  heroic  sagas  of  our  glorious
ancestors tackling with any challenges for the sake of  their  homeland  and
sanctity. Çanakkale Victory  was  precisely  one  of  such  sagas  in  which
faithful chests reared with the love for Allah (s.w.t.).

    Dear Believers!
    Çanakkale Victory is the name of the great battle undertaken by a  whole
nation including women, men, the young, and the old,  standing  shoulder  to
shoulder. Çanakkale is where the gallant Mehmetçik, the namesake of whom  is
the Prophet Muhammad (saw), shouted out ""Çanakkale  is  Impassable""  to  the
world, and  where  they  fell  on  the  ground  upon  being  shot  on  their
immaculate foreheads. Çanakkale Victory is one that was won  by  those  with
hearts full of unshakeable faith, those with hearts beating  with  love  for
homeland, against the great powers despite all poverty and unfortunateness.

    Honorable Muslims!
    The Battle of Çanakkale showed us that  under  no  circumstances,  those
hearts beating for the purposes of getting the approval  of  Allah  (s.w.t.)
and making i'la kalimatillah (glorifying  and  disseminating  the  words  of
Allah (s.w.t.)) dominant in the world, could be enslaved. Our  flag  bearing
the color of our martyrs' blood will never  stop  waving  high  in  the  sky
until as long as only one soul is left  on  these  lands.  The  adhans,  the
shahadah of which is the base of the religion, shall always sound  loud.  In
case of a necessity, many souls shall pass away for such sake;  however,  no
disallowed hand shall be able to touch upon what is  sacred  for  us.  Those
who have designs against damaging the unity and solidarity  of  our  nation,
in servitude to Allah (s.w.t.) only, shall never be able to succeed.

    Dear Believers!
    Today, what falls upon us is to comprehend the magnificent spirit having
reared in Çanakkale, to gather around our values that make us 'us', and  the
nation that we are, and to transfer them to our next generations. It is  our
responsibility to bring the sanctity bestowed  on  us  by  our  martyrs  and
veterans under the same awareness and ideals.
    We should always remember that as long  as  we  keep  the  awareness  of
unity,  solidarity,  brotherhood  and  sisterhood  alive  and  preserve  our
values, there can be no malicious attack  we  cannot  resist,  no  fight  we
cannot come out as victorious, and no victory we cannot gain.
    Honorable Believers!
    The hateful attack at our Muslim brothers during their  worship  in  New
Zealand today-Friday as the feast for Muslims-has deeply  hurt  our  hearts.
This should be clearly noted that no attack at worship  places  and  Muslims
can be acceptable, regardless of where it takes places  in  the  world,  who
does it, and why it is done.
    In the face of such provocative incidents, we as Muslims should act with
common sense. We wish Allah's mercy upon our martyred  brothers,  and  quick
recovery for our injured brothers. May Allah protect the Muslim  Ummah  from
any kind of troubles.
-----------------------
[i] AABFJYZ_fïßÄ° ?Ep`pG7'hgÇhF""5?CJaJmH     sH   hgÇhÌxø5?CJaJmH  sH
0hgÇhib»B*[ii]CJ\?^J_H[pic]8aJmH  phÿsH      hgÇh«9ð5?CJaJmH sH
hgÇhÊS15?CJaJmH  sH    hgÇhî©5li ?mran, 3/169-170.
[iii] Bukhari, Jihad, 21.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
15;2018-07-01;"DATE: 1.07.2018

USURY: ILLICIT EARNING

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

In the verse I have recited from the Qur’an, Our Almighty Lord enjoins, “O you who have believed, do not consume usury, doubled and multiplied, but fear Allah that you may prosper.”

And in the hadith I have read, our Prophet (s.a.w.) says, “There is no one who deals in usury a great deal (to increase his wealth) but he will end up with little.”

Brothers and Sisters!

The true owner of all kinds of blessings that we benefit is the Supreme Lord, al-Malik (the Owner), who owns the earth and the heavens. Our Lord has granted us, His servants, things from his possession, and availed countless bounties for us. But He forbade us from resorting to certain earnings and misusages which could unsettle us in this world, and lead to punishment in the Hereafter. One of them is usury –ill-gotten gain without labor or effort.  Usury is the illicit surplus people add in their assets. Usury is to disregard the values such as justice, mercy, helping, and solidarity, brought by Allah’s Messenger (s.a.w.), who said, “Whoever deceives us is not one of us.” Usury is to disrespect the holiness of toils. Usury is a great sin with a big price to pay both in this world and in the Hereafter.

Brothers and Sisters!

			Usury is forbidden, because it contradicts the concept of Haqq –the rightfulness– which underlies Islam’s system of laws and morality. Usury paves the way for deceiving people easily, disregarding rightful dues of others. It leads to disaster the individuals who think they are winning while losing in fact, and the societies who lose confidence in each other. Usury costs the uberty of not only assets but also life. Bankruptcies, suicides, scattered families and wasted lives are each the results of usury. Allah Almighty informs us of the warning aftermath of those who derived ill-gotten gains without hard work as follows: “Those who consume interest cannot stand [on the Day of Resurrection] except as one stands who is being beaten by Satan into insanity. That is because they say, ‘Trade is [just] like interest.’ But Allah has permitted trade and has forbidden interest…”

Honorable Believers!

Certainly, trade cannot be thought the same as interest! Because, trade involves endeavor, pain, risk and labor. It entails the effort to make a living by halal (lawful) means. Usury, however, encourages people to make money without trouble, thus it makes people lazy and insusceptible. In this respect, Our Lord enjoins as such, “Allah will deprive usury of all blessing, but will give increase for deeds of charity: For He does not love creatures ungrateful and wicked.” 

Considering usury to be one of the seven devastating things, our Prophet (s.a.w) forbade usury for the entire society, his family any kin being in the first place, and gave this message in the Farewell Sermon, “Days of Ignorance is under my feet completely abolished. The usury of the pre-Islamic period is abolished, and the first of our usury I abolish is that of my uncle ‘Abbas b. ‘Abd al-Muttalib.” 

Brothers and Sisters!

While the rich multiply their assets via usury, the burden on the weak and needy grows day by day.  Those who become selfish with greed for property and prestige seemingly get rich in the eyes of people, but in fact grow poor morally and lose value before the Almighty Lord. Their life in this world and in the Hereafter is imperiled for the sake of petty gains.

Esteemed Muslims! 

This world is ephemeral and merely a place of trial. What is eternal is the afterlife. When we are in the divine presence, we will definitely be asked “about our wealth, how we earned it and how we spent it upon.”  Then, let us avoid all kinds of ill-gotten and forbidden gains, in particular usury. Let us give up on all business with small and big amounts of usury. Let us not allow usury to destroy our generations, our society, and our future. Let us protect our morality in trade as in all other aspects of life. Let us protect ourselves and families from ill-gotten gains.  Let us remember that usury will take us to only Allah’s wrath, a great frustration, and remorse both in this world and in the Hereafter."
16;2018-11-09;"
DATE: 09.11.2018
[pic]
                     A BLESSING WORTH THE WORLDS: HEALTH
    Honorable Muslims!
    In the verse I have recited, the Prophet  Ibrahim  (as)  introduces  our
Almighty Lord (swt) as, ""Who created me, and He [it is who] guides  me.  And
it is He who feeds me and gives me drink. And when I am ill, it  is  He  who
cures me. And who will cause me to die and then bring me to life.""[i]

    Our Prophet (saw) said in the hadith I have  read:  ""Whoever  among  you
wakes up in the morning secured  in  his  dwelling,  healthy  in  his  body,
having his food for the day, then it is as if the world  has  been  gathered
for him.""[ii]

    Esteemed Believers!
    Our religion, which is the source of mercy, invites us  to  respect  the
limits set by Allah on the one hand while setting universal  principles  for
us to be healthy individuals and build a peaceful society on the other.  The
protection  of  life  comes  on  top  of   these   principles,   which   are
indispensable for the believers. Because life, which is entrusted to  us  by
Allah Almighty (swt), is the gate to the world of trials. Both goodness  and
evil can be achieved only when we are alive. To believe and act  righteously
proper to the purpose of our creation is  possible  only  by  being  healthy
both physically and mentally.

    Dear Believers!
    It  is  a  matchless  blessing  to  live,  to  feel  the   dignity   and
responsibility of being human, and to have the mind and will  to  build  the
world. Leaving beautiful traces behind requires to be healthy.  However,  we
unfortunately cannot appreciate the value of life  and  health  bestowed  by
Allah (swt). We squander this treasure with  harmful  habits,  neglect,  and
wastefulness. We comprehend the true value of a  healthy  breath  and  body,
and a peaceful heart only  when  it  is  too  late.  For  this  reason,  the
Messenger of Allah (saw) warns us as, ""There are two  blessings  which  many
people fail (to appreciate): (They are) Health and free time.""[iii]

    Honorable Muslims!
    People who appreciate the value of their health protect themselves  from
any kind of material and spiritual damage and  also  pay  attention  to  the
treatment when ill. It is our responsibility to  seek  treatment  by  taking
refuge in the Shafii name of Almighty Allah (swt), and  to  treat  well  the
entrusted life. In this respect, our Prophet (saw) said, ""Seek treatment,  O
slaves of Allah! For Allah does not create any disease but He  also  creates
with it the cure.""[iv] and advised not to give up hope in recovery.

    Honorable Believers!
    What suits virtuous and conscientious Muslims is to protect  the  health
of their environment as well as their own health, care  for  their  brothers
and sisters who are waiting  for  healing,  and  do  their  best  for  their
treatment. The Messenger of Allah (saw),  who  placed  great  importance  on
praying for the patients and giving spiritual support to them  by  visiting,
said, ""Whoever relieves a Muslim of  a  burden  in  the  world,  Allah  will
relieve him of a burden on the Day of Judgement...""[v].

    Nowadays, many patients and relatives who have lost their health due  to
different reasons and who are running out of treatment  options  are  hoping
for organ transplantation for a long time. It is humane and moral to  donate
one's organs to others who need healing, without  any  material  expectation
in return, before  the  moment  to  leave  this  temporary  world  comes  as
preordained by Allah (swt). For what is essential  in  our  religion  is  to
save people's lives, protect the life on earth, and support the hope.

    Honorable Muslims!
    So, let us not  forget  that  every  healthy  moment  is  an  invaluable
blessing. Let us make it count and use wisely the days when  we  are  young,
lively, and healthy. Let us pay attention to eating halal  and  clean  food.
Let us stay away from harmful substances that threaten our  health  and  are
prohibited by our religion. Let us always listen to the following advice  of
our Prophet, ""Appreciate the value of five things before five  things  come.
Your young age before old age, your  health  before  sickness,  your  wealth
before poverty, your leisure time before being busy, and  your  life  before
death.""[vi]
-----------------------
[i] Shu'ara, 26/79-81.
[ii] Tirmidhi, Zuhd, 34.
[iii] Bukhari, Riqaq, 1.
[iv] Ibn Majah, Tibb, 1.
[v] Abu Dawud, Adab, 60; Tirmidhi, Birr, 19.
[vi] Hakim, Mustadrak, IV, 341.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
17;2018-02-02;"
LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE
DATE  : 02.02.2018

                                    [pic]

                       THE TWO MAIN SOURCES OF ISLAM:
                          THE QUR'AN AND THE SUNNAH
    Jumu'ah Mubarak, Honorable Believers!
    Our Almighty Lord enjoins in the verse I have recited: ""O you  who  have
believed, respond to Allah and to the Messenger when he calls  you  to  that
which gives you life. And know that Allah intervenes between a man  and  his
heart and that to Him you will be gathered."" [i]

    Our Prophet (s.a.w.) said in the hadith  I  have  read:  ""I  am  leaving
behind two things to you. As long as you hold to them tightly, you will  not
go astray. They are the Book of Allah and the Sunnah of His Prophet.""[ii]

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    The Holy Qur'an is the power and guide that constructs our world and our
afterlife, our present and our future. Our Prophet's  Sunnah  is  where  the
Qur'an  meets  with  life,  and  becomes  comprehensible  and   practicable.
Therefore, we have been learning the sure religion of Islam from  these  two
main sources for fourteen centuries.

    The Holy Qur'an commands us to believe in our Prophet besides the belief
in Allah. It asks obedience to the Prophet right after obedience  to  Allah.
Because our Prophet (s.a.w.) is the one who conveyed  and  taught  our  Holy
Book to us. The Qur'an has been transformed into  a  lifestyle  through  his
exemplary life. Those who organize their lives in the light  of  the  Qur'an
and in  the  unique  leadership  of  our  Prophet  would  never  lose  their
direction.

    Honorable Believers!
    The Holy Qur'an, the Book of our purpose of existence,  commands  us  to
believe in Allah and be a servant only to Him. Our Prophet  (s.a.w.)  showed
us the real faith as he did not bow before any power except  Allah,  and  he
displayed  a  dignified  and  honorable  stance  in  all  circumstances  and
situations.

    The Holy Qur'an commands us prayers which keep our faith alive and bring
us closer to Allah. And through his life,  our  Prophet  taught  us  how  to
pray, how to fast, how to pay zakat, how to perform the pilgrimage  and  how
to worship our Lord.

    The Qur'an commands us to enjoin what is good and forbid what  is  evil,
to defend the right and the truth, to be  trustworthy,  to  have  compassion
and mercy, in short to become honored with morality. Our Prophet  became  an
example to all of us about how to be a good  believer  by  practicing  these
virtues.

    Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
    The history is our witness that we have always been attached to our Holy
Book heartedly. We have felt  a  deep  fondness  towards  the  Messenger  of
Allah. We have been an honorable ummah and an example to  humanity  as  long
as we correctly understood and practiced the peaceful messages of  the  Holy
Qur'an and the Sunnah of our Prophet. But when we became unable  to  reflect
this devotion and  fondness  to  our  actions,  when  we  strayed  from  the
knowledge, wisdom, and determination that the Qur'an and the Prophet ask  of
us, then we lost our power and  weakened.  When  we  began  to  neglect  the
supreme spirit and ideals  that  the  Qur'an  and  the  Sunnah  want  us  to
achieve, then we got stuck in the swamp of ignorance.

    Dear Muslims!
    There is only one way for  us  to  free  ourselves  from  the  pain  and
difficulties we have been suffering and once again  become  an  ummah  which
offers peace, tranquility, and civilization to the humankind.  This  way  is
to hold tightly to the Qur'an and the Sunnah as the believers  of  our  Holy
Book and the ummah of our Beloved Prophet. It  is  to  make  no  concessions
from these two sources in learning and practicing  our  religion  correctly.
It is to be aware of those who try to put a wedge  between  the  Qur'an  and
the Sunnah, and those who try to obtain power and interest by abusing  these
most sacred values of ours. It is to make efforts to raise  generations  who
look at the world through the last Book of Allah and the pure Sunnah of  the
Prophet, who are devoted to their  religion  and  nation  with  a  sense  of
loyalty.

    Esteemed Brothers and Sisters!
    It is our duty to raise and educate  our  children  with  the  sense  of
faith, the love of prayer and the consciousness of morality  which  are  fed
by the Qur'an and the Sunnah. It is our goal  to  ensure  that  they  become
good persons and exemplary believers. I would like to  remind  you  esteemed
believers an important issue that could serve this goal: As  you  know,  The
Holy Qur'an, The Life of Our  Prophet  and  Basic  Religious  Knowledge  are
given as selective courses in our schools. We should be attentive to  ensure
our children to select these courses. Let us not  forget  that  our  beloved
children are entrusted to us by our Lord and it  is  our  responsibility  to
raise them to live  in  accordance  with  the  consent  of  Allah.  May  our
Almighty  Lord  make  our  children  dutiful  towards  their   parents   and
beneficial to their religion, nation and the humanity.
-----------------------
[i] Anfal, 8/24.
[ii] Muwatta Malik, The Decree, 3.
            Issued by: General Directorate of Religious Services


"
18;2019-02-15;"
DATE : 15.02.2019
       [pic]THE WAY OF MAKING LIFE LIVABLE: RELIGION AND SPIRITUALITY
    Honorable Muslims!
    Human beings need love, affection, and company from birth to death. They
search for a friend who  will  treat  their  spiritual  gaps  and  spiritual
tremors throughout his life. Our Lord's mercy is the only support that  will
give man peace in the world and the Hereafter.  Indeed,  Almighty  Allah  is
closer to the human beings than their jugular  veins.  When  they  pray,  He
answers them. He never leaves them alone in  the  misfortunes,  equips  them
with reason, heart, consciousness, and conscience. To the person who  thinks
that he is helpless, He grants exits in the example of Our Beloved  Prophet.


    Valuable Believers!
    Every period of life is accompanied by its own  blessings  and  burdens.
The years of childhood, youth, adulthood  and  old  age  sometimes  go  with
beautiful memories, sometimes  in  distress  and  sadness.  Confronting  the
examinations we face in life and finding a solution are  primarily  possible
with a  sound  heart.  A  sound  heart  is  a  heart  that  finds  peace  in
surrendering to Allah. Believer, nourishes his heart with faith.  Keeps  his
spirituality strong. He  takes  his  energy  from  worship.  The  doctor  of
hearts,  Our  Beloved  Prophet  (s.a.w.),  described   the   importance   of
spirituality that settles in the heart, as follows: ""...Beware! There  is  a
piece of flesh in the body if it becomes  good  (reformed)  the  whole  body
becomes good, but if it gets spoilt the whole body gets spoilt, and that  is
the heart.""[i]

    Valuable Muslims!
    A person who believes that he is under His unique mercy  and  protection
and that He can see and hear him at any moment does not have fear  of  being
alone and forlorn. He takes power from faith and spirituality to  make  life
livable, to overcome difficulties, to increase goodness.  As  he  feeds  his
spiritual world in healthy ways,  he  distances  himself  from  tension  and
conflict. He will have  peace  and  his  hope  increases.  Because,  as  our
supreme religion teaches us, human beings have spiritual needs  as  much  as
material needs. Spirituality is a natural part of life. It is  a  source  of
hope, patience and tolerance.

    Esteemed Muslims!
    Today, although the means of communication increases, human  beings  are
lonelier. Family  ties  were  weakened  and  kinship  relations  lost  their
vitality. The culture of consumption, based on  waste  and  pretentiousness,
has brought humanity in terms of the  spirit  and  body,  to  the  brink  of
extinction. At such a time, spiritual support and  guidance  for  people  of
all ages is an indispensable need.  Moral  support;  inoculates  persistence
and perseverance to those in need of help to survive. It  spreads  mercy  by
saying stop to violence and persecution. It  becomes  hope  in  coping  with
pain and grief,  in getting rid of addiction.

    Honorable Believers!
    The Supreme Allah, commands in  a  verse:  ""O  you  who  have  believed,
respond to Allah and to the Messenger when he calls you to that which  gives
you life. And know that Allah intervenes between a man  and  his  heart  and
that to Him you will be gathered.""[ii]

    Our clergy, who is now the servants of goodness, is responsible for  the
task of illuminating the society with the life-giving Islam. They serve  the
society day  and  night  with  sound  religious  knowledge  and  deep-rooted
experience of our tradition. They give spiritual counseling and guidance  to
our  nation  in  every  aspect  of  life  such  as  hospitals,  penitentiary
institutions, nursing homes, health institutions and dormitories  especially
mosques and Qur'an courses.

    Esteemed Believers!
    The only salvation that will make life meaningful for the depressed  man
is to return  to  its  essence,  to  search  for  verity  and  to  keep  his
spirituality alive. Let us not forget that the tired  hearts,  refresh  with
faith and fondness. Worn values are repaired with conscience. Sliding  lives
stabilize with spiritual support and guidance.

    I finish my khutbah with the translation of Surah  Ash-Sharh,  that  The
Supreme Allah bestowed to Our Beloved Prophet (s.a.w.) and to  all  humanity
as peace of mind: ""Did We not expand for you,  [O  Muhammad],  your  breast?
And We removed from you your burden. Which had weighed upon your  back.  And
raised high for you your repute. For indeed, with hardship [will  be]  ease.
Indeed, with hardship [will be]  ease.  So  when  you  have  finished  [your
duties], then stand up  [for  worship].  And  to  your  Lord  direct  [your]
longing.""[iii]
-----------------------
[i] Bukhari, Belief, 39.
[ii] Al-Anfal, 8/24.
[iii] Ash-Sharh, 94/1-8.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
19;2017-01-06;"
  LOCATION : NATIONWIDE
  DATE            : 06.01.2017

                                    [pic]

                      TODAY, WE UNITE AGAINST TERRORISM

  A Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters!
  We have been grieving in these days as  a  nation.  Because  we  suffered
disgustful terror attacks last week in Istanbul and yesterday in ?zmir.  The
innocent lives we have lost once again tore our heart out.  I  wish  Allah's
mercy to the ones we lost, a quick recovery  to  the  wounded.  I  offer  my
condolences to their families. And condolences to our nation and  the  human
family.

  Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
  As always expressed from this minbar, every human being is  honorable  in
our faith. The right to life is sacred for everyone. Their  life,  property,
dignity, and honor are untouchable.[i] The Holy Quran says ""Whoever kills  a
soul is as if he had slain the entire humankind.""[ii] The  primary  goal  of
our great religion Islam is to bring life to people. To make it  better.  To
make it improve.

  It should be known that all types of terrorism that target our  existence
have the same purpose even  though  their  names,  methods,  mentality,  and
appearance  are  different.  They  hurt   our   unity,   togetherness,   and
brotherhood. They destroy our culture  of  peaceful  co-existence  with  our
differences which offer richness. The purpose  of  terror  is  to  make  our
hearts to be held hostage by the darkness of mischief and  sedition,  hatred
and animosity, violence and hostility. Its aim is to drag us  into  a  swirl
of conflict and unrest. To weaken us. To kill our hopes for the future.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  In this difficult period we are going through, we  desperately  need  the
moral principles the Almighty taught us in the  Surat  al-Hujurat[iii].  Let
us lend an ear to these vital principles in today's khutbah.

  The first principle is ?????????????? which means ""investigate."" Our Lord
enjoins, ""O you who have believed, if there comes to  you  an  untrustworthy
one with information, investigate."" Considering a piece of information  true
without investigating it and verifying its accuracy may  lead  us  to  wrong
conclusions. It may cause undesired circumstances, sedition,  and  mischief.
And as a result, we may regret what we have done.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  The second  moral  principle  is  to  reconciliate  as  per  the  command
????????????.  It  is  to  resolve  issues  between  people.  It  is  to  be
constructive and corrective, not destructive and vindictive; to be  unifying
and inclusive, not divisive and disruptive. It is to join  forces  and  make
the power of love, fondness, and brotherhood prevail  against  the  darkness
of hostility, hatred, and violence. It is to band  together  and  drain  the
swamp of division and conflict.

  The third moral principle is to glorify justice by ????????????  that  is
""acting  justly.""  It  is  to  never  let  go  of  justice,   loyalty,   and
righteousness under any circumstances.

  Dear Brothers and Sisters!
  The fourth moral principle taught to us  by  Surat  al-Hujurat  is  which
means ??? ???????? ""do not mock others."" It is to never  scorn  and  despise
anyone. It is to never forget that, as the children  of  Adam  and  Eve,  we
have been created from the same origin.

  The fifth moral principle is to avoid defamation as per the command ?????
??????????? ????????????. It is to avoid offending  a  person  even  with  a
little gesture or implication. It is to keep away from any word or  behavior
that may hurt a person's honor and dignity.

  The sixth moral principle is,  ???????????????  ?????  ???????????  which
means ""Do not call each other by offensive nicknames.""  Because  a  person's
name, honor, and reputation are esteemed and  worthy  of  respect  like  the
person himself.

  Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
  The seventh moral principle  that  the  Surat  al-Hujurat  taught  us  is
???????????  ????????  ????  ?????????  that  is  to  avoid   making   wrong
assumptions  about  one  another  Because  assumption  about  others   often
misleads  and  causes  one  to  sin.  It  leads  to  misunderstandings   and
disturbances.

  The eighth moral principle is the command ????? ???????????. That is,  do
not spy and pry into the flaws and imperfections of others. It is  to  avoid
attempting to expose others' privacy. It is to remember that our  real  duty
is to correct our own mistakes and flaws.

  The ninth moral principle is ???????? ?????  ????????  that  is  ""Do  not
backbite each other. Do not talk behind one  another's  back.""  Because  our
duty is to protect the rights of our brothers and  sisters  even  when  they
are not present. It is to consider their  existence  as  ours.  To  consider
their honor as ours.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  May the Almighty Lord grant us to be  among  those  who  abide  by  these
principles. May He grant us to be among those who get their morals from  the
morals of the Quran and of the Prophet. May the Lord never allow  those  who
target our nation's unity and togetherness. May He  never  allow  harm  upon
our country and nation, the hope of the downtrodden.
-----------------------
[i] Bukhari, ?lim, 9.
[ii] Al-Ma'idah, 5/32.
[iii] Al-Hujurat, 49/1-18.

                 Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
20;2018-11-02;"
DATE: 02.11.2018
[pic]
    PURE FOOD, PURE GENERATION
    Honorable Muslims!
    One day the  Messenger  of  Allah  (saw)  addressed  all  humankind,  in
presence of his Companions, ""O people,  Allah  is  pure  and  He  therefore,
accepts only that which is pure. And Allah commanded  the  believers  as  He
commanded the Messengers..."" He continued by reciting the  following  verse:
""O messengers, eat from the good foods and do right. Indeed, I, of what  you
do, am Knowing.""[i]

    The Messenger of Allah (saw) then mentioned a person who had made  long-
distance travels, with his hair disheveled  and  his  clothes  covered  with
dust, he lifted his hand towards the  sky  (supplicating  as):  ""O  Lord,  O
Lord!"". Then our Prophet (saw) said: ""Whereas his  diet  was  unlawful,  his
drink was unlawful, and his clothes were unlawful, and his  nourishment  was
unlawful. How could then his supplication be accepted?""[ii]

    Esteemed Believers!
    Allah, the Owner of the heavens and the earth, created a  vast  universe
and a habitable world in it for humankind. He embellished it with sweet  and
pleasant waters, and countless kinds of delicious food. He bestowed us  with
the lands of crops, gardens of fruits, and the sun and rain  to  grow  them.
He gave, in service of humans,  countless  beings,  each  one  of  which  is
unique, beautiful and precious.  Then,  He  commanded  his  servants  to  be
selective by stating, ""And eat of what Allah has  provided  for  you  [which
is] lawful and good. And fear Allah, in Whom you are believers.""[iii]

    Humankind, however, mostly took the way of mischief and harmed not  only
themselves but also the world, our home,  instead  of  benefiting  from  the
blessings of the Lord  (swt)  and  beautifying  the  earth  and  reproducing
goodness. Charmed by city life, luxury, and  comfort,  they  have  abandoned
agricultural activities, the natural and balanced lifestyle.  Modifying  the
genetics of seeds, and poisoning the nature  with  chemical  and  artificial
products, they have spoiled the purest blessings. It was however,  the  duty
of all of us to take care of our soils, crops, and hand labor.

    Not heeding the divine warning, ""That  you  not  transgress  within  the
balance.""[iv], they have polluted the soil, the air,  and  the  water,  with
their own hands. Lured into  material  benefits,  they  have  forgotten  the
responsibility towards other  beings  and  future  generations  despite  the
warning of Allah the Almighty (swt), ""And  cause  not  corruption  upon  the
earth after its reformation...""[v]

    Esteemed Believers!
    The material and spiritual destruction in  a  society  begins  with  the
genetic modification of food. Indifference to halal and  haram  contaminates
people's  consciousness.  When  moral  values  and  human  values  are   not
observed, the things that people eat, drink, produce and  consume  start  to
cause  rather  harm  than  benefit,  which  eventually   leads   to   social
degeneration, and corrupts the nature of young minds and generations.  As  a
result, an environment emerges in which love, respect, and tolerance  become
extinct, and evil, impudence and injustice increase. As a  matter  of  fact,
the Lord Almighty (swt), referring to the hypocrites,  states  in  the  Holy
Qur'an, ""And when he goes away, he strives  throughout  the  land  to  cause
corruption therein and destroy crops and animals. And Allah  does  not  like
corruption.""[vi]. Therefore, those who want to destroy peace  and  order  on
earth strive to corrupt the crops and generations. The verse above  is  both
a warning and an invitation for believers to produce clean foods  and  build
a virtuous posterity.

    Dear Muslims!
    A deep effect has every word, every action, as well as every morsel,  on
our lives. We as human beings are responsible to watch what we eat and  what
we provide for our family and loved ones to eat. The world is  entrusted  to
us, and we are entrusted to each  other.  Then,  let  us  be  aware  of  our
responsibilities, and opt for a moderate and moral lifestyle. Let us  pursue
halal  earning,  clean  production,  balanced   consumption,   and   healthy
generations.
-----------------------
[i] Mu'minun, 23/51.
[ii] Muslim, Zakat, 65; Tirmidhi, Tafsir al-Qur'an, 2.
[iii] Ma'idah, 5/88.
[iv] Rahman, 55/8.
[v] A'raf, 7/56.
[vi] Baqarah, 2/205.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
21;2017-11-10;"
   LOCATION  : NATIONWIDE
   DATE        : 10.11.2017

                                                                       [pic]

   BELIEVER, THE ROLE MODEL
   Blessed Friday to You All, Brothers and Sisters!
   Our Lord Almighty enjoins in the verse I have recited:  ""The  Believers,
men and women, are protectors, one of another: they  enjoin  what  is  just,
and forbid what is evil: they  observe  regular  prayers,  practice  regular
charity, and obey Allah and His Messenger.  On  them  will  Allah  pour  His
Mercy: for Allah is Exalted in power, Wise."" [i]
   One day, our Prophet (pbuh) asked his companions: ""Shall  I  not  inform
you of the best of you from your worst?"" and continued: ""The best of you  is
the one whose goodness is hoped for, and people are safe from his evil.  And
the worst of you is he whose goodness is not hoped for, and people  are  not
safe from his evil."" [ii]

   Dear Brothers and Sisters!
   Our Prophet (pbuh) showed us how to be a good  believer,  a  role  model
through his words and his life. Let us pay heed to  the  characteristics  of
an exemplary believer in this khutba, as told  and  lived  by  our  Prophet,
Muhammad the Trustworthy. Let us remember again the good  things  that  will
bring us peace and happiness in this world  and  eternal  salvation  in  the
Hereafter.

   In the words of Allah's Messenger (pbuh), a believer is  submissive  and
loyal above all. He is precious, just like gold. [iii] Throughout his  life,
he displays an Abrahamic stance and keeps his dignity.  He  would  stand  on
his values and faith in every situation and says: [pic], meaning: 'To  Allah
we belong, and to Him is our return'. He would not abandon the  guidance  of
the Quran and the noble Sunnah, and would not turn away  from  the  straight
path.

   In the words of the Great Messenger (pbuh), a believer is like  a  honey
bee. Just like a honey bee, he would only eat nice, clean, halal things  and
produce good things. He would not hurt or harm anybody.[iv] His  heart  only
has place for the good, the useful and the positive; but not  for  the  bad,
the harmful and the negative.

   Dear Believers!
   A believer is like a date tree, as in our  Prophet's  expression.[v]  He
would keep his strength, his vitality through the power from his  faith.  He
would be beneficial to humanity without forgetting his purpose of creation.

   A believer would not fall down but stand firm, even  if  he  was  tested
with all kinds of misfortunes.[vi] He knows that a  believer's  task  is  to
accept the tests and misfortunes with  patience,  steadiness  and  solemnity
just like Ayyub did. It is to be able to say ""Your grace  is  welcome,  Your
wrath is too"" to whatever's coming from Allah Almighty.

   Honorable Believers!
   There is no place for sadness and despair in the life of a believer.  He
believes in this verse with all his heart: [pic] ""Have no  fear,  for  Allah
is with us"". [vii] He knows that he has a protector who stands by  his  side
when there are none, and who provides hope and relief.

   A believer is a person whose tongue and  hands  people  are  safe  from.
[viii] He would take refuge in Allah from deceiving and being  deceived,  in
accordance with this hadith: [pic] meaning: ""Those who deceive  is  not  one
of us.""[ix] Bad and false words,  insulting  and  heartbreaking  expressions
would not come out of a believers mouth. He would not  marginalize,  but  he
would unite; he would not  hate,  but  he  would  be  the  bringer  of  glad
tidings. He knows that one day he will account for all his actions  and  all
his words.

   Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
   A believer has sagacity, discernment and moderation in the words of  our
Prophet (pbuh). He considers life and  events  as  lessons  and  wisdom.  ""A
believer is not stung twice (by something) out of one  and  the  same  hole""
[x] He would not knowingly fall into error. He would not  allow  his  faith,
feelings and thoughts to be exploited. He would not give his heart and  mind
to others.

   A believer is humble, as he knows this hadith: ""He who has in his  heart
the weight of a mustard seed of pride  shall  not  enter  Paradise.""[xi]  He
loves the Created for the Creator's sake. He would know that a person is  no
good if he does not befriend others  and  others  could  not  befriend  him.
[xii] His actions are dressed in mercy, compassion, sincerity,  friendliness
and fondness.

   And finally, a believer is like herbalist who sells nice perfumes.[xiii]
He would offer people ethics, morals and virtue. He would take a good  place
in the minds of the people. He would  always  leave  a  nice  voice  in  the
hearts.

   Brothers and Sisters!
   How happy are those who is honored  by  these  praises  of  our  Prophet
(pbuh)! How happy are those who obtained the countenance of  Almighty  Allah
by embracing the reason of creation! How happy  are  those  who  transformed
the mortal world into eternal treasure!

-----------------------
[i] At-Tawbah, 9/71.
[ii] At Tirmidhi, Al Fitan, 76; Ahmed b. Hanbel, II, 268.
[iii] Ahmed b. Hanbel, II, 199.
[iv] Ahmed b. Hanbel, II, 199.
[v] Al Bukhari, Good Manners and Form (Al-Adab), 89.
[vi] Al Bukhari, Onenness, Uniquness of Allah (Tawheed), 31.
[vii] At-Tawbah, 9/40.
[viii] Al Bukhari, Faith, 4.
[ix] Sahih Muslim, Faith, 164.
[x] Al Bukhari, Good Manners and Form (Al-Adab), 83.
[xi] Sahih Muslim, Faith, 147.
[xii] Ahmed b. Hanbel, II, 400.
[xiii] Taberânî, el-Mu'cemü'l-Kebir, XII, 319.

                       Written by: General Directorate Of Religious Services

"
22;2017-03-24;"LOCATION        : NATIONWIDE

DATE                   : 24.03.2017



WISE PIECES OF ADVICE

Honorable Believers!

One of the people who the Almighty elevated by mentioning their name specifically in the Holy Quran is Luqman (as). In the verse in Surat Luqman that I have recited at the beginning of the khutbah, the Almighty enjoins, “We had certainly given Luqman wisdom saying, ‘Be grateful to Allah.’” This surah informs us about the pieces of advice he gave to his son in his wise style. It’s shown as an exemplary relationship between a father and his son based on love and respect, knowledge and wisdom, mercy and compassion. Let us lend an ear in today’s khutbah to the wise pieces of advice that Luqman (as) gave to his son. 

Brothers and Sisters! 

The first piece of advice given by Luqman (as) to his son was about oneness. He said to his precious son:  يَا بُنَيَّ لَا تُشْرِكْ بِاللّٰهِۜ  “O my son, do not associate [anything] with Allah.” إِنَّ الشِّرْكَ لَظُلْمٌ عَظِيمٌ   “Indeed, association with him is great injustice.” Because when one becomes a servant to anyone other than Allah, it’s the biggest injustice to his Lord and himself. 

Brothers and Sisters!

The piece of second advice in surat Luqman is, وَوَصَّيْنَا الْإِنسَانَ بِوَالِدَيْهِ  which is caring for parents. “His mother carried him, [increasing her] in weakness upon weakness, and his weaning is in two years.” That’s why the Almighty enjoins us: “Be grateful to Me and to your parents; to Me is the [final] destination. But if they endeavor to make you associate with Me that of which you have no knowledge, do not obey them but accompany them in [this] world with appropriate kindness and follow the way of those who turn back to Me [in repentance]. Then to Me will be your return, and I will inform you about what you used to do.

Brothers and Sisters!

Luqman’s (as) third piece of advice to his son is that not a single good deed will be wasted in the ranks of Allah. Even the smallest one will not go unanswered. Because Allah is aware of even the most well-kept things. He knows everything. 

Brothers and Sisters!

Luqman’s (as) fourth piece of advice to his son:

يَا بُنَيَّ اَقِمِ الصَّلٰوةَ “O my son, be steadfast in prayer.” Because prayer is our most important worship. It’s the time when our hearts exhilarate after all the constant troubles of the world. It’s the peace to our mind and spirit which get distressed by so many different things. It’s a glorious meeting where we present our desire to our Lord.  

Luqman’s (as) fifth piece of advice to his son,

وَأْمُرْ بِالْمَعْرُوفِ وَانْهَ عَنِ الْمُنكَرِ  “Son!  Enjoin what is right! Forbid what is wrong!”   Because our duty is to always side with the good. To never bow to evil. To never serve evil people.

Luqman’s (as) sixth piece of advice, وَاصْبِرْ عَلَى مَا أَصَابَكَ   “O son! Be patient over what befalls you!” means enduring in the path of truth and righteousness. 

اِنَّ ذٰلِكَ مِنْ عَزْمِ الْاُمُورِۚ “Surely these acts require determination.”

Brothers and Sisters! 

Luqman’s (as) seventh piece of advice is being humble and not arrogant. وَلَا تُصَعِّرْ خَدَّكَ لِلنَّاسِ  “Dear son, do not turn your cheek [in contempt] toward people!” وَلَا تَمْشِ فِي الْأَرْضِ مَرَحًا “Do not walk through the earth exultantly!” اِنَّ اللّٰهَ لَا يُحِبُّ كُلَّ مُخْتَالٍ فَخُورٍۚ  “Indeed, Allah does not like everyone self-deluded and boastful.” 

Luqman’s (as) eighth piece of advice to his son is about knowing his place. Never forgetting that he is a venerable person. وَاقْصِدْ ف۪ي مَشْيِكَ “Son! Be moderate in your pace.”  وَاغْضُضْ مِنْ صَوْتِكَۜ  “Lower your voice.” اِنَّ اَنْكَرَ الْاَصْوَاتِ لَصَوْتُ الْحَم۪يرِ۟ “Indeed, the most unpleasant sound is the voice of donkeys!” 

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Praise be to the Almighty Lord that we have once again reached the three holy months, the season of mercy, abundance, and grace. We will have the first day of Rajab month next Wednesday. And we will observe Raghaib night all together on Thursday. A happy Raghaib night to you all in advance. I pray to the Almighty that the three holy months may bring good to all of us."
23;2018-04-27;"DATE: 27.04.2018



BARA’AH NIGHT – AN OCCASION FOR FORGIVENESS, PURIFICATION AND SALVATION

Jumu’ah Mubarak, Esteemed Believers!

Our Almighty Lord with His infinite mercy and unlimited forgiveness gives us this glad tiding in the verse I recited, “Say, ‘O My servants who have transgressed against themselves [by sinning], do not despair of the mercy of Allah. Indeed, Allah forgives all sins. Indeed, it is He who is the Forgiving, the Merciful.’”

Honorable Muslims!

We are rejoicing in approaching the Bara’ah Night, an occasion for forgiveness, purification and salvation. Eternal praise be to our Almighty Lord. Inshallah, we will altogether attain the bounties of the Bara’a Night, on April 30th, the night that connects Monday to Tuesday.

In a hadith qudsi, our Prophet (s.a.w.) said: “Spend the fifteenth day of the month of Shaban by observing a fast and its night in prayer. Because, when the sun sets at that night, Allah Ta’ala manifests Himself at the nearest heaven in a state which we cannot know of, and until the time of dawn He says, ‘Is there nobody asking for forgiveness? Forgive I shall! Is there nobody asking for sustenance? Sustenance I shall give him! Is there nobody suffering a calamity? Felicity I shall give him! …”2

Brothers and Sisters!

Life is our most precious wealth. Each hour is worth a treasure, each minute is worth riches. The Bara’ah Night is one of the most blessed stops on our journey of life. The Bara’ah is a night of opportunity for us to review our existence, granting us the chance for contemplation and consideration. The Bara’ah is forgiveness. It is the day when the Divine Mercy manifests itself. The Bara’ah is time for remorse and hope. The Bara’ah is the night when hands are raised for dua, and hearts are opened to the heaven. The Bara’ah means setting foot on the realm of mercy by turning towards our Lord. 

The Bara’ah is the time of repairing broken hearts, collapsing the walls of resentment, and overcoming the feelings of grudge, hatred, and revenge. The Bara’ah is the night of salvation from the hold of our desires, fancies and whims, and redemption from the cravings of our nafs. It is the time of alertness against the wiles and decoys of the nafs, and of the Devil.

Dear Believers!

The Bara’ah Night teaches us every year to keep away from all kinds of evil, oppression, wrongdoing and injustice. The Bara’ah Night reminds us of not only reaching Allah’s forgiveness, but also of being forgiving. For those who expect forgiveness from Allah also become forgiving. They become forgiving and tolerant towards themselves, their families, their brothers and sisters in religion, their surroundings, and the entire universe. Those who seek Allah’s content cannot despise or denigrate anybody. Those who seek to reach the love of Allah always bear love and mercy in their hearts.

Honorable Believers! 

With the occasion of this night, I would like to once again remind that we all have responsibilities individually on the way to “become a beneficial ummah for all humanity” as it is not possible to be good believers by being indifferent to what is going on around us.

Let us, in this blessed time, recall the responsibilities we have forgotten and abandoned. If we have become of people who chose this world over the Hereafter, let us repent for love and compassion we refrained to show even to our nearest. If we have left orphans, our oppressed brothers and sisters alone, let us repent. Let us review our servitude to Allah if we have omitted it. Let us crown our worn-out hearts with dua, worship and contemplation. Let us block the roads that lead to sins and evil. Let us strive for a world where goodness rules. Let us put to good use these days when Allah’s compassion manifests in abundance. Let us submit our repentance and contrition only to Him with our obedience, devotion, and good deeds. Let us turn away from our faults, wites, and sins, not to return again.

I would like to conclude this khutbah with the following dua of our Prophet (s.a.w.), “O Allah! I take refuge in your content from your wrath, I take refuge in your forgiveness from your punishment, I take refuge in You from You. I cannot finish counting praises for you. You are as You have praised Yourself.” 

“O Allah! Help us in remembering You, in expressing our gratitude for Your bounties, and in worshiping You in the most beautiful form.”"
24;2018-10-19;"
DATE: 19.10.2018
           [pic] MATERIAL AND SPIRITUAL PURIFICATION: CLEANLINESS
    Honorable Muslims!
    After commanding wudu (minor  ablution),  ghusl  (major  ablution),  and
tayammum (dry ablution),  Allah  the  Almighty  (swt)  states  in  the  Holy
Qur'an: ""Allah does not intend to make difficulty for you,  but  He  intends
to purify you and complete His favor upon you that you may be grateful.""[i]

    In the hadith I have read, our  Prophet  Muhammad  Mustafa  (saw)  says:
""Allah is flawless from all kinds of imperfection,  He  loves  his  servants
who are decent in  their  actions  and  words;  He  is  clean,  loves  clean
servants.""[ii]

    Esteemed Believers!
    Cleanliness is to be purified from the dirt and impurity both materially
and spiritually, and to become pure and decent. It means keeping  pure  both
our body, which is entrusted to us by our Lord (swt), and our  heart,  which
attained peace with faith. Cleanliness is both the source of a healthy  life
and prerequisite of a precious act of worship as the prayer, which  protects
the believer from doing evil.

    Dear Muslims!
    Islam; is the religion of nature (fitrah) and life that  encourages  all
kinds of material and spiritual cleaning. The  universe  is  in  a  constant
state of renewal and purification. All creatures on earth inherently try  to
be clean. Human being, however, has a special place  and  responsibility  in
terms of cleanliness among all other creatures as he is the  most  honorable
of creatures. As a matter of fact, he is  the  one  who  both  pollutes  the
nature and who will keep it clean.

    Valuable Believers!
    Cleanliness is in a sense purifying ourselves from  the  material  dirt.
The well-being of our bodies and the peace of our inner world is  hidden  in
cleanliness. Body cleansing, oral and dental  care  constitute  the  primary
stage of material cleaning befitting the honor of being human.  Our  beloved
Prophet (saw) attached importance to  this  issue  to  the  extent  that  he
stated he would have ordered cleaning mouth by miswak if  he  had  known  it
would not have been difficult for the Ummah.[iii]

    Valuable Muslims!
    When our Prophet (saw) received the revelation and was honored with  the
duty of prophethood after the seclusion period in the Cave of Hira,  he  was
commanded: ""And your clothing purify. And uncleanliness  avoid.""[iv]  It  is
not important whether the clothes are  old,  but  it  matters  if  they  are
dirty. Coming to the mosques with dirty clothes and  socks,  and  disturbing
our  brothers  and  sisters  with  unpleasant  smells  is  not  a  favorable
attitude. Believers should be the  exemplar  of  cleanliness,  elegance  and
freshness wherever they are. When the Messenger of Allah  (saw)  met  a  man
with dirty clothes, he said, ""Could this man not find something to wash  his
garments with?""[v]

    In addition to cleaning the body and clothes,  it  is  a religious  and
human duty to pay attention to the cleanliness of  the  environment  and  to
keep clean the whole world that was made a place of worship for  believers.
It is our responsibility towards future generations to act according to the
environmental ethics, for example by using recycle boxes for  plastic  and
similar wastes instead of randomly disposing them.

    Honorable Believers!
    Cleanliness  also  refers   to   becoming   purified   of non-material
uncleanliness. In this respect, it means  for believers  to  protect  their
hearts, illuminated by Islam, from darkness and evil.  It  means  recovering
the  heart  from  diseases  such  as  arrogance,   hypocrisy,   envy,   lie,
stinginess, and embellishing it with beautiful traits  such  as  humbleness,
honesty, generosity,  compassion,  and  decency.  It  means  preventing  the
tongue, which is the mirror of the soul and the  translator  of  the  heart,
from uttering vulgar and disgraceful words,  impertinent  talks,  lies,  and
slanders. It means protecting their  eyes,  ears,  hands,  feet,  and  other
limbs and organs from all kinds of evil and haram. It means  always  turning
towards the halal in everything they are engaged in. It  means  loading  off
the burden of sins by repenting for them. Our Lord Almighty (swt) says in
the Holy Qur'an, ""Give glad tidings to those believers who repent, worship,
praise Allah, travel for His cause, bow and prostrate  in  prayer  for  Him,
and enjoin what is right and forbid what is wrong, and  observe  the  limits
set by Allah.""[vi]

    Esteemed Believers!
    Being clean and decent is the requirement of our faith. Let us pay  due
attention to the criteria of material and spiritual cleanliness  as  ordered
by our  religion.  Let  us  neither leave  our  body  uncared  for  and  be
ungroomed, nor go to extremes just to  be  well-groomed.  As believers  who
hope for happiness in this world  and  in the Hereafter,  let  us  be  the
exemplars of cleanliness and good morality.  Let  us  give  hope  to  others
with our appearance; peace and reliance with our words and actions. Let our
cleanliness be the evidence of our faith. Let us ensure that we  keep  our
inside, outside, and surroundings clean.

    Valuable Muslims!
    The Presidency of Religious Affairs builds many mosques  in  Turkey  and
abroad with the support of our noble nation. We have full faith  that  our
generous nation will contribute to the construction of mosques  today,  too,
just as in the past. May our Lord  Almighty  (swt)  allow  us  to continue
worshiping with a clean body and pure heart, and  not  allow  us  to  remain
without the mosque and the adhan.
-----------------------
[i] Ma'idah, 5/6.
[ii] Tirmidhi, Adab, 41.
[iii] Bukhari, Jumu'ah, 8.
[iv] Muddaththir, 74/4-5.
[v] Abu Dawud, Libas, 14.
[vi] Tawbah, 9/112.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
25;2019-10-04;"
DATE: 04.10.2019
[pic]
                    LET US PROTECT OUR HOME: PLANET EARTH
    Honorable Muslims!
    Pondering over carefully, we can see that all creatures around us,  from
tiny little ants to inconceivably large planets  sailing  in  their  orbits,
are all Allah the Almighty's (swt) works.  With  His  unexampled  power  and
inimitable artistic style, our Lord has created a thousand and one kinds  of
living beings. Each and every single one of them is a blessing for  us,  and
we will account for each and every blessing bestowed upon us. In  the  verse
I have recited at the beginning of the khutbah, this truth  is  referred  to
as follows, ""Allah has subjected to you, as from Him, all  that  is  in  the
heavens and on earth. Behold,  in  that  are  Signs  indeed  for  those  who
reflect.""[i]

    Dear Believers!
    The sole authority to determine the value of any and all things is Allah
(swt) alone. Having created any creature for a specific reason  to  serve  a
specific purpose, Allah the Almighty (swt) states,  ""Not  for  (idle)  sport
did We create the heavens and the earth and all that  is  between!""[ii]  The
universe, with all its unseeably atoms of certain  meaning,  is  a  balanced
and sublime whole. All created beings on this planet on  which  we  came  to
life have a distinctive function and value.

    Dear Muslims!
    It is important to note that Allah (swt)  has  not  created  a  universe
independent of His watch and left it unoverseeable. All creatures  speak  of
and belong to Him. By Him is overseen all existence. This is referred to  in
the Holy Qur'an as follows, ""Of Him seeks (its need) every creature  in  the
heavens and on earth: every day in (new)  Splendor  doth  He  (shine)!  Then
which of the favors of your Lord will ye deny?""[iii]

    In  this  regard,  we  are  responsible  towards  the  nature  and   the
environment, as our respect  for  the  Lord's  work  and  sovereignty  would
require. Causing harm and damage to the  nature  by  going  against  Allah's
(swt) rules and laws means the negligence of  our  responsibilities  towards
Him.

    Dear Believers!
    We are the members of the Prophet  Muhammad's  (saw)  ummah,  who  would
spectate with affection even a mountain and say, ""We  love  Uhud,  and  Uhud
loves us.""[iv] We follow his path,  who  says,  ""If  the  Resurrection  were
established upon one of you while he has in his hand  a  sapling,  then  let
him plant it.""[v] We take him as our guide  and  example  who  would  always
warn his companions about protecting the rights of animals.

    Dear Muslims!
    We are going through bitter times when on the one hand tons of bread are
wasted and thrown in the garbage, and on the other  hand  many  people  lose
their lives due to hunger and poverty. How sad it is that today  people  who
are the captives of their worldly desires and ambitions fail to establish  a
friendly, fair and humane relationship with the nature.  They  set  on  fire
forests that are the source of breath for all living beings,  desertify  the
earth with the products grown on which we feed ourselves,  and  pollute  the
rivers that satisfy our thirst.

    For how long yet will we have to put up with the fact that tons of  food
are being wasted in the garbage while our civilization  considers  unwelcome
even a tiny little bit of breadcrumb thrown away  on  the  ground?  For  how
long yet will we carelessly keep  recyclable  waste  in  containers  on  the
streets?

    We should know, however, that we can be  peaceful  and  healthy  to  the
extent we treat the nature with love and compassion. Otherwise,  the  damage
will not hit the nature only, but us, as well.  People  are  warned  in  the
Holy Qur'an as follows, ""Corruption has appeared  throughout  the  land  and
sea by [reason of] what the hands of people have earned so He may  let  them
taste part of [the consequence of] what they have  done  that  perhaps  they
will return [to righteousness].""[vi]

    Honorable Believers!
    We humans are the Most Merciful Allah's (swt) caliphs on earth. Being  a
caliph means being held responsible; that is, being  the  protector  of  the
earth, not its landlord. It means making use  of  the  earth  in  accordance
with Allah's (swt) approval. It means not spoiling and damaging the earth.

    Then, let us be more sensitive towards the nature that is  entrusted  to
us by our Lord who keeps creating and managing. Let us not forget  that  one
day we will give an account for  everything  to  the  Owner  of  all  things
entrusted to us. Let us continue our lives as conscious  of  the  fact  that
the earth belongs to all living beings, not to humans only.

    Before I conclude today's khutbah, I would like to remind  an  important
point. The next Sunday following the fajr prayer from all mosques,  we  will
go planting saplings on the occasion of the Mosques and Religious  Officials
Week, with your participation, our  honorable  congregation.  You  and  your
family members are all invited for this meaningful activity.
-----------------------
[i] Jathiyah, 45/13.
[ii] Anbya 21/16.
[iii] Rahman, 55/29.
[iv] Bukhari, Maghazi, 82.
[v] (Ibn Hanbal, III, 184)
[vi] Rum, 30/41.s

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
26;2019-10-18;"DATE: 18.10.2019



INDIVIDUAL AND PUBLIC RIGHTS

Honorable Muslims!

One day the Prophet Muhammad (saw) asked his companions, “Do you know who is a muflis (bankrupt)?” His companions there replied, “O Rasulullah, a muflis is one who has neither money nor any property.”	

Thereupon,	he	said, “The	real bankrupt would be those who would come on the Day	 of Resurrection		with	salat,	sawm, and sadaqah, but they will find themselves bankrupt on that day as they will have exhausted the good deed because they	reviled		others, brought calumny against others, unlawfully devoured the wealth of others, shed the blood of others, and beat others; therefore, their good deeds would be credited to the account of those who suffered at their hands. If their good deeds fall short to clear the account, their sins would be entered in their accounts and they would be thrown in the Hellfire.”

Dear Muslims!

Islam is the religion of rightfulness, truth, law, and justice. The concept of ""right"" denotes both our responsibilities and the values that we need to protect. Our source of life and peace, the revelations by Allah (swt) invite us to protecting the right. One of the Asma al-Husna (the Beautiful Names of Allah) is ""al- Haqq"". For this reason, when people are in pursuit of the right, they actually take the side of the righteousness and the truth, that is the conformity to Allah's (swt) commandments and consent.

Dear Believers!

Humans, from the moment they fall into the mother's womb, have the right to life and the security of life. This principle is referred to in the words of Allah the Almighty (swt) as follows, “Whoever kills a soul unless for a soul or for corruption done in the land, it is as if he had slain mankind entirely. And whoever saves one, it is as if he had saved mankind entirely.”

Every person has the right to protecting their property and legitimate income. Engaged in haram are those people who gain property illicitly, deceive theircustomers by resorting to fraud in business, and do not pay, thereby stealing from, their employee's rightful share.

Inviolable are people's individual values, honor, chastity, and beliefs. Among the worst violations of rights are considered to insult people's values, defame them, and damage their reputation by uttering lies and slanders about them. The violation of rights is a crime according to our laws in force, and a grave sin according to Islam.

Honorable Muslims!

Being a Muslim requires all of us to adopt a middle-of-the-path approach, be conscientious, and righteous in all domains of life. A distinctive sign of being a Muslim is to protect their own rights and the rights of other people around them. People who encroach upon the rights of other people, as well as of animals and the nature, for personal interests and benefits are doomed to lose and go brankrupt in the end although they may seem to gain profit in the first place.

Being a responsible person conscious of the rights requires giving the rightful due to whoever has the right, particularly the family members in the closest circle. Respecting the rights of our parents, observing the rights of our spouses duly and lovingly, and protecting the rights of our children compassionately are all responsibilities upon us. It is a duty upon all of us to strive to ensure that the rightful due is paid for those involved in kinship relations, particularly those who are party to any business partnership, wedding, or inheritance.

Dear Believers!

The sphere completely influenced by the rights of individuals is that of the rights of the public. The rights of the public require us to be even more responsible compared to the rights of individuals. Failure to observe the rights of the public drag people to frustration both in this world and in the Hereafter. In this regard states the Almighty Allah (swt), “No prophet could (ever) be false to his trust. If any person is so false, they shall, on the Day of Judgment, restore what they misappropriated, and then shall every soul receive its due, whatever it earned, and none shall be dealt with unjustly.” Similarly, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) warned his ummah, ""Whoever takes a piece of the land of others unjustly, he will sink down the seven earths on the Day of Resurrection.""On another occasion, he said,  Whoever is charged with a work and earns wage in turn, everything that he gets except for this earning is the breach of trust. 

Dear Muslims!

Let us not forget that the relations based on righteousness lead to peace in this world and salvation in the Hereafter. Let us be careful not to infringe the rights of other people in our private life. Let us perform our public duties and services as conscious of them being entrusted to us for a given period of time, Keeping in mind that we are responsible even for the rights of orphans This is so because any right of the public infringed and any public property damaged mean thousands of rights of individuals violated. Let us live in the know of the fact that just as every good deed has its rewards, every negligence and mistake will cause the violation of the rights of individuals and of the public."
27;2019-01-25;"DATE: 25.01.2019

HAYA’ (PIOUS SHYNESS): THE ESSENCE OF ISLAMIC MORALITY

Honorable Muslims!

The religion of Islam aims at directing the emotions in the essence of human towards better in line with the principles determined by Allah the Almighty. It puts universal principles in place for human to avoid evil and ugly words and deeds, abandon evil, and embrace good deeds. Haya’, which also reflects conscience, compassion, and a sense of shame that motivates human to avoid of misconduct, comes on top of these principles, which not only direct human closer to attaining the approval of the Lord Almighty, but also regulate human relations in the societal life.

Haya’ is an inherent human emotion making human observe the boundaries of privacy and pursue good deeds. A basic inherent human quality loved greatly by Allah, it is the ornament of faith that beautifies it. It is the most robust shield that protects believers against sins. The emotion of haya’ fills the hearts of believers with love, respect, and trust; prevents extremisms, thereby forming a peaceful society. In this respect, says our beloved Prophet (saw), “One of the sayings of the early prophets which the people have got is: If you don't feel ashamed (from Haya': pious shyness from committing religious indiscretions) do whatever you like.”

Valuable Believers!

Our Lord Almighty (swt) mentions living a chaste life among the most valuable qualities to lead human to eternal salvation, as expressed in the Holy Qur’an, “And they who guard their private parts”. Right after the command of “Tell the believing men to reduce [some] of their vision and guard their private parts. That is purer for them. Indeed, Allah is Acquainted with what they do”, He commands, “And tell the believing women to reduce [some] of their vision, guard their private parts, and not exposes their adornment…”.. In presence of Allah, all believing men and women are liable to avoid haram, and pursue a chaste life.

In an environment where societies lost moral and spiritual values in the darkness of the Jahiliyyah, our beloved Prophet (saw) insistently encouraged people to live a chaste life. In addition, after taking on the duty of prophethood, he (saw) drew attention to the unbreakable bond between faith and haya’ by stating, “The essence of Islamic morality is haya’.” He further stated, “Haya’ does not bring anything except good.”

Esteemed Muslims!

Our sublime religion Islam enjoins haya’ and modesty on the one hand, and forbids zina (fornication and adultery) that disrupts such values on the other hand. According to Islam, zina is an act that the religion regards as a grave sin, the mind as foul, and the morality as unpleasant. It is against the human nature; it damages human’s honor and self-respect. It gives a feeling of worthlessness, and breaks the ties of compassion and love. It undermines the spiritual and moral values of the society by sowing the seeds of distrust, hatred, and grudge among people.

Valued Believers!

There are many wisdoms underlying all the commandments and prohibitions established by Allah. The most important wisdom underlying the commandment of being chaste and the prohibition of fornication and adultery is the protection of the family structure because extramarital relationships both causes the collapse of the institution of family and threatens the existence of uncontaminated generations.

Honorable Muslims!

Disaster for human is deprivation and lack of chastity and modesty. It is a painful situation that distances human from attaining the approval of Allah, brings them closer to the wrath, and drags them into the never-ending frustration. Therefore, Islam forbids zina and all other acts and behaviors that lead to it. No matter how small an immoral step may look in the first place, not avoiding such steps would possibly cause one’s fall into haram. Our Sublime Lord warns us, “And do not approach unlawful sexual intercourse. Indeed, it is ever an immorality and is evil as a way.”

Esteemed Believers!

Let us be meticulous in remaining within the boundaries set by our religion and distancing ourselves from the sins. Let us strive not to make even the slightest of a mistake that may lead to moral corruption. Let us put the dress of taqwa on and equip ourselves with chastity and modesty. Let us not let it slip out of our minds that the life, the property, and the body we have are what Allah has entrusted to us, and that we all will give an account for each of these blessings. Let us not fall for the deceiving colors and the short-lived desires of the life in this world. Let us never forget that a believer who follows the path of revelation and fulfills the necessity of their faith will be glorious, and those who follow their zeal and desires will be in ignominy."
28;2019-11-08;"
DATE: 08.11.2019
[pic]
    THE MAWLID AL-NABI
    Honorable Muslims!
    As you know, today is Friday; that is, a celebration  day  for  Muslims.
Tonight is the Night of Mawlid (Laylat al-Mawlid), the  anniversary  of  the
Prophet Muhammad (saw) honoring the world with his birth,  who  communicated
the message of Islam to us, taught us the right and truth, and guided us  as
the best role model on the road to the Heaven. Endless thanks and praise  be
to the Almighty Allah (swt) for honoring us to be the members of  the  ummah
of the Last Prophet Muhammad's (saw) of sublime character and sweet  tongue.
Salat and salam be to the Prophet Muhammad (saw), whom Allah (swt)  sent  as
an ambassador of peace, mercy, and trust to the worlds, and  to  his  family
and his companions.

    Dear Believers!
    The Prophet Muhammad (saw) was an inviter  who  invited  all  people  to
peace and salvation, and a warner who warned all people  against  and  saved
them from wrongdoing and being rebellious. He was the perfect living  answer
to the questions of ""What do Muslims believe?"" and  ""What  kind  of  a  life
should Muslims lead?"" In  him  were  embodied  such  virtues  as  affection,
compassion, loyalty, courage, and foresightedness. By him earned  the  weak,
the poor, and the victimized people the deserved respect  for  being  human.
Around him became guided even the people, who wanted to  kill  him,  to  the
right path thanks to his compassion. So much so that a  dark  age  dominated
by ignorance and oppression and lack  of  compassion,  virtues,  and  wisdom
turned into the Age  of  Bliss  (the  Asr  al-Saadah)  under  the  light  of
knowledge, justice, and compassion with his  arrival  and  divine  struggle.
People who had lost their way and values in  the  whirl  of  the  Jahiliyyah
(Ignorance)  period  set  the  best  examples   of   brotherhood,   virtues,
commitment to promises, and all good behaviors by following his path.

    Dear Muslims!
    In this regard,  he  said,  ""I  was  sent  to  perfect  the  good  moral
character.""[i] His life  was  filled  with  countless  beautiful  words  and
actions.It was him who declared that all people were equal before Allah  and
the criterion of superiority  was  piety  (taqwa)  by  saying,  ""Humans  are
children of Adam, and Adam was created  from  earth.""[ii]  It  was  him  who
taught his ummah to be humble by saying ""Fear not; I am  just  a  man  whose
mother used to eat dried meat.""[iii] to  someone  speaking  with  him  in  a
state of excitement and shaking voice. It was again him who  advised  us  to
pursue not the temporary blessings of this world but the approval  of  Allah
(swt) by praying to Him, ""O  Allah,  I  beseech  You  for  guidance,  piety,
chastity, and contentment.""[iv]

    Dear Believers!
    The Almighty Allah (swt) states in the Holy Qur'an, ""There has certainly
been for you in the Messenger of  Allah  an  excellent  pattern  for  anyone
whose hope  is  in  Allah  and  the  Last  Day  and  [who]  remembers  Allah
often.""[v]

    Then let us get to know the Prophet Muhammad  (saw)  better,  understand
him better, and make sure that his great Sunnah has a  determining  role  in
our lives. Let us shape our world of thought  according  to  his  mentality,
and let us clean our  hearts  with  his  morals.  Let  us  protect  all  the
principles, on which he never made any concessions, in all  domains  of  our
lives. Let us not forget that our faith, our humanity, and our society  will
reach the long-awaited good days to the extent that we take him as our  role
model. Only then will his birth (mawlid) mean literally  a  rebirth  in  our
lives.

    Honorable Muslims!
    As in every year, the  week  following  the  Night  of  Mawlid  will  be
celebrated as the Mawlid al-Nabi Week this year as well. The  theme  of  the
Mawlid al-Nabi Week 2019 is set to be ""the Prophet Muhammad and the  Family""
by the Presidency of Religious Affairs. This is because  it  is  our  family
values that are damaged worst in this world  where  peace  is  lost  in  the
whirl of selfishness and self-interests and love is  gone  due  to  material
concerns. It is therefore a duty upon all of us to ensure that families  are
established, protected, and maintained properly.

    As in all matters, our best role model in the matter of family  is  also
the Prophet Muhammad (saw). During the Mawlid al-Nabi Week,  various  events
will be organized to introduce to  our  society  the  environment  of  love,
compassion, trust, peace, and consultation within the family of the  Prophet
Muhammad (saw), and solutions will be sought, in line with the  Holy  Qur'an
and the Sunnah, for today's problems faced by the institution of family.

    I would like to take this opportunity to congratulate you  all  for  the
Night of Mawlid, and pray to Allah the Almighty  (swt)  that  the  Week  may
bring good things to our noble nation and the Muslim world.
-----------------------
[i] (Ibn Hanbal, II, 381)
[ii] (Tirmidhi, Manaqib, 74)
[iii] (Ibn Majah, At'imah, 30)
[iv] (Muslim, Dhikr, 72)
[v] Ahzab, 33/21.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
29;2019-08-11;"
DATE: 11.08.2019
[pic]
    EID AL-ADHA
    Honorable Muslims!
    Today is the Eid al-Adha. It is an exceptional time when we  submit  our
servitude to Allah (swt) and express  our  gratitude  to  Him  for  all  the
blessings He bestowed upon us. It is an offering by  Him  for  those  people
who bear the Prophet Ibrahim's  faith,  Hajar's  loyalty,  and  the  Prophet
Ismail's submission. It is the day when the prospective pilgrims  enjoy  the
peacefulness and joy of  becoming  pilgrims  by  going  to  Muzdalifah  from
Arafat, and to Mina thereafter, stoning the devil, and performing the  tawaf
al-ziyarah. Today is one of those rare times when we  get  closer  to  Allah
(swt) by performing the worship of qurban, a distinctive sign of Islam.

    Dear Believers!
    It was an eid morning just like now, when  the  Prophet  Muhammad  (saw)
left home to perform the eid prayer.  Arriving  the  place  to  perform  the
prayer, he appealed to his companions, ""The first thing to do  today  is  to
perform the eid prayer, and then perform the worship of  qurban.  Those  who
follow this are in conformity with my sunnah.""[i]

    In the khutbah he delivered to his companions after performing  the  eid
prayer, he gave the following good news to  his  ummah,  ""A  human  does  no
action from the actions on the day  of  nahr  more  beloved  to  Allah  then
spilling blood. On the Day of Judgement, it will appear with its horns,  and
hair, and hooves, and indeed the blood will be accepted by Allah from  where
it is received before it even falls upon earth, so let  your  heart  delight
in it.""[ii]

    It was the time to  sacrifice  the  animal  after  the  prayer  and  the
khutbah. The Prophet Muhammad (saw)  warned  the  believers  about  treating
nicely the animals to be sacrificed, and showing  mercy  and  compassion  to
them as follows,  ""Allah made it a fardh for people to act based on  ikhsan,
in other words to act nicely. Then, whoever will sacrifice an animal  should
do it nicely.""[iii] He placed the animal to  be  sacrificed  on  the  ground
facing the qiblah, recited basmalah and takbir, and  uttered  the  following
verses:

    ""I have turned my face toward Allah, Who created  the  Heavens  and  the
Earth. I am not of the idolaters. Verily, my salah, my sacrifice,  my  life,
and my death are for Allah. He has no partner.  And  of  this  I  have  been
commanded, and I am the first of the Muslims.""[iv]

    Dear Muslims!
    Let us spend the days of the Eid al-Adha in conformity to the sunnah  of
the Prophet Muhammad (saw) as he taught us. Let us  bear  in  mind  that  we
need to utter the tashrik takbir, starting from the morning  prayer  on  the
Day of Arafat and ending with the asr prayer on the fourth day of the Eid.

    As members of  the  ummah  of  the  Prophet  Muhammad  (saw)  who  says,
""Cleanliness makes up half of the faith.""[v] let us  pay  attention  to  the
environmental cleanliness. We should bury deep in the ground  any  piece  of
diseased-looking meat from the sacrificed animal. For,  in  the  event  that
stray cats and dogs eat such meat, they may transmit diseases to people.  We
should also ensure that the animals to  be  sacrificed  be  slaughtered  and
apportioned at a clean place.

    Dear Believers!
    The occasions of eid are the days of sharing, offering, and helping.  We
should bear in mind that our neighbors,  relatives,  poor  people,  orphans,
and people in need have their rights over our qurban. Let us  remember  that
we gain as much as we give out, and we get richer as much as we share out.

    The silat al-rahim (paying visits to relatives) is the  essence  of  the
eid. We should be aware that the days of eid are  not  only  an  opportunity
for off days.  Let us visit the elderly members of our family and  show  our
care in their well-being, particularly our parents. Let us make the  younger
family members happy with little treats. Let us ensure that  the  sick,  the
elderly, and the lone people have their share from the joy of the eid.

    Dear Muslims!
    The occasions of eid  are  the  days  of  forgiving  and  embracing  one
another. Let us regard the days of the eid as an opportunity to put  an  end
to conflicts and hard feelings between our  brothers  and  sisters.  Let  us
fully enjoy the peacefulness and brotherly climate of the eid.

    As I conclude the khutbah, I would like to congratulate our noble nation
and the whole Muslim world for the Eid al-Adha.  May  Allah's  (swt)  peace,
mercy, and blessings be upon you. May this Eid al-Adha bring  many  beauties
for all of us.
-----------------------
[i] Bukhari, 'Eidayn, 3.
[ii] Tirmidhi, Adahi, 1.
[iii] Muslim, Sayd, 57; Abu Dawud, Dahaya, 10-11.
[iv] An'am, 6/79, 162-163; Ibn Majah, Adahi, 1.
[v] Tirmidhi, Daawat, 86.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services


"
30;2019-12-06;"
DATE: 06.12.2019
                    [pic] FALSE BELIEFS AND SUPERSTITIONS
    Honorable Muslims!
    One day the Prophet Muhammad (saw) was on a road trip with his  paternal
uncle's son Abdullah ibn Abbas and he gave him  the  following  advices:  ""O
young man, I shall teach you some words of advice. Be mindful of  Allah  and
Allah will protect you. Be mindful of Allah and you will find Him  in  front
of you. If you ask, then ask Allah alone; and if you seek  help,  then  seek
help from Allah alone. And know that if the nation were to  gather  together
to benefit you with anything, they would not benefit you  except  with  what
Allah had already prescribed for you. And if they were  to  gather  together
to harm you with anything, they would not harm you except  with  what  Allah
had already prescribed against you...""[i]

    Dear Believers!
    The sublime religion, Islam, points out for all  people  the  truths  of
faith and the paths to peace in this  world  and  in  the  Hereafter.  Islam
wants people to worship, rely on, seek refuge in the mercy of, and ask  help
from Allah (swt)  only.  Accordingly,  it  rejects  all  false  beliefs  and
superstitions. Islam regards it as a great sin to exploit people's  feelings
and  values  by  taking  advantage  of   their   lack   of   knowledge   and
desperateness. People, however,  have  from  time  to  time  failed  to  pay
attention to such principles of the religion  and  found  themselves  hoping
for  help  from  fortunetellers,  sorcerers,  soothsayers,  magicians,   and
mediums.

    Dear Muslims!
    It is against the essence of Islam to assert claims about, and hope  for
help from practices such as, predicting the future, changing people's  fate,
bringing luck, and offering cures. For the future and unknown  is  known  to
Allah (swt) only. For He alone is the Most Powerful over all things. For  He
is the One, Who provided us every piece of food we eat  and  every  drop  of
water we drink. For in Him alone rests the remedy to sorrows,  the  cure  to
diseases, and the solution to problems. For He is the One Who at  all  times
oversees us and respond to our heartfelt entreaties and sincere prayers.



    Dear Believers!
    It is never approvable to make plans about the future by  placing  one's
hopes on fortunetelling, sorcery, and soothsaying while  we  have  faith  in
Allah (swt) and on Him we rely. It would be against the  Islamic  standpoint
to suggest that  one  has  obtained  knowledge  of  people's  fates  through
observing the movements of stars. It  would  also  be  against  the  Islamic
faith to attribute mystery and  bad  omen  to  numbers,  days,  months,  and
objects that have no ability and power to do or change anything. Among  such
practices prohibited by Islam are to view  a  piece  of  bead  as  holy  for
thinking it protects against evil, tying a piece of cloth  to  a  tree,  and
throwing away coins into a pool of water in the hope that  they  bring  good
luck.

    Dear Muslims!
    Let us think for a moment. Why are  those  people,  who  claim  to  find
solutions to other people's problems  through  such  illegitimate  means  as
sorcery and magic, not able to find solutions to  their  own  problems?  Why
are those people, who exploit other people's hopes through  lies  that  they
know what will happen in the future, not able to find the  right  path  with
the knowledge they claim to have? Why are those people,  who  deceive  other
people by telling them that they have cure for their illnesses, not able  to
use the same cure for their own illnesses?

    Dear Believers!
    The Almighty Allah (swt) states in the Surah al-Falaq I have recited  at
the beginning of the khutbah, ""Say, ""I seek refuge in the Lord of  daybreak,
from the evil of that which He created, and from the evil of  darkness  when
it settles, and from the evil of the blowers in knots, and from the evil  of
an envier when he envies.""[ii]

    Let us then not spoil our clean human nature, created by Allah (swt)  as
fit  for  faith  and  inclined  to  do  good,   with   false   beliefs   and
superstitions. Let us strengthen our  faith,  which  is  our  most  precious
treasure, with sincere feelings and our intentions with authentic  religious
knowledge. Let us make it a principle for a peaceful life to work  and  earn
our livelihood through legitimate means, get treatment when  ill,  and  seek
for reasons to rely our efforts on. Let us not  fall  for  hope-mongers  who
promote shortcutting the  efforts  through  illegitimate  means  to  earn  a
living. Let us ask Allah  (swt)  only  for  success,  salvation,  cure,  and
providence in this world and in the Hereafter. Let us  always  believe  that
He does not leave our  prayers  unresponded  when  uttered  in  a  heartfelt
manner.
-----------------------
[i] Tirmidhi, Sifat al-Qiyamah, 59; Ibn Hanbal, I, 293.

[ii] Falaq, 113/1-5.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
31;2017-09-15;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 15.09.2017



ARE THOSE WHO KNOW EQUAL WITH THOSE WHO KNOW NOT?

Honorable Believers!

One day, some companions of the Prophet in the Al-Masjid an-Nabawi were busy praying, and another group were busy studying. Our Prophet (pbuh) observed this situation and said: “Both groups are busy with a good endeavor. Some pray to Allah and ask Him for certain things. Allah will give or will not give them if He wishes so. The others study and teach that knowledge to those who do not know. What they are doing is more virtuous.”

Messenger of Allah (pbuh) did not just gratify his companions who sought knowledge. He said: “Indeed, I have been sent as a teacher, an educator.” and sat beside them.  Because he was a prophet who showed the superiority of knowledge with the life he led in the light of this verse: “Are those who know equal with those who know not?” 

Brothers and Sisters!

Our Prophet placed great importance to education and knowledge throughout his life. Eradicating ignorance was a very important goal for him. The way to truth and God was to teach knowledge which gives meaning to life and honor to humans. He was a Messenger of Mercy who prayed “O Allah, teach me that which will benefit me, and increase me in knowledge.”  Because our Prophet was first addressed with the command “Read” in Holy Quran, our guide to the true path. Our Lord Almighty ordered the mankind through His Last Messenger: “Read! In the Name of your Lord, Who has created (all that exists), has created man from a clot. Read! And your Lord is the Most Generous, Who has taught (the writing) by the pen, has taught man that which he knew not.” 

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!



Written by: General Directorate of Religious ServicesWe are the members of a civilization where knowledge is merged with reason and kneaded with wisdom, and the scholar is adorned with morals. Knowledge is considered as the prayer of the mind in our civilization. Knowledge means first and foremost to try to understand the truth and essence of objects, the purpose and reason of existence. Knowledge means to know oneself. Because those who know themselves know their Lord. Those who know their Lord sets learning the truth and essence of objects as their goal. Those who are conscious of their existence will be conscious of their environment, the universe and life.

Knowledge should not move a person away from himself, his Lord and people. It should not estrange him to his environment. Knowledge should lead a person to wisdom. It should address his heart, his soul. Knowledge should manifest itself in life with a sense of morality and responsibility. It should be seen as a means of gaining Allah’s countenance.

Brothers and Sisters!

Just as we are obligated to read the book of Allah and practice it in our lives, we are also obligated to read and understand the universe and the order in it. We have a responsibility to acquire all kinds of knowledge that benefits humans and humanity. We should never see knowledge as a means of satisfaction and self-interest. We cannot acquire knowledge to harm humanity, destroy the earth and make it uninhabitable.

Honorable Believers!

Our children, our youth are going to start a new education period. Our teachers will continue to raise generations who have conscience and compassion, who are committed to their values, who work for the benefit of their nation and humanity. I would like to take this opportunity to ask Allah Almighty for this education year to bring goodness to our teachers, our families, our nation and our children, who are the safeguards of our future. May our Lord grant our children knowledge which will allow them to achieve His countenance, and which our children will use for the benefit of the realm of Islam and all mankind.

I also would like to remind something to the parents. Let us not neglect our responsibility for our children to meet with the Quran’s climate of mercy and learn the exemplary life of our Prophet (pbuh). Let us guide our children to select Quran and Prophet’s life, which are taught as elective courses in our schools.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

I want to share two things with you before I finish the khutba. Next Thursday we are going to observe the first day of the Islamic new year. I congratulate your new year in advance.

Also our Presidency have started an aid campaign with Turkey Diyanet Foundation for our brothers and sisters in Rakhine. In this campaign, today we are going to appeal to our noble nation in all mosques throughout the country. The collected donations will be delivered to our oppressed and innocent brothers and sisters in Rakhine to provide them some relief. May our Lord Almighty accept your charity and goodness. May He protect our country and noble nation who are the hope of the oppressed and helpless."
32;2017-03-31;"LOCATION       : NATIONWIDE

 DATE                  : 31.03.2017



TURN TO YOUR LORD ALONE WITH HOPE!

A Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters!

Infinite praise be to the Almighty. He has let us get to the three holy months, the season of grace. We all felt the jubilation of Raghaib night, the harbinger of Ramadan, in our hearts last night. Today, on one hand we are experiencing the abundance of Rajab and the joy of Friday, our weekly feast, on the other. When the season was upon him, Allah’s Messenger (pbuh) used to pray, “O Allah, Bless for us the months of Rajab and Sha’ban! Get us to Ramadan with faith and in health and well-being!” May the Almighty Lord bless Rajab and Sha’ban for our nation and for the world of Islam. May He grant all of us to make it to Ramadan having been protected from all evil.

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

There is a great surah called “Al-Inshirah” in our Great Book the Holy Quran. Inshirah is the opening of the heart, the expanding of the chest. It is the exhilaration and becoming quiet of the heart. It was revealed during a time when Allah’s Messenger and his companions were suffering great hardship. The surah gave the news that the hearts of all believers, in the person of Allah’s Messenger (pbuh), would be exhilarated until the Day of Judgement and find peace. It showed us how to unload the burden on our backs, how to elevate our honor, and how to make difficulties easy to deal with. 

The Almighty enjoins in Surat al-Inshirah: “Have We not uplifted your heart for you, O Muhammad, and We removed from you your burden, which weighed so heavily on your back, and elevated your reputation for you? So surely along the hardship there is ease. Surely with that hardship comes more ease. So once you have fulfilled your duty, strive in devotion! And turn to your Lord alone with hope!” 

Brothers and Sisters! 

We understand from the last two verses that there are two conditions for our hearts to be uplifted, our burden to be removed, our reputation to be elevated, and our hardship to be eased. The first one is abiding by the Lord’s command to فَاِذَا فَرَغْتَ فَانْصَبْۙ “work, strive, endeavor, produce!” In other words, not wasting this short life. Not leading a vain life which is most precious for us. Striving for goodness, for truth, for helpful things. Making an effort to make the earth a more livable place.  

Honorable Believers!

The second condition for being honored with the things revealed in the surat al-Inshirah is turning to Allah as per the verse وَاِلٰى رَبِّكَ فَارْغَبْ “Turn to your Lord alone with hope!” This must be the most important point we must emphasize on Raghaib night. It means working for Allah. Laboring for Allah. Endeavoring for Allah. Sending our wishes and desires to Allah. Striving for our Lord’s favor instead of fame, rank or wealth. 

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

We are also going through difficult periods today as Muslims. We are at a period when every believer’s heart feels tight. We are at a time when we need exhilaration the most. We are in need of finding peace and getting read of the burden on our back. Then come, brothers and sisters! Let us strive in determination to that end. Let us live for the Lord’s favor, not for desire and fancy. Let us make an effort to work and endeavor more for truth, for the right path, for justice, for goodness, and for the humankind.

Only then will the Almighty Lord exhilarate our hearts. He will relieve the burden from our chests. He will clear our sins. He will make our struggles easier to deal with. Only then will the Almighty deliver us from all evil that takes away our freedom. He will turn our labor into mercy. He will elevate our reputation. He will make us a glorious ummah again. 

	Brothers and Sisters!

	When the Almighty Lord sent Moses (as) to the Pharaoh to invite him to the true path, Prophet Moses prayed,رَبِّ اشْرَحْ ل۪ي صَدْر۪يۙ وَيَسِّرْ ل۪ٓي اَمْر۪ي  “My Lord! Expand for me my breast with assurance! And ease for me my task.” Today, we supplicate like Moses (as) to our Lord and say: 

O Lord! Uplift our hearts! Ease our hardship. Grant us to be among those who spend every breath in Your cause!

O Allah! Do not let us yield to our desires even for a moment! Make our desire, wish, demand, and passion to be only seeking Your favor! 

O Lord! Elevate our honor! Make the Ummah of Islam a glorious one once again!"
33;2018-04-20;"
DATE: 20.04.2018
                                                                       [pic]

                       OUR HOPE FOR TOMORROW: CHILDREN

    Jumu'ah Mubarak Honorable Believers!
    Our beloved Prophet was fond of sharing the gifts  that  were  given  to
him, starting from his right side. One day, as he  was  seated  amongst  his
companions, he turned to his right to share a gifted drink. He saw  that  to
his right was sitting the nephew of his uncle, Abdullah b. Abbas, who was  a
little boy at the time. To his left,  the  elderly  amongst  his  companions
were seated. The Prophet of Compassion (s.a.w.) did not  wish  to  hurt  the
child's feelings and without skipping the child's turn asked  him:  ""Do  you
permit me to give it to them (the old men)?"", but the boy said:  ""By  Allah!
I will not give preference at your hand over me in  my  share.""  After  this
response, our Prophet began sharing the drink from the child.[i]

    Honorable Believers!
    The Prophet of Allah  (s.a.w.)  always  had  a  place  for  children  in
meetings and in masjids, valuing  them  as  the  ""adults  of  tomorrow""  and
protecting their rights. For children are, as  stated  in  the  Qur'an,  ""an
adornment of [worldly] life""[ii], and as said by  our  Prophet,        ""acts
[of good] which last after  death.""[iii]  Children  are  the  prosperity  of
homes, hope of families and the future of society. They are  the  answer  to
prayers, ""My Lord! Grant me from Yourself  a  good  offspring.""[iv],  and  a
truly divine gift.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    We all hold responsibilities to our Lord,  to  each  other  and  to  our
environment. One of our most important responsibilities is the ones we  have
towards our children. The Messenger of Allah  (s.a.w.)  who  declared  ""Your
child has a right upon you.""[v] sought the Ummah's attention on this  issue.
For children, though little themselves, have rights which  should  never  be
belittled. And it falls upon us adults, to protect the rights of children  -
entrusted to us by Allah for safekeeping.

    Whether girl or boy, it is our duty to accept the arrival of a  children
wholeheartedly,  to  welcome  them  with  love  and  prayers.  It   is   our
responsibility to give children pleasant names, to show them  the  attention
and compassion they deserve, and  to  be  just  by  not  showing  favoritism
between siblings.

    We should raise our youngsters on halal and healthy food, pay  attention
to their education, and  provide  for  their  spiritual  needs  as  well  as
material ones. We should guide our children in being  introduced  to  social
life, familiarizing them with their culture and teaching their  customs  and
traditions. For the social  and  cultural  development,  bodily  and  mental
education and religious and  moral  upbringing  of  children  begin  in  the
family. The dutiful generations that are our hope for tomorrow shall be  the
product of conscious parents. Let us not forget that a child who is made  to
suffer and  whose  rights  are  violated  cannot  appreciate  the  value  of
justice. A child hammered under violence cannot comprehend  the  meaning  of
mercy. A child who is humiliated and whose  personality  is  ignored  cannot
build a healthy future.

    Esteemed Believers!
    Our best  guide  in  children's  education  and  in  communication  with
children is our Prophet. He respected the honor children  carried  as  human
beings. He made them feel that  they  are  valuable,  greeted  them  on  the
street, asked how they were,[vi] and  answered  their  questions.  He  would
kiss and  hug  them,  embrace  them  and  play  with  them  without  heeding
anybody's disapproval.

    Allah's Messenger (s.a.w.) forbade speaking by evil  words  and  cursing
towards children. He prayed for  all  children  who  came  to  him  or  were
brought to him. He paid special attention  to  the  religious  education  of
children, never turned them  away  from  his  masjid  to  raise  mosque  and
worship-loving generations.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Let us heed the words of our Beloved Prophet claiming, ""There is no gift
that parents give their children more  virtuous  than  good  manners.""[vii].
Let us take  example  of  him,  and  use  his  education  methods  based  on
compassion and justice,  patience  and  tolerance.  Let  us  facilitate  the
opening of the doors of peace, success and beauty in this life  and  in  the
next for our children.

    Luqman (a.s.) advised his son: ""O my son, establish prayer, enjoin  what
is right, forbid what is wrong,  and  be  patient  over  what  befalls  you.
Indeed, these matters require determination.""[viii] Let us always  stand  by
our children and hold their hands like him.

    I wish to end this khutbah with a prayer from  the  Qur'an:  ""Our  Lord,
grant us from among our wives and offspring comfort to our eyes and make  us
an example for the righteous.""[ix]

-----------------------
[i] Muslim, Ashriba (the Book of Drinks), 127.
[ii] Kahf, 18/46.
[iii] Muslim, Wasiyyah (the Book of Wills), 14.
[iv] Al-i 'Imran, 3/38.
[v] Muslim, Siyam, 183.
[vi] Muslim, Salam, (the Book on Greetings), 14.
[vii] Tirmidhi, Birr (the Book on Righteousnes), 58; Ibn Hanbal, IV, 77.
[viii] Luqman, 31/17.
[ix] Furqan, 25/74.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services


"
34;2019-01-18;"
DATE: 18.01.2019
                                    [pic]
            MUSLIMS ARE PRECURSORS OF KNOWLEDGE AND CIVILIZATION
    Honorable Muslims!
    The verses I have recited were  the  first  revelation  to  our  Beloved
Prophet (saw), who was sent as a guide to humanity, and as a  mercy  to  the
worlds. These verses of  the  Holy  Qur'an,  which  were  the  first  to  be
revealed, invited all Muslims to the path of knowledge  and  wisdom  in  the
person of our Prophet (saw) as:  ""Recite  in  the  name  of  your  Lord  who
created - Created man from a clinging substance. Recite, and  your  Lord  is
the most Generous - Who taught by the pen - Taught man that  which  he  knew
not.""[i]

    Esteemed Believers!
    Being the addressee of the revelation and being equipped with  knowledge
are the most precious features of human in the realm of  existence.  Indeed,
the Holy Qur'an informs us that Allah the Almighty (swt)  taught  the  names
and the verity of all things to the  first  prophet  and  first  human  Adam
(as), ""...And He taught Adam the names - all of them...""[ii]

    The ability to learn and teach is a rare blessing bestowed upon human by
Allah the Almighty,  who  is  ""al-Aleem  (the  All-Knowing)"".  The  greatest
effort worthy of exhaustion for humans is  to  feed  the  soul  by  pursuing
authentic knowledge just as they feed themselves physically by pursuing  the
halal (lawful) means of earning. Can one think of  a  more  valuable  effort
than accumulating knowledge or a more honorable rank than being  a  scholar?
Can those who turn their back on the light  of  knowledge  find  peace?  For
this reason, our Prophet (saw) warned us, ""You should  be  a  teacher  or  a
learner, a listener or a supporter of knowledge, and you should not  be  the
fifth, which makes you perish!""[iii]

    Valued Muslims!
    Islamic civilization, which has been carrying justice, compassion, peace
and trust to all corners of the world since 'Asr al-Sa'adah (Age of  Bliss),
is a civilization of knowledge. It is so because  Islam  commands  human-who
shoulders the trust of Allah (swt) on  earth-to  think,  produce  knowledge,
and contribute to the improvement of themselves and the society by  learning
the truth.


    As the adherents of a religion as such, and with  the  inspiration  they
take from the Holy Qur'an that clearly expresses, ""Those who know would  not
be equal to those who do  not.""[iv],  Muslims  have  been  the  pioneers  of
knowledge in all the geographies they live. They have  taken  groundbreaking
steps in  sciences  such  as  medicine,  algebra,  chemistry  and  geometry,
physics and astronomy in particular, as well  as  the  fields  such  as  the
Qur'anic exegesis (tafsir), hadith, Islamic jurisprudence, and  kalam.  They
brilliantly established a bond between  the  unshakable  principles  of  the
religion they believe and the marvelous rules of  the  universe  they  live.
They have become the followers of a path that will lead humankind  to  peace
in this world and to salvation in the Hereafter by  combining  physics  with
metaphysics,  and  knowledge  with   wisdom.   They   have   authored   many
masterpieces that have put their stamp on history and they have  enlightened
both their own era and the following  centuries  with  their  knowledge  and
inventions.

    Honorable Muslims!
    With the sorrows that hurt all our hearts, the  Islamic  world  that  is
going through difficult times today is paying off the  price  of  neglecting
knowledge and contenting with ignorance. Making up for being left behind  in
that regard and building a peaceful and safe future  can  only  be  possible
through acquiring knowledge.

    Knowledge is such a great force-people with good intentions can turn  it
into benefits for humanity while people with  bad  intentions  can  turn  it
into a lethal technology that can kill millions of people.  Then,  our  duty
as Muslims is to know the value of knowledge, and to  introduce  ""ethics  of
knowledge"" to our present day so that the knowledge  can  produce  goodness.
We need to fully grasp the sense of the responsibility that  our  faith  and
history  places  on  us,  and  strive  to  become  a  society  that   reads,
contemplates,  inquires,  and  refers  to  authentic  sources   to   acquire
knowledge. We need to  embrace  knowledge  to  protect  our  tomorrows  from
material and spiritual destruction, with the awareness that we do  not  have
even a second to waste. We need to ensure that  our  children  who  are  the
light of our  eyes  become  familiar  with  the  prominent  figures  of  our
civilization, and teach them that  it  was  Muslim  scholars  who  laid  the
foundations of modern sciences and  technological  discoveries  hundreds  of
years ago. We need to introduce those prominent figures as role models,  who
used their knowledge, experience, reasoning, and efforts  for  the  good  of
humanity.

    Esteemed Believers!
    Our Prophet (saw) supplicated to our Lord, as I recited at the beginning
of my khutbah, ""O Allah, benefit me with that which You have taught me,  and
teach me that which will benefit me, and increase me  in  knowledge.""[v]  It
is essential for Muslims to have beneficial knowledge  and  do  good  deeds.
Today, too, just as has been throughout the history, Muslims all around  the
world continue  to  acquire  knowledge,  carry  out  learning  and  teaching
activities, and strive to be the pioneers of all kinds of charitable  works,
as well as reconstruction, improvement, and building  activities.  In  2018,
we inaugurated the Imam Sarakhsi Mosque  in  Bishkek,  Kyrgyzstan,  and  the
Cologne Mosque in Germany, with the help of our  charity-loving  nation.  In
2019, inshaallah, the adhans will echo, the believing hearts  will  line  up
standing shoulder to shoulder in prayer, and the  foreheads  will  meet  the
ground in prostration at the Hala Sultan Mosque in the Turkish  Republic  of
Northern Cyprus, the Tirana Mosque in Albania,  and  the  Sultan  Abdulhamid
Khan Mosque in Djibouti. May our Lord always give our noble  nation  all  in
abundance, who always support knowledge and worship  places.  May  our  Lord
accept all our charitable works in the best fashion.
-----------------------
[i] Alaq, 96/1-5.
[ii] Baqarah, 2/31.
[iii] Darimi, Muqaddimah, 26.
[iv] Zumar, 39/9.
[v] Tirmidhi, Da'awat, 128.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
35;2018-03-16;"Date: 16/03/2018





OUR NATION’S STRUGGLE FOR EXISTENCE:

THE VICTORY OF ÇANAKKALE



Honorable Believers,

In the verse I have recited, our Almighty Lord enjoins:

“Those who emigrated or were evicted from their homes or were harmed in My cause or fought or were killed - I will surely remove from them their misdeeds, and I will surely admit them to gardens beneath which rivers flow as reward from Allah, and Allah has with Him the best reward.”



In the hadith I read, our Prophet (s.a.w.) says:

“Allah guarantees to the person who carries out Jihad for His Cause and to confirm the Kalimah al-Tawhid, that He will either admit him into Paradise or return him with his reward or the booty he has earned to his residence from where he went out.”



Dear Believers,

Homeland is where people build their homes and find peace. It is the place where people live in safety and freedom far from oppression and tyranny. Homeland love is a unique feeling that Allah the Almighty engraved in our hearts. While defending this homeland with a noble struggle, our heroic ancestors took the power from their faith, and survived thanks to their love for the homeland. They did not hesitate to sacrifice their lives with the aim of preventing the adhan from being quieted, our flag from falling, and our honor from being broken. Because defending the homeland is to defend all the material and spiritual values that a nation possesses. The reward for defending our sacred values is either being a veteran or a martyr.



Honorable Believers,

Martyrdom is such an eminent rank that it has been praised by our Lord and desired by our Prophet (s.a.w.). Martyrdom is to lay down one’s existence for the domination of the right, the truth, and justice. It is to witness goodness and peace against evil and tyranny. The reward of this testimony is honor in this life, and paradise in the Hereafter. Martyrs are alive, they do not die, they are not called “dead”. In this respect, our Almighty Lord says:



“And do not say about those who are killed in the way of Allah, ‘They are dead.’ Rather, they are alive, but you perceive [it] not.”



Honourable Believers,

There are many glorious victories that change the course of history. The victory of Çanakkale is one of them. Çanakkale is the place where people whose hearts beat by an unshakable belief and the love of the homeland, make their bodies shields against e heartless invasion. Çanakkale is the place where Mehmetçik fell to the ground for the sake of independence and future with the motto “A martyr if I die, a veteran if I survive.” Çanakkale is the place where a nation that overflowed the oceans and made the history of re-existing.  Çanakkale is the name of the struggle of a nation that came together from all corners of Anatolia, from Rumelia, Baghdad, Damascus, Skopje, Bosnia. Their languages and colors were different, but they became one for the same cause. Çanakkale is a flag carried by our ancestors, women and men, and a land hosting that saintly spirit in every inch.

Çanakkale is the place where Mehmetçik adopted as a principle the verse “... And do not let the hatred of a people prevent you from being just...”, made the wounded enemy soldiers drink water and carried them on their back, acted humanly to the captives, and taught the morality of war to the world.

Çanakkale is the place where the good tidings “So do not weaken and do not grieve, and you will be superior if you are [true] believers.” manifested itself.



Honorable Believers,

Those aiming at our unity, solidarity and brotherhood, today, as it was yesterday, are surrounding us with no conscience or moral value. Terrorist organizations and gangs of persecution are trying to disrupt the peace and unity of our beloved nation. However, the end of those who try to create trouble among us, weaken our will and prudence will be disappointment. With the strength we receive from our faith and the inspiration we take from our history, we are struggling to establish peace, brotherhood and justice today as well.



Then, my brothers and sisters,

Let us not forget our history, our culture, our values, and our victories that made us and brought us to today. Let us teach our children the spirit that made Çanakkale insurmountable, the glory of our land which is full of the heroic memories of our martyrs. Let us keep the trust of our ancestors safe. Let us move this trust to the future with the same conscience and ideal.



Honorable Muslims!

Next Monday, we will once again have the pleasure of reaching the three months, which is the season of mercy, fertility and forgiveness. On the night that connects Thursday to Friday, we will also be celebrating the Night of Raghaib. May our Almighty Lord let all of us benefit from the three months in the most beautiful way, and reach Ramadan by gaining His countenance. May Allah grant mercy to the martyrs who sacrificed themselves for our religion, our holy things, our homeland, our nation, peace and blessings; and bestow healing to our veterans.



Brothers and Sisters,

Today, in all mosques across the country and the Presidency of Religious Affairs of Turkey and the Turkey Diyanet Foundation will receive donation to help our ongoing construction of mosques at home and abroad. We are waiting for your donation. And those who say “I would like to have a hand in” could type CAMİ and send an sms to 1379, and donate 10 TL by this way. May Allah accept your donation.

I end up with a hadith of our Beloved Prophet (s.a.w.):

“O Allah! Make Rajab and Shaban a blessing for us, and help us reach the month of Ramadan!”"
36;2019-08-23;"
DATE: 23.08.2019
[pic]
    THIS HOMELAND IS OURS AND UNDER OUR PROTECTION
    Honorable Muslims!
    Allah the Almighty (swt) states in the verse I have recited,  ""If  Allah
should aid you, no one can overcome you; but if He should forsake  you,  who
is there that can aid you after Him? Upon Allah let the believers  rely.""[i]

    According to the hadith I have read, when asked, ""What is a good deed?"",
the Prophet Muhammad (saw) replied, ""To believe in Allah, and fight for  His
cause.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    The land on which we live means much more than just a piece of land.  We
put forth our chest as a shield to defend the land, on which we live  freely
and to continue living freely, against all kinds of disgraceful attacks.  It
is the most beautiful land on earth for us, not an inch  of  which  we  will
forsake for all  worlds.  It  is  the  sacred  legacy  of  our  martyrs  who
sacrificed their lives, gave up on their beloved  ones  and  all  they  had,
were honored with the rank  of  martyrdom,  and  of  our  war  veterans  who
devoted their existence for it.

    Dear Muslims!
    Defending the land for us does not mean only overseeing a piece of land.
It means to make every effort to uphold all high values that  make  a  piece
of land ""our homeland."" We defend  the  life,  religion,  property,  future,
dignity, and honor of every individual living on this land. We stand by  the
side  of  all  oppressed  and   victimized   people   without   making   any
discrimination of religion, language, or race, and we do not  let  down  the
hopes of those who rely on us. We fight for keeping up  and  waving  in  the
sky our national flag that is the symbol  of  our  independence  and  future
existence. We proudly bear all kinds of sacrifices to let  the  adhans,  the
testimonials of which is the foundation of Islam, echo in the sky forever.

    Dear Believers!
    It is a sacred duty for all Muslims to love and defend their  countries.
It is a divine commandment to be prepared against the enemy for any kind  of
psychological, technological, or economic warfare.  In  this  regard  states
the Almighty Allah (swt), ""O  you  who  have  believed!  Persevere,  endure,
remain  stationed,  and  fear  Allah  that  you  may  be   successful.""[iii]
Similarly, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) emphasizes this holy struggle for  the
truth and the right as follows, ""Strive with your wealth,  your  hands,  and
your tongues.""[iv]





    Dear Muslims!
    August is an exceptionally important month for in the past our ancestors
demonstrated matchless heroism in defence  of  our  land  and  all  that  is
sacred for us. Our glorious forefathers, with their  hearts  full  of  faith
and with  their  courage  and  resoluteness,  won  unprecedented  victories,
leaving their marks in  many  Augusts.  Their  greatest  witnesses  are  the
victories won from the Battle of Malazgirt (Manzikert)  through  the  Battle
of Kosovo, and from the Battle of Mohacs through the Greco-Turkish War  (the
Turkish Great Offensive).

     These victories show us that Allah's help  has  always  been  with  the
believers. When the believers asked, [pic]""When  is  the  help  of  Allah?"",
Allah  the  Exalted  (swt)  always  supported  them  with  the  good   news,
[pic]""Unquestionably, the help of Allah is near.""[v]

    Honorable Believers!
    No enemy hand will touch upon our land even if there is a  single  house
is left standing. Upholding the unity  and  solidarity  above  any  personal
interest and working courageously and  resolutely,  our  noble  nation  will
never kneel down before any kind of derogation. Those  who  want  to  damage
our brotherhood, our affection for each other, and our peace are  doomed  to
lose today, too, just as in the past. Because those who stand by  Allah  and
work in a fair and sincere manner will eventually be victorious.  Those  who
stand by the falsehood, oppression,  cowardice,  and  evil  will  definitely
disappear one day. As expressed in the Holy Qur'an,  ""Truth  has  come,  and
falsehood has departed. Falsehood,  indeed,  is  by  nature  ever  bound  to
depart.""[vi]

    Dear Muslims!
    Sustaining its honorable journey from  the  past  to  the  present,  the
existence of our noble nation is a hope for the world. We can stand  against
the oppressors and protect  the  oppressed  only  if  we  defend  our  land,
nation, and sacred values altogether, and be powerful  both  materially  and
spiritually.

    Then, let us, young or elderly, take our ancestors as the  example,  and
embellish  ourselves  with  the  same  faith,  the  same  cause,  the   same
resoluteness, the same loyalty, and the same submission  to  Allah.  Let  us
not give a chance to those who want to suppress  our  country,  disrupt  our
unity and solidarity, and cause turmoil and disorder in  this  beloved  land
of ours. Let us never move away from  righteousness,  benevolence,  and  the
truth and the right.

    As I conclude the khutbah, I would like to commemorate, wishing  Allah's
mercy upon and with heartfelt  gratitude  for,  our  honorable  martyrs  and
heroic veterans who have borne the banner of Islam  throughout  the  history
and bequathed this heavenly homeland for us.
-----------------------
[i] Al-i 'Imran, 3/160.
[ii] Bukhari, 'Itq, 2.
[iii] Al-i 'Imran, 3/200.
[iv] Nasa'i, Jihad, 48.
[v] Baqarah, 2/214.
[vi] Isra, 17/81.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
37;2017-05-26;"
  LOCATION  : GENEL
  DATE             : 26.05.2017

[pic]

      EVERY SOUL HAS A RIGHT UPON US

                               A Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters
  In the verse I  have  recited,  the  Almighty  enjoins:  ""Worship  Allah.
Associate nothing with Him. To parents do good, and to  relatives,  orphans,
the needy, the near neighbor, the neighbor farther away,  the  companion  at
your side, the traveler, and those for whom  you  are  responsible.  Indeed,
Allah does not like those who are self-deluding and boastful.""[i]

  In the hadith I have recited, our Prophet (pbuh) says: ""Indeed your  self
has a right upon you, your Lord has a right  upon  you,  your  guest  has  a
right upon you, and your family has a right  upon  you.  So  give  each  the
right they are due!""[ii]

  Honorable Believers!
  Many thanks to the Almighty that he has brought us  to  another  Ramadan,
the month of grace, prosperity, and mercy. We will  experience  the  joy  of
the first tarawih altogether this evening. We will have  the  peace  of  the
first sahur altogether tonight. We will experience  the  enthusiasm  of  our
first fasting tomorrow. We will try to host as well as we can the school  of
Ramadan which will stay at our house for a month.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  Students of the Ramadan school are all believers. This schools teaches us
dedication, patience, gratitude, and appreciating the blessings. It  reminds
us of our responsibilities towards Allah, towards one another,  and  towards
people we know. It points out to us that every soul has  a  right  upon  us.
The greatest lesson we can take from this school is  to  make  our  fasting,
sahur, iftar, tarawih, and all good deeds  instruments  in  abiding  by  the
right of one another. To renew our promise to look out for the right of  our
spouses  and  children,  our  parents,  our  neighbors  and  relatives,  our
employees or employers.  To  solidify  our  commitment  to  not  ignore  the
situation of the orphans, the homeless, and every soul in need.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  Our parents have a right upon us. Because they brought us into the  world
through so many hardships. They raised and prepared us for life by  fighting
against many difficulties. Then come! Let us be good daughters and  sons  to
our parents at all times this Ramadan. Let us  not  spare  our  respect  and
mercy from them.

  Our spouses and children have a right upon us.  Because  they  have  been
entrusted to us by Allah. They are our values with  whom  we  undertake  the
burden of life. Then come! Let us treat our spouses and children with  love,
compassion,  affection,  and  fondness.  Let  us  raise  our   children   as
generations that contribute to Islam and to humankind who know  their  Lord,
their religion, their prophet, and their book well.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  Our relatives and neighbors have a right upon us.  Because  they  are  an
opportunity for prosperity for us. Then come! Let  us  keep  in  touch  with
them. Let us share their joy and  sorrow.  Let  us  not  abandon  them  into
loneliness among the crowd.

  The orphans have a right upon us. Because they are a test  for  us.  Then
come! Let us look after the orphans. Let us hold  their  hands  and  prepare
them for life. Let us not forget that the tiniest spark  we  will  cause  in
their eyes will be the biggest happiness for them and the most lasting  gain
for us.

  Dear Brothers and Sisters!
  Every person, every being has a right upon us.[iii]  Because  this  world
belongs to others as well as us. Then come! Let  us  take  heed  of  rights.
Remember that we can protect our own rights to the extent  that  we  protect
the right of others. We can expect our right to be respected to  the  extent
that we respect the right of others.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  Our presidency will point out to the concept of right this  Ramadan  with
the theme ""Every Being Has a Right upon You, This Ramadan  and  Always.""  It
will make an effort to reinforce the awareness of rights which  gets  weaker
every day. With these thoughts and sentiments, I pray  to  Allah  that  holy
Ramadan may bring good things to our nation, to the world of Islam,  and  to
humankind. May He grant us to be among those who respect  rights  and  whose
rights are respected.
-----------------------
[i] An-Nisa, 4/36.
[ii] Tirmidhi, Zühd, 63.
[iii] Abu Dawud, Tatavvû, 27.

           Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services


"
38;2020-01-24;"
DATE: 24.01.2020
                                    [pic]

    TO BE A RESPONSIBLE FATHER
    Honorable Muslims!
    Being a family is one of the greatest blessings  granted  for  human  by
Allah (swt). This is so because family means trust, shelter, and refuge.  It
refers to joining hands all together to foster  the  good  and  prevent  the
evil. It is also the most important institution that prepares human for  the
future. The first education ever is given within family.  Within  family  is
formed the personality. Before everyone else, from parents are taught  love,
respect, and honesty.

    Important duties fall upon the father in family as well as the mother. A
father's responsibility is not limited to the financial satisfaction of  the
family's material needs only.  It  is  the  primary  responsibility  of  all
fathers to rear children  who  are  aware  of  the  significance  of  mercy,
equipped with good morals and values. In the hadith I  recited  as  I  began
the khutbah, Prophet Muhammad (saw) says, ""No  father  can  leave  a  better
heritage to his children than good manners.""[i]

    Dear Believers!
    To be a father means to strive that his child is honored with iman, like
Prophet Nuh. It is to make every effort so that the child could be happy  in
this world and in the Hereafter. Prophet Nuh called  out  to  his  son,  who
refused to get aboard the ship to tawhid, with  his  final  hope,  ""...O  my
son, come aboard with us and be not with the disbelievers.""[ii]

    Dear Muslims!
    To be a father means to be in a  state  of  constant  supplication  like
Prophet Ibrahim. It is to seek refuge with Allah (swt)  to  be  an  obedient
servant of His. It is to pray earnestly to Him (swt) for good  children.  In
this respect, Prophet Ibrahim prayed to Allah (swt) as, ""Our Lord!  Make  us
Muslims in submission to You and from our descendants  a  Muslim  nation  in
submission to You. And show us our rites and accept our repentance.  Indeed,
You are the Accepting of repentance, the Merciful.""[iii] ""O Allah!  Make  me
an establisher of prayer, and many from my descendants. O Allah,  accept  my
supplication.""[iv]

    Dear Believers!
    To be a father means to preserve  one's  perseverance  in  the  face  of
hardships, like Prophet Yaqub. It is to bear the tests  and  trials  of  the
world, however heavy they may be, with patience and reliance  on  Allah.  It
is to continuously instill love, mercy, justice,  and  compassion  in  one's
children. It is to warn them when they fail, but not ever give  up  hope  in
them. Prophet Yaqub said to his children who, out of jealousy,  threw  their
brother Yusuf in  a  well,  ""...Rather,  your  souls  have  enticed  you  to
something, so patience is most fitting. And Allah  is  the  one  sought  for
help against that which you describe.""[v]

    Dear Muslims!
    To be a father means to give advice to one's child  in  a  compassionate
manner, like Luqman. It is to teach them what is right and  what  is  wrong,
as well as what is haram and what is halal.  Luqman  advised  his  child  so
finely,  ""O  my  son,  do  not  associate  anything  with   Allah.   Indeed,
association with Him is great  injustice.""  ""O  my  son,  establish  prayer,
enjoin what is right, forbid  what  is  wrong,  and  be  patient  over  what
befalls you."" ""And do not turn your cheek in contempt toward people  and  do
not walk through the earth exultantly. Indeed, Allah does  not  like  anyone
self-deluded and boastful."" ""And be moderate in your  pace  and  lower  your
voice...""[vi]

    Dear Muslims!
    To be a father means to follow the Sunnah of Prophet Muhammad (saw), who
was sent as mercy to the worlds. He (saw) was an exemplary father. He  would
not make any discrimination among his children. Seeing his daughter  Fatima,
he would stand up, let her have his seat, kiss and hug  her  mercifully.  He
would treat considerately not only his own children but all children.  Grown
up under Prophet Muhammad's (saw)  supervision,  Anas  said  about  him,  ""I
served him for ten years. He never said 'uff' to me.""[vii]

    Honorable Believers!
    Our children expect care and compassion from us. They want to feel  they
are valued around us. They need us to be the compass guiding them  on  their
way and the safe harbor taking shelter in as they learn the life. Then,  let
us not neglect our children in the busyness of the daily life and  the  rush
of earning livelihood. Let us make every effort to raise children  who  help
their religion, homeland, and all humanity. Let us not  leave  our  children
deprived of our love, care, and du'a for them.
-----------------------
[i] Tirmidhi, Birr, 33.
[ii] Hud, 11/42.
[iii] Baqarah, 2/128.
[iv] Ibrahim, 14/40.
[v] Yusuf 12/18.
[vi] Luqman, 31/13, 17, 18, 19.
[vii] Muslim, Fadail, 51.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
39;2017-01-20;"LOCATION   : NATIONWIDE

DATE              : 20.01.2017



FAITHFUL SERVANTS OF THE COMPASSIONATE

Honorable Brothers and Sisters! 

In the verse I have recited, Allah Almighty enjoins: “Indeed, those who have said, ‘Our Lord is Allah’ and then remained on a right course; the angels will descend upon them saying, ‘Do not fear and do not grieve but receive good tidings of Paradise, which you were promised.’”

In the verse I have recited, the Prophet (pbuh) says: “A believer is like a honeybee. He always eats good, clean, lawful things like the bee. He always produces good things, always purses goodness. He never breaks or ruin anything.”

Honorable Believers!

The Almighty sent down a Holy Book for us. He sent down an exemplary Prophet for us. He taught us how to lead a humane life, how to have a believer’s attitude with examples from His Book and His Messenger. Let us remember once again in today’s khutbah the qualities of a believer as described by the Holy Quran and demonstrated by the Prophet’s exemplary life. 

Brothers and Sisters!

The believer is one who sincerely believes in the existence and oneness of Allah. They unwaveringly acknowledge Allah’s angels, books, prophets; the afterlife, destiny, and what Muhammad Mustafa (pbuh) brought from the ranks of Allah. The believer is the person who turns the Prophet’s exemplary morality into a life.

Brothers and Sisters!

The believers presented to us in the Quran are those cognizant of the purpose and wisdom in their creation. They think, remember, and reflect upon what they see, hear, and experience. They live with the awareness of being servants and worshipping. They perform their prayers with conscious and in submission and consider them ascension. They give charity merely for Allah’s sake from the heart. They make their fast a shield against evil.

Believers are true servants of the Compassionate. Their hearts are satisfied with the remembrance of and gratitude to Allah. They feel a heartfelt, deep respect when His name is mentioned. They are not deaf or blind to the verses, commandments, and bans of Allah. They strive to understand them all accurately and implement them in the best way.  

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Believers are humble. They do not get arrogant. They do not brag. They do not act superior. They are dignified. They stand clear of empty words, acts, and attitude that are of no use to their world and afterlife. When the ignorant pick on them, they merely respond by saying, “peace!”

Believers have trust. They only rely on Allah. They only seek His help. They repent for their faults and sins. They recognize their mistakes and do not persist on them. They always act with patience. They do not give up in the face of hardship and calamity, they do not lose hope. They know life is a test and say اِنَّا لِلّٰهِ وَاِنَّٓا اِلَيْهِ رَاجِعُونَۜ “To Allah we belong and to Him we shall return,” thereby uttering their submission and fortitude. They overcome anger. They forgive the bad things done to them.

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

Believers adopt righteousness and loyalty as motto. They avoid lies, false testimony, and deception. They never break their word. They never misappropriate. They do not veer away from what is true and just. They preserve their dignity and honor. They do not shy away for one second from fighting for a humane life. They do not hang back from sacrificing in Allah’s cause in poverty and in wealth.  

Believers are friends and brothers to one another. They do not abandon each other to loneliness. They do not wish bad things for others. They compete in goodness, not evil. They help one another in goodness, not in sin. They value mercy and compassion. They do not allow oppression, violence, and savagery. They do not cast a shadow upon each other’s prestige, they do not cross lines. They never abandon moderation. They do not break the heart that Allah looks at. They especially do not take a life deemed venerable and forbidden by Allah. 

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

All of these are the qualities of our Lord’s faithful servants that He described in His Book. Those who possess these good qualities have neither fear nor sorrow. They will attain Allah’s infinite grace and eternal paradise. There, they will be greeted with respect and peace. They will be entertained with the nicest of treats.

Fortunate are the true servants of the Compassionate! Fortunate are those who have earned Allah’s favor by living in compliance with the purpose and wisdom of their creation! Fortunate are those who have taken the path of peace! Fortunate are those who have turned the mortal world into an immortal gain!

May the Almighty grant us to be among the servants He likes and favors."
40;2018-12-21;"DATE: 21.12.2018

DIVINE YEAST OF EXISTENCE: MERCY

Honorable Muslims!

Our Beloved Prophet’s (saw) daughter Zaynab’s (ra) child had a severe illness. Zaynab (ra) sent a message to the Messenger of Allah (saw), “My son is dying; please come to us.” The Messenger of Allah (saw) went to his daughter’s house with a group of Companions. The child was placed on his lap while his breath was irregular. Tears flowed from the eyes of the Prophet (saw). One of the Companions there asked him, “What is this, [tears in your eyes] O Allah’s Messenger?”. Upon this, our Prophet (saw) uttered the following words: “This is Mercy, which Allah has embedded in the hearts of whomever He wished of His slaves. And Allah does not bestow His Mercy except on the merciful among His servants.”

		Valued Believers!

		Mercy is the kindness and softness of heart. It is to be sensitive to every living creature. All the virtues such as love of the child, respect for parents, helping the elderly, the poor, patients, orphans, the homeless, and even compassion for plants and animals are all the manifestation of mercy. Mercy, the manifestation of Allah’s name “al-Rahman”, is the divine yeast of being. Mercy contains the most effective medicine for the material and spiritual diseases and the remedy for the various troubles that occupy the hearts. 

		Esteemed Muslims!

		Our Beloved Prophet (saw) is the most splendid example that introduced compassion to the community of the jahiliyya (age of ignorance) and spread mercy in all aspects of life. To the believers, He was kind and merciful. By mercy from Allah, He was lenient with the people around Him constantly. He eased them with beautiful words. He never hurt anybody. He never left fairness and justice even while punishing, and he never persecuted anyone. He recommended that believers treat each other with love, compassion and mercy.

		Valued Believers!

		Today, more than ever before, humanity is in need of compassion and mercy, and conscience and justness. Countless innocent people in different corners of the world are writhing in the grip of mercilessness, and subjected to oppression and violence. Damaged by this remorselessness are not only humans, but also all other living beings, as well as our future. The Messenger of Allah (saw), on the contrary, enjoined that people treat all creatures with mercy, and said, “The Compassionate One [Allah] has mercy on those who are merciful. If you show mercy to those who are on earth, He Who is in the heaven will show mercy to you.”

			Honorable Muslims!

		Mercy is to not leave our parents in solitude, but stretch our wings of compassion for them. It is to be considerate, have a smiling face for our spouses, and say a couple of warm words for them. It is to be forgiving and tolerant for our children, and treat them justly.

		Mercy is to caress an orphan’s head with mercy. It is to help those who are lost and in trouble. It is to share our bread with the hungry and the homeless.

		Mercy is to avoid any action to not distort the balance of the world. It is to plant a sapling even it is the Doomsday. It is to provide a bowl of food and water for the hungry and thirsty animals on these cold winter days. All in all, it is to ensure that the world is a livable, safe place for all living beings.

		Esteemed Believers!

		Let us regard every creature created by Allah (swt) as something entrusted to us from Him, and as a precious member of the family of the universe. Let us turn mercilessness into compassion and mercy. Let us, again, instill mercy in the conscience of the time.

I would like to conclude my khutbah with the translation of the verses I recited at the beginning: “And what can make you know what is [breaking through] the difficult pass? It is the freeing of a slave. Or feeding on a day of severe hunger, an orphan of near relationship, or a needy person in misery. And then being among those who believed and advised one another to patience and advised one another to compassion.”"
41;2018-08-10;"
DATUM       : 10.08.2018
                                    [pic]
           OPFERTIERSCHLACHTEN GIBT ANLASS FÜR ANNÄHRUNG AN ALLAH
    Verehrte Gläubige gesegnet sei euer Freitag!
    In dem Koranvers die ich eben gelesen haben  befehlt  unserer  erhabener
Allah wie folgt: ""Ihr Fleisch erreicht Allah nicht, noch tut  es  ihr  Blut,
sonder eure Ehrfrucht ist es die Ihn reicht ...""[i]

    Und mit dem Hadith die ich gelesen  haben  befehlt,  unserer  Herr,  der
Prophet  (s.a.s) wie folgt: ""Die Kinder Adams können nicht eine bessere  Tat
am Opferfest machen als für Allah ein Opfertier zu schlachten ...""[ii]

    Werte Muslime!
    Seit dem heiligen Adam bis heute weiterführende Opfergabe ist  eine  uns
an Allah annaehrendes Gebetsweise. Schlachten von Opfertier  bedeutet  nicht
nur ein Tier am Festtage zu schlachten.  Opfertier  zu  schlachten  ist  ein
Zeichen  für  die  Treue,  Hingabe  und  Ergebung  an  Allah.     Ist   eine
symbolische Bezeichnung, dass wir bereit sind mit  unserem  Vermögen,  Leben
und  Existenz  im  Wege  Allahs  zu  opfern.   Wir  besinnen  uns  an  jedem
Opferfesttag an die absolute Hingabe von  heiligen Ibrahim und  dessen  Sohn
Ismail an dem Allah alle All. Wir besinnen uns erneut, dass wir unser  Leben
auf so ein Glaube, Hingabe und Aufrichtigkeit bauen müssen.

    Meine Geschwister!
    Opfertierschlachten ist vor allem mit der Hoffnung den Segen  Allahs  zu
erlangen errichtetes Gebet. Berechtigung ist mit  Koran  und  beispielhaftes
Verhalten unser Prophet festgelegt. Im Koran wird wie folgt  befohlen:  ""und
für jedes Volk gaben wir Anleitung zur Opferung, dass sie des Namens  Allahs
gedenken für das, was Er ihnen gegeben  hat  an  Vieh...""[iii]  Und  unserer
geliebter Prophet (s.a.s) hat ab dem zweiten Hedschrajahr   jedes  Jahr  ein
Opfertier geschlachtet.[iv]

    Werte Muslime!
    Opfertier ermöglicht den Gläubigern Aufteilung, Notbedürftigen für Segen
des Allahs bei Seite zu stehen für sich Gewohnheit  zu  machen.  Rettet  ihn
davor, geizig  zu  sein,  und   gefangener  von  Weltgüter  zu  sein.  Bring
Nachbaren, Verwandten, Freunde im  Großen  und  Ganzen  alle  die  Gläubiger
zusammen.  Bringt  uns  mit  unseren  tausenden  von  Kilometern  entfernten
Geschwistern  näher,  vereint  uns  und   stärkt  unser   Bewusstsein,  eine
Glaubensgemeinschaft zu werden.

    Opfertier bedeutet auf dem Tisch der  Menschen  die  Sattheit  vermissen
bisschen  damit   Beitrag  zu  leisten.   Ungeachtet   auch   unter   welche
Religionsglaube  die  sind,  jeden  behilflich  zu  sein.  Anlass  für   die
Festfreude von Unterdrückten zu sein. Sogar in  den  ganz  entlegenen  Teile
der Welt, den Glaubensgeschwistern die in  den  Bereichen  der  Welt  leben,
dessen Namen wir  nicht  kennen,  nie  gesehen  haben  eine  Wohltathand  zu
reichen. Dies ist mehr als Falsch von Opfertier zu bieten   die  Bezeichnung
für Hoffnung, Sicherheit und Zuneigung.

    Meine Geschwister!
    Opfertier unter uns zu Teilen öffnet für uns  das  Tor  für  eine  ewige
Glück und Friedlichkeit. So  hat  auch  unserer  geliebter  Prophet  (s.a.s)
aufgekündigt, dass unsere Opfertiere mit notbedürftigen teilen uns  wirklich
Nutzen bringen wird.  Einmal hat  er  gefragt  was  von  dem  geschlachteten
Schaf  übrig  geblieben  ist,  nach  dem  die  Tochter  Âi?e  mit  nur   ein
Schulterblatt geantwortet hat, dann sagte er, ""O   Âi?e!  Dann  wurde  alles
außer einem Schulterblatt für uns gezeichnet""[v]

    Verehrte Muslime!
    Unsere Präsidentschaft  für  Religionsangelegenheiten  organisiert  seit
einem     Vierteljahrhundert     zusammen     mit     dem     Verein     für
Religionsangelegenheiten im Inland und  Ausland  Opfertierschlachtung  durch
Vertretung. Durch unserer opferbereiten und  großherzigen  Nation  vertraute
Opfertiere  werden  nach  islamischen  Praktiken  geschlachtet   und   unser
Geschwistern in unser Land  und  allen  Seiten  der  Welt  übermittelt.  Mit
Opfertierschlachten durch Vertretung unter das  Moto  ""Verteile  Opfertiere,
nähre dich an die Geschwistern"" begonnene Organisation für  Opfertierspenden
wird bis zum Abend des Festvortages weiterführen.

    Meine Geschwister!
    Uns ist bekannt, dass ein Teil von Opfertier was wir abgeben  kommt  uns
vielleicht als millionen von Fürbitten zurück. Wir sollten auch um  mit  den
Waisen, Alleinstehenden, Flüchtlinge ein Herzenstisch zu decken  dabei  teil
nehmen.    Um von uns Hilfe erwartete Glaubensgesellschaft  nicht allein  zu
lassen sollten wir diese Zuneigungsfahrt unterstützen.

    Ich möchte mein Freitagsgebet mit dem folgenden Hadith dem Gesandtem von
Allah (s.a.s.) beenden. ""wer ein weltliche  Leiden  eine  Muslim  beseitigt,
wird Allah am Tage der Auferstehung eine von dessen Leiden  beseitigen.  Wer
einem in Not befindliche hilft, wir Allah denen in  der  Welt  und  jenseits
behilflich sein ...""[vi]

-----------------------
[i] (Pilgerfahrt) Hac, 22/37.
[ii] Tirmizî, Edâhî, 1.
[iii] Hac, 22/34.
[iv] Tirmizî, Edâhî, 11.
[v]
RSE×; <     =    >     óçÛÏ½¯?<?{?fQ<(hû!ðh¼Ã5?B*[pic]CJaJmH |phsH
|(hû!ðh?.¬5?B*[pic]CJ Tirmizî, S?fatü'l-k?yâme, 33.
[vi] Ebû Dâvûd, Edeb, 60.
                                              Din Hizmetleri Genel Müdürlü?ü

"
42;2017-06-23;"LOCATION  : NATIONWIDE

DATE            : 23.06.2017



MAKING OUR WHOLE LIFE RAMADAN

Fellow believers who have packed this beautiful mosque with faith in your hearts! A blessed Friday to you all.

Honorable Believers!

We are both happy and sad today. We are happy. Because we have experienced to our hearts’ content the civilization of Ramadan. We have approached Eid as pupils of Ramadan school. We are sad. Because we bid farewell to the Holy Ramadan which every year brings us the Quran again as well as the piety of fasting, the joy of iftar, the abundance of sahur, and reminds us what we have forgotten. Here goes the month of mercy that surrounds our cities, tables, and souls with its richness and generosity for a month. May Allah Almighty make us among His servants that have done the best in Ramadan. May He let us reach the Eid and many more Ramadans with faith, knowledge, and wisdom.

Dear Believers!

We fasted in this unique period of time that, with its mercy and grace, brought our souls closer to Allah and elated our spirits with virtue and abundance. We were tested with hunger and thirst in long summer days. We said “I am fasting” against any desire and appetite. Our patience was tested. We guarded our mind, hands, tongue, and all in all ourselves against evil. We surrounded ourselves with compassion and mercy as we fasted. We once again sympathized with the poor and needy. We better understood the value of making do with less. We read our guide for the true path, the Quran, which heals souls and brings peace to believers in both worlds. We tried to understand and practice it.

Dear Congregation!

We performed prayer day and night in Ramadan by virtue of the verse  “He has certainly succeeded who purifies himself and mentions the name of his Lord and prays.” We came closer to Allah with prayer in confession of our helplessness. We performed tarawih prayers, gathering around the same goal and standing side by side. We made an effort to get off the burden of sin with gratitude and prayer during iftar, with repentance and asking for forgiveness during sahur. 

In awareness of the verse “Never will you attain the good until you spend in the way of Allah from that which you love,” we extended a helping hand to the poor and needy with zakat, alms, fitr, and iftar tables. We opened our souls to our neighbors, orphans, and homeless. We had the joy of sharing, solidarity, and giving without taking back for the sake of Allah.

Ramadan has been a fruitful school for us for a month. It gave us spiritual education. It taught us discipline in life. It reinforced feelings of fraternity, unity, and togetherness. It allowed us to contemplate on the years we lived and to revise our future. 

Honorable Believers!

As Ramadan bids us farewell soon, the month of mercy asks us to always keep all the beautiful things it has taught us. Then come! Let us fulfill our duties and responsibilities until the final moment of the test by virtue of the verse in which Allah enjoins, “Worship your Lord until there comes to you the certainty.” Let us make an effort every moment to earn Allah’s favor by virtue of the hadith of our Prophet (pbuh) in which he says, “The most beloved deed to Allah is the regular consistent one.” Let us be always sincere to Allah, to ourselves, and to one another. Let us practice and make others practice the things we taught in Ramadan. Let us make our whole life Ramadan in return for the generosity Ramadan offers to us.

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

Before I finish my khutbah, I would like to remind you something. The traffic accidents that happen every year turn the peace and joy of Eid into grief and pain. A lot of brothers and sisters are killed in these accidents. A lot of families perish. A lot of parents, children, and relatives are left teary-eyed and destitute. Hopes and futures die away. At this point, I urge all brothers and sisters to adhere to the traffic rules, be patient and careful, and look after the rights of one another. May Allah let all brothers and sisters who will make an Eid trip come back home safe and sound. May He protect us from any accident, trouble, and tribulation. 

I would like to finish my khutbah with the following prayer from our Prophet (pbuh): “O Allah! Forgive us! Have mercy on us! Accept our worship, good deeds, and prayers! Admit us to your Paradise, save us from Hell! Rectify all our affairs.”"
43;2017-09-01;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 01.09.2017



         EID AL-ADHA

Assalatu wassalamu alaika Ya Rasool Allah!

Assalatu wassalamu alaika Ya Habeeb Allah!

Assalatu wassalamu alaika Ya Sayyid al Awwalin wal Akhirin

Honorable Brothers and Sisters! Eid Mubarak to You All!

Praise and thanks be to our Lord Almighty who granted us such a joyful Eid.

Honorable Believers!

Our Lord Almighty says in the verse I have recited: “It is neither their meat nor their blood that reaches Allah, but it is piety from you that reaches Him.” 

Our Prophet sacrificed his animals with the prayer in the hadith I have recited on an Eid like this one: “O Allah! These sacrificial animals are your blessings and they are for your countenance. Accept my sacrifice and my family’s and ummah’s sacrifices!” 

Brothers and Sisters!

We are once again having the peace and happiness of reaching Eid al-Adha, the days of joy and excitement, once again. Eid al-Adha brings us each year one of the five fundamental prayers in Islam, namely the ritual of hajj. It offers us the ritual of sacrifice as a means of getting closer to our Lord. The Eid reminds us again the loyalty of Ibrahim and the submission of Ismail. It brings once again the image of our Master Muhammad Mustapha’s (pbuh) faithfulness, generosity and his firm stand as a believer and his exemplary life right before our eyes.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Recently, millions of our brothers and sisters have poured to the House of Allah, to Arafat for the ritual of hajj. They have renewed their agreement of faith with our Lord. We, as Muslims of the world, are going to sacrifice our animals in the name of Allah today. We will strengthen our belief in Tawheed and our sense of servitude.

With their white as snow ihrams, a symbol of purification from faults and sins, our brothers and sisters performing the hajj acknowledge with their most sincere prayers that there is no refuge but Allah. Our brothers and sisters from all corners of the world join in prayer at Kaaba with a common feeling. The sound of “Labbaik” fills the skies with all its sincerity. We too are going to depict today that what really matters is closeness to Allah, while we are sacrificing our animals.

Our brothers and sisters performing the hajj express in all steps of the hajj that one should not be the slave of his wants and desires and only piousness leads to salvation. We will demonstrate today with our sacrifices that we are ready to give up all our possessions on the path of Allah.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Eid al-Adha is the Eid of peace, well-being, brotherhood, unity and solidarity. It is the Eid of those who set aside all differences and reached unity in abundance, those who know themselves and their Lord, those who contemplate and consider and those who submit themselves to their Lord with sincerity. It is the Eid of those who cleared their mind of evil, cleaned their heart from spiritual stains and those who refrain from all sins. It is the Eid of those who discipline their desires, those who hurt no living being and those who strive to be trustworthy. This is the Eid of those who dress in patience and praise, those who live a life in accordance with the reason and purpose of our existence. This is the Eid of those who keep our values alive; those who get close to the poor, lonely, orphan and desolate, and those who are the help to the helpless.

Brothers and Sisters!

Eids are times when we should get even closer to our Lord and each other. Eids are the days where feelings of unity and solidarity, sharing and helping are at their peak. Eids are the days where we should remember that everything is a trial in this journey of life where there are both happiness and sadness.

So come! Let us put a smile on the faces of our parents, our spouses and children, our brothers and sisters and our neighbors. Let us carry the joy of Eid to the lonely, desolate, poor, destitute and elderly. Let us mend and repair broken hearts with the blessings and beauties of the Eid. Let us end the resentments, hard feelings and conflicts today that put a shadow over our brotherhood and joy of Eid.

Let us not forget that each gift we give in this Eid will get us closer to our Lord’s countenance. The most beautiful gift we could give in this Eid is a sincere salutation from our hearts, our earnest prayers, and our smiles and visits.

Brothers and Sisters!

As I conclude the khutba, I wish a blessed Eid to our honorable nation, our people abroad, all our brothers and sisters in the region of our hearts and the realm of Islam. I ask our Lord Almighty for the acceptance of your sacrifices, the acceptance of the hajj of all our brothers and sisters, forgiveness of our sins and a happy Eid. I want to end this khutba with these verses that put the true Eids to words:

The heart finds it’s beloved, let it be this Eid!

The servant finds his sultan, let it be this Eid!

Gloom and sorrow be gone, curtain of the heart be lifted!



Written by: General Directorate of Religious ServicesAll sins be forgiven, let it be this Eid!"
44;2018-08-31;"
DATE: 31.08.2018
                                    [pic]
                         WORKING ENRICHES OUR LIVES
    Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
    In the verse I have recited, our Almighty Lord (swt) states:  ""And  that
there is not for man except that [good] for which he strives. And  that  his
effort is going to be seen. Then he will be  recompensed  for  it  with  the
fullest recompense.""[i]

    The Beloved Prophet (saw) says in the hadith I have  read:  ""Nobody  has
ever eaten a better meal than that which one  has  earned  by  working  with
one's own hands.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    Our Lord, who is al-Razzaq (The Provider and Sustainer), is the One  Who
bestows upon us every sip we  drink,  every  morsel  we  eat,  the  air  we
breathe, the bread, and the water. He is the Owner of eternal offerings. We
know and believe while saying ""O Razzaq!"" that Allah is the One  Who  gives
the nourishment of both our souls and our bodies, and He is  the  Guarantor
of our sustenance. What is incumbent upon us as believers  is  to  work  in
lawful ways to obtain sustenance, to pursue the income that  is  clean  and
decent. Our beloved Prophet (saw) expressed this point as follows: ""No soul
will die until it has received all its provision decreed  by  Allah  (swt).
So, fear Allah and seek your provision from the convenient ways. Take  that
which  is   halal   (permissible)   and   leave   that   which   is   haram
(forbidden).""[iii]

    Brothers and Sisters!
    The prophets who were sent as guides to mankind  were  also  engaged  in
various professions such as tailoring, carpentry, farming,  or  trade,  and
provided halal sustenance for themselves and their families without being a
burden on anybody. It is the Sunnah of the  prophets  to  work  with  elbow
grease and hand labor, to be in struggle for the halal gain, to produce and
spend lawfully.

    Allah the Almighty (swt) makes the following call to all mankind in  the
Holy Qur'an:
[pic]
      ""O mankind, eat from  whatever  is  on  earth  [that  is]  lawful  and
good...""[iv]

    Esteemed Muslims!
    Working brings peace and blessings to our life. Honorable  for  servants
is to work in jobs that will be approved by Allah (swt),  using  the  mind,
body, and the heart bestowed by Him (swt). Believers, then,  should  always
renew themselves, knowing that they shall be in loss if ""two of their  days
are equal"".

    Our religion prohibits laziness, irresponsibility, and any act of  fraud
and dishonesty with the purpose of acquiring unearned gains. It does not in
any manner allow any means to  acquire  unearned  gains  such  as  bribery,
usury, hoarding, and black-marketing, which disrupt the safe  and  peaceful
environment of the society by disregarding its moral values. As a matter of
fact, our Prophet (saw) states, ""It is better for anyone of you to  take  a
rope and cut the wood (from the forest) and carry it over his back and sell
it (as a means of earning his living) rather  than  to  ask  a  person  for
something and that person may give him or not.""[v].

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    In the Holy Qur'an Allah (swt) commands, ""But seek, through  that  which
Allah has given you, the home of the Hereafter; and [yet],  do  not  forget
your share of the world...""[vi]. Muslims should take  this  divine  warning
into consideration and not forsake their life  in  the  Hereafter  for  the
worldly life, or vice versa. They should maintain such virtues as  honesty,
justice, and fairness in business life, and not lose the  consciousness  of
servitude to Allah (swt) while working to maintain their life.

    I would like to conclude my khutbah with the following verse  describing
the believers: ""[They are] men whom neither  commerce  nor  sale  distracts
from the remembrance of Allah and  performance  of  prayer  and  giving  of
zakah. They fear a Day in which the hearts and eyes will  [fearfully]  turn
about.""[vii]
-----------------------
[i] Najm, 53/39-41.
[ii] Bukhari, Buyu, 15.
[iii] Ibn Majah, Tijarat (Business Transactions), 2.
[iv] Baqarah, 2/168.
[v] Bukhari, Zakat, 50.
[vi] Qasas, 28/77.
[vii] Nur, 24/37.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services


"
45;2017-02-17;"LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE

DATE               : 17.02.2017



FACTS TAUGHT BY SURAH AL-ASR

Honorable Believers!

There is a surah in our Book, the Holy Quran, which is short but quite deep in meaning. It concisely puts forward the paths that will save mankind from eternal frustration and bring them to endless blessings. It is the Surah al-Asr. Surah al-Asr teaches us the five facts that give us life. Let us hear about them in today’s khutbah.

Honorable Brothers and Sisters! 

The first fact that Surah al-Asr teaches us is the awareness of time. Man is a creature limited by time. Lord Almighty enjoins just at the beginning of the surah, اِنَّ الْاِنْسَانَ لَف۪ي خُسْرٍۙ . وَالْعَصْرِۙ “By time, indeed mankind is in loss.” He makes time the witness for mankind. Because it is one of the greatest blessings given to mankind. It is the most precious treasure entrusted to us so we may decorate our world with goodness and earn the afterlife. Wasting it and spending an irresponsible life is completely unbecoming for a believer. It is the greatest frustration for a person.

Brothers and Sisters!

The second fact taught to us by Surah al-Asr is the significance of the blessing of faith. As the Lord enjoins, اِلَّا الَّذ۪ينَ اٰمَنُوا He informed people that the first condition of being saved from loss and frustration is believing. Because a life spent without faith is the greatest of losses. Faith, on the other hand, is setting sail for good deeds and things, for the truth. A believer who sincerely recites the kalima shahada and kalima tawhid promises himself and his Lord that he will walk on the path of faith against evil, truth against falsehood, honor against contempt, and justice against cruelty. He agrees to stand with goodness and not evil.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

The third fact that Surah al-Asr teaches us is the importance of good deeds. Our Lord enjoins, وَعَمِلُوا الصَّالِحَاتِ and says that our faith and good deeds will save us from eternal loss. Good deeds are the reflection of faith on acts. It is faith brought to life.

Every word and act that will earn us our Lord’s favor is a good deed. Putting all means to service for humanity is good deed just as our prayer, fast, alms, and hajj which we do with sincerity. Extending a hand to the oppressed to the victims, to the orphans is good deed. Becoming the eyes of the blind, the ears of the deaf, the hands and feet of the disabled is good deed. Protecting our peace, brotherhood, and values is good deed. The effort to prevent evil and make goodness prevail is good deed. As narrated in a hadith, removing an obstacle from the road is good deed.   In short, good deed is suitable deed which means it suits Allah’s favor, human disposition, and society’s affairs. 

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

The fourth fact taught to us by Surah al-Asr which will save us from eternal loss is, وَتَوَاصَوْا بِالْحَقِّ which means siding with the truth at all times. It means guiding each other to truth. It means protecting ourselves and our brothers and sisters from falsehood, lies, tricks, sedition, and discord. It means never veering away from the truth and the path in our relationship with our Lord, with our neighborhood, with the universe under any circumstances.

Brothers and Sisters!

The fifth fact that Surah al-Asr teaches us is,

وَتَوَاصَوْا بِالصَّبْرِ which means being patient on the true path. It means recommending patience to one another. But it should be remembered that patience does not mean enduring falsehood. On the contrary, it means keeping on the path of truth.

Brothers and Sisters!

I would like to conclude the khutbah by the following verses of our Independence Poet, the ate Akif:

The Companions would make sure

To recite Surah al-Asr as they parted, why? 

Because hidden in that surah is

The secret of salvation. 

First comes the true faith, then peace. 

Then truth, then fortitude.

There you go, humankind. 

When those four comes together,

No more will you suffer."
46;2017-08-18;"
LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE
DATE  : 18.08.2017
[pic]

    ETHICS OF TRADE AND COMMERCE
    Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
    Our Prophet  (pbuh)  occasionally  visited  the  bazaar  of  Medina.  He
observed the people who traded and dealt with each  other  and  talked  with
them. He warned those who behaved wrong or had  a  wrong  attitude.  Indeed,
our Lord Almighty sent these verses which contains vital warnings  regarding
trade: ""Woe unto those who give short measure: those who, when they  are  to
receive their due from (other) people, demand that it be given in full  -but
when they have to measure or weigh whatever they owe to  others,  give  less
than what is due! Do they not know that they are bound  to  be  raised  from
the dead (and called to account) on an awesome Day -the  Day  when  all  men
shall stand before the Sustainer of all the worlds?"" [i]
    Brothers and Sisters!
    After these verses were revealed, the believers began to be more careful
and precise when conducting trade under the  guidance  of  our  Prophet.[ii]
Our Master,  Allah's  Messenger  (pbuh)  was  very  pleased  with  this.  He
encouraged them to conduct trade  with  this  prayer:  ""O  Lord!  Give  your
blessings to the scales, measurements and trade of these people!"" [iii]
    Honorable Believers!
    Islam taught us a trade ethic, a commercial ethic.  Being  and  behaving
honest while refraining from lying and deceiving is at  the  heart  of  this
ethic. Because honesty and righteousness are required of  a  believer.  They
are a must if we are to live our lives as a virtuous  individual.  Moreover,
a believer should wear the cloak of truthfulness  in  every  aspect  of  his
life, not just in trade. The verse of our Lord  Almighty,  [pic]  ""Therefore
stand firm (in the straight path) as thou art commended""[iv]  is the  anchor
point of a believer's words, actions  and  attitude.  Our  Prophet's  (pbuh)
warning, [pic] ""Whoever cheats us is not  one  of  us""[v]  is  an  essential
principle in a believer's relationship with other people.

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    The Messenger of Allah (pbuh)  said:  ""The  trustworthy,  honest  Muslim
merchant will be with the Prophets, the honest men, and martyrs on  the  Day
of Resurrection."" [vi] As this hadith  states,  being  honest  and  open  in
trade and commerce is an important  principle.  This  is  one  of  the  most
beautiful example of it: One of his companions came to  our  Prophet  (pbuh)
to  ask  about  certain  issues  that  bothered  him  regarding  trade.  The
Messenger of Allah listened him carefully and advised him:  ""When  you  want
to buy something, state the price you  want.  And  when  you  want  to  sell
something, state its value in the market, not higher."" [vii]

    Esteemed Brothers and Sisters!
    Our Prophet (pbuh) warned us in this hadith: ""It is not permissible  for
a Muslim to sell his brother goods in  which  there  is  a  defect,  without
pointing that out to him."" [viii]  Because  hiding  the  defect  of  a  good
destroys the divine blessing in trade as well as the trust  between  people.
Even though the seller seems like making a profit, his only profit  will  be
disappointment. Knowing this, a believer couldn't see all the  ways  leading
to profit and gain as fair.  He  wouldn't  resort  to  ways  like  deceitful
advertising,  cheating,  unfair  competition  and  exorbitant   profit.   He
wouldn't profit from the loss of  others.  He'd  know  deceiving  others  is
actually deceiving himself. Indeed,  Lord  Almighty  informs  us  about  the
destruction of communities in the past because they did  not  conduct  trade
honestly and spread corruption on earth. [ix]
    Brothers and Sisters!
    One of the main principles of trade ethics is  to  take  care  that  the
profit from trade is halal. A believer who believes  that  he  is  certainly
going to account for his actions would not mix haram in his income. In  this
context, it is not permissible for a Muslim to trade  the  things  our  Lord
Almighty forbids. A Muslim must refrain  from  trading  alcohol  and  drugs,
gambling or tax evasion.
    Beloved Believers!
    As painful as it is, some lose their sentiment on halal  income  day  by
day. Some could act as if everything is fair,  driven  only  by  profit  and
their interests. Some could be a  slave  to  greed,  avarice,  earning  more
without rules; in short, a slave to earthly goods. Some even carelessly  and
immodestly exploit the material and spiritual gains of the greatest sign  of
Allah, the humans.
    Like in every other aspect of our lives, what really matters in trade is
the approval of our Lord Almighty. So come!  Let  us  build  our  income  on
righteousness and truthfulness. Let us respect the rightful  due  of  others
and make our tables and our lives plentiful. Let us be careful to ensure  no
ill-gotten food comes into our house. Let this hadith of our Prophet  (pbuh)
be a standard for us in trade and commerce: ""This property is like  a  sweet
fresh fruit; whoever takes it without greediness, he is blessed in  it,  and
whoever takes it with greediness, he is not blessed in it."" [x]
-----------------------
[i] Al-Mutaffifin, 83/1-6.
[ii] Ibn Majah, The Chapters on Business Transactions, 35.
[iii] Al-Bukhari, Sales and Trade, 53.
[iv] Al-Hud, 11/112.
[v] Müslim, Faith, 164.
[vi] Tirmizî, The Book on Business, 4.
[vii] Ibn Majah, The Chapters on Business Transactions, 29.
[viii] Ibn Majah, The Chapters on Business Transactions, 45.
[ix] Al-Hud, 11/84-95.
[x] Al-Bukhari, Obligatory Charity Tax, 50.

                       Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
47;2019-05-31;"DATE: 31.05.2019

 LAILAT AL-QADR: 

THE NIGHT HONORED BY THE QUR’AN

Honorable Muslims!

Let us give ear to these verses of Allah the Almighty (swt) on this blessed Friday while we are approaching the end of the month of Ramadan: “We have indeed revealed this (message) in the Night of Qadr (Power). And what will explain to thee what the Night of Qadr is? The Night of Qadr is better than a thousand months. Therein come down the angels and the Spirit by Allah’s permission, on every errand: Peace!.. This until the rise of the Morn!” 

Let us set our hopes on the glad tidings of Prophet Muhammad (saw) in this sacred time of Friday: “Whoever passes Lailat al-Qadr in prayer with faith and seeking his reward from Allah will have his past sins forgiven.”

Dear Believers!

We are going to attain the Night of Qadr tonight insha’Allah. It is a unique night which brought the forgiveness of al-Rahman and the light of the Qur’an to humanity. Every believer who appreciates the value of this exceptional period of time and wishes to spend it in an effective and meaningful way must first turn their steps towards the Qur’an. They should remember once again that reciting the Holy Qur’an beautifully, and understanding and applying it in our lives in the best way are the main purposes of life. If we want to enlighten our lives and add barakah to it with the Qur’an, Lailat al-Qadr is the best opportunity.

In that case, let us take this opportunity to contemplate some of the verses from the Holy Qur’an which invite us to hidayah (guidance to the true path) and to the truth.                                                                                      

  

“Is it not to Allah that sincere devotion is due?” Muslims who comprehend that neither humans are created in vain nor they are left unattended after creation be the servants to only Allah (swt). They stay away from all kinds of arrogance and show-off, and live in ikhlas (pure intention) and sincerity. They reflect on their lives the promise that they gave by believing with their worships and the morality of the Qur’an.

                                                                  

“Therefore stand firm (in the straight Path) as thou art commanded.” Muslims take our beloved Prophet Muhammad (saw) as an example in every phase of life and they become honest like him. They try not to get off the direction, the right and the truth.  They know that lies, slander and betrayal can never exist together with iman. They do not compromise on righteousness.

 “Allah doth command you to render back your trusts to those to whom they are due; and when ye judge between man and man, that ye judge with justice.” Our lives, our property and our family are entrusted to us. The nature, with its plants, animals, water, and soil, is entrusted to us. Reconstruction and management of the earth with justice, peace, and goodness are entrusted to us. A virtuous Muslim gives the trusts to those to whom they are due and sustains justice. 

                                                      

“O ye who believe! Fulfill (all) obligations.” Mu’min (believer) means the one who is trustworthy. When they promise, they keep their promises. Besides obeying the commands and prohibitions of Allah (swt), they also fulfill the requirements of the promises and agreements they make with people. Believers know that lying when one speaks, not keeping promises, and betraying what is entrusted are the signs of the hypocrites.

      “O ye who believe! Eat not up your property among yourselves in vanities; but let there be amongst you traffic and trade by mutual good will: nor kill (or destroy) yourselves.” Muslims obtain their rizq (sustenance) by halal means and do not get involved in forbidden means in trade. They do not resort to void practices such as theft, extortion, bribery, usury, pawnbroking, gambling, unreasonable prices, and deception.   



“And remember your Lord caused to be declared (publicly): ‘If ye are grateful, I will add more (favors) unto you; but if ye show ingratitude, truly my punishment is terrible indeed.’” Believers, who sustain their lives by countless blessings of Allah (swt), use the opportunities in their hands in accordance with the consent of the Almighty Allah (swt). The gratitude of wealth is to spend it in the way of Allah (swt), that of scholarship is to use knowledge for the benefit of humanity, and that of health is to serve in the path of benevolence and goodness.      

 

“O ye who believe! Fear Allah, and let every soul look to what (provision) it has sent forth for tomorrow.” Muslims know that you shall reap what you sow and that the Hereafter awaits us after this worldly life. When they have the opportunity, they ask themselves how prepared they are for the Hereafter. As they walk the path determined by the Qur’an to achieve eternal salvation, they set their target as the happiness in the Hereafter.

Honorable Muslims!

We can appreciate the value of Lailat al-Qadr only by truly appreciating the value of the Qur’an. Then let us connect our minds and our hearts to the Qur’an with the occasion of this night when the Holy Qur’an was revealed. Let us read the Qur’an more, exert effort to understand it, and try to live according to it and help others follow the same path. Let us consider the Night of Qadr as an opportunity for self-accounting, and asking forgiveness and mercy for our sins. Let us cherish every night and know the value of every blessing to add barakah to our whole life. Let us by this way benefit from the spiritual rewards of this night of grace and gifts, which is better than a thousand months.

Dear Believers!

I would like to make an important reminder as I conclude my khutbah. There are only a few days left for us to reach the eid. Many of us are going to set off as of today to spend the eid with the loved ones. The intensity of traffic flow on the roads requires us to be more careful than ever. Because the traffic accidents turn our joy of eid into sadness, and, as a nation, we all feel grief in our hearts. Many brothers and sisters are dying in accidents that occur due to speed violation, improper overtaking, close follow-up, fatigue, etc. Many families are destroyed due to these incidents. At this point, I invite all our brothers and sisters to obey the traffic rules, to be patient, sympathetic and careful, and to respect each other’s rights and law."
48;2019-07-19;"DATE: 19.07.2019



FRIDAY PRAYER AND ITS CUSTOMS

Honorable Muslims!

Today is Friday. The most blessed and bountiful day of a week. Today is an eid of Believers and a time of meeting weekly. It is an occasion of grace and mercy and brotherhood and familiarity.

It is a unique spiritual climate that differs from the other days in terms of its value and merit. The Prophet Muhammad (saw) told us about Friday, “The best day on which the sun rises is Friday. [On Friday] Adam was created, and on that day he entered Paradise, and on that day he was expelled from Paradise. And the Hour will come to pass on Friday.”

Dear Believers!

Today, our most important responsibility is to perform the Friday prayer.  Because Friday prayer is an obligation for Muslims. The Almighty Allah (swt) states in the verse I recited in the beginning of my khutbah, “O ye who believe! When the call is proclaimed to prayer on Friday (the day of assembly), hasten earnestly to the remembrance of Allah, and leave off business (and traffic): That is best for you if ye but knew!”

Neglecting Friday prayer unless there              is a valid excuse is a great sin. The Messenger of Allah (saw) warned us about this issue, “Whoever do not establish Friday prayer three times because he does not care about it, Allah sets a seal on his heart.”

Honorable Muslims!

Every believer who wants to benefit from the baraqah of Friday prepares himself for Friday prayer by complying with the sunnah of our Prophet Muhammad (saw). He performs ablution properly and cleans his body. He makes a point of wearing clothes that are clean and suitable to satr-i awrat. He knows that it would not be good to come mosque after eating stinky food. He wears nice scents. He behaves in accordance with the soul of the worship and the awe of the community. He makes effort to close and align the ranks. He respects Friday prayer and avoids from making noise and disturbing the people who stand near him in the presence of Allah (swt).

Dear Muslims!

On this blessed day, another point we need to be careful about is the Friday khutbah. Khutbah is a call on ummah from minbar. It is a recommendation, reminder, and warning for Muslims. It is an invitation to iman, wisdom, and morals and a call for the truth. Khutbah is also a must of Friday prayer. Khutbah is a worship, too, just like prayers. 

It a religious necessity to listen to the khatib in awe, silently and by hanging on his every word.  Taking to your friends or playing with your phones during khutbah causes you to stray from the essence of khutbah and miss out the rewards of it. Sadly, I need to say that such behaviors that are contrary to the soul of worship are becoming widespread among our community day by day. However, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) did not even tolerate speaking of a member of community in order to warn a friend who speaks near him, and warned his ummah about this issue, “You are wrong even to say ‘’Hush!’’ to your friend while imam reads khutbah on Friday.”   

Honorable Believers!

Let us try to benefit from the bounty and blessing of Friday that is the best day on which the sun rises. Let us conduce this day to meet, become friends, and strengthen our brotherhood bonds. To ask how we are doing, to share each other’s happiness, and to give hand to each other when one of us suffers. Let us look for ways to help the needy people, those who are short of money, and the ones who are in bad health. On Fridays, let us go mosques with all members of our family as it was in the Asr al-Saadah. Let us familiarize our children with Friday prayer and invite our young people to the presence of Friday. 

Let us remember that khutbah is a part of the prayer. Let us give our interest and attention only to khatib and khutbah during the khutbah.  Let us stay away from behaviors that do not suit to the soul of the worship. In this time of acceptance when duas are accepted let us our bodies, minds, hearts, and feelings turn to al-Rahman.

I would like to conclude my khutbah with these glad tidings of the Prophet Muhammad (saw), “There is such a moment on Friday that if servants ask something, Allah certainly bestows what they ask to them.”"
49;2020-02-14;"
DATE: 14.02.2020
[pic]
                   THE BOND BETWEEN ALLAH AND HIS SERVANTS
    Honorable Muslims!
    In the verse I have recited, Allah (swt) states,  ""And  whoever  submits
his face to Allah while he is a doer of good - then he has grasped the  most
trustworthy handhold. And to Allah will be the outcome of all matters.""[i]

    In the hadith I have recited, Prophet Muhammad says, ""Whoever  wants  to
meet Allah, Allah wants to meet him, too. Whoever  does  not  want  to  meet
Allah, Allah does not want to meet him, either.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    Allah the Almighty is the  only  reason  for  our  existence.  Upon  His
command ""Be!"", all creations between heavens and earth find their  place  in
the world. It is Allah, Who creates us from nothing, makes us  live  through
His might, bounty and help, and puts us to a test through His blessings.

    We are responsible against Allah, from the moment  we  wake  up  in  the
morning till we go to sleep at night, in every  breath  and  every  step  we
take, and in every decision we make. Prophet Muhammad (saw) refers  to  this
responsibility in one occasion, ""The right of Allah over His slaves is  that
they should worship Him and not associate  anything  with  Him.""  Then  they
show they believe in tawhid and build their lives based on  it.  Then  Allah
promises them, ""He  shall  not  punish  them,  and  He  shall  put  them  in
paradise.""[iii]

    Dear Muslims!
    When the servants of Allah have sincere faith in Him, He becomes pleased
with them. Having sincere  faith  requires  wholeheartedly  worshipping  and
living in accordance with good morals. Muslims  show  their  love,  respect,
and obedience to Allah not  only  through  worships  but  also  their  moral
behaviors.

    Allah responds  to  the  prayers  and  supplications  of  His  believing
servants. He (swt) does not leave those, who  try  to  obtain  His  consent,
alone and unaided. Whenever His servants ask,  [pic]""When  is  the  help  of
Allah?"", He (swt) welcomes their question  with,  [pic]""Unquestionably,  the
help of Allah is near.""[iv] In  a  hadith  qudsi,  Prophet  Muhammmad  (saw)
says, ""I am just as My servant thinks I am, (i.e. I am able to  do  for  him
what he thinks I can do for him) and I am with him if He  remembers  Me.  If
he remembers Me in himself, I  too,  remember  him  in  Myself;  and  if  he
remembers Me in a group of people, I remember him in a group that is  better
than them. If he comes one span nearer to Me, I go one cubit nearer to  him;
and if he comes one cubit nearer to Me, I go a distance of two  outstretched
arms nearer to him; and if he comes to Me walking, I go to him running.""[v]

    Dear Believers!
    People can sometimes be ungrateful and egoistic, and pushy and careless.
We are merely servants. Sometimes we  happen  to  forget  that  Allah  sees,
hears, and expects good deeds from  us  at  all  times.  We  find  ourselves
committing sins, and making mistakes, knowingly or  forgetfully.  We  happen
to do things we would greatly regret when the dark clouds set  down  on  our
way, when our foot slips, and when our eyes are closed.

    No matter what, our only shelter is Allah, Who is the Most  Merciful  of
all the Merciful. Allah is forgiving and loves to forgive.  He  (swt)  keeps
open the door of mercy and forgiveness until our last breath. It  is  stated
in the Holy Qur'an, ""O My servants who have transgressed against  themselves
[by sinning], do not despair of the mercy of Allah. Indeed,  Allah  forgives
all sins. Indeed, it is He who is the Forgiving, the Merciful.""[vi]

    Dear Muslims!
    Allah warns us in the Qur'an, ""And be not like those who  forgot  Allah,
so He made them forget themselves.""[vii] Let us heed this  warning.  Let  us
properly protect and strengthen the bond of servitude between Allah and  us.
Let us duly worship Him and let us ask for help from Him (swt) only. Let  us
wholeheartedly pray to Him. Let us repent for  all  our  sins.  Let  us  not
forget that if we forget Allah and lose our bond with Allah, then He  pushes
us away from His mercy. He (swt) instills fear in hearts in the  world,  and
He does not care about  us  and  puts  us  in  a  great  punishment  in  the
Hereafter.
-----------------------
[i] Luqman, 31/22.
[ii] Bukhari, Riqaq, 41; Muslim, Dhikr, 14.
[iii] Muslim, Iman, 48; Bukhari, Jihad, 46.
[iv] Baqarah, 2/214.
[v] Bukhari, Tawhid, 15.
[vi] Zumar 39/53.
[vii] Hashr, 59/19.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
50;2019-09-13;"
DATE: 13.09.2019
[pic]
    THE INVIOLABLE RIGHT TO LIFE
    Honorable Muslims!
    In the verse I have just recited the Almighty Allah (swt) states, ""If  a
man kills a believer intentionally, his recompense is Hell, wherein he  will
abide eternally. The wrath and the curse  of  Allah  are  upon  him,  and  a
dreadful penalty is prepared for him.""[i]

    In the hadith I have just  recited  the  Prophet  Muhammad  (saw)  says,
""Whoever harms others, Allah will  harm  him.  Whoever  causes  hardship  to
others, Allah will cause hardship to him.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    The sublime religion Islam  is  known  for  its  promotion  of  justice,
harmlessness to others, mercy, and trust. The right to life comes on top  of
the values that Islam protects. All people, regardless  of  their  religion,
language, race, and gender, have the  inviolable  right  to  life.  In  this
regard, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) declared  in  his  Khutbah  al-Wada  (the
Farewell Khutbah), ""Verily! Your blood, property, and honor  are  sacred  to
one another like the sanctity of this day of Arafah, this month of  Dhu  al-
Hijjah, and this city of Makkah.""[iii]

    It is a great oppression when  a  person  takes  another  person's  life
unlawfully. It is a great honor, on the other  hand,  when  a  person  saves
another person's life who  is  victimized  and  in  need  of  help.  As  the
unchanging principle of the divine message revealed to  all  prophets,  this
issue is referred to in the Holy Qur'an  as  follows,  ""...Whoever  takes  a
life, unless as a punishment for murder or mischief in the  land,  it  would
be as if killing all people. And whoever saves a life, it  would  be  as  if
saving all people...""[iv]

    Dear Muslims!
    Every human being deserves to be respected from the  moment  of  falling
into the mother's womb. According to the legal and ethical restrictions  put
in place by Islam, abortion without any  medical  reason  can  never  be  an
option for personal benefits, such as if the unborn infant  would  risk  the
mother's life. Honor killing can never be an excuse to throw  a  woman  into
the brutal claw of violence. An explanation showing  great  ignorance,  such
as ""Our traditions force us to do so"" can never be a justification  for  the
cause of blood feud or killing a person. Since, in fact, even our  own  life
is entrusted to us and we do  not  have  the  right  to  commit  suicide  by
claiming, ""This life is mine.""

    Dear Believers!
    It should never be forgotten that Islam, the religion in  the  sight  of
Allah the Most  Gracious  and  the  Most  Merciful,  is  founded  on  mercy.
Similarly, Muhammad Mustafa (saw) the Last  Prophet  was  an  ambassador  of
compassion. Never do violence and oppression  have  a  room  in  Islam.  For
violence is  the  wound  of  conscience,  not  faded  away  over  time,  nor
forgotten in the heart. Violence is a blatant oppression, no matter whom  it
hurts, be it a woman or a man, or a young or an old  person.  Oppression  is
definitely haram.

    Miserable are  those  people  who  yield  to  their  anger,  hatred,  or
ignorance, and subdue the oppressed ones. A pit of  utter  darkness  is  the
destination of those people who are devoid of compassion and mercy  and  who
are far from being fair and just.

    Dear Muslims!
    The Prophet Muhammad (saw) himself was very  respectful,  compassionate,
and polite to his family particularly and  to  all  people  around  him.  He
would not utter any rude or hurtful word to anybody, nor would he allow  any
Muslim to resort to violence in any way. In one occasion he  warned  Muslims
as follows, ""Those who torment people most in this world  will  be  punished
most severely on the Day of Resurrection.""[v]

    Honorable Believers!
    How sad it is that sometimes we as Muslims attempt against others' lives
because of such  unimaginable  reasons  as  ""throwing  an  oblique  look  at
someone"" or ""horning someone's car in traffic"" while we are expected to  not
hurt even an ant. We Muslims look as if we forgot that Allah (swt)  commands
that an arbiter be appointed if a dispute arises and friendly settlement  of
conflicts be sought, and that the Prophet Muhammad (saw) would forgive  even
those people who had tried to commit suicide  when  they  regretted.  Today,
Muslims have turned into such people hurting one another because  of  losing
temper in a moment of anger while they are  expected  to  treat  each  other
with patience and tolerance in  family,  at  school,  at  work,  or  in  the
street.  In  this  regard,  the  Prophet  Muhammad  (saw)  criticized  one's
resorting not to the intellectual strength but  to  the  physical  strength,
and said, ""The strong man is not the one who is good at wrestling.  But  the
one who controls himself in a fit of rage.""[vi]

    Dear Muslims!
    Come! Let us try to see the might of our Lord (swt) through  all  living
beings. Let us hold dear to ourselves whatever is created for  the  sake  of
the Creator. Let us ensure that we do not cause any harm  to  any  creature,
be it through our  actions  or  our  words.  Let  us  follow  the  prophetic
principle, ""Neither harm, nor get  harmed!""[vii]  Let  us  hold  on  to  the
virtue of being reliable, bequeathed to us by our Beloved Prophet.   Let  us
never resort to violence regardless of the magnitude  of  our  problems  and
troubles. Let us adopt a manner of speaking, listening,  understanding,  and
getting along well with each  other,  as  would  be  finely  fit  for  human
dignity.  Yet the most important of all, let us not frustrate  our  life  in
this world and in the Hereafter by attempting against one's  life  that  our
Lord (swt) regards sacred and inviolable.
-----------------------
[i] Nisa, 4/93.
[ii] Abu Dawud, al-Qada' (Aqdiyyah), 31.
[iii] Bukhari, 'Ilm, 9; Muslim, Qasamah, 30.
[iv] Ma'idah, 5/32.
[v] Ibn Hanbal, IV, 90.
[vi] Bukhari, Adab, 76; Muslim, Birr, 107.
[vii] Ibn Majah, Ahkam, 17.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
51;2017-12-15;"
LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE
DATE  : 15.12.2017

[pic]

               A DAGGER IN THE BACK OF BROTHERHOOD: BACKBITING
    Blessed Friday to You, Honorable Believers!
    One day, the Prophet's (pbuh) wife  Aishah  implied  that  Safiyyah  was
short-statured. Thereupon, the  Messenger  of  Allah  pointed  out  how  bad
backbiting is with this warning: ""O Aisha! You have said a statement  which,
if it were mixed in with the water of the sea, it would pollute it."" [i]

    Honorable Believers!
    Backbiting is mentioning a brother or sister with unpleasant  words.  It
is harming his honor and dignity in his  absence.  Backbiting  is  a  dagger
stabbed on trust and sincerity, peace and fondness,  unity  and  solidarity;
or  in  short,  on  brotherhood.  It  is  an  ugly  attitude  and   behavior
incompatible with humanity and unfitting for  a  believer,  which  harm  the
individual and society. Therefore, Lord Almighty  has  forbidden  backbiting
with this verse of the Quran: ""O you who  believe!  Avoid  much  suspicions,
indeed some suspicions are sins. And spy not, neither backbite one  another.
Would one of you like to eat the flesh of his dead brother? You  would  hate
it. And fear Allah. Verily, Allah is the One Who  accepts  repentance,  Most
Merciful."" [ii]

    Brothers and Sisters!
    We are believers who are bound together with the brotherhood  of  faith.
This is an unshakable  brotherhood  just  like  the  building  blocks  of  a
structure that are fused to one another. In this brotherhood,  the  brothers
are entrusted to each other. The life of our brother is our life. His  honor
and dignity is our honor and dignity.  This  brotherhood  requires  that  we
should not harm one another even with a seemingly  small  implication.  This
fact was articulated by one openhearted, gentle believer with  this  remark:
""Never hurt a soul, or you'll destroy the heavens of the Most Gracious.""

    Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
    During our daily lives, our minds get tired with all kinds of news.  Our
ears hear many words whether we want them or not.  Especially  in  the  mass
media and social media, most of the time ugly words like  gossip,  lies  and
slander are presented in a way that  arouses  interest.  Sometimes  people's
honor and  dignity  are  targeted  by  false  news  and  comments  that  are
senselessly and irresponsibly published. Yet our Prophet  (pbuh)  defined  a
Muslim as ""the one who avoids harming others with  his  tongue  and  hands.""
[iii]

    Brothers and Sisters!
    The Messenger of Allah (pbuh) enjoined us to stay  away  from  behaviors
that does not fit a believer like backbiting,  suspicion  and  looking  into
others faults: ""Do not back-bite  Muslims,  and  do  not  search  for  their
faults, for if anyone searches for their faults, Allah will search  for  his
fault, and if Allah searches for the fault of anyone, He disgraces him  even
in his house."" [iv]

    Our Master, The Greatest Prophet said: ""Whoever believes  in  Allah  and
the Last Day should talk what is good or keep quiet.""[v]  He  also  informed
us that it is enough falsehood for us to relate everything we hear.[vi]

    Alas! Today, however, perception operations are put into place by people
who turned lies, slander, backbiting and gossip into an industry. The  peace
and tranquility of the individual and the society are being  greatly  harmed
with such negative behavior.

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Let our tongue always move for trust confidence, peace and  tranquility;
not for sedition and malice. Let  our  words  be  uttered  for  loyalty  and
righteousness; not for gossip and backbiting or slander and  lies.  Let  our
speech lead to fondness and brotherhood; not hatred, grudge and enmity.  Let
us not forget that those who have a believer-like outlook on  life  and  who
protect their minds, hearts, tongues, hands and in short  their  bodies  are
the ones who would reach eternal blessings in that grand day.

    I want to conclude the khutba with this prayer of our Prophet (pbuh):

    ""O Allah, indeed I seek refuge in You from the evil of  my  hearing,  my
sight, my tongue and the evil of my heart."" [vii]

-----------------------
[i] At-Tirmidhi, Descr. of the Last Day, 51; Abi Dawud, General Behavior,
35.
[ii] Al-Hucurat, 49/12.
[iii] Al-Bukhari, Belief, 4.
[iv] Abi Dawud, General Behavior, 35.
[v] Al-Bukhari, To make the Heart Tender, 23.
[vi] Abi Dawud, General Behavior, 80.
[vii] At-Tirmidhi, Chapters on Supplication, 74; Abi Dawud, Book of Prayer,
32.

                       Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
52;2017-04-14;"LOCATION    : GENEL

DATE               : 14.04.2017



THE PROPHET AND SAFE SOCIETY

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

Our Prophet (pbuh) one day addressed the people of Makkah from Safa hill near the Kaaba: “Would you believe me if I said there is an army waiting to attack you behind that valley?” In unison, the people said, “Yes, we would. For you are trustworthy. You are reliable. You are the example of righteousness and loyalty. We have never heard you lie.” Then, the Messenger of Grace told them, “I am warning you about a painful torment.” Then, before the people of Makkah, he called the entire humankind to believe Allah. He called them to find safety in faith, that is being safe from all sorts of fear and worry.

Brothers and Sisters!

We have entered another Holy Birth Week which is the anniversary in the Gregorian calendar of our Prophet’s honorable arrival to the world. Holy Birth Week is a week that the President of Religious Affairs started completely with its own initiative and has been celebrating since 1989 to both commemorate and understand the Messenger of Allah (pbuh). It is an event of culture and knowledge embraced by our nation and our friends in the region that increases the fondness for our beloved Prophet in faithful hearts and leads to a better understanding of the beautiful things he brought to the humankind. It is not an alternative to Mawlid which we observe based on the Islamic calendar.

Honorable Believers!

The Almighty enjoins in the Holy Quran: “Indeed, we offered the Trust to the heavens and the earth and the mountains, and they declined to bear it and feared it; but man undertook to bear it.”   

Brothers and Sisters!

Safety is the greatest blessing Allah granted us after faith. It is the blessing of trust. The Lord entrusted the universe with the humankind and ordered us to build a safe world. He wanted us to build a world where people would trust other people, neighbors would trust one another, and workers would trust each other. It is sad that we are going through a crisis of trust on a global scale today because the humankind cannot duly honor all that is entrusted to them. There are incidents constantly that shake the relations between individuals and societies. People’s relationship with one another and with nature gets worse every day. And every passing day our world becomes more unsafe.







Brothers and Sisters!

When we look around, we see a massive atmosphere of turmoil and chaos, we see that we are facing great insecurity and fear. Extraordinary safety measures are being taken to meet the need for safety. All means of technology are being utilized. 

The crisis of safety that has surrounded our world today has reached such a high level that the future of our world, the shared homeland of the entire humankind, is also under grave danger. With ceaseless greed and ambition of human beings, the balance of nature has begun to deteriorate.  

I regret to say that the community of believers could not save itself from those grim incidents. Islamic cities known in history as “the places of peace and safety” are pillaged today in the grip of dark and lawless wars which know no ethics and fairness.

Brothers and Sisters!

For all the aforementioned reasons, the Presidency of Religious Affairs determined “The Prophet and Safe Society” as the theme for Holy Birth Week in 2017. The events to be held during the week will attempt to create awareness in believing hearts to once again become the trustworthy ummah of the Trustworthy Prophet and be considered a safe society. In addition, it will make a contribution to building a safe, peaceful, livable world at a time when the humankind altogether is dragged into a swirl of insecurity.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

The common goal of all prophets was to preach the belief of oneness to people. It was to bring the faith to the hearts. It was to bring safety to hearts, minds, bodies, cities, and countries with faith. It was to offer people a society where their lives, their faith, their families, their property, and their honor were safe. The Prophet (pbuh), who had been sent as grace to the worlds, spent his life fighting for this. He established a tight bond between faith and safety and being a believer and trustworthy. He defined the believer as “Someone of whose hand and tongue others are sure.”

Brothers and Sisters!

As the ummah of the trustworthy prophet, our duty today is to be trustworthy believers. If we do that, then the safety and protection of the Almighty will be with us. He protects us from any fear, worry, concern, and grief. If we become trustworthy believers, then our houses, workplaces, neighborhoods, cities, countries, and world will be safe. Because a safe world can only be built by the hands of reliable people and trustworthy believers. Let us remember that religion is safety. The believer is the one who is trusted. The people are entrusted with humanity.

Brothers and Sisters!

On that note, I wish you a happy Holy Birth Week. I wish from the Almighty that this week may be the harbinger of good tidings for our country, our nation, our friends in the region, and all humankind."
53;2017-01-27;"
  LOCATION  : NATIONWIDE
  DATE             : 27.01.2017
[pic]

                      NEGLECTING PRAYER IS A GREAT LOSS
    A Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters!
    In the Surah al-Maryam, the Almighty Lord mentions the  tawhid  struggle
of Prophets Enoch, Noah,  Abraham,  Ishmael,  Isaac,  Jacob,  Moses,  Aaron,
Zechariah, John, and Jesus one by one. Then He mentions  the  calamity  that
befell upon the community that lived after these prophets  in  the  verse  I
have recited at  the  beginning  of  my  khutbah.  ""There  came  after  them
successors who neglected prayer and pursued desires; so they  are  going  to
meet evil.""[i]

    Honorable Believers!
    According to this verse, one of the greatest losses for  a  believer  on
the earth is to lose prayer, to neglect it. Because prayer is submission  to
the Lord and also one of the most special and  beautiful  manifestations  of
our servitude. Prayer means reaching a peaceful  place.  It  means  reaching
peace. It means finding peace. It  is  a  union  longingly  awaited  by  the
believer. It is meeting our Lord five times a day.  At  the  start  of  this
meeting is ""Allahu Akbar"" which is the acknowledgment of Allah's  greatness.
Raising hands to the ear level means  throwing  behind  all  worldly  things
that prevent Allah's favor. Qiyam is the symbol of  turning  only  to  Allah
and remaining on His path. Qiraat is our heartfelt supplication to the  Lord
in His own verses. Ruku and sajdah are the peak of being  Allah's  servants.
Salam is wishing well-being and peace for both ourselves  and  for  brothers
and sisters with whom we live together.

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    As believers who pray are deemed worthy of  praise  in  our  Holy  Book,
those who neglect prayer are criticized just as much. As those  who  perform
their due prayer and elevate themselves are given the good  news  of  grace,
those who deprive themselves of this  great  blessing  are  warned  just  as
much. Those who attain praise, good news, and mercy with their  prayers  are
??????????  ???????????  ???????????   ????????????   ??????????   that   is
believers who regularly perform prayers.  ??????????  ????  ???  ???????????
??????????? They are the  ones  who  adhere  to  the  spirit,  essence,  and
messages of prayer. They consider prayer as elevation.  They  are  the  ones
who understand the hadith, ""Prayer becomes a warrant for light,  proof,  and
salvation on the Day for those who regularly perform it.""[ii]

    Brothers and Sisters!
    There are also those who are criticized despite performing prayer in the
Holy Quran. They are ?????????? ???? ???? ???????????  ?????????  ??????????
???? ???????????? that is those who are loose about their prayer.  They  are
those whose prayers can't protect them against  evil.  They  are  those  who
don't perform their prayers with believer's mentality  and  sincerity.  They
are those  who  add  hypocrisy  and  vanity  to  their  prayers.  ??????????
??????????? ?????? ????? ?????????????? They are those who have a hard  time
in prayer since they don't perform it devotedly. They are  those  who  don't
know that prayer is not a burden, it is a blessing.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    As our Holy Book mentions those who deprive themselves of the upsides of
prayer, it also deals with the hypocrites and the deniers. They  are,  ?????
??????? ????? ???????  or those who turn away from prayer. ???????  ????????
????? ?????????? ???????  ?????????  They  are  those  who  are  lazy  about
prayer. They even do not hesitate from exploiting prayer.
??????? ??????????? ????? ?????????? ????????????  ???????  ??????????  They
are those who mock it when they are invited to prayer. Those who make  light
of the religion's symbols.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    Prayer protects us as long as we protect it. It preservers us so long as
we preserve it. It never spares us its generosity. All we need to do  is  to
not spare ourselves prayer. Prayer never shies away from elevating  us.  All
we need to do is to elevate our prayer  with  our  sincerity.  Prayer  never
draws away from us, it does not deprive us of closeness to our Lord. All  we
need to do is to not draw away from prayer. Despite  all  that,  we  immerse
ourselves so much in the flow of life  that  we  either  can't  perform  our
prayers on time or leave it. However,  our  Prophet  (pbuh)  said  the  best
prayer was the one performed on time. He said to his distinguished  muezzin,
""Get up, o Bilal! Refresh us with prayer!""[iii] and eased the  intensity  of
life with prayer. He took away his exhaustion with prayer.  He  found  peace
with prayer.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    Then come, let us ask ourselves  these  questions:  Do  we  protect  our
prayers, and do they protect us? Do we pain for the remorse of  the  prayers
we delayed or neglected? Are our prayers the bridge of  union  and  fondness
that connect us to our Lord? Is  our  goal  an  indispensable  oath  of  our
morality that elevates us before our Lord and  people?  Are  our  prayers  a
shield that protect us against evil?

    Brothers and Sisters!
    May the Almighty grant us to be among those who elevate with prayer. May
He grant us to be among those who are purified with  prayer,  who  earn  His
favor with prayer, and who attain His eternal blessings.
-----------------------
[i] Maryam 19/59.
[ii] ?bn Hanbal, II, 169.
[iii] Abu Dawud, Edeb, 78.
           Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
54;2017-03-03;"LOCATION   : GENEL

DATE              : 03.03.2017

              INHERITING AL-FIRDAWS

Honorable Believers!

As narrated by Umar, a revelation came to Allah’s Messenger (pbuh). He waited for a while then turned to qibla. He raised his hands and supplicated to His Lord: “O Allah! Increase Your blessings, don’t decrease them! Give us honor, not misery! Help us reach our goals, don’t spare them from us! Grant us to be among those who You favor and who favor You!” 

Brothers and Sisters!

After this prayer, the Prophet said, “Ten verses have been revealed to me just now. Whoever implements the tenets in these verses gets into paradise,” and recited the first ten verses of Surah al-Mu’minun. 

In today’s khutbah, I’d like to share with you those ten verses that will make us the inheritors of the highest gardens of paradise. Let us find out the true believers mentioned in the ten verses who attain salvation.

اَلَّذ۪ينَ هُمْ ف۪ي صَلَاتِهِمْ خَاشِعُونَۙ  They are humbly submissive during prayer. They consider prayer a moment of union with the Lord, a longingly awaited meeting. They do not reduce this magnificent worship to mere form. They never waste its spirit.

وَالَّذ۪ينَ هُمْ عَنِ اللَّغْوِ مُعْرِضُونَۙ They stay clear of ill speech and acts that are of no use to their world and hereafter. Because life is too short and precious a blessing to even waste a second. Time is a unique treasure we have been entrusted. And one day, the Almighty will hold us accountable for everything. 





وَالَّذ۪ينَ هُمْ لِلزَّكٰوةِ فَاعِلُونَۙ The believers who have attained salvation are those who give alms. They do charity. They practically compete one another in charity. And alms is the right of the poor and needy in the wealth of the rich. It protects a person against being the slave of wealth, fortune, and power. It saves one from material burdens. It cleans one from sin and filth on the other hand.

Brothers and Sisters! 

The believers who have been promised paradise,

وَالَّذ۪ينَ هُمْ لِفُرُوجِهِمْ حَافِظُونَۙ are those who keep their dignity. Because one keeps their character intact as long as they protect their clean disposition and honor. They are treated with respect as long as they do not hurt anyone’s dignity.

وَالَّذ۪ينَ هُمْ لِاَمَانَاتِهِمْ وَعَهْدِهِمْ رَاعُونَۙ They protect what they have been entrusted. They keep their word and promise. Because being loyal and trustworthy is one of the most important characters for a believer. For a believer is the follower of the path of Muhammad the Trustworthy, the trustworthy prophet. 

وَالَّذ۪ينَ هُمْ عَلٰى صَلَوَاتِهِمْ يُحَافِظُونَ The believers who will get into al-Firdaws carefully maintain their prayers. They are those who are protected by prayer against bad things. It is a fact that prayers protect us if we protect them. They are a shield for us against all evil if we hold dear and love the prayers.

Brothers and Sisters!

The Almighty’s great reward is for those believers mentioned here. اَلَّذ۪ينَ يَرِثُونَ الْفِرْدَوْسَۜ هُمْ ف۪يهَا خَالِدُونَ They are the eternal inheritors of al-Firdaws which is one of the most special places in paradise. It is one of the highest ranks. It is the part of paradise that was a reason for consolation and mourning to mother Fatimah who said “O father who is placed in al-Firdaws!” after the Prophet’s (pbuh) passing.

Brothers and Sisters!

May the Lord Almighty grant us to be among the blissful believers who attain salvation and become neighbors to our Prophet (pbuh) in al-Firdaws."
55;2017-07-07;"
LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE
DATE  : 07.07.2017


                                    [pic]

                     THE TEST OF OUR FAITH AND HUMANITY:
                                THE REFUGEES
    Honorable Believers!
    Helpers in Medina (the  Ansar)  embraced  their  emigrant  brothers  and
sisters from Mecca (the Muhajirin) with love and sincerity, who  left  their
estates and homeland behind and came to them for  refuge.  The  helpers  did
not refrain from any sacrifice. Such  an  case  happened  when  one  of  the
helpers took a poor emigrant that our Prophet (pbuh) asked  if  any  of  the
helpers could entertain as a guest. But he had nothing at  home  except  the
meal of his children. So he and his wife let their children sleep  and  then
offered all the meal they had to their guest. They even found an  excuse  to
put out the lamp and pretended to eat. They slept hungry  that  night,  just
like their children. After that, our Almighty Lord revealed this verse  that
praises the generosity of the helpers through them: ""But  those  who  before
them, had homes (in Medina) and had adopted the Faith, show their  affection
to such as came to them for refuge, and entertain no desire in their  hearts
for things given to the (latter), but give them preference over  themselves,
even  though  poverty  was  their  (own  lot).  And  those  saved  from  the
covetousness  of  their  own  souls,  they  are  the   ones   that   achieve
prosperity."" [i]

    Esteemed Muslims!
    All thanks be to our Almighty Lord, our honorable nation,  who  followed
the guidance of the Messenger of Allah and took  this  first  generation  of
Muslims as  role  models,  have  become  the  Ansar  to  the  Muhajirin  for
centuries. They opened their hearts without an ounce of doubt to  those  who
came to them for refuge, regardless of their  race,  language  or  religion.
They took the downtrodden and oppressed under their wings, no  matter  where
they are. They looked after the orphans and the weak. They lent  a  hand  to
the poor and the needy. They have always been on the side of what  is  right
and true, and stood by  the  righteous.  They  took  a  firm  stand  against
oppression and the oppressors. And therefore, the poor and  the  lowly  pray
to Allah for our people with tears in their  eyes  and  these  prayers  have
become the never-ending power, the invincible  shield  of  our  nation.  Our
Lord have never let us become dishonorable, but made us  honorable  for  the
sake of these prayers that rise from these suffering hearts,  for  the  sake
of the hopes that find their way into the hearts of these deprived souls.

He never left us powerless, helpless and alone. He never denied us His  help
and grace.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    This land we live in have always been a home  for  the  emigrants.  This
noble nation famous for their generosity and altruism  have  always  been  a
safe haven. In recent years,  millions  of  our  brothers  and  sisters  who
escaped from the civil war, violence and massacres that take  place  in  the
region had to take refuge in our country. With a generosity that  the  whole
world could only envy, our nation have extended  a  helping  hand  to  these
people and welcomed them in the best possible way.

    But lately, we have sadly witnessed some unpleasant  events  that  could
cast a shadow upon the generosity of our nation.  Especially,  a  perception
management operation targeting  our  fellowship  and  hospitality  is  being
carried out by certain groups. They are trying to incite grudge  and  hatred
and harm the solidarity, unity, fondness and tranquility of  our  nation  by
spreading unfounded claims and messages on social media. All Muslim  sisters
and brothers must be alert and have foresight on this matter.

    Dear Muslims in the Mosque!
    As our Prophet (pbuh) said: ""The  parable  of  the  believers  in  their
affection, mercy, and compassion for each other is that of a body. When  any
limb aches, the whole body reacts with fever."" [ii] So come! Let us see  our
guests not as a burden but as a means of Allah's grace.  Let  us  not  blame
others for the mistakes of a few. Let us pray  ""Our  Almighty  Lord,  please
test no person and no nation with such a heavy trial!""

    Let us not forget that insight,  foresight  and  common  sense  are  the
values we need the most and that could support us in this hard time  we  are
going through as a  nation.  We  should  acknowledge  that  our  fellowship,
solidarity, peace and tranquility are entrusted to us. Each soul  that  asks
four our compassion and expects our help is a test of our faith, our  Islam,
and humanity.

    Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
    We are going to reach the first anniversary of  the  heinous  coup  that
targeted the values and very existence of our nation on 15 July.  Therefore,
the Quran is being read in its entirety throughout  the  country,  dedicated
first to the souls of the martyrs of 15 July and then to the  souls  of  all
our martyrs. Also, there will be commemorations for  our  martyrs  in  every
mosque and prayers will be made. We ask you to say ""amin"" to the prayers  as
an indication of our fidelity towards our martyrs. We once again  ask  mercy
and grace for the martyrs that turned these lands  into  our  homeland  with
their lives and ask swift recovery for the veterans from our Almighty Lord.
-----------------------
[i] Al-Hashr, 59/9; Bukhari, Merits of the Helpers in Madinah, 10.
[ii] Bukhari, Al-Adab, 27.

            Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
56;2018-04-06;"
DATE: 06.04.2018
                                                                       [pic]

                THE THING THAT INCREASES BY SHARING: GOODNESS

    Jumu'ah Mubarak, Honorable Believers!
    In the verse I recited, our Almighty Lord enjoins, ""And  not  equal  are
the good deed and the bad.  Repel  [evil]  by  that  which  is  better;  and
thereupon the one whom between you  and  him  is  enmity  [will  become]  as
though he was a devoted friend.""[i]

    Our Prophet (s.a.w.) states in the hadith I recited,  ""Righteousness  is
good behavior, and sin is what fluctuates in your chest, and you would  hate
that the people discovered it about you.""[ii]

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Goodness is the most basic aim  of  creation.  Allah,  who  has  created
mankind, who sustains, protects and forgives man and  covers  him  with  His
grace, has created death and  life  to  test  who  amongst  us  does  better
deeds.[iii]

    The life we experience is a journey of goodness. Man is a  traveler  who
came to this world to believe and do  good  deeds.  Man  exists  to  perform
good,  beneficial  and  virtuous  acts,  and  to  show  righteous  and  kind
behavior. It is man's first duty to both avoid and  prevent  acts  of  evil,
wrongdoing and harm.

    Honorable Believers!
    Goodness is simply the name of the character that faith and all acts  of
worship seek to impress on us. Goodness is all values that  make  us  human.
And the most important feature that our faith seeks us to be is  being  good
believers, good children, good parents, good neighbors, good  friends,  i.e.
being good persons.

    Goodness is a call to faith and Islam. Sometimes it  is  high  morality,
virtue and  good  temper.  Sometimes  it  is  charity,  sadaqah  and  zakat.
Goodness is at times a smile and an embrace,  a  kind  word  and  a  smiling
face. Goodness is the endeavor to be good and spread good  deeds  with  good
companions. It is the highest rank of faith and worship.
    Esteemed Muslims!
    Goodness is to be a companion for the lonely, a shoulder  on  which  the
tired may  rest,  a  shelter  for  the  needy.  It  is  embracing  refugees,
protecting orphans,  helping  the  elderly.  Goodness  is  to  give  without
expecting anything in return; to share one's strength,  experience,  wealth,
love and mercy without the expectation of material benefit.

    Goodness is compassion, sacrifice, justice, and affection.  It  requires
to be at the side of the oppressed and against the oppressors.  Goodness  is
supplication, invocation, and greeting. A pair of hands  joining  in  saying
""Ameen"" at a time of trouble is goodness. A good deed is sometimes  planting
a tree, at others it is feeding a hungry animal. It is the meal shared  with
one's neighbors, and giving directions to those who are lost.

    Dear Believers!
    The Islamic civilization has been carrying on the movements  of  charity
and  relief  for  centuries.  Countless  charity   foundations   have   been
established for this purpose. Our nation has been a refuge for  the  wronged
and the ansar to the muhajirun through these organizations.

    Esteemed Believers!
    Unfortunately, good acts are passed over for evil ones in the memory  of
our time. Evil is besieging our world day by day and mankind is  losing  its
high values such as conscience, justice, compassion and mercy  each  passing
day.

    In such a world, it must be  the  ideal  of  us  all  to  make  goodness
dominant and to prevent evil. Because it is a tenet of our faith to say  ""No
more!"" to evil with our hands, tongues, and hearts. Let us not  forget  that
[pic] ""Good deeds do away with misdeeds.""[iv] And evil takes over the  place
of every good deed we neglect.

    Honorable Believers!
    Let us call upon Allah in this auspicious day and say: Oh  Lord!  Render
us amongst your fortunate servants who can build  bridges  of  goodness  and
mercy between our hearts!

    Our Lord, give us in  this  world  [that  which  is]  good  and  in  the
Hereafter [that which is] good and protect us from  the  punishment  of  the
Fire![v] Our Lord! Forgive us and our parents and the believers on  the  Day
the account is established![vi]
-----------------------
[i] Fussilat, 41/34.
[ii] Muslim, Birr, 14.
[iii] Mulk, 67/2.
[iv] Hud, 11/114.
[v] Baqarah, 2/201.
[vi] Ibrahim, 14/41.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services


"
57;2017-01-13;"
LOCATION  : NATIONWIDE
DATE             : 13.01.2017

                                                                       [pic]

                   TO BE ABLE TO BE A SERVANT ALLAH LOVES

    A Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters!
    In the verse I have recited, Allah Almighty  shows  us  the  way  to  be
honored with His love and favor: ""Say, [O Muhammad],  'If  you  should  love
Allah, then follow me, so Allah will love you and  forgive  you  your  sins.
And Allah is Forgiving and Merciful.'""[i]
    Brothers and Sisters!
    The Almighty stated the deeds that will move us away from His  grace  in
His Book like He showed us in it the ones that will bring us to  His  favor.
He stated the ones honored with His love as well as those left  without  His
love and mercy. Come, let's hear in today's khutbah  who  the  servants  our
Lord loves are.
    ?????????  ???????  ????????????????  Allah  loves  those  pure  in  the
spiritual and material sense.  Then  come,  let's  protect  our  disposition
against all evil. Let's make our mind and our heart the center  of  goodness
and nice things, not of evil and ugliness.
    ????? ??????? ??????? ?????????????? Allah loves those who repent. Then,
honorable brothers and sisters! Come, let's  be  the  servants  we  are  and
repent. Let's voice our submission to our  Lord  and  the  remorse  for  our
sins. Let's take refuge in His vast mercy. Let's not forget that  repentance
is like a new start to life.
    ????? ??????? ??????? ????????????? Allah loves those who avoid  disobey
Him. Then come, let's always be aware of our duties and obligations  towards
Him. Let's live our lives in accordance with the purpose and reason  of  our
creation.
    ????? ??????? ??????? ????????????????? Allah loves those who trust Him.
Then come, after doing  our  duty,  ?????????  ???????  ????????  ??????????
let's say ""Allah suffices, what a great trustee He  is!""  Let's  never  lose
hope in our Lord's grace, help, and blessing.
    ????????? ??????? ??????????????? Allah loves  the  doers  of  good  and
those who seek His favor in everything they say and do. Then come,  brothers
and sisters! Let's act with the awareness that our Lord  sees  us  at  every
moment.
    ????????? ??????? ????????????? Allah loves the patient. He is with  the
patient. Then come, let's adopt patience and  quiet  as  a  maxim  with  the
awareness that life is a test.
    ????? ??????? ??????? ?????????????? Allah  loves  who  are  just.  Then
come, let's elevate justice at all times. Let's not forget that  justice  is
the key to trust and peace. It is indispensable for a humane life.
    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Come, now look at those the Almighty does not love.
    ????? ??????? ??? ??????? ?????????????? Allah does not love aggressors,
those who cross the line. Then, we must be constructive  and  unifying,  not
destructive and divisive.
    ????????? ??? ??????? ????????????? Allah does not love the  oppressors.
Because oppression is one of the biggest sins. It means disregarding  what's
right and just. Then, we must always stand against the oppressors  and  with
the oppressed.
    ??????? ??? ??????? ??????????????? Allah does not love  the  prodigals.
Then, we must avoid squandering what we have earned and lavishly  using  the
blessings Allah has bestowed upon us.
    ????????? ??? ??????? ?????????????? Allah does not love those who spoil
and make trouble. Then, we must altogether protect our peace, our unity  and
togetherness, our brotherhood and relationship.
    ??????? ??? ??????? ?????????????????? Allah does not love the arrogant,
those who boast. Then, we must elevate with humility and solemnity.
    ????? ??????? ??? ??????? ??????????????? Allah never  loves  those  who
betray Himself, His Holy Book, His Prophet, their own values, and their  own
brothers. Then, we must stay away from all  sorts  of  betrayal,  hypocrisy,
and deception.
    ????????? ??? ??????? ????? ???????? ??????? Allah does not love anybody
who persists in impiety and  sin.  Then,  we  must  avoid  being  blind  and
oblivious to the countless blessings bestowed upon us by  the  Almighty  and
the goodness we have been blessed with.
    Brothers and Sisters!
    May the Almighty Lord grant us to be among those happy servants of  His
who have been honored with His love. As I conclude my khutbah, I would  like
to share with you this piece of information: As they always  do,  our  great
nation has shown great favor to the aid campaign launched by the  Presidency
of Religious Affairs a short while ago with the slogan ""Don't  Let  Humanity
Die in Aleppo."" Under the campaign,  an  aid  of  133,745,000  TL  has  been
raised so far from abroad and within the country. The raised  fund  is  sent
to our oppressed brothers and sisters in Aleppo to  tend  to  their  wounds.
May the Almighty accept your help. May He always  protect  our  country  and
our great nation that are the hope of the oppressed,  the  downtrodden,  and
the destitute.
-----------------------
[i] Ali 'Imran, 3/31.

                             Written by: General Directorate of Religious
Services

"
58;2019-05-03;"
DATE: 03.05.2019
                                                                       [pic]
    WELCOME, THE MONTH OF RAMADAN!
    Dear Muslims!
    We will have reached Ramadan, the Sultan of the Months, with the tarawih
prayer following the isha prayer the next Sunday. The  same  night  we  will
wake up for sahur to start fasting, and enter the  season  of  blessing  and
mercy, inshaallah.

    May endless praise be to Allah  (swt)  who  have  allowed  us  to  reach
Ramadan. May salat and salam be to the  Prophet  Muhammad  (saw),  of  whose
ummah we are honored to be members.

    Honorable Believers!
    The month of Ramadan is the month of blessing that we have for one  year
longed for. It is an unprecedented period of time in which  faith,  worship,
good morality, consciousness of being ummah, and brotherhood  in  Islam  are
consolidated. It is the time for Muslims to review their  relationship  with
Allah on the one hand, and with their brothers and  sisters  on  the  other,
thereby questioning their own selves.  With  the  peacefulness  of  reaching
such a sacred month, the Prophet  Muhammad  said  to  his  companions,  ""The
month of Ramadan has come with its blessings. Allah  enriches  you,  blesses
you, conceals mistakes, and accepts your prayers and du'as  in  this  month.
The Almighty Allah (swt) takes  into  account  rather  your  competition  in
benevolence, and praises you to  His  angels.  Then,  do  your  best  to  be
prominent in your efforts in good deeds and benevolence.  The  miserable  is
whoever is deprived of Allah (swt)'s mercy in Ramadan.""[i]

    Honorable Believers!
    Ramadan is the month in which the worship of  fasting,  which  turns  us
into pious Muslims as patient and contented, was made obligatory. It is  the
month in which the Holy Qur'an, our guide to true path  and  salvation,  was
started to be revealed. Allah the Exalted (swt) refers  to  it  as  follows,
""Ramadan is the month in which the  Qur'an  was  revealed  as  a  guide  for
humanity with clear proofs of  guidance  and  the  standard  to  distinguish
between right and wrong.  So,  whoever  is  present  this  month,  let  them
fast...""[ii]

    Ramadan is the month of repentance which purifies Muslims from sins like
autumn rains at the end of summer washing the dirt and dust  away  from  the
earth. Likewise, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) says,  ""Whoever  observes  fasts
during the month of Ramadan out of  sincere  faith,  and  hoping  to  attain
Allah's rewards, then all his past sins will be forgiven.""[iii]

    Honorable Muslims!
    The Month of Ramadan is the most valuable harvest season  of  our  lives
and an opportunity of material and spiritual renewal for all of us. It is  a
hope, excitement and awakening  for  Muslims.  It  is  the  mobilization  of
hearts, during which the poor, the almsman, the needy  and  the  lonely  are
remembered and protected by means of infaq (spending in  the  way  of  Allah
(swt)). Those people who do not know the value of  Ramadan  though  reaching
it will be deprived of a great treasure!

    Dear Believers!
    The places where the sacred month of Ramadan is best experienced are the
mosques in which the hearts of Muslims are filled with peacefulness as  they
stand in prayer. The mosques, in which we as Muslims  purified  of  all  our
senses of self-centrism submit our servitude to Allah, are the heart of  the
Islamic civilization. Our mosques are constructed  thanks  to  the  efforts,
sacrifices, material and non-material  support  of  our  noble  nation.  The
adhans echoing around over nintey thousand mosques today in our country  are
the symbols of our independence and of our future. One such  mosque  is  the
Istanbul Great Çaml?ca Mosque,  which  is  Turkey's  greatest  and  will  be
opened  officially  today.  I  would  like  to  take  this  opportunity   to
commemorate, in gratitude, all those charitable people  who  have  lead  the
way  for,  and  supported,  the  construction,  maintenance,  and  rendering
prosperous of mosques, from the past to the present.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Let us try to benefit from the barakah of  Ramadan.  Let  us  bring  our
houses and hearts together with Qur'an in the month of Qur'an.  Let  us  try
to maintain the tradition of gathering for reciting the Qur'an, as  done  by
the Prophet Muhammad (saw) Let us try to attend the sermons and the  tarawih
prayers altogether, men and women, children  and  youth.  [i]  Let  us  make
those people in need smile with the zakat and sadaqah  that  we  will  give.
Let us try to be among those people to spend this sacred month in  the  best
way, as expressed by the Prophet Muhammad (saw), from  the  first  night  of
which the devils are chained up, the gates of the Hell are  closed,  of  the
Heaven are opened, and countless Muslims are saved  from  the  fire  of  the
Hell.[iv]
-----------------------
[i] Haythami, Majmua al-Zawaid, III, 344.
[ii] Baqarah, 2/185.
[iii] Bukhari, Iman, 28.
[iv]hO]?hè&õCJOJQJaJ)hO]?hè&õB*[pic]CJOJQJ^JaJph%hO]?hÔ\...B*[pic]CJOJQJaJph
,hO]?h>¥5?B*[pic]CJOJQJ^JaJph,hO]?hýOÓ5?B*[pic]CJOJQJ^JaJph(hO]?hÔ\...5?B*[pic]
CJOJQJaJph(hUa~h
Ô5?B*[pic]OJQJ^JaJph-jhUa~hO]?5?B*[pic]OJQJU[pic]aJ Tirmidhi, Sawm, 1; Ibn
Majah, Siyam, 2.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services



"
59;2018-02-16;"
   LOCATION      : NATIONWIDE
   DATE    : 16.02.2018
                                    [pic]

       JIHAD: THE STRUGGLE IN ALLAH'S CAUSE WITH ONE'S LIFE AND WEALTH
   Jumu'ah Mubarak, Honorable Believers!
   A Companion came to our Prophet (s.a.w.) and asked: ""What do  you  think
of a man who fights seeking both fame and spiritual rewards?  What  does  he
gain?"" The Messenger of Allah replied, ""He will gain nothing."" But  the  man
repeated the question three times. Therefore, our Prophet said: ""Allah  does
not accept any deed, except that which is purely for Him,  and  seeking  His
countenance."" [i]
   Honorable Believers!
   Jihad is the name of the effort spent on Allah's path, the struggle made
for the cause of the Truth. Jihad is the  endeavor  of  a  believer  to  win
Almighty Lord's countenance by using every means of his existence. Jihad  is
to show the determination with  one's  body,  tongue,  ideas  and  heart  to
protect all that is sacred.
   Jihad is not a struggle for an unjust attack, destruction,  exploitation
or oppression. On the contrary, it is the  will  of  a  Muslim  to  live  in
his/her homeland with his/her  honor,  identity,  and  freedom;  to  protect
his/her faith, flag, independence and dignity. Jihad  is  the  effort  of  a
nation to protect its rights against oppression and the  oppressors.  It  is
the cause of lifting the truth up, and spreading  peace,  comfort,  justice,
and goodness on earth.
   Esteemed Muslims!
   Our Almighty Lord enjoins us in the Qur'an that people  who  believe  in
Allah and His Messenger strive for the cause of Allah with their wealth  and
their lives.[ii] Our Prophet (s.a.w.)  says:  ""Strive  in  Jihad  with  your
hands, your tongues and your wealth.""[iii] This verse and hadith  show  that
jihad is not always achieved by sacrificing  one's  life,  it  can  also  be
achieved by serving the truth with one's hands or tongue or wealth.
   The hadith ""Mujahid is the one who strives against  his  own  soul.""[iv]
tells us that our jihad starts against our own desires first.  The  whispers
of our nafs urge us towards badness, faults and  rebellion;  and  struggling
against them is a jihad as well. It is also a jihad to  learn  the  religion
of Allah from the truest source and live it in the most  beautiful  way.  It
is also a jihad to stand against the wants and desires that  would  alienate
us to our creation and  drive  us  to  an  endless  abyss.  Moreover,  if  a
believer succeeds in the jihad with one's own soul, then s/he  will  succeed
in the jihad against the enemies of Islam as well.


   Dear Brothers and Sisters!
   The jihad is made to spread the life-giving principles of Islam on earth
and to end injustice sometimes by pens, and sometimes by words.  A  believer
works and strives for the Truth at times with his/her  hand,  and  at  times
with his/her wealth. S/he works day and night to tell  the  truth,  to  call
people to goodness, and conduce to good things. The  highest  level  of  the
jihad  is  the  armed  struggle  for  one's  faith,  existence,  motherland,
continuity, and freedom. The struggle we have made  as  a  nation  with  its
East, West, North, and South to protect this  honorable  motherland  is  the
most vivid witness of jihad. Çanakkale, which we came  out  victorious  with
the help of Allah, is the name of the epic  of  existence,  faith,  courage,
and determination.
   Honorable Believers!
   Jihad does not mean to take a weapon in hand and murder innocents.  Some
people have tried to attribute the suicide attacks,  violence  and  savagery
committed by the murderous gangs in the recent years to Muslims,  but  these
things are not even remotely connected to the concept  of  jihad  in  Islam.
Because in Islam, jihad is the name of the struggle  to  let  live,  not  to
kill; and to revive, not to destroy. Jihad is performed only to  remove  any
evil that deviates humans from their purpose of creation. Whoever  they  may
be and regardless of its purpose,  attacks  against  innocent  people  would
never comply with the supreme essence and ideals that Islam has ascribed  to
the concept of jihad. These are brutal  murder  attempts  committed  against
humanity.
   Esteemed Brothers and Sisters!
   Today, we are striving with our lives and our wealth for existence as  a
nation. Our Mehmetçiks (soldiers) showed the whole world once again that  we
would sacrifice ourselves for  our  faith,  our  flag,  and  our  motherland
without hesitation. Each son of this motherland who has  been  honored  with
martyrdom at a very young age almost shouts out  the  glad  tidings  of  our
Lord to us: ""And say not of those who are slain in God's  cause,  'They  are
dead': nay, they are alive, but you perceive it not."" [v]
   Honorable Believers!
   We all have our responsibilities in this struggle for survival. By  this
responsibility, let us sincerely ask Allah Almighty together  in  this  hour
of holy Jumu'ah:
   O Allah! Grant victory to our heroic army who has been fighting for  our
independence and our future, for our unity and solidarity! Grant Your  Mercy
to our honorable martyrs who sacrificed their lives  to  protect  our  peace
and values; and  bless  our  veterans  with  recovery.  Grant  us  sagacity,
foresight, strength and wisdom against those who seek sedition,  malice  and
mischief, and those who tricks and set traps  against  our  nation  and  the
ummah of the Prophet! Grant us the honor to be among your  sincere  servants
who comprehend the true  meaning  of  jihad  and  do  not  escape  from  the
struggle and endeavor for your cause!
   Our Lord! In You we believe and in You we put our trust. Do not leave us
without Your Mercy!
-----------------------
[i] Nasa'i, Jihad, 24.
[ii] Saff, 61/11.
[iii] Nasa'i, Jihad, 48.
[iv] Tirmidhi, Virtues of Jihad, 2.
[v] Baqarah, 2/154.
                        Issued by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
60;2018-06-15;"DATE: 15.06.2018

	

SPENDING A LIFE WITH THE AWARENESS OF SERVITUDE TO ALLAH

         Jum’uah Mubarak Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

One day, Our Prophet (s.a.w.) was asked, “Which act is the most precious before Allah?” The beloved Messenger replied, “The acts most precious before Allah are those which are done continuously, even if they are small.”

This answer indicated that worship and servitude, goodness and benevolence need a balance and an order. With this answer, the Prophet of Mercy advised us to observe simplicity and continuity in worshiping Our Lord as a sign of our faith. In order to keep our awareness for servitude for a lifetime, our ties of affection with Allah Almighty needed to be regularly fed with our prayers and deeds.

Estimable Brothers and Sisters!

We had an indescribable joy with the arrival of the Holy Ramadan, and we had welcomed it with great enthusiasm. We had experienced the spiritual peace of reaching the season of fasting, iftar, suhur, tarawih, and muqabala. Today, we are bidding farewell to the schooling of Ramadan which trained us, dignified us, warned us against the desires of the nafs, and encouraged us for good deeds. We are ending the month of forgiveness which equipped our souls and our tables with its riches and generosity for the whole month. May Our Lord make us of His servants who duly observed Ramadan and are honored by Ramadan. May He allow us to reach many blessed months and eids.

Honorable Believers!

During the Holy Ramadan, we stood up for salat day and night as instructed by this verse from the Qur’an,  “Certainly will the believers have succeeded. They who are during their prayer humbly submissive.” We prostrated ourselves, knowing our weakness. We questioned ourselves, we repented and we prayed. We ran for tarawih with an extra ardor, relieving not only our bodies, but also our hearts. We realized again the value of health, time, youth, a morsel of food, and a sip of water. We felt the bliss of pleasing our brothers and sisters with zakat, fitr and sadaqas.

We once again remembered the great responsibility to extend a hand to the relatives, the orphans, the refugees, the poor and the forlorn. We grasped the wisdom in Our Prophet’s (s.a.w) saying, “O Aisha, what you have distributed is our, not what you left.” when an animal had been sacrificed and its meat had been allotted and distributed.

Brothers and Sisters!

In the month of forgiveness, we prayed for forgiveness and mercy from Our Lord with the good tidings of   “Indeed, He is ever Accepting of repentance.” We tried to be purified from our sins with our gratitude and prayers during iftar, and with our repentance and supplication. 

Following the divine order of  “And hold firmly to the rope of Allah (the Qur’an) all together and do not become divided.” we refrained from all kinds of disunity and discord in this season of mercy. We became one and we stood for unity, forgetting all our differences. We strengthened our brotherhood with the iftar tables we attended together, tarawih prayers we did shoulder to shoulder, and the charity activities which found abundance by sharing.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Now, it is time to look after the beauties acquired from Ramadan and spread them all over the year, even the entire lifespan. It is time to set Ramadan as a starting point which disciplined our lives, refreshed our awareness of servitude, and conduced that we deploy all our material and spiritual possibilities for the goodness of humanity. It is time to follow the Holy Qur’an, which reminds us that our responsibility will continue until our last breath as enjoined in this verse, “And worship your Lord until there comes to you the certainty (death).” 

Estimable Muslims!

Let us make the peace and awareness of Ramadan rule over our lives. Let us maintain our ties with our Holy Book–the Qur’an. Let us continue frequenting the mosques with our families just as we did in Ramadan, and do not leave the masjids in gloom. Let us stand by everybody who needs our love, compassion, attention, and support. Let us earnestly avoid words and behaviors which undermine our unity and solidarity and weaken us by playing us against each other. May Allah ordain all of us to protect the legacy of Ramadan, and to have good morals and to be constant in worshipping."
61;2018-07-20;"Date : 20-07-2018

	

	         WEDDING ETIQUETTE

	Jumu’ah Mubarak Honorable Believers!

Our Prophet (s.a.w.) married his dear daughter Fatimah and his uncle’s son Ali in the second year of his the Hijrah to Madinah. Fatimah’s dowry consisted of just a piece velvet, a lyster bag and a pillow filled with a redolent herb called idhkhir. Fatimah’s wedding dinner was just as plain and humble as her bridewealth (mahr) and dowry. Despite that, those who witnessed the Prophet’s (s.a.w.) daughter’s wedding said, “We have not seen a more beautiful wedding than this.”

Honorable Believers!

Marriage is the order of Allah (s.w.t.) and the Sunnah of our Prophet (s.a.w.). It is a precious beginning that leads someone to peace, happiness, blessing and heaven in both this world and afterlife. As expressed by our Prophet (s.a.w.) words marriage is the means “to protect the half of religion.”

Our first step to marriage, our weddings are the ceremonies that take place with our loved ones’ best wishes and their presence. Establishment of a new family is announced with a wedding; two lives get united at one home. Hopes regarding the future get stronger, joys of life are shared. Everybody prays to Allah (s.w.t.) for healthy, benevolent generations, habituation, affection and mercy.

My Dear Brother and Sisters!

Our beloved Prophet (s.a.w.), who was an example to his ummah with his life, prayed for newlyweds, saying “May Allah (s.w.t.) make this wedding blessed for you.” He allowed for decent entertainment in joyful and happy wedding occasions. As such; unpretentious, modest, warm and moderate wedding ceremonies are of his Sunnah because one of the most important measures of life for believers is to avoid extravagancy. Being balanced is always essential in servitude to Allah (s.w.t.), in happiness, anger, sorrow, and entertainment.

Dear Muslims!

The Holy Qur’an asks believers to support each other in the matter of marriage and starting a family, our Prophet (s.a.w.) heralded that Allah (s.w.t) will help those who intend to marry. What is essential in Islam is to facilitate marriage. Therefore, forgetting our Prophet’s (s.a.w) principle that says “The most fruitful wedding is the one with least burden.” usually causes material and moral damages. Redundant wedding spending at every stage to marriage put families into trouble. Young people who want to marry get into trouble because wedding expenses are over reasonable limits, even avoid marriage just because of that. Paying debts for a long time after wedding causes a family’s early years to pass in financial distress and unrest. However, in simplicity there is nobility, and in humbleness there is wisdom.

Venerable Muslims!

Our Prophet (s.a.w.) advised one of his newlywed companions to “Give a wedding dinner even with only a sheep.” However, our wedding dinners, which are supposed to be where our friends meet and share happiness, should not turn into the tables of squander, vanity and gaudiness. Our Prophet (s.a.w.) demanded not to make any difference between rich and poor while making wedding invitations. He described wedding dinners which invited the rich but forgot the poor as “the worst meal.” 

Dear Muslims!

What is appropriate for believers is to act according to what Islam deemed rightful in our marriage, engagement, circumcision and wedding ceremonies. Being temperate and balanced in entertainment is to observe Islamic principles, and to obey the following expression of Allah (s.w.t.) by heart: “O you who have believed, do not prohibit the good things which Allah (s.w.t.) has made lawful to you and do not transgress. Indeed, Allah does not like transgressors.”

A believer cannot be slack about haram actions by taking shelter in the excuse of “his or her children’s happiness.” A believer does not resort to mind-numbing things like alcohol, drugs and guns which turn happiness to sorrow, or does not violate anyone’s privacy while pursuing happiness. A believer does not violate anyone’s rights or disturb anyone in entertainment. A believer lives every moment with the awareness that Allah (s.w.t.) sees and observes him every moment. A believer praises Allah (s.w.t.) and acts in line with the approval of Allah (s.w.t.).

Brothers and Sisters!

Let us stay away from actions that could shadow our happiness in these months of frequent weddings, in which our children get married. Let us be careful about sinking into material passions, and plunging into pleasure and debauchery when making a wedding ceremony. Let us not be the captives of luxury and wastefulness on such occasions. Let us remember that life does not consist of joy and entertainment only. Let us turn our wedding ceremonies into opportunities to praise Allah (s.w.t.) who “created for us from ourselves mates that we may find tranquility in them; placed between us affection and mercy.”"
62;2019-11-01;"
TAR?H: 01.11.2019
             [pic] SECULARIZATION: DELIGHT IN THE TEMPORARY LIFE
    Honorable Muslims!
    The Prophet Muhammad (saw) had made a peace agreement with the people of
Bahrain and appointed an ambassador there. After some time,  the  ambassador
returned to Madinah, with a significant amount of goods. Curious, the  Ashab
al-Kiram gathered around the ambassador and the goods  he  brought.  As  the
Prophet Muhammad (saw) came  out  of  the  masjid,  he  saw  the  situation,
smiled, and said, ""Rejoice and hope for what will please you!  By  Allah,  I
am not afraid of your poverty. But I am afraid that you will lead a life  of
luxury as past nations did, whereupon you will compete with each  other  for
it, as they competed for it,  and  it  will  destroy  you  as  it  destroyed
them.""[i]

    Dear Believers!
    Islam, the sublime religion, encompasses all aspects  of  life.  Allah's
(swt) commandments and prohibitions lead  us  to  the  right  path  in  this
world, and to the heaven in the Hereafter. Yet  despite  all  this,  we  get
lost in the busyness  of  worldly  affairs,  whereby  neglecting  the  life-
enhancing principles of Islam. Away  we  drift  from  the  guidance  of  the
Prophet Muhammad (saw) as our role model, and slowly we lose  the  influence
of Islam in  our  life  that  gives  meaning  to  it.  We  cherish  what  is
transient, lose the balance between the  worldly  affairs  and  the  affairs
relating to the Hereafter, and finally become secularized.

    Dear Muslims!
    Secularization is when people strive ambitiously  for  worldly  affairs,
becoming unaware of Allah (swt) and the Hereafter. It is  when  they  ignore
their responsibilities towards Allah  (swt),  and  care  about  the  worldly
affairs  only.  It  is  when  they  place  religious  beliefs,  values,  and
attitudes away from the center of their lives. It is when  all  they  crave,
as if they will never die, for are the worldly possessions.  Regarding  this
wrong attitude of people states  Allah  the  Almighty  (swt),  ""Behold,  you
prefer the life of  this  world.  But  the  Hereafter  is  better  and  more
enduring.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    The Almighty Allah (swt) has sent us to this temporary life for test and
trial. This is not to say that Muslims should completely  quit  working  for
their livelihood. It is just that they  should  not  neglect  their  affairs
relating to the life in the Hereafter. It is essential  to  make  legitimate
use of the worldly blessings  although  the  main  purpose  is  to  work  to
deserve going to the heaven in the Hereafter.  What  is  important  is  that
Muslims should not be captivated by the  means  they  earn,  and  that  they
should use them in accordance with the  consent  of  Allah  (swt).  In  this
regard states the Almighty Allah (swt) in the Holy Qur'an, ""But  seek,  with
the wealth which Allah has bestowed on you, the Home of the  Hereafter,  nor
forget your portion in this world.  But do you good, as Allah has been  good
to you, and seek not occasions for mischief in the  land,  for  Allah  loves
not those who do mischief.""[iii]

    Dear Muslims!
    On top of the damages  caused  by  secularization  comes  the  unmindful
consumption. While some people are in need of and crave for a piece of  food
in one corner of the world, other people in another corner push  the  limits
of wasting resources extravagantly. It  is  unfortunate  that  today  people
think happiness rests in consumption. They are under the delusion that  they
will be happy when they spend more and consume  expensive  things.  However,
excessive and immoderate consumption erode  our  humane  and  moral  values.
Many people are lost in the swamp  of  debt  and  interest  accrued  due  to
unmindful consumption and irresponsible spending. Many families suffer  from
uneasiness and  helplessness.  The  Prophet  Muhammad  (saw),  however,  had
warned people from ages ago, ""Son of Adam says: 'My wealth, my  wealth'.  Do
you own of your wealth other than what you eat and  consume,  and  what  you
wear and wear out, or what you give in sadaqah to those who deserve it,  and
that what you will have in stock for yourself.""[iv]

    Honorable Believers!
    If a delicate balance is struck between the  world  and  the  Hereafter,
then wastefulness turns into  mindful  spending,  greed  and  ambition  into
contentedness, uneasiness into  reliance  on  Allah  (swt),  abundance  into
adequateness. Then, more mindful investments should be  made  in  this  life
and the life in the Hereafter as  per  their  worthiness.  So,  let  us  not
forget that the life in this world is only as short as a blink  of  an  eye.
Let us get prepared for  the  eternal  life  in  the  Herefter.  Let  us  be
unpretentious, humble, and moderate in all our affairs and actions.

    I would like to conclude this khutbah with the following  words  of  the
Almighty Allah (swt), ""O People! Certainly the promise  of  Allah  is  true.
Let not then this present life deceive  you,  nor  let  the  Chief  Deceiver
deceive you about Allah.""[v]
-----------------------
[i] Bukhari, Maghazi, 12; Muslim, Zuhd, 6.
[ii] A'la, 87/16,17.
[iii] Qasas, 28/77.
[iv] Muslim, Zuhd, 3.
[v]
$&('""¨ªÖï
ð
ñ
[pic]
p
}
~
÷îåÙÈ·¦""¦""?yeT¦A?¦""$hû?h?^î5?B*[pic]CJPJaJph
hû?h?^î5?6?CJ\?]?aJ'jhû?h?^î0J5?CJU[pic]\?aJ-
hû?h?^î0J5?6?CJaJhû?h?^îCJaJ#hû?h?^î5?B*[pic]CJ\?aJph
hû?h?^î5?B*[pic]CJaJph h?^îh?^î5?B*[pic]CJaJph jh
"
63;2019-03-22;"
DATE: 22.03.2019
[pic]
              THE QURAN AND THE SUNNAH ARE AN INSEPARABLE WHOLE
    Dear Muslims!
    The Almighty Allah (swt)  states,  ""And  whoever  obeys  Allah  and  the
Messenger -those will be with the ones upon whom Allah  has  bestowed  favor
of the prophets, the steadfast affirmers  of  truth,  the  martyrs  and  the
righteous. And excellent are those as companions!""[i]

    In this respect, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) says, ""The  truest  word  is
the Book of Allah and the best guidance is the guidance of Muhammad.""[ii]

    Honorable Believers!
    Allah the Most Merciful (swt) has not left humans alone and  unaided  in
the world. He (swt) has sent prophets to show His servants the  right  path,
and divine books to guide them to salvation. The duty  of  prophethood  that
started with the first human and  the  Prophet  Adam  ended  with  the  Last
Prophet Muhammad Mustafa (saw).  The  divine  message  that  started  to  be
revealed with the Prophet Adam was crowned by the Holy  Qur'an  revealed  to
the Prophet Muhammad (saw).

    Honorable Muslims!
    The Holy Qur'an is the final divine appeal by Allah (swt) to all people.
It is the words and verses of the Almighty Allah  (swt).  It  is  the  Book,
reading which is a form of worship.  It  is  al-Furqan  to  distinguish  the
truth from the falsity, the right from the wrong, and  the  halal  from  the
haram. It is therapeutic for body and soul, and the  source  of  remedy  for
moral diseases. It is the guide that shows the ways of  attaining  happiness
in this world and in the  Hereafter.  It  is  the  remembrance  that  remind
people of the purpose of creation.

    Dear Believers!
    The Sunnah is the compilation of the Prophet Muhammad (saw)'s lifestyle,
words, acts, and approvals. While the Qur'an enjoins people  to  have  faith
in Allah (swt) and be in servitude to Him (swt)  only,  the  Sunnah  teaches
people the verities of  the  faith.  While  the  Qur'an  enjoins  people  to
worship as required by the faith, the Sunnah indicates how  to  perform  the
worships. While the Qur'an enjoins people to have good  morals,  the  Sunnah
functions as the model for such a virtuous life.

    Dear Muslims!
    Not only did the Prophet Muhammad (saw) conveyed the revelations to  him
(saw) by the Lord of the Worlds (swt), but he (saw) also clarified  them  to
people. His distinguished life is the best is the best  example  for  us  to
become good Muslims and lead a life as approved by Allah (swt). If  we  want
to attain peace in this temporary life on earth and in the eternal  life  in
the Hereafter, the  only  way  is  to  follow  the  Sunnah  of  the  Prophet
Muhammad, and exert efforts to live, think, and  behave  the  way  he  (saw)
did. In this respect, Allah (swt) states, ""There has certainly been for  you
in the Messenger of Allah an excellent pattern  for  anyone  whose  hope  is
Allah and the Last Day and [who] remembers Allah often.""[iii]




    Honorable Believers!
    The Prophet Muhammad lived a life under  the  custody  of  the  Almighty
Allah (swt), Who tasked him (saw) with the  duty  of  prophethood,  and  was
immediately warned by Him (swt) when he (saw) as a human being made  even  a
small mistake. According to  the  Qur'an,  he  (saw)  never  said  any  word
arising out of his own  self,  but  only  said  what  was  revealed  to  him
(saw).[iv]  His  Companions  carefully  observed  his  blessed   words   and
behaviors, and meticulously transferred them to the future generations.

    The Holy Qur'an and the Sunnah unite an inseparable  whole.  It  is  not
possible to think of the Holy Qur'an that is  the  foundation  of  Islam  as
separate from the Sunnah of the Prophet Muhammad  (saw).  Trying  to  put  a
distance between the Holy Qur'an and the Sunnah, undervaluing the  place  of
the Sunnah in Islam by claiming ""The Holy Qur'an is sufficient for us"",  and
raising doubts about the authentic knowledge passed down on to us  from  the
Prophet Muhammad (saw) are all far from well-intended endeavors  that  place
a  heavy  burden  on  a  person,  because  the  traditions  of  the   Muslim
communities that have faith in the Holy Qur'an have been  kneaded  with  the
Sunnah, and the foundations of the Islamic civilization have been laid  upon
the Holy Qur'an and the Sunnah. In this respect, the Prophet Muhammad  (saw)
said in the Farewell Sermon  (Khutbah  al-Wada),  ""I  leave  behind  me  two
things, the Quran and my example, the Sunnah and if  you  follow  these  you
will never go astray""[v]

    Dear Muslims!
    Then, let us hold on tightly to the Holy Qur'an, and,  as  it  commands,
follow the Sunnah of the Prophet Muhammad (saw). Let us not leave  from  the
guidance of the Holy Qur'an and the Sunnah of the  Prophet  Muhammad  (saw).
Let us be wary against those people who pave the way  for  the  exploitation
of religion and attempt to derive fame and benefit  through  distancing  the
Qur'an from the Sunnah. Let us never respect  such  mindsets  claiming  that
the entire hadith works transmitting the Sunnah to our day is not  reliable.
Let us be wary also against those people who exploit the  sahih  (authentic)
Sunnah with the words and superstitions that do not belong  to  the  Prophet
Muhammad (saw). Let us exert all efforts to  raise  generations  that  align
their lives with Allah (swt)'s divine revelation, the Holy Qur'an,  and  the
Prophet Muhammad (saw)'s distinguished Sunnah.
-----------------------
[i] Nisa, 4/69.
[ii] Nasai, Îdayn, 22.
[iii] Ahzab, 33/21.
[iv] Najm, 53/3-4.
[v] Muvatta', Qadar, 3.
           General Directorate of Religious Services


"
64;2019-08-02;"
DATE: 02.08.2019
[pic]
    MAKE SACRIFICE FOR YOUR LORD
    Honorable Muslims!
    In the verse I have recited, the Almighty Allah (swt)  states:  ""Indeed,
We have granted you, o Prophet, abundant goodness. So,  pray  and  sacrifice
to your Lord alone!""[i]

    In the hadith I have read, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) states,  ""The  son
of Adam does not do any deed on the Day  of  Sacrifice  that  is  dearer  to
Allah (swt)than sacrificing an animal for Him...""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    We started to feel the excitement of the Eid al-Adha, an occasion for us
to get closer to Allah (swt) and to reinforce our bonds of brotherhood  with
Muslims. May endless praise and thanks be to Allah (swt) for allowing us  to
reach these blessed days. Insha'allah, we all together will  reach  the  eid
on August 11, Sunday. We are going to refresh our submission and loyalty  to
Allah (swt) by means of qurban, and our  affection  with  our  brothers  and
sisters by means of our aids and offerings.

    Dear Muslims!
    Qurban  means  sacrificing  an  animal  of  certain  qualifications   in
accordance  with  certain  procedures  for  worship  purposes.  As  in   all
worships, the primary purpose of qurban is to get  closer  to  Allah  (swt).
That is to say, it is the effort to attain the approval of Allah  (swt).  It
is the desire to attain piety (taqwa). Qurban is a demonstration of  respect
and sincerity by obedient servants for al-Rahman. This  is  referred  to  in
the words of the Almighty Allah (swt) as follows, ""Neither  their  meat  nor
blood reaches Allah. Rather, it is your piety that reaches Him.""[iii]

    Dear Believers!
    Qurban for Allah (swt) has been a form of worship  made  obligatory  for
all nations since the Prophet Adam (as). This is referred  to  in  the  Holy
Qur'an as follows, ""For every community We appointed a rite of sacrifice  so
that they may pronounce the Name of Allah over the  sacrificial  animals  He
has provided for them...""[iv]

    Let qurban remind you of Abil and Kabil, the Prophet  Adam's  sons,  who
were put to a test of sincerity. Abil, with his contentedness and  obedience
to the commandment of Allah (swt) in the best  manner,  passed  successfully
the test, and Kabil failed  it,  with  his  insincerity  and  jealousy.  For
sincerity (ikhlas) and piety (taqwa) constitute the essence of worship.

    Let qurban remind you also of the  Prophet  Ibrahim  (as)  and  his  son
Ismail, both of whom were put to a test of submission. In  this  challenging
test, a prophet as a father and his son showed all people  that  they  could
without hesitation sacrifice all they had in the cause of Allah (swt).

    Let qurban remind you of the Prophet Muhammad (saw), who performed  this
worship every year until his death. He himself would do the slaughtering  of
the animal he would sacrifice; he and his family would eat from the meat  of
the sacrificed animal, and he would also offer some meat to his  companions,
and to those people in need. Qurban also bears  the  marks  of  the  Prophet
Muhammad's (saw) loyalty and prayers. On it are reflected also the marks  of
his morals of infaq and sharing.

    Dear Muslims!
    Qurban is a supreme responsibility in both material and spiritual terms.
It means coming together, with our family,  friends,  neighbors,  relatives,
brothers and sisters, around the same blessing.  It  means  doing  good  and
spending in the cause of Allah (swt), and staying conscious of the  need  to
share His blessings with other people. It  means  making  happy  the  people
primarily in our close circles, the  people  in  need,  the  aggrieved,  the
miserable, and the lonely. It means delivering compassion  and  joy  to  the
homes of people in need without any discrimination of  color,  language,  or
geography. It means stretching out a hand of benevolence  to  countries,  of
whose names we may not have heard before, and people whom we  may  have  not
met before. It means grasping the meaning of  being  brothers  and  sisters,
being united, and being the ummah.

    Honorable Believers!
    The Presidency of Religious Affairs, in  cooperation  with  the  Türkiye
Diyanet Foundation, continues to carry out its  organization  of  qurban  by
proxy this year, too, just as it has been for  the  past  years.  Great  was
your participation for  the  last  year's  organization.  Alhamdulillah,  we
distributed a total number of 430.000 shares of qurban, which you  entrusted
to us, to  17.650.000  brothers  and  sisters  of  ours  who  are  in  need,
oppressed, aggrieved, and refugees.

    This year, within the framework of the organization initiated under  the
title of ""Share Your Qurban, Get Closer to Your Brothers and Sisters"",  some
of the shares of qurban you entrusted to  us  will  be  slaughtered  in  our
country, and some  of  them  by  our  officials  on  duty  abroad.  We  will
meticulously deliver your shares entrusted to us to those  people  truly  in
need. This way, we will function as a bridge of love between the  hearts  of
Muslims, thereby strengthening the consciousness of being ummah. We will  be
serving  for  upholding  and  spreading  the  awareness  of  Islamic  infaq,
morality, assistance, and solidarity before all humanity.

    The Türkiye  Diyanet  Foundation  will  keep  its  system  of  receiving
donations of shares of qurban open until the evening of the Day  of  Arafah.
We would like to invite you, our honorable  community,  to  this  charitable
activity. Let us not forget that a single share of qurban will turn back  to
us as thousands of prayers uttered for us. You can get detailed  information
from the mosque officials and offices of muftis.

    I would like to take this opportunity to pray to Allah (swt) that He may
allow us to reach the Eid al-Adha as healthy, tranquility,  and  happy.  May
Allah the  Almighty  (swt)  appreciate  our  worship  of  qurban  and  other
worships.
-----------------------
[i] Kawthar, 108/1-2
[ii] Tirmidhi, Adahi, 1.
[iii] Hajj, 22/37.
[iv] Hajj, 22/34.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
65;2017-03-17;"
LOCATION  : NATIONWIDE
 DATE             : 17.03.2017 [pic]

                    ÇANAKKALE: WHERE MARTYRS MADE HISTORY
  Honorable Believers!
  In the verse I have recited, the Almighty enjoins: ""Those  are  a  people
who have passed away. Theirs is that which they earned, and  yours  is  that
which you earn. And you will not be asked of what they used to do.""[i]

  Brothers and Sisters!
  In this verse, the Almighty Lord calls on us to learn from  the  past  in
building our future. Because what happened in history is  not  mere  memory.
History is our present and future as much as it is our past. History is  our
values that shed  light  on  our  future.  There  are  major  incidents  and
victories in history which must be passed on from generation  to  generation
and never be forgotten. One of the greatest ones in our nation's history  is
the one at Çanakkale.

  Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
  Çanakkale is the place where financial might fell to  its  knees  against
faith. Çanakkale is the place where our Lord's good tidings were  manifested
once again in which he says:  ?????  ????????  ?????  ??????????  ??????????
????????????? ???? ???????? ???????????  ""Do not weaken and do  not  grieve.
You will be superior if you are believers.""[ii]  Çanakkale  is  where  faith
clinched its victory over disbelieving, truth over falsity, the  right  over
the wrong. Çanakkale is where so many sons of this homeland  from  north  to
south, from east to west ran to martyrdom shoulder to shoulder for the  holy
cause. Çanakkale is where martyrdom became epic  and  a  nation  arose  with
Allah's love as described by our late Independence Poet Akif:
         How mighty you are that your blood saves oneness,
         Only the lions of Badr were as glorious as you.


  Honorable Believers!
  Çanakkale is an exceptional school that taught the contemporary world the
ethics and law  of  war.  Our  nation  taught  an  unforgettable  lesson  of
humanity against  shameless  attacks  at  its  very  existence.  Our  little
Mehmets who ran to the front with ""Allah Allah"" cries demonstrated  a  great
spirit by carrying wounded enemy soldiers on their  backs  and  giving  them
water from their own waterskins.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  Çanakkale is one of the best instances of uniting on  common  ideals  and
embracing the national and ummah awareness. It is a precious example of  the
fact that no value should be put over spiritual values.  Because  many  sons
of the homeland who spoke different languages, had  different  skin  colors,
and came from different regions sacrificed their live for  the  nation,  for
the homeland, for the truth, for  the  right  path,  for  justice,  and  for
virtue. They poured into Çanakkale from every house in Anatolia, from  every
region in Rumelia, from Damascus, from Baghdad, from  Cairo,  from  Tripoli,
from Skopje, from Kosovo, from Sarajevo, from Caucasia to crush  the  latest
attack of the Crusaders. And in the end, they did not let  the  dignity  and
honor of the nation be trampled. They did not let the hope of the  ummah  go
away. They did not let our present and future be captured by darkness.

  Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
  We will surely celebrate Çanakkale Victory as a nation today which  is  a
turning point for us. We will surely continue  to  talk  from  the  minbars,
from the stands about this tremendous accomplishment so uncommonly found  in
history. However, we cannot make do with merely commemorating Çanakkale  and
other victories. We cannot reduce  them  to  just  specific  ceremonies.  We
cannot boast about the accomplishment of  our  forefathers  and  do  nothing
else. Because the more important thing is to draw  big  lessons  from  these
accomplishments. To build our present and future in their light.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  Our real duty today is to properly comprehend the magnificent  spirit  of
Çanakkale. To pass that spirit on to future generations which has  not  died
despite numerous treacherous attempts from past to present. To  embrace  the
memories of our glorious  martyrs  who  are  buried  underground  but  still
alive. To tightly embrace the  supreme  values  for  which  they  sacrificed
their lives. Because even though we cannot see their bodies  or  hear  their
voice, this is what our martyrs want from us.

  Dear Brothers and Sisters!
  I would like to finish the khutbah with the following prayer to which  we
will sincerely say ""Amin"": O Allah! Give holy ranks to all our  martyrs  who
sacrificed their lives for Your cause and devoted  their  existence  to  our
existence, dignity, and honor! Grant us to be in company with them!

  O Allah! Grant us to be among those who keep alive the high spirit of our
martyrs! Grant us to protect their glorious legacy!  Grant  us  to  preserve
and embrace the values they died for! Save us from betraying  those  values,
o Allah!

-----------------------
[i] Al-Baqarah, 2/134, 141.
[ii] Ali 'Imran, 3/139.

                  Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services


"
66;2020-01-17;"
DATE: 17.01.2020
                                    [pic]
                TECHNOLOGY ADDICTION AND SOCIAL MEDIA ETHICS
    Honorable Muslims!
    Islam primarily aims  to  ensure  that  the  lives,  properties,  mental
health, dignity, and faith of human, created to be the most honorable  being
on earth, are protected. It regards these five values  inviolable.  It  does
not approve in any manner these values  being  undermined  for  any  reason.
Binding all  spheres  of  life,  this  fact  is  also  applicable  to  using
technology, and the Internet and social media.

    Dear Believers!
    What fits a Muslim is to use the technology properly as approved by  the
religion,  ethics,  and  common  sense.  To  consider  the  Internet  as   a
purposeless, useless and uncontrolled  medium  means  to  violate  the  five
fundamental values Islam wants protected. This is because the  inconsiderate
use of technology harms human life by exposing threat to  human  health  and
inflicts costly damage to property by  causing  financial  loss.  It  erodes
human  dignity  through  unethical  orientations  and  human  faith  through
radical and perverse  ideologies.  It  impairs  the  ability  to  think  and
comprehend, and challenges the mental faculties.

    Dear Muslims!
    People who produce technology using the reason  and  material  given  by
Allah (swt) are accountable to use it in good cause. By using technology  if
they go after gambling instead of halal  earning,  extravagance  instead  of
moderate spending, morally ill practices instead of  honorably  living,  and
violence instead of compassion, then greatly mistaken  are  they.  It  means
they spread sedition by their own hands, and put  their  future  in  danger.
Moreover, if they kill their time behind a television  or  computer  screen,
then they become accountable against themselves, their families,  and  Allah
(swt). It is unfortunate that the number of families living under  the  same
roof unaware of each  other  is  increasing  day  by  day.  The  technology,
expected to buy time by speeding up the  processes  for  human,  has  turned
into the most deceiving trap for waste  and  loss  of  time  today.  Prophet
Muhammad (saw), however, warned us as  follows,  ""There  are  two  blessings
that many people lose: Health and free time.""[i]

    Dear Believers!
    Occupying a great place in the  lives  of  everyone,  the  Internet  and
social media should be prevented from turning  into  an  area  uncontrolled,
unprincipled, and free of responsibility. What suits a Muslim is  to  always
act responsibly observing the boundaries set by Allah (swt), and  to  uphold
the truth and the right at all times. Let us not forget that just as in  the
offline life, it is haram to violate the rights and  privacy  of  people  on
the social media as well. Any  step  in  disrespect  of  privacy  of  people
contradicts the divine commandment of Allah (swt), ""Do not spy  or  backbite
each other.""[ii] Just as it is a sin to  tell  a  lie,  defame  people,  and
utter slanders at them in offline life, it is also a sin to  do  so  online.
Allah (swt) as the Lord of the Worlds watches us over online, too.  He  will
bring us to account for all our words and acts online, too. In the  verse  I
recited as I began the khutbah, Allah (swt) states, ""Do not pursue  that  of
which you have no knowledge. Indeed, the hearing, the sight and the heart  -
about all those one will be questioned.""[iii]

    Dear Muslims!
    Today it is not possible to live  in  a  way  completely  isolated  from
technology. In fact, Islam does not want such a thing  either.  However,  it
is the primary responsibility of all of us to use the  technology  as  aware
of halal-haram, paying attention to  protecting  moral  principles,  without
violating  human  rights  and  liberties.  That  way  we  might  have   more
productive time and more meaningful  efforts.  We  might  render  the  world
better and peaceful... As long as we use the technology in  accordance  with
the limits and boundaries set by Allah (swt) as in all His blessings.
-----------------------
[i] Bukhari, Riqaq, 1.
[ii] Hujurat, 49/12.
[iii] Isra, 17/36.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
67;2020-02-21;"
DATE: 21.02.2020

                                    [pic]
           TOWARDS THE SPIRITUAL CLIMATE OF THE THREE HOLY MONTHS
    Honorable Muslims!
    In the verse I have recited, Allah the Almighty states, ""And  hasten  to
forgiveness from your Lord and a garden as wide as the  heavens  and  earth,
prepared for the righteous.""[i]
    In the hadith I have read, the Prophet Muhammad teaches us the following
du'a: ""O Allah, You are Most Forgiving, and You  love  forgiveness,  and  so
forgive me.""[ii]
    Dear Believers!
    Over us is the shade of the three holy months that bring barakah to  our
life and peace to our soul through the countless  blessings  and  ikhsan  of
Allah the Almighty. We will  have  reached  the  month  of  Rajab  the  next
Tuesday. Next Thursday night turning to Friday,  we  will  be  enjoying  the
Raghaib, inshallah.

    Endless praise be to Allah the Almighty for allowing us to  reach  these
spiritual days, and salat  and  salam  be  upon  the  Prophet  Muhammad  for
teaching his ummah the worship and  obedience,  tawbah  and  istighfar,  and
du'a and supplication.

    Dear Muslims!
    The three holy months denote waking up from heedlessness  (ghaflat)  and
getting oneself purified through the awareness of servitude  to  Allah.  The
three holy months are among the rare times the coming of which we  long  for
every year. These are the months in which the divine mercy  and  forgiveness
embrace all creation and Muslims gravitate toward worshiping together.

    The first door opening to Allah the Almighty's endless blessings for His
servants is the month of Rajab. It is the sign of Muslims' iman and  seeking
refugee in Allah; and  their  loyalty  and  affection  to  Prophet  Muhammad
(saw).





    Dear Believers!
    Two holy nights in the month of Rajab come over in our hearts as guests.
One of them is the Raghaib night. Raghaib refers to our  efforts  to  direct
all our wishes and desires to obtaining the consent of  Allah.  The  Raghaib
night teaches us that our only true achievement  in  this  life  that  slips
away is to turn to Allah and keep our promise of servitude to Him.

    The other holy night in this month is the Mi'raj night  that  brings  to
mind the Masjid al-Aqsa as Prophet Muhammad's entrustment to his ummah.  The
Mi'raj  night  reminds  us  to  move  ourselves  from  material  desires  to
spiritual values and lifting ourselves up from what is temporary to what  is
eternal.

    Honorable Believers!
    After the month of Rajab welcomes us the month of Sha'ban  in  which  we
prepare ourselves spiritually and  physically  for  the  month  of  Ramadan.
Shining in the middle of the month of Sha'ban, the Bara'ah  night  makes  us
think that saving ourselves from sorrow and divine punishment and  attaining
forgiveness and peace lie in the servitude to Allah (swt).

    Ramadan, the beginning of which  denotes  mercy,  the  middle  of  which
forgiveness, and the end of which salvation from hell, is the  last  of  the
three holy months. Ramadan is the month of fasting, Qur'an, spending in  the
cause of Allah, zakat, purification, and contemplation. Towards the  end  of
Ramadan we celebrate the Laylat al-Qadr, which is better and more  bountiful
in divine blessings than a thousand months for those  who  know  its  value.
And finally, with the happiness of being  obedient  servants  of  Allah,  we
make it to the Eid al-Fitr.

    Dear Muslims!
    Let us regard the three holy months as an opportunity to be attached  to
Allah from heart, duly worship Him, and lead a life in accordance with  good
morals. Let us repent for our wrongs and sins. Let us quit  our  bad  habits
if we have any. Let us open a brand new page for  the  right,  truth,  good,
and nice. Let us carry joy and  happiness  to  sad  hearts.  Let  us  purify
ourselves from the feeling of ""I"" and get the feeling of ""we"". Let  us  thus
attain peace in this world and in the Hereafter.

    I would like to take this opportunity to pray to Allah  that  the  three
holy months and the Raghaib night may lead  to  good  developments  for  our
nation and the ummah of Prophet Muhammad. May Allah make Rajab  and  Sha'ban
blessed and allow us to reach Ramadan.
-----------------------
[i] Al-i 'Imran, 3/133.
[ii] Tirmidhi, Da'awat, 84.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
68;2017-05-12;"
  LOCATION   : NATIONWIDE
  DATE              : 12.05.2017

  [pic]EPITOME OF INSINCERITY: HYPOCRISY    A Blessed Friday to You,
  Brothers and Sisters!
  In today's khutbah, I would like to talk about a misdeed that  wipes  out
and sweeps away all the good deeds we have done. It is hypocrisy,  which  is
the epitome of insincerity that destroys all things  beautiful  and  cancels
all good deeds. Hypocrisy is a disease  that  damages  human  relations  and
mutual trusts as well as bringing down the reputation the individual.

  In a conversation with his companions, our Beloved Prophet (pbuh) pointed
out to hypocrisy as follows: ""The thing I fear the most about you  is  small
shirk,"" says Allah's Messenger. They ask, ""What's a small shirk,  o  Allah's
Messenger?"" Our Prophet answers: ""Hypocrisy is the  small  shirk.  As  Allah
repays everyone for their deed on the Day of Reckoning, He  will  tell  this
to hypocrites: 'Go to those to whom you were  hypocrites  in  earthly  life!
Behold! Will you see a reward or good deed near them?'""[i]

  Honorable Believers!
  The essence of the Sure Religion of Islam is sincerity  and  genuineness.
It's to make faith, worship, and obedience  exclusive  only  and  solely  to
Allah, the Lord of the worlds. It's to seek Allah's favor alone in  what  we
say and do. It's to be what we seem and seem what we are.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  Deeds lose meaning when they are stained with hypocrisy  and  desire  for
vanity. Deeds that lack sincerity and genuineness are fancy on  the  outside
but empty on the  inside.  Without  sincerity,  values  decrease  in  value.
Sincerity is extremely important in human relations, not only in  faith  and
worship. It is one of the best moral virtues for a believer  to  be  sincere
and genuine when among family and relatives,  in  relations  with  neighbors
and friends, in business life, and in short in every area of life. The  only
way to attain that virtue is to aspire Allah's favor in everything we do.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  If we commit hypocrisy, our prayer, which is our ascension, can't protect
us against evil. Such prayer is the type of prayer mentioned in  the  verse,
[pic] ""Woe to those who pray!"". Such prayer is the type of prayer  mentioned
in the verse, [pic] ""Who are heedless of prayer."" Such prayer  is  the  type
of prayer expressly described in the verse, [pic] ""They make show  of  their
deeds.""[ii]

  Honorable Believers!
  Our fasting cannot shield us against evil if we waste it  for  hypocrisy.
If we sacrifice animals with hypocrisy, it will not get us closer to  Allah.
If our sadaqa, alms, and good deeds are stained with  hypocrisy,  they  will
not be able to demonstrate our obedience to Allah.

  Our Prophet (pbuh) said that deeds stained with hypocrisy will  lead  one
to great  disappointment  on  the  Day  of  Reckoning.  If  one  gives  alms
thinking, ""They will think I am generous"", his own wealth will be his  fire.
If one obtains knowledge thinking ""They will think I am  wise,""  his  wisdom
will be his torment. In fact, if one becomes a martyr thinking,  ""They  will
think I am a hero,"" his martyrdom will not be  accepted.  Because  deeds  of
those who reduce their wish to pure vanity and  leave  Allah's  favor  aside
have no value by Allah.[iii]

  Brothers and Sisters!
  Image and vanity are dominating the world every passing day. Humanity  is
rapidly walking away from sincerity. Today,  pretentiousness  and  hypocrisy
are among the greatest dangers that damage our minds and  spirits,  threaten
our faith and deeds, and hurt our human relations and friendships. As we  go
through a test of sincerity and genuineness in this world as believers,  our
duty is to veer away from two-facedness, vanity, and selfishness.  Our  duty
is to aim for Allah's favor, His content in everything we say and  do.  It's
to be wary against the hypocrites who seek to exploit our  high  values  and
sincere feelings. To never give an opportunity  to  those  who  try  to  sow
seeds of discord, sedition, division among us by deluding us.

  Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
  I would like to finish my khutbah with a prayer from our Beloved Prophet:
""...O Allah, Possessor of glory and honor, the Lord of everything!  Make  us
sincere  to  You  at  every  moment  in  this  world  and   in   the   world
hereafter!""[iv]
-----------------------
[i] Al-Bayhaqi, ?uabü'l-îmân, V, 333.
[ii] Al-Ma'un, 107/4-6.
[iii] Muslim, ?mare, 152.
[iv] Abu Dawud, Vitr, 25.

      Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services


"
69;2018-05-01;"DATE :11.05.2018                                

FAMILY –  HOME OF JUSTICE AND BENEVOLENCE

Honorable Believers!

In the verse I have recited, Our Lord says, “And of His signs is that He created for you from yourselves mates that you may find tranquility in them; and He placed between you affection and mercy. Indeed in that are signs for a people who give thought.” 

And in the hadith I have recited, Our Prophet (s.a.w.) says, “The best of you is the one who is best to his/her family, and I am the best of you to my family.”  

Brothers and Sisters!

One of the most beautiful bounties of Our Lord is family. Family embraces us the moment we open our eyes to the world. It protects and cherishes us. Family is a precious home that Our Lord nourishes with His mercy, and beautifies by bestowing children and pure sustenance. Family denotes finding peace and deeply feeling the sense of security. Family is where the value of affection, joy and zest increases by sharing. Family is a hearth and home of education where fidelity is blended with altruism, faith with benevolence, knowledge with wisdom, and love with respect. Family is our most precious treasure, and indispensable wealth.

Honorable Believers!

Our Lord has created man and woman justly. In our religion, the purpose of creation is the same for man and woman. Both are valuable, and both have basic rights and inviolabilities. They are not different than each other in servitude and responsibility, in reward and punishment, in living their lives in chastity and honor. The goal, which Islam has put forward as the most favorable approach on family is the ethics of fairness and benevolence.  Each member of a family must base pleasing the other as the foundation of their behaviors, for families ruled by justice and benevolence are the homes of peace.

Honorable Believers!

Our supreme religion Islam has shown us the ways for the bliss and happiness of the family.  The best role model for us in terms of family life is the Prophet (s.a.w.). He ordains benevolence, goodness and fairness in family life, as it involves competing in goodness with benevolence. Benevolence is a noble value which sustains love in the family, inholding altruism and generosity. Benevolence is a favor made without expecting a reward in return and not pushing the receiver to be under obligation. Fairness in family is to observe mutual love and respect, to protect honor of individuals, to appreciate efforts of others, and to embrace a way of equity and moderation in rights and responsibilities. 

Dear Believers!

Mutual understanding must rule over families. Spouses must trust and show loyalty to each other. Delight, sadness, fatigue and troubles must be shared. Helping each other and solidarity is of the essence for family members. Each individual in the family must act responsibly. Decisions must be made in consultation with each other. Individuals in the family must think of the others more than themselves. Then the divine mercy will manifest itself, and fondness, love and attachment will become perpetual.

Parents must treat both each other and their children with justness and fairness without discrimination of gender. Because each parent is responsible for the directive in this hadith, “Be afraid of Allah, and be just to your children.” Therefore, parents must act in line with their responsibilities, and never neglect their children. This prophetic commination from our beloved Prophet must be heeded, “It is sufficient sin for a man that he neglects him whom he maintains.”  

Then, let us protect our families commended by Our Lord, and treat them with kid gloves. Let us remember that when the day comes, we will be accountable to Allah, owner of these trusts. Let us strive to strengthen the ethics of fairness and benevolence in every area of our family life. Let us come together with our parents, our spouses and our children, and appreciate the value of our family. Let us not forget that it is our primary duty to protect our families from all kinds of moral and material perils and threats. 

Dear Believers! 

I would like to remind you that this week is also the Disability Awareness Week. We all know that we have disabled brothers and sisters in many families. Handicaps can be overcome in happy and peaceful families. Handicaps, whether occurred congenitally or subsequently, are never obstacles to work, to produce and to succeed. The real handicap is to shun one’s mind, hands and tongue to affection and mercy.

Dear Believers! 

Inshallah, next Wednesday we will enter Ramadan – the holy month of mercy. Tuesday night, we will perform the first Tarawih prayer and wake up for Suhur. I pray to Allah that this holy month bring peace and tranquility to our families, our nation, our state, and all Islamic world."
70;2017-04-21;"
  LOCATION  : NATIONWIDE
  DATE             : 21.04.2017
  [pic]

THE BELIEVER TRUSTS OTHERS AND IS TRUSTED


  A Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters!
  In the verse I have recited at the beginning of my khutbah, the Almighty
enjoins: ""They who believe and do not mix their belief with injustice -
those will have security, and they are [rightly] guided.""[i]


  In the hadith I have recited, the Prophet (pbuh) says: ""He who breaches
one's trust will never have his faith reach perfection. He who does not
honor his word can never be pious in a perfect sense.""[ii]


  Brothers and Sisters!
  Our Lord created the universe from nothing and trusted the human beings
with the realm of existence for them to build a safe and peaceful life. The
verse I have recited declares two conditions for building a safe world. The
first one is faith. One cannot reach the right path without believing their
Allah and His Messenger and without being a believer. And one cannot attain
the truth in faith without protecting what's been entrusted to them and
being a reliable person. There is no faith without security, practicing
Islam would not be possible.

  The second condition for building a secure world is to never foul our
faith with injustice and shirk in any way. Embracing justice means not
condoning injustice. It means always keeping in mind that the Earth, life,
Allah's blessings, and every person around us are entrusted to us.


  Dear Brothers and Sisters!
  Safety is fed by faith, belief, and sincerity and it gets engraved in the
heart. We cannot secure our houses, bazaars, and schools without creating
safety in our hearts no matter how much external security measure we take.
We cannot protect the safety of our neighborhood, city, and country without
ensuring the security of our home in the heart.

  The believer firstly trusts his Lord and whenever he looks for a source
of unwavering security seeks shelter with his Creator who ""gives well-being
and grants security."" Then, thanks to that faith his own confidence
improves and he becomes an honest and merciful person who instills
confidence in those around him. Faith is trust. The believer is the one who
trusts others and is trusted. How can a person who does not trust his Lord,
book, and Prophet trust himself? If one does not trust himself, who trusts
him?


  Brothers and Sisters!
  All the prophets called the humankind to faith. They endured many
hardships and tough tests to make the world a safe home. Every prophet
experienced safety first in his own heart then in life.


   [pic] ""There is no deity except You; exalted are You. Indeed, I have
been of the wrongdoers,""[iii] cried Prophet Jonah (as) as he was safe in
the stomach of a fish in dark seas.

  Abraham the Friend of Allah attained peace and safety under Allah's
protection when he was thrown into the fire for tawhid. As he raised the
foundations of Kaaba with his son Ishmael, he first prayed for security
from his Lord saying, [pic] ""O Lord! Make this a secure city!""[iv]

  When Prophet Joseph (as) was thrown into a well by his brothers and his
dignity was defamed, he always had trust in his Lord. When his father Jacob
(as) and his mother came to visit him, he embraced them saying, [pic]
""Allah willing, enter Egypt safe and secure!""[v] And Prophet Moses grew up
in safety next to the Pharaoh with Allah's assistance and protection.


  Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
  Our Beloved Prophet, who spent his life facing hardships in the cause of
tawhid and spreading the word, sought Allah's security in the Cave of the
Bull during Hijrah. In the desolation of the cave, he instilled confidence
in his loyal friend Abu Baqr saying, [pic] ""Do not grieve! Indeed Allah is
with us.""[vi]


  He was Muhammad the Trustworthy trusted by friend and foe, near and far.
He was an honest, pure, modest person from whose hand, tongue, and heart
nobody was hurt.


  As believers, our duty is to take examples from the chain of prophets,
equip ourselves with the morality of our Beloved Prophet, and become the
trustworthy ummah of the trustworthy prophet. Remember that the key to
being reliable is protecting faith and what the Almighty has given us. But
when one breaches that trust, both peace and security go away. If you are
trustworthy, homes become safe. If you are trustworthy, cities become safe.
If you are trustworthy, countries become safe. The faith and trust in our
hearts are a warrant for the universe, nature, and world to be safe and
secure.


  Brothers and Sisters!
  Upon seeing the crescent which is an evidence of  Allah's  existence  and
might, Allah's Messenger (pbuh) prayed, ""O Allah! May  this  crescent  bring
abundance, faith, well-being, safety, and security upon us.""[vii]


  As we enjoy the gracious atmosphere of holy birth these  days,  our  Lord
has granted us to reach another blessed night. We will observe  Mi'raj  next
Sunday night. It is a blessed  night  that  witnessed  the  journey  of  our
Prophet that went from Masjid al-Haram to Masjid al-Aqsa and from  there  to
the heavens.


  On that note, I wish you a blessed  Mi'raj  Night.  I  wish  that  values
associated with Mi'raj may bring  good  to  the  entire  humankind  and  our
ascent and rise may gradually surround every  segment  of  society  starting
from our souls. I pray to the Almighty that Masjid  al-Aqsa,  Jerusalem  and
the surrounding region may once again be a place of safety and security  and
peace and well-being may take  the  place  of  terror,  violence,  war,  and
animosity which threaten the common peace of the humankind.

-----------------------
[i] Al-An'am, 6/82.
[ii] Ibn Hanbal, III, 134.
[iii] Al-Anbiya, 21/87.
[iv] Al-Baqarah, 2/126.
[v] Yusuf, 12/99.
[vi] At-Tawbah, 9/40.
[vii] Tirmidhi, Deavât, 50.

            Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
71;2017-06-09;"
  LOCATION  : GENERAL
  DATE             : 09.06.2017


                                    [pic]

                   LET'S LEARN QURAN IN THE MONTH OF QURAN
  A Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters!
  Our Beloved Prophet (pbuh) came to al-Mashid an-Nabawi with his  grandson
to lead the isha prayer for his companions. He  unusually  extended  one  of
the prostrations during prayer, so  much  so  that  the  companions  thought
something had happened to Allah's Messenger or  a  revelation  had  arrived.
When the prayer was finally over, the  distinguished  companions  asked  him
why he extended the prostration. The Messenger of  Mercy  answered:  ""It  is
not what you think. My  grandson  climbed  my  back  during  prostration.  I
waited for him to climb down so he would be happy  and  not  fall  and  hurt
himself.""[i]

  Honorable Believers!
  In the words of the Holy Book, our children are the light  of  our  eyes.
They are the joy of our heart. They are  the  adornment  for  earthly  life.
They are one of the most important things Allah entrusted to us. That's  why
we as believers call our dear kids to Islam with the first  azan  we  recite
into their ear. Every child who accepts this call by nature learns  from  us
how to love, believe, and trust. It  is  our  duty  to  nurture  their  soul
without hurting their creation. It is our duty to introduce  them  to  Allah
and the Prophet, give them  the  habit  of  worshipping,  and  instill  good
morals in them.

  Dear People in the Mosque!
  It must be the primary goal in life for all of  us  to  read,  accurately
understand, and duly experience the Holy Quran. Because Quran will guide  us
to salvation. This Great Book brings bliss in  both  worlds  to  people  who
believe in it and abide by it. ""Indeed, this Qur'an guides to that which  is
most suitable and gives good tidings  to  the  believers  who  do  righteous
deeds that they will have a great reward.""[ii]

  Dear Muslims!
  We must introduce our children to the basic values of Quran at  an  early
age so they may grow up under Quran's  guidance.  Because  their  souls  are
closer  than  everyone  to  Quran's  spiritual  table.  Their  young  minds,
innocent hearts are more open to our Book's message  than  everyone.  If  we
want to enlighten and make their life fruitful with Quran,  Ramadan  is  the
perfect time.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  A great opportunity is coming up for our  children  to  learn  about  our
Great Book, the exemplary life of our Prophet,  and  meet  the  mosque,  the
minbar, and the mihrap. Our summer Quran  courses  begin  on  June  12.  Our
mosques and courses will be populated once again by our children, the  light
of our eyes, with the call ""Let's Learn Quran in the Month  of  Quran.""  Let
us remember that teaching our Great Book to our children is both a  duty  as
parents and also the greatest inheritance  we  can  pass  on  to  them.  Our
Prophet (pbuh) stated this fact as such: ""No parent has passed  down  on  to
their kid something more valuable than good morals.""[iii]

  Dear Brothers and Sisters!
  Come! Let us introduce our children, a great blessing from Allah  to  us,
to the graceful messages of the Quran. Come! Let  us  equip  our  kids  with
wisdom, knowledge, and manners. Let us not leave them without Quran. Let  us
make their hearts, minds, and future thrive with Quran. Let us  use  Ramadan
as an opportunity to raise sincere Muslims who lead their  life  with  Quran
in their hands and faith in their hearts. Let us work to  raise  generations
that know Allah's Book, pattern themselves after Allah's Messenger, and  are
committed to their religion and nation  with  loyalty.  Let  us  reveal  the
Quran, which was revealed in this blessed month, first to  our  hearts  then
to the hearts of our children.

  I would like to finish my khutbah with the following prayers Allah taught
us in the Holy Quran:

  ""Our Lord! Grant unto us wives and offspring who will be the  comfort  of
our eyes, and give us the grace to lead the righteous.""[iv]

  ""My Lord, make me an establisher of prayer, and many from my descendants.
Our Lord, and accept my supplication.""[v]
-----------------------
[i] An-Nasai, Tatbik, 82.
[ii] Al-Isra, 17/9.
[iii] Tirmidhi, Birr, 33.
[iv] Al-Furqan, 25/74.
[v] Ibrahim, 14/40.

               Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
72;2017-10-06;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 06.10.2017



THOSE WHO FORGET ALLAH
WILL BE FORGOTTEN

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

Our Prophet (pbuh) took on a journey with his cousin Abdullah. On this journey, he said “My dear child! I’ll give you some advice. Do not forget them!” Then he gave this advice to this young companion about how he shouldn’t break his connection with the Lord: “Be mindful of Allah and He will protect you. Be mindful of Allah and you will find Him before you. When you ask, ask Allah, and when you seek aid, seek Allah's aid. Know that if the entire creation were to gather together to do something to benefit you- you would never get any benefit except that Allah had written for you. And if they were to gather to do something to harm you- you would never be harmed except that Allah had written for you.” 

Honorable Believers!

We are all human. Sometimes we forget our neighbors, our family and our friends in this busy life. Sometimes we forget our relatives, our brothers, the orphans and the needy. Sometimes we forget about ourselves, our society, and our responsibilities. But besides all this, the worst thing for a person is to forget the purpose and reason of his creation. The real defeat is leading a life where you forget your Lord; it is to disregard your oath of servitude, your agreement with Allah; it is to ignore the scale, the judgement and the afterlife, forgetting the fact that this world is mortal. Therefore our Lord warns us not to be among those who forget Him:  “And be not like those who forgot Allah, and He caused them to forget their ownselves.” Those are the Fasiqun (rebellious, disobedient to Allah).” 

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

Our Lord sent us the Quran to teach us our duties and responsibilities. Another name of our Holy Book is Dhikr Al-Hakim (reminder of wisdom). It is a book that reminds us the things we should not forget. It is a lamp, a guide that illuminates our path. Let us hold fast to it and open our hearts, our minds and our lives to it.

Our Lord enjoined: “You are only a one who reminds”  and sent a Prophet with the most beautiful character to the believers to show the true path and to remind Him to them. He blessed us with Muhammad Mustafa (pbuh.). He taught us what is right and true, wrong and false, good and bad. Let us live by his sunnah; do not stray from his exemplary life and bless our life with his messages of mercy.

Our prayers, sacrifice, pilgrimage, zakat, fasting, in short all of the rituals of worship are prescribed for us so that we could always remember our Lord. Let us not forget that our worship brings us closer to our Lord and makes us more honorable on the sight of Him.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Those who lead a life where they forget Allah will be forgotten by Him in this world and in the afterlife. Allah will deprive those who are ungrateful to Him in this world from His mercy in the great day. On the Day of Resurrection, where there is no sanctuary other than the mercy of Allah, those who became a slave to this world will hear this: “This Day We will forget you as you forgot the Meeting of this Day of yours. And your abode is the fire, and there is none to help you.” 

Brothers and Sisters!

Please come! Let us not forget our responsibilities to our Lord, our family and our society in this short life. Let us not forget that it is our duty to live in accordance with Allah’s will. Let's keep in our minds that the goal of our existence is to prepare for that great day. Let us not neglect our prayers as they are our expression of thanks to our Lord’s blessings. Let us live with the consciousness that in every moment He could see us, know about every one of our actions and hear every word coming out of our mouths. Let us not forget that eternal peace comes through a life that is lived on the path of Allah's will.

Brothers and Sisters!

I conclude this khutba with these prayers that our Lord taught us in the Quran:

“Our Lord! Condemn us not if we forget or fall into error!” 

“Our Lord! Let not our hearts deviate (from the truth) after You have guided us, and grant us mercy from You. Truly, You are the Bestower.” 

“Our Lord! Forgive us our sins, and remit from us our evil deeds, and make us die the death of the righteous! Our Lord! Grant us what You promised unto us through Your Messengers and disgrace us not on the Day of Resurrection, for You never break (Your) Promise.”"
73;2017-02-24;"LOCATION  : NATIONWIDE

DATE             : 24.02.2017



BEST DESCRIPTION OF REFUGE IN ALLAH: SURAH AL-MU'AWWIDHATAN

Honorable Believers!

The Almighty enjoins in the surahs Al-Falaq and An-Nas that I have recited at the beginning of my khutbah: “Say, ‘I seek refuge in the Lord of daybreak from the evil of that which He created and from the evil of darkness when it settles and from the evil of the blowers in knots and from the evil of an envier when he envies.’” 

“Say, ‘I seek refuge in the Lord of mankind, the Sovereign of mankind, the God of mankind from the evil of the retreating whisperer who whispers evil into the breasts of mankind from among the jinn and mankind.’” 

Brothers and Sisters!

The biggest danger for a person in the world is to forget the purpose of their creation. To veer away from the path. The greatest loss for a person is to lose themselves. To be a slave to desires. The biggest deprivation for a person is to deprive themselves of seeking shelter in the vast grace of Allah.

Our Almighty Lord sent us a Noble Book full of life that will protect us from the aforementioned dangers and save us from suffering losses and damages. He showed us the ways to be servants to Him in the best way. He taught us how to live under his shelter particularly in the two powerful surahs called Al-Falaq and An-Nas in our Holy Book. That’s why the Prophet (pbuh) recommended us to frequently recite these two surahs which he considered the best description of refuge in Allah. 

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Al-Falaq and An-Nas surahs are a concise description of our belief of oneness and our submission to Allah. They are the indication of our commitment to live by seeking His favor and protection. By reciting Al-Falaq and An-Nas, we seek refuge in Allah from all evil and from losing our path amid darkness. We seek His shelter from hatred, enmity, jealousy, hate, superstition, and delusion. We ask for His help against the evil of the malevolent, the evil-eyed, the stone-hearted, the unconscionable. We ask for His assistance and mercy against those who sow seeds of discord and sedition and who exploit thoughts and sentiments. We know that our Lord is the only shelter where we will feel safe.

Brothers and Sisters!

Al-Falaq and An-Nas always advise us a believer’s attitude, a conscious life. Because we must seek Allah’s refuge not only in times of difficulty and hardship but also in wealth, joy, and strength. Contemplating His power is our mind’s refuge. Sincerely seeking His mercy, forgiveness, and grace is our heart’s refuge. Putting His might into words as we like is our tongue’s refuge. And when the mind, the heart, and the tongue seek His shelter, the whole body must join them. Because what really makes us valuable in the eyes of our Lord is our good deeds.

Brothers and Sisters!

Al-Falaq and An-Nas teach us to be sagacious and heedful against those who want to exploit our faith, our sentiments, our desperation. They teach us to be servants to Allah alone and not to any mortal being. Because who else do we have other than our Lord who never abandons us even when everyone else does? Isn’t He the One who sees us even when nobody does, hearts us even when nobody does, and on whom we can always rely? Does He ever turn down the prayers, the heartfelt supplications? Does He ever deprive and aggrieve those who seek His shelter and knock on His door of grace? All we need to do is turn our hearts towards Him sincerely. Let our tongues dearly glorify Him and supplicate to Him. Let our hands turn to Him heartily and ask from Him alone.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

I would like to conclude my khutbah with the prayers of refuge our Prophet (pbuh) taught us:

 “We seek refuge in Allah’s exact words, His eternal will and judgement from all evil and malice and doers of evil.”

“O Allah! We seek refuge in You from the evil of our ears, the evil of our eyes, the evil of our tongues, the evil of our hearts, the evil of our desires.”

 “O Allah! We seek refuge in You from incapability, from laziness, from stinginess, from cowardice, and from the trials and tribulations of the grave.”"
74;2018-01-12;"
LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE
DATE  : 12.01.2018

            [pic]TO STAND BY THE TRUTH, AND AGAINST THE FALSEHOOD
    Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters!
    Our Prophet (pbuh) conquered Mecca with his army, the city where he  had
to leave ten years ago with the journey of hegira. The  Messenger  of  Allah
was born and grew up in this blessed city and he  was  longing  for  it.  He
looked at the city with longing eyes then  he  went  towards  the  House  of
Allah with enthusiasm and excitement. After  the  tawaf  (circumambulation),
he went in the Kaaba and cleared it and  its  surroundings  from  the  idols
after he recited this verse: [i] [pic] ""And say: truth  has  (now)  arrived,
and falsehood perished: for falsehood is (by its nature) bound  to  perish.""
[ii]

    Honorable Believers!
    One of the most beautiful names of  Allah  Almighty  is  ""Al-Haqq""  (The
Embodiment of Truth). Our Lord is the only source  and  sole  owner  of  the
truth and justice. He invited  people  to  know  the  truth  with  His  holy
prophets, from Adam to Muhammad Mustafa (pbuh.). The  battle  between  truth
and falsehood in human history started with the two sons of Adam, Habil  and
Qabil. While Habil stood by the truth with submission and  sincerity,  Qabil
choose falsehood with his greed and jealousy. To  the  end  of  days,  Habil
will be the leader of the good ones and the goodness, while  Qabil  will  be
known as the symbol of evil ones and evil with the murder he committed.

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    The truth is the faith of tawheed. It is the faith in and submission  to
Allah. It is being a servant only to Him.  The  falsehood  is  to  deny  the
existence and oneness of Allah and associate partners with  Him.  It  is  to
serve others than Him. It is to be a servant to desires and wants. It is  to
be blind and deaf towards His countless blessings.

    The truth is the life giving principles and the beauties of the manifest
religion that is Islam which makes us human and the world a place  to  live.
The falsehood is the beliefs  and  ideas  that  are  incompatible  with  our
supreme religion. It is the practices that wage war  on  Islam.  It  is  the
evil that harms the honor and dignity of the people.

    The truth is the Holy Quran, our guide to salvation, which distinguishes
between good and evil. It  is  the  irreplaceable  example  of  our  Prophet
(pbuh.). The falsehood is the behaviors that aim to  remove  our  Holy  Book
and the holy sunnah of our Prophet from the hearts and the minds.

    The path of the truth is the path of the prophets, martyrs, and good and
faithful believers. At the end of this  road  lays  a  paradise  of  eternal
blessings. The path of falsehood is  the  path  of  unbelievers,  condemned,
those who stray from righteousness, and the evil ones. The end of this  road
leads to hell that is home to doom and loss.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    While those who stay on the path of the truth become  the  hope  of  the
oppressed and the  downtrodden;  those  who  unite  in  falsehood  generally
become the voice of oppression and  the  oppressors.  While  those  who  set
their hearts to the truth  fight  for  high  values;  those  who  fell  into
falsehood hold interests and self-seeking above all.  While  the  lovers  of
the truth work in order  to  build  the  earth  and  make  it  livable;  the
servants of falsehood seek sedition, malice, lies,  slander,  and  mischief.
While those who stand by the  truth  strive  to  make  peace,  comfort,  and
justice prevail on earth; the followers of falsehood try to spill blood  and
tears, turn cities into ruins, and harm the minds and the hearts.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    Our Poet of Independence describes a heart that is a lover of  truth  in
these lines, and how meaningful they are:

    It cuts me to bone when I see a bleeding wound,
    I would get whipped to relieve it, or get kicked!
    I can't say ""Never mind, let it go"", I'll mind.
    I'll trample, get trampled, I'll raise the truth!

    So, brothers and sisters! Whatever the circumstances, let us continue to
stand by the truth and against the falsehood, let  us  continue  to  be  the
voice of the truth. Let us not abandon recommending one  another  the  truth
and patience. We must not forget that the help and mercy of Allah  is  going
to be with us as long as we keep serving  the  truth.  The  falsehood  could
never hurt us as long as we pick up and raise the truth.

    I want to conclude this khutba with this hadith of our Prophet:

    ""O Allah! All the Praises are for You; You are the Lord of  the  Heavens
and the Earth and whatever is therein. You are the Truth, and  Your  Promise
is the Truth, and Your Speech is the Truth, and meeting You  is  the  Truth,
and Paradise is the Truth and Hell (Fire) is the Truth and all the  prophets
are the Truth and The Final Hour is the Truth.

    O Allah! Please forgive my past and future sins and those sins  which  I
did in secret or in public. It is You Whom I worship. There is  no  God  but
You."" [iii]

-----------------------
[i] Al-Bukhari, Oppressions, 32; Sahih Muslim, Jihad and Expeditions, 87.
[ii] Al-Isra,17/81.
[iii] Al-Bukhari, Oneness, Uniqueness of Allah (Tawheed), 35.
                       Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services


"
75;2018-07-06;"
DATE : 06.07.2018
                                    [pic]
                 GOOD DEEDS THAT LEAD TO ALLAH'S COUNTENANCE
    Honorable Believers!
    One day, during a conversation with his  companions,  the  Messenger  of
Allah (s.a.w) asked, ""Who amongst you is fasting today?"". Abu Bakr  replied,
""I am."". Then, Our Prophet asked these questions, ""Who amongst you joined  a
brother's funeral today? Who amongst you  served  food  to  the  needy?  Who
amongst you has visited the sick today?""

    Abu Bakr al-Siddiq (r.a.) replied all these questions  affirmatively  by
saying, ""I did."" Thereupon, Our Prophet gave us the following good  news  in
the presence of his companions, ""Anyone  in  whom  (these  good  deeds)  are
combined will certainly enter paradise.""[i]

    Estimable Muslims!
    The reason for our creation is, first of all, to  be  cognizant  of  the
Lord Almighty properly, to be bond with Him at the  heart,  and  to  observe
what He commands and forbids. The purpose  of  our  being  is  to  establish
faith, good deeds,  goodness  and  good  morality  in  life,  which  can  be
achieved by faithfully complying with the Qur'an  and  the  Sunnah.  Because
the Qur'an and the Sunnah are the most sound,  the  most  reliable  and  the
most essential guides in our journey of life. At the end  of  this  journey,
there is the Paradise, as  a  grace  and  reward  from  our  Lord,  for  the
servants of Allah who attain His countenance.

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    The first step in the path of truth that will take us to the Paradise is
faith. Those who have faith in the  existence  and  oneness  of  Allah  will
reach the Paradise. Those who abide by the tenets  of  faith  at  the  heart
will gain eternal blessings. Our duty is to remain loyal to our  faith  till
the last breath, to keep our promise  of  servitude  to  our  Lord,  and  to
reflect our faith in our words and behaviors, and keep  it  alive  with  our
deeds. Hence, our Almighty Lord enjoins in the Holy  Qur'an,  ""Indeed,  they
who have believed  and  done  righteous  deeds  -  those  are  the  best  of
creatures. Their reward with Allah will be gardens  of  perpetual  residence
beneath which rivers flow, wherein they  will  abide  forever,  Allah  being
pleased with them and they with Him. That is  for  whoever  has  feared  his
Lord.""[ii]

    Brothers and Sisters!
    The second step on the way to the Paradise is good deeds.  There  is  no
limit to the good deeds, i.e. the good and beautiful manners  and  true  and
meaningful  moves,  which  we  hope  will  lead  us  to  attain  Our  Lord's
countenance. Each benevolent word uttered with the awareness  of  servitude,
each beautiful action worthy of being a human being, or each good  intention
that aims  to  attain  Allah's  content  are  good  deeds  as  long  as  the
countenance of Allah is not given up for other aims or expectations.

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Every act of worship is a good deed. However, our  worship,  which  will
take us to the Paradise, are the ones which also help  us  attain  beautiful
traits. Our prayer (salah) should protect us from sinning  and  evil  deeds.
Our fasting (sawm) should protect our tongue from bad words, and our  hands,
our minds and hearts from evils. Our  pilgrimage  (hajj)  should  strengthen
our submission and our awareness of the Ummah. Our Zakat, our charities  and
sacrifices should remind us of the fact that we should not be captivated  by
worldly possessions.

    Honorable Believers!
    The most effective way that makes faith perfect and takes a believer  to
the Paradise is good morality. Believers show affection  and  compassion  to
their parents, spouse, children, neighbors and relatives, and  every  living
thing. They do not hurt anybody with their actions or  words.  They  inspire
trust in their surroundings. They are as true as commanded by our  Lord  and
never deviate. They do not lie even when they know they will be  hurt.  They
keep their promises.  They do not waste their  lives  with  unnecessary  and
meaningless things. Those destined to  the  Paradise  observe  only  Allah's
countenance in every moment of their lives on every matter.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    At this time of Jumu'ah, let us question  ourselves  while  supplicating
for salvation and becoming of those  deserving  the  Paradise.  Let  us  ask
ourselves these questions: For what are we spending our lives, entrusted  to
us by our Lord? Will this path we follow take us to the  Paradise?  Or  will
it deviate us from the path to the Paradise? Are we building a  bridge  with
our living that will take us to the  Paradise?  Or  are  we  building  walls
between us and the Paradise? Do our words and behaviors have  sincerity?  Or
are we just wasting our deeds with hypocrisy and vanity?

    Dear Believers!
    I would like to conclude this khutbah with this hadith  of  our  Beloved
Prophet, ""If you warrant me on these six things, and I will warrant  you  on
the Paradise; Say the  truth  when  you  speak.  Keep  your  word  when  you
promise. Respect it when you are  entrusted  with  something.  Protect  your
chastity and dignity. Protect your eyes from haram. Do not extend your  hand
to evil things.""[iii]
-----------------------
[i] Muslim, Fadhail al-Sahaba (Merits of the Companions), 12.
[ii] Bayyinah, 98/7-8.
[iii] Ibn Hanbal, V, 323.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
76;2019-05-24;"
DATE: 24.05.2019
                                    [pic]
      ADDING BARAKAH TO OUR BROTHERHOOD WITH ZAKAT AND SADAQAH AL-FITR
    Honorable Believers!
    As required by our iman, we sincerely love  our  believer  brothers  and
sisters and have respect and affection for them. We support each other  just
like the organs of a body. Sometimes we ease the hearts of our brothers  and
sisters with a conversation, sometimes we help them with their problems.  We
provide financial assistance to the believers along with  standing  by  them
spiritually with our prayers. Because  our  source  of  honor,  the  supreme
religion Islam, commands us to be in solidarity. The  Almighty  Allah  (swt)
wants us to be  conscious  of  cooperation  under  favor  of  our  different
worships, primarily zakat and sadaqah al-fitr.

    Dear Muslims!
    Zakat is one of the five basic pillars on which the clear and  righteous
religion of Islam is built. It is a  fardh  (obligatory)  worship  which  is
strictly commanded by Allah (swt)  to  be  fulfilled.  It  is  an  essential
responsibility of the  people  who  are  considered  as  rich  according  to
religious criteria to share a certain part of their wealth with the ones  in
need once a year.

    Zakat is a financial worship and an expression of gratitude to Allah for
all the blessings He bestowed upon us. Zakat prevents  the  accumulation  of
wealth in a manner  useless  to  anybody.  It  establishes  love  and  trust
between the rich and the poor by reinforcing the  feelings  of  brotherhood.
It protects believers against  several  bad  traits,  particularly  such  as
stinginess and hunger for property. It purifies the  properties  and  hearts
of believers. It adds barakah to both the donor  and  donee's  lives.  Thus,
the Almighty Allah (swt) commands in the Holy Qur'an, ""Of their  goods  take
alms, that so thou mightest purify and sanctify them.""[i]  Accordingly,  the
Prophet Muhammad (saw) instructs us, ""Ask recovery  of  your  patients  from
Allah by giving sadaqah and protect your properties by giving zakat.""[ii]

    Honorable Muslims!
    The sadaqah al-fitr is a display of gratitude of being created honorable
as human, of reaching the month of Ramadan, the  most  profitable  times  of
our lives, and of finally reaching the Eid al-Fitr. Every Muslim  who  lives
until the end of the month of  Ramadan  should  give  a  certain  amount  of
donation to those  people  in  need,  for  himself  and  on  behalf  of  his
dependents before the Eid al-Fitr. Thus, they reach the end of  the  blessed
month of Ramadan, which invites  people  to  worship  day  and  night,  with
benevolence. The sadaqah al-fitr helps the people in need  to  get  prepared
for the Eid al-Fitr, and to share the peace and joy of the Eid with others.

    Honorable Believers!
    It is completely natural that people of different financial status  live
together in the society. Not turning this difference  into  a  huge  gap  is
only possible if the rich take  care  of  the  poor.  The  rich  who  cannot
understand that there is a share for the poor in their wealth  are  in  loss
unless they give this share to its owner. To neglect zakat and  sadaqah  al-
fitr is a major sin. Allah the Exalted (swt)  warns  the  believers  in  the
Holy Qur'an as follows, ""O ye who believe! Spend out of  (the  bounties)  we
have provided for you,  before  the  day  comes  when  no  bargaining  (will
avail), nor friendship nor intercession...""[iii]

    Dear Believers!
    Let us add barakah to our brotherhood by means of zakat and sadaqah  al-
fitr. As in every moment of our lives, let us be  pioneers  in  charity  and
goodness in this month of Ramadan  as  well.  Let  us  make  sure  that  our
sadaqah al-fitr is delivered to our brothers and sisters in need before  the
morning of the Eid. Let us not hurt and break hearts of anyone while  giving
our charities. Let us always remember that we will never be  able  to  reach
goodness unless we spend in the way  of  Allah  (swt)  out  of  our  beloved
things.

    Dear Muslims!
    The Presidency of Religious Affairs and Türkiye Diyanet Foundation  say,
""Let Our Brotherhood Get Barakah By Means  Of  Zakat"".  As  it  was  in  the
previous months of Ramadan, we are going to deliver donations  of  you,  our
benefactor nation, to the needy people both in homeland and abroad  in  this
month of Ramadan, too. You will make the orphans and  the  poor  smile  with
your food packages. You will help thousands of children to wear new  clothes
special for the Eid. You will lay iftar tables for immigrant  families.  You
will conduce to the needy people's, who are entrusted to us by Allah  (swt),
waking up happily and peacefully in  the  morning  of  the  Eid  within  our
country, the Muslim world and all over the world.

    I would like to  invite  you  to  be  a  part  of  the  mobilization  of
benevolence by applying to our province and district mufti's offices and  to
our representative offices of Türkiye Diyanet Foundation. May  the  Almighty
Allah (swt) accept all of our previous and future  aids.  I  would  like  to
conclude my khutbah with a verse, ""And be steadfast in  prayer  and  regular
in charity: and whatever good ye send forth for your souls  before  you,  ye
shall find it with Allah: for Allah sees well all that ye do.""[iv]
-----------------------
[i] Tawbah, 9/103.
[ii] Bayhaqi, al-Sunan al-Kubra, III, 542.
[iii] Baqarah, 2/254.
[iv] Baqarah, 2/110

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services


"
77;2017-06-30;"LOCATION        : GENERAL

	DATE : 30.06.2017



THE BOND ALLAH WANTS US TO MAINTAIN: FAMILY TIES

A Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters!

In the verse I have recited, Allah Almighty enjoins: “…Be careful of (your duty to) Allah, by Whom you demand one of another (your rights), and (to) the ties of relationship; surely Allah ever watches over you.” 

In the hadith I have recited, our Prophet (pbuh) says: “…Whoever believes in Allah and the Last Day should keep good relation with their kin…”

Venerable Muslims!

A companions one day told the Prophet: “O Allah’s Messenger! I try to keep in touch with my relatives, but they do not. I do them favors, they do me wrong. I treat them with kindness, they treat me rudely.” Then, the Messenger of Allah (pbuh) told the companion that Allah’s assistance was going to be with him as long as he kept treating his relatives nice no matter what. 

Honorable Believers!

Maintaining the bond of kinship is a crucial occasion to keep our ties with our family, our relatives, and our neighbors. It means taking care of relatives. Sharing their joy and grief. Being a safe harbor for one another. Coming to the rescue of our close ones when they are in difficulty. Taking their hand and lifting them up when they fall. Refreshing our mind and spirit, exhausted in the various ruckus of the world, with the compassion, mercy, and fondness of one another.

Brothers and Sisters!

It is a path to attain Allah’s grace to look after all our relatives, especially our parents. Allah enjoins in a hadith through His Messenger: “I am the Merciful. I have created ties of kinship and derived a name for it from My Name. If anyone maintains ties of kinship, I maintain connection with him, and I shall cut off anyone who cuts them off.” 

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

In this world, we are all away from home. And the feeling of homesickness gets easier with a helping hand we extend to each other. The joy of reunion reduces the hardship of being away from home. If we treat each other with kindness and affection in this world where we are homesick, Allah will treat us with His mercy on the Day of Reckoning. If we offer compassion, mercy, and sincerity to one another here, Allah will grant us with unending blessings of paradise in the hereafter which is our eternal home.

Brothers and Sisters!

Then come! Let us care about maintaining the ties of kinship which is one of the conditions of earning Allah’s favor. Let us please our parents, spouses, and children at all times. Let us keep in touch with our close/distant relatives and neighbors. Let us not abandon our close ones to the coldness of homesickness as they are all precious to us. Let us avoid building walls between our hearts without realizing amidst the hustle of life. Let us take these days we spend in the shadow of Ramadan and Eid as an opportunity to make distances closer to us.

Let us always remember that the real way of maintaining ties of kinship is being able to get in contact with someone who does not keep in touch with you. It is being able to call those who do not call you. Visiting those who do not visit you. Because real dignity is not doing favors to those who have done favors to us, it is doing favors to those who have not. 

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

May Allah Almighty grant us to be among those who recognize the importance of maintaining the ties of kinship and who abide by family ties."
78;2019-09-06;"
DATE: 06.09.2019
[pic]
                          THE MONTH OF MUHARRAM AND
                              THE DAY OF ASHURA
    Honorable Muslims!
    As the Almighty Allah (swt) states in the Holy Qur'an,  ""The  number  of
months in the sight of Allah is twelve.""[i] One of these months that we  are
currently in is the month of Muharram. It is an exceptional period  of  time
blessed by the mercy of Allah.The Prophet Muhammad  (saw)  referred  to  the
abundance of  spiritual  blessings  in  this  month  by  saying,  ""The  most
excellent fast after Ramadan is the fast in Allah's month al-Muharram.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    The month of Muharram holds a special  place  in  our  history  and  our
culture as well. The month of Muharram is the month  of  Ashura.  Ashura  is
one of the symbols of our  unity,  togetherness,  sharing,  and  solidarity.
Just as the ashura as a food brings together a variety  of  ingredients  and
creates a balanced flavor, our nation, as required by the ethics  of  living
together, has for centuries been sharing the joy and sorrow,  the  blessings
and hardships, and the affection and hard feelings.

    Dear Muslims!
    The month of Muharram is also the month in which the Battle  of  Karbala
took place, which is our shared sorrow and the heart wound of  our  history.
Over 70 Muslims, the majority of whom were from Ahl al-Bayt,  including  the
Prophet  Muhammad's  (saw)  grandson  Hussein,  were  martyred  in  Karbala.
Karbala is the name of a challenging test and a deep sorrow.  Karbala  is  a
heavy experience bequeathed by the Prophet Muhammad's (saw)  family  members
for centuries to come. Muslims whose hearts burn and heave  a  painful  sigh
today at the  mention  of  Karbala  and  Hussein  should  contemplate  about
Karbala, understand it correctly, and draw lessons from it.

    Dear Believers!
    In order to understand Karbala, one  needs  to  be  knowledgeable  about
Hussein. Hussein was  an  honorable  believer  following  the  path  of  his
grandfather Muhammad Mustafa (saw), the Last of  the  Prophets  (Khatam  al-
Nabiyyin). He  was  a  graceful  Muslim  who  stood  against  injustice  and
oppression, and set his heart on  upholding  the  truth,  justice,  loyalty,
fidelity, and righteousness. To love him requires defending  the  values  he
sacrificed his life for. For he is a sublime example of  an  honorable  life
and a noble stance for all generations and centuries to come. It is  a  duty
upon us to embrace his faith and morals, and, at  the  same  time,  to  pass
down his personality traits of  bravery  and  self-sacrifice  to  our  young
people.

    Dear Muslims!
    The greatest message of the month of Muharram for us Muslims is to  hold
on to our unity and  peace,  and  to  never  make  any  concessions  on  our
brotherhood. The Almighty Allah (swt) warns us in the Holy Qur'an,  ""Be  not
like those who are divided amongst themselves  and  fall  into  disputations
after  receiving  Clear  Signs.  For  them  is  a  dreadful   penalty.""[iii]
Similarly, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) says, ""Do not  hate  one  another.  Do
not be jealous of  one  another,  and  do  not  desert  each  other.  O  the
worshippers of Allah! Be brothers.""[iv]

    Dear Muslims!
    Let us unite our hearts of the same faith, the same pain, and  the  same
longing, in order not to let new incidents of Karbala  take  place.  Let  us
spare rooms in our hearts for each  other,  and  embellish  our  lives  with
affection. Let us deal with our shared  sorrows  and  problems  in  need  of
solution  through  discernment,  prudence,  sense  of  responsibility,   and
sensitivity. Let us lock together around the  sacred  values  that  make  us
""us"". Let us make Hussein's nobility and good morals our distinctive marks.

    I would like to take this opportunity to  commemorate,  wishing  Allah's
mercy upon and with heartfelt gratitude for, Hussein the leader of  martyrs,
in particular, and all our  martyrs  who  sacrificed  their  lives  for  the
truth, freedom and independence, dignity and sacred values, from Karbala  to
today.

    As I conclude the khutbah, I would like to point out another  point.  As
you know, the new school year is just around the corner.  The  next  Monday,
schools will open insha'allah. I would like  to  take  this  opportunity  to
pray Allah the Almighty (swt) that the new school  year  may  lead  to  good
developments for our children who are our  hope  for  the  future,  for  all
students at any academic level, and for our dear  teachers  and  parents  of
our students. May  Allah  (swt)  allow  our  children  to  have  a  healthy,
peaceful, and successful school year, and enable them  to  equip  themselves
with knowledge, skills, and experience that they can use for the benefit  of
our country, nation, and for all humanity.
-----------------------
[i] Tawbah, 9/36.
[ii] Muslim, Siyam, 202.
[iii] Al-i 'Imran, 3/105.
[iv] Bukhari, Adab, 57

              General Directorate of Religious Services

"
79;2019-03-01;"
DATE: 01.03.2019
[pic]
    THE THREE SACRED MONTHS: THE SEASON OF BLESSINGS
    Honorable Muslims!
    The beginning of the  three  sacred  months,  which  is  the  season  of
compassion and mercy, is just around the corner. Thanks  and  praise  be  to
Allah for allowing us to make it to these blessed days. Peace and  greetings
be to the Prophet Muhammad (saw) who was sent as mercy to the worlds.

    The Night of Raghaib marks the beginning of  the  three  sacred  months,
which are Rajab, Sha'ban, and Ramadan. Along  the  way  come  the  Night  of
Miraj and Bara'ah, and the peak is reached through the Night of Qadr,  which
is more blessed than a thousand months.  Finally,  the  Eid  al-Fitr,  which
cements  our  unity  and  togetherness  and  increases  our   fondness   and
compassion, crowns the three sacred months. The season of the  three  sacred
months is the long-awaited sacred guest at the home of our hearts.  In  this
respect, The Messenger of Allah used to  welcome  the  three  sacred  months
with the following prayers: ""O Allah! Bless the months of Rajab  and  Shaban
for us, and allow us to reach the month of Ramadan.""[i]

    Dear Believers!
    The season of the three sacred months is when the divine  compassion  is
felt all around and the hearts are filled with  spiritual  peacefulness  and
serenity. It is on these blessed occasions that we account for the deeds  we
do in life and make sense of  the  purpose  of  creation.  We  turn  towards
servitude to Allah, worshipping, doing charitable works and good deeds  more
than ever, as well as render the world of our hearts prosperous. We  get  to
remember all the duties and responsibilities that we keep neglecting in  the
rush of life.

    Dear Muslims!
    Next week Thursday night is the Night of Raghaib,  full  of  virtue  and
blessings. Raghaib means 'the longed for, the demanded for, and  the  valued
for'. The Night of Raghaib is the herald of the three sacred months and  the
news-bringer of Ramadan, the month of  the  Qur'an.  The  Night  of  Raghaib
reminds us that the true gain in this  life  that  flows  away  is  to  turn
towards Allah and keep our promise of servitude to Him.

    Honorable Believers!
    Allah the Almighty says in the verse I have recited at the beginning  of
the khutbah, ""O you who have believed, fear Allah. And let every  soul  look
to what it has put forth for tomorrow - and fear  Allah.  Indeed,  Allah  is
Acquainted with what you do.""[ii] According to this  divine  appeal,  we  as
Muslims should look for opportunities to do good deeds  more  than  ever  in
these three sacred months full of compassion and mercy. There are many  ways
to do good deeds. Sometimes it can be to show the direction for someone  who
lost their ways. Some other times it  is  to  rid  of  an  obstacle  causing
inconvenience for people. Still other times it is to help  those  people  in
need and give charity (infaq) to them. Infaq does not always have  to  be  a
good deed done by way  of  giving  out  an  amount  of  money.  The  Prophet
Muhammad (saw) pointed out to several ways  of  infaq,  with  his  following
saying, ""Enjoining all that is good is a Sadaqa.""[iii] It is also a kind  of
infaq to provide a cure or remedy for a patient's illness. What a noble  act
it is to be a beam of hope for patients through organ-,  bone  marrow-,  and
blood stem cell-donation  without  expecting  anything  worldly  in  return!
These kinds of acts as required of our religious and human  responsibilities
are no doubt among those deeds to help us get the approval of Allah in  this
atmosphere of blessings and mercy of  the  three  sacred  months.  As  Allah
clearly states in the Holy Qur'an, ""...whoever saves one (soul) - it  is  as
if he had saved mankind entirely...""[iv]

    Dear Muslims!
    The season of the  three  sacred  months  is  a  door  opening  to  many
opportunities  for  us.  We  should  turn  such   days   and   nights   into
opportunities to get Allah's approval, on  condition  that  our  efforts  in
this regard do not discontinue once they are past. Our 'raghaib'  should  be
for the Almighty Allah for life long.

    As I conclude, I would like to congratulate you all  for  the  Night  of
Raghaib,  and  pray  Allah  that  the  climate  of  compassion,  mercy,  and
blessedness of the three sacred months contribute to the  salvation,  peace,
and serenity of humanity.
-----------------------
[i] Tabarani, Al-Mu'jam Al-Awsat, IV, 189; Ahmad ibn Hanbal, Musnad, 1,
259.
[ii] Hashr, 59/18.
[iii] Bukhari, Adab, 33.
4 Ma'idah, 5/32.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services


"
80;2018-07-27;"
TAR?H : 27.07.2018
                                                                       [pic]

                  THE RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN FAITH AND DEEDS
    Honorable Believers!
    One day when the Messenger of Allah (s.a.w.) was riding  his  camel,  he
called out to Mu'adh bin Jabal who  was  sitting  behind  him,  ""O  Mu'adh!""
Mu'adh replied, ""Your word is my order,  o  the  Messenger  of  Allah!""  Our
Prophet repeated, ""O Mu'adh!"" Mu'adh answered for  the  second  time,  ""Your
word is my order, o the Messenger of Allah!"" This repeated for a third  time
and the Messenger of Allah said, ""There  is  none  who  testifies  sincerely
that none has the right to be worshipped  but  Allah  (s.w.t)  and  Muhammad
(s.a.w.) is his Messenger, except that Allah (s.w.t),  will  save  him  from
the Hell-fire.""[i]

    Dear Muslims!
    On top of the most important blessings bestowed  upon  us  by  the  Lord
Almighty (s.w.t.) comes the faith. Faith stands for believing  sincerely  in
the existence and unity of Allah, His Angels, His Books, His  Prophets,  the
Day of Judgment, and the Qada and Qadar (the Predestination and  the  belief
that  all  things,  good  or  bad,  come  from  Allah  (s.w.t.).  It  is  to
acknowledge sincerely and profess all truths conveyed to us by  the  Prophet
of Mercy (s.a.w.). It is to be submitted to Allah (s.w.t.) with loyalty  and
devotion.

    Venerable Believers!
    Every human is born on al-Fitra (the Islamic disposition).  Fitra  means
that every person has an essence of creation that is inclined to  faith  and
goodness. Those who choose faith, Islam and beneficence (ihsan) are  blessed
with unending blessings. Allah (s.w.t.) is always with  believers  who  have
complete faith and trust in Him. Allah (s.w.t.)  protects  and  helps  them,
and never leaves them alone.

    Faith adds meaning to people's life, gives them an awareness  of  living
in accordance with the purpose of creation, shapes their behaviors,  directs
their ideas and decisions. Faith makes people strong, patient  and  enduring
against  the  hardships  of  life.  Faith  removes  solitude,  weakness  and
hopelessness. Faith helps  people  be  fully  aware  and  grateful  for  the
blessings.

    Dear Believers!
    Faith in Allah (s.w.t.) requires us to live according to  our  Prophet's
sunnah in all aspects of our lives. Defining a believer as ""one  from  whose
tongue and hand the people are safe""[ii], the Messenger  of  Allah  (s.a.w.)
mentions doing beautiful deeds, keeping promises made,  not  betraying  what
is entrusted, treating well the guests, and speaking  of  the  good  as  the
manifestations of faith. When a companion asked him (s.a.w.)  to  ""tell  him
something about Islam that later he never has  to  ask  anybody  else  about
it"", he (s.a.w.) replied, ""Say I affirm my faith in Allah (s.w.t.),  and  be
steadfast.""[iii]

    My Brothers and Sisters!
    What keeps our faith alive is our good deeds, what  makes  it  to  reach
maturity is good morals. Our Lord (s.w.t.) heralded  this  to  everyone  who
believes and  does  right,  good  and  beautiful  deeds  in  line  with  His
approval: ""Whoever does righteousness, whether male or female, while  he  is
a believer - We will surely cause him to live  a  good  life,  and  We  will
surely give them their reward [in the Hereafter] according to  the  best  of
what they used to do.""[iv] Our Beloved Prophet (s.a.w.)  remarked  that  the
connection between faith and good morals is indispensable as  follows:  ""The
most complete of the believers in faith is the one with the  best  character
among them.""[v]

    Honorable Believers!
    Faith and good deeds are the most valuable wealth we have that will help
us attain the mercy of Allah in the Afterlife. It is expressed in  the  Holy
Qur'an, ""Indeed, those who  have  said,  ""Our  Lord  is  Allah  ""  and  then
remained on a right course - the angels will descend  upon  them,  [saying],
""Do not fear and do not grieve but receive good tidings of  Paradise,  which
you were promised.""[vi]

    Every believer who reflects their faith on their life  with  good  deeds
and good morals is an addressee for the good tidings of  Allah  (s.w.t.)  as
long as they turn towards Allah sincerely and say [pic] ""Sufficient  for  us
is Allah,  and  [He  is]  the  best  Disposer  of  affairs.""[vii]  in  every
situation.

    Venerable Believers!
    Faith is a whole. Declining to believe even one of the  fundamentals  of
faith means to be faithless, which is a  great  catastrophe,  because  being
faithless distances a human from the purpose of  creation  and  leads  to  a
meaningless life. It damages the feeling  to  be  self-sacrificing  for  the
noble ideals. Those who do not believe in the  Power  of  Allah,  the  guide
sent and the truth  promised  by  that  Power,  and  the  existence  of  the
unending life cannot find peace and happiness.  They  will  be  deprived  of
Allah's (s.w.t.) mercy and help in the Afterlife.

    Brothers and sisters!
    Let us know the value of our faith. Let us have the kind of  true  faith
that glorifies  our  souls,  reinforces  our  servitude  to  Allah  (s.w.t),
protects us from being a slave to our nafs-driven desires, build our  future
just as our present day. Let our faith prosper our world and our afterlife.

    I finish my khutbah with the prayer of our Beloved Prophet (s.a.w.),  ""O
Allah! Make us love faith, adorn  our  hearths  with  faith!  Stop  us  from
loving blasphemy, disobedience and rebellion, make them seem vile!  Make  us
be among the ones on the right path!""[viii]
-----------------------
[i] Bukhari, 'Ilm, 49
[ii] Nasa'i, Iman, 8
[iii] Muslim, Iman, 62
[iv] Nahl, 16:97
[v] Tirmidhi, Rada, 11
[vi] Fussilat, 41:30
[vii] Al-i Imran 3/173
[viii] Ibn Hanbal, III, 424
                        Issued by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
81;2018-09-07;"
DATE: 07.09.2018
                                    [pic]
                                 THE HIJRAH
    Jumu'ah Mubarak Beloved Brothers and Sisters!
    With the grace and beneficence of Allah  the  Almighty  (swt),  we  will
attain the first day of the month of Muharram  next  Tuesday,  and  we  will
start the 1440th year after the Hijrah. I pray to our  Almighty  Lord  (swt)
that this beginning, which is the  anniversary  of  the  the  Hijrah,  bring
goodness to our nation and the Islamic world.

    Esteemed Believers!
    The polytheists, who did not accept the prophethood of our Prophet,  the
Pride of the Universe (saw), did all kinds of  persecution,  repression  and
torture to him and the believers. When it  became  impossible  for  them  to
live in Mecca, Allah the Exalted  (swt)  permitted  them  to  migrate  to  a
peaceful city, i.e.  Madinah,  where  they  would  be  able  to  live  their
religion freely and perform their worships easily. A group of the  believers
had departed first, and then our Prophet (saw) with His faithful friend  Abu
Bakr (ra) migrated to Madinah.

    Honorable Muslims!
    This noble journey of the Islamic history is not an  ordinary  migration
only, but a symbol of search for opportunity for the right and the truth  to
dominate the earth. Hijrah is the indicator of  belief  in  Allah,  loyalty,
submission, patience, and perseverance to Him (swt). Hijrah is  the  meeting
of the devout Muhajirun (immigrants), who gave up everything they  possessed
for the countenance of Allah and for the serenity and  peace  of  humankind,
with the generous Ansar (helpers) who received them with open arms.

    In the Holy Qur'an, the Muhajirun and the  Ansar,  who  became  brothers
through this troublesome and blessed journey, are heralded as follows:  ""And
the first forerunners [in the faith] among the Muhajirun and the  Ansar  and
those who followed them with good conduct - Allah is pleased with  them  and
they are pleased with Him...""[i]

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    The Hijrah is not an incident that took place and came to an end in  the
Asr al-Saadah (the Age of Bliss). Today, too, many  Muslims  have  to  leave
their homes and homelands in tears and hit the roads,  seeking  asylum  with
people who would become  Ansar  for  them  as  the  representatives  of  the
goodness. What falls upon us in this regard is that  we  endeavor  to  stand
against and stop oppression and injustice, remembering again  this  fact  on
the anniversary of the Hijrah.

    Hijrah also means leaving behind any kind of badness, staying away  from
evil, and taking steps  towards  goodness  and  benevolence.  The  spiritual
aspect of Hijrah is, in fact, expressed with  the  following  words  of  our
beloved Prophet (saw): "" A Muslim is the one from  whose  tongue  and  hands
the Muslims are safe; and a Muhajir is the one who refrains from what  Allah
has forbidden.""[ii]

    Esteemed Believers!
    In the essence of Hijrah lie sincerity and good intention.  Devotion  to
Allah (swt) and affection for the Prophet (saw) make up  the  yeast  of  it.
Believers become Muhajir when they hold on  to  life  with  faith  and  hope
despite the sorrowful days they have  experienced.  The  Muhajir  comprehend
the meaning of Hijrah when they turn their back on  haram  and  meticulously
follow halal.

    Honorable Muslims!
    As the new Hijri year is around the corner, we as Muslims should  better
hold ourselves to account for the year  we  are  leaving  behind  soon,  and
shape our future plans accordingly. Our Hijrah should be  from  disobedience
to obedience, sin to repentance, arrogance to humility,  discord  to  unity,
enmity to brotherhood, ignorance to knowledge, and from evil to good.

    Come! In this blessed hour of the Jumu'ah prayer while  remembering  the
Hijrah, let us become Ansar for our Muhajir brothers and sisters who had  to
leave their homes and homelands in an effort to escape from  the  oppression
of the oppressors. Let us once again  set  our  intention  to  flourish  the
journey of our life with perfect faith, good deeds, and good  morality.  Let
us direct our route, road, and Hijrah towards Allah (swt)  and  the  Prophet
(saw).
-----------------------
[i] Tawbah, 9/100.
[ii] Bukhari, Iman, 4.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
82;2019-04-26;"
DATE: 26.04.2019
                                    [pic]
                        THE BARAKAH OF BUSINESS LIFE:
                                 WORK ETHICS
    Dear Muslims!
    Humans pursue their rizq (sustenance) in order  to  ensure  the  nafaqah
(maintenance) of their own and their dependents. With this aim, each  person
works in jobs in compliance with the sunnatullah  imposed  by  the  Almighty
Allah (swt). Some people  work  as  employees,  others  as  employers,  some
others as public servants, and still others as supervisors.  There  is  much
wisdom underlying this  obligatory  division  of  labor  in  life.  In  this
regard, the Almighty Allah (swt) states, ""Is it they who would  portion  out
the Mercy of thy  Lord?  It  is  We  who  portion  out  between  them  their
livelihood in the life of this world: and We raise some of them above  other
ranks, so that some may command work from others. But the Mercy of thy  Lord
is better than the (wealth) which they amass.""[i]

    Honorable Believers!
    All people are equal like the teeth  of  a  comb,  regardless  of  their
financial status, authority or duty. No one is  privileged  or  superior  to
the other in terms of being  servants  of  Allah.  The  superior-subordinate
relationship in business life does not give a specific rank  to  the  humans
before Allah the Exalted (swt). What makes a person worthy in  the  presence
of Allah (swt) is nothing but his iman, worship, morals, and taqwa  (piety).
The Prophet Muhammad (saw) warns us, ""Allah does not look  at  your  outward
appearance and your wealth but  He  looks  only  at  your  hearts  and  your
deeds.""[ii]

    Dear Muslims!
    It is a great favor to provide a job for somebody  and  help  them  earn
their rizq in a halal way and maintain  their  family.  However,  this  also
brings   along   mutual   rights   and    responsibilities.    When    these
responsibilities are complied with and  mutual  rights  are  protected,  the
people are going to gain the consent of  Allah  (swt)  and  the  society  is
going to live in peace and prosperity.

    The Messenger of Allah (saw) qualifies the relation between workers  and
employers, and supervisors and public servants  as  ""brotherhood  relation"".
Love and respect, compassion and mercy, and solidarity and  cooperation  are
essential elements in the relationship between brothers.

    Employers who heed the warnings of the Messenger of Allah (saw)  observe
the rights of their employees. They provide them  with  a  peaceful  working
environment. They offer them opportunities necessary for  their  needs  such
as worship and rest. They pay the amount they deserve on time. They  do  not
task them with duties that they cannot perform. They do not  endanger  their
health and life. They take all necessary measures for  occupational  safety.
They see their employees as a  trust  and  act  by  knowing  that  they  are
accountable to Allah (swt) for them. They establish a  brotherly,  merciful,
warm, and sincere relation with their employees. They do not  deprive  their
employees of their social rights nor victimize them, or employ  unregistered
workers.

    Honorable Believers!
    Business life also lays some responsibilities on employees. Muslims work
properly in accordance with the advice of the Prophet Muhammad  (saw).  They
protect their workplace, its properties, and materials as their  own  goods.
They do not utilize the facilities of  the  workplace  to  satisfy  personal
needs. They know that when they do not deliver  an  efficient  and  a  high-
quality job this will result in undeserved earning.

    Anyone who works for the public service should also see it as  entrusted
to them by our nation. They should never forget  that  just  as  every  good
deed has its rewards, every negligence and mistake will cause the  violation
of the rights of individuals and the public.

    Dear Muslims!
    The Almighty Allah (swt) states in the  Holy  Qur'an,  ""It  was  We  who
created man, and We know what dark suggestions his soul makes  to  him:  for
We are nearer to him than (his) jugular vein. Behold, two (guardian  angels)
appointed to learn (his doings) learn (and note them), one  sitting  on  the
right and one on the left.""[iii]

    In accordance with this warning of Allah (swt), we need the awareness of
servitude in our business life as well as in every area of  our  lives.  Let
us all work to  produce  and  earn  in  halal  way.  As  handicraftsmen  and
craftsmen, let  us  not  only  teach  the  profession  to  our  apprentices,
journeymen, and masters. Let us teach them  virtue,  honesty,  loyalty,  and
the value of elbow grease and halal  earnings  at  the  same  time.  Let  us
promote modesty and good morals. Thus,  let  us  hand  the  business  ethics
based on Islamic brotherhood and prophetic wisdom down to our generations.

    I would like to conclude my khutbah with this hadith qudsi,  ""Allah  the
Exalted (swt) states, 'There are three whose adversary I  shall  be  on  the
Day of Resurrection: a man who has given his word by Me and has  broken  it;
a man who has sold a free man and has consumed the price; and a man who  has
hired a workman, has exacted his due in full from him but has not given  him
his wage.'""[iv]
-----------------------
[i] Zukhruf, 43/32.
[ii] Muslim, Birr, 34.
[iii] Qaf, 50/16-17.
[iv] Bukhari, Ijarah, 10.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services


"
83;2019-03-29;"
DATE: 29.03.2019
[pic]
    LAILAT AL-MI'RAJ
    Dear Muslims!
    As observed in all periods of history, the  polytheists  of  Mecca  also
knew no bounds in torture and oppression. They applied social  and  economic
boycott against Muslims  in  order  to  prevent  the  invitation  to  Islam.
Shortly after the boycott ended, the Prophet Muhammad (saw)  lost  both  his
uncle Abu Talib who had protected him and his beloved spouse and our  mother
Khadijah who had been his supporter during troublesome days.  Thinking  that
our Prophet  Muhammad  (saw)  became  unprotected  with  their  demise,  the
polytheists increased the oppression and torment which they deemed he  (saw)
deserved. Looking for a remedy, the Messenger of Allah (saw) went  to  Ta`if
in order to convey the message of Islam. However he was exposed  to  insults
there as well. Moreover, he was lapidated and his blessed feet  drenched  in
blood.  During such a period when he (saw) was in need of  consolation,  the
Almighty Allah (swt) guarded his Beloved one and  granted  al-Isra  and  the
miracle of Mi'raj to him (saw).

    Honorable Believers!
    Allah the Almighty (swt) states in the  verse  I  have  recited  at  the
beginning: ""Exalted is He who took His Servant by night from  al-Masjid  al-
Haram to al-Masjid al-Aqsa, whose surroundings We have blessed, to show  him
of Our signs. Indeed, He is the Hearing, the Seeing.""[i]

    Al-Isra is the night journey of our beloved Prophet (saw) from Masjid al-
Haram in Mecca to Masjid al-Aqsa in al-Quds. Lailat al-Mi'raj  is  the  name
of the acceptance to the highest level from Masjid al-Aqsa.

    Dear Muslims!
    The Messenger of Allah (saw) returned from Lailat al-Mi'raj  with  three
great gifts to his Ummah.[ii]  First  of  these  gifts  is  the  five  daily
prayers (salat), which is called by  the  Prophet  Muhammad  (saw)  as  ""the
light of my eye""[iii]. Prayer is the manifestation  of  the  powerful  faith
link between Allah (swt) and the servants. It is the spiritual rise  of  the
believer who turns toward the qiblah and  prostrates  before  Allah.  Prayer
does not consist of certain  gestures  and  moves  only.  Rather,  it  is  a
worship surrounding human both in physical,  mental  and  moral  aspects.  A
person who performs prayer is the one who is expected to  have  good  ethics
and to be honest, modest, compassionate, and just.  Therefore,  Allah  (swt)
states, ""Indeed, prayer prohibits immorality and wrongdoing.""[iv]

    Another gift of al-Mi'raj is the last two verses  of  Surah  al-Baqarah,
which we know as ""Amanar Rasul"" and read after the 'isha prayer  every  day.
These Qur'anic verses remind us the principals of  faith,  consciousness  of
servitude and the sense of responsibility. These verses state that  we  will
give account for whatever we do in this world, and teach us how to pray  and
invoke Allah.

    The last gift of al-Mi'raj is the herald that sins of the ones among the
Ummah of Muhammad (saw) shall be forgiven  if  they  do  not  associate  any
partners to Allah (swt) and will finally be rewarded with Jannah.

    Honorable Muslims!
    The bleeding trust of al-Mi'raj in our hearts is al-Quds and Masjid  al-
Aqsa. Called as ""the land of peace  and  salvation  (Jerusalem)""  under  the
rule of Muslims for centuries, al-Quds now has been transformed into a  land
of  occupation,  oppression,  violence,  and  sorrow.  Those  who  disregard
freedom of worshipping and violate the  immunity  of  temples  on  one  hand
prevent the believers from worshipping in Masjid al-Aqsa and  on  the  other
hand brutally murder the innocent Muslims while worshipping  in  the  mosque
in New Zealand during the Friday prayer.

    It should not be forgotten that any  despotism  cannot  prevent  Muslims
from worshipping in unity and peace in al-Quds, Masjid al-Aqsa, and  in  all
other mosques of the earth. The oppressors who attempt against  tranquility,
peace and hope  will  be  the  victims  of  the  fire  that  is  lighted  by
themselves. In this regard, Allah the Almighty (swt) expresses in  the  Holy
Qur'an: ""And who are more unjust than those who prevent the  name  of  Allah
from being mentioned in His mosques and strive toward their destruction.  It
is not for them to enter them except in fear. For  them  in  this  world  is
disgrace, and they will have in the Hereafter a great punishment.""[v]

    Dear Believers!
    May Lailat al-Mi'raj conduce to clearness in our minds, freshness in our
hearts and peace in our lives. Let us  stand  up  (for  qiyam)  shoulder  by
shoulder by obeying wholeheartedly to the call of Allah  (swt)  for  prayer.
Let us prostrate (sujud) with the fruitfulness of Lailat al-Mi'raj.  Let  us
remember the honor of faith and the responsibility of being a  servant  once
more. Let us not refrain our hope and pray for reaching  to  the  nights  of
Lailat al-Mi'raj when al-Quds and Masjid al-Aqsa are free.

    May Allah (swt) let the Lailat al-Mi'raj that we will experience in  the
night from next Tuesday to Wednesday conduce to the unity and  togetherness,
the rise and elevation of the Islamic world.
-----------------------
[i] Isra, 17/1.
[ii] Muslim, Iman, 279.
[iii] Nasa'i, Ishrat al-Nisa', 1.
[iv] Ankabut, 29/45.
[v] Baqarah, 2/114.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
84;2017-12-29;"
LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE
DATE  : 29.12.2017

[pic]
    OUR IRREPLACEABLE WEALTH: LIFE
    Blessed Friday to You, Honorable Believers!
    Our Lord Almighty enjoins in the verse I have recited: ""[He] who created
death and life to test you [as to] which of you is best in deed - and He  is
the Exalted in Might, the Forgiving."" [i]

    Our Prophet (pbuh) says in the  hadith  I  have  read:  ""There  are  two
blessings which many people lose: (They are) Health and free time for  doing
good."" [ii]

    Brothers and Sisters!
    We are on the verge of a new year of  the  Gregorian  calendar.  We  are
about to leave behind a year from our irreplaceable wealth: our  lives.  May
our Lord Almighty bless us with a bountiful  life.  May  He  make  the  days
ahead of us better than the days we have left behind.

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Whether we name the years or calculate the days according to Islamic  or
Gregorian calendars; the one and only master of time is our  Lord  Almighty.
He is the One Who entrusted each moment we have to us  as  a  blessing.  And
what really matters before our Lord is how  we  spend  our  time;  for  what
purpose we spend our limited breaths; whether we use the  blessing  of  life
in accordance with the purpose of our creation.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    We call the short period of time that our Lord deemed fit for  us  life.
Life describes a period that should be made prosperous and transformed  into
eternal gains. The mortal life on this earth is made  prosperous  if  it  is
dressed with faith in Allah and righteous deeds. This  very  short  life  is
made bountiful if it is lived in accordance with Allah's countenance with  a
sense of responsibility and trust.

    Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
    Our Almighty Lord provides opportunities for each one of us  for  us  to
make our life more meaningful and bountiful. The beginning  of  a  new  year
which informs us  about  how  swiftly  the  time  passes  is  one  of  those
opportunities. This is an opportunity for us to make a fresh start to  life,
so to speak, and open yet another clean page; to define new resolutions  and
high ideals, to make good plans for the year ahead. This is  an  opportunity
for us to take account of ourselves, review and  correct  our  mistakes  and
repent for our sins.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    Then let us ask ourselves these questions as we leave behind a year from
our lives:

    How close were we to Allah Almighty, when whole creation  in  the  earth
and the sky praised Him? How faithful were we for our oath to Allah we  gave
after the question [pic] ""Am I not your Lord?""? To what extent we were  able
to heed His orders, or refrain from what He forbidden?

    Which righteous deeds, goodness or beautiful things we recorded  on  our
book of good deeds? To what extent  we  were  able  to  protect  our  hands,
tongue, eyes, ears, mind and heart from unlawful things and sins?

    How many of our days did we make more fruitful than the other,  in  this
life where those who live two equal days are losers? How many  of  our  days
we were able to turn into eternal gains?

    To what extent we were able to fulfill our responsibilities towards  our
mother and father, wife and  children,  relatives  and  neighbors?  To  what
extent we were able to make the suffering of those in  need  our  suffering?
What did we do to  relive  the  suffering  of  our  oppressed  brothers  and
sisters, wherever in the world?

    Brothers and Sisters!
    It is not fitting for us to waste  the  hours  we  should  answer  these
questions on some wrong behaviors that have no place in our belief,  culture
and tradition. To pin our hope upon lottery and games of chance and  try  to
earn money without labor or any effort is incompatible with the  sensitivity
of our religion on lawful earnings. Wasting our health away  with  alcoholic
drinks,  killing  our  time  with  unlimited  and  improper   pleasures   is
absolutely incompatible with the sense  of  trust  that  a  believer  should
have.

    Because, as the Prophet (pbuh) stated, a believer should appreciate  the
value of his health before he gets ill. He should spend his free time  doing
good before he gets busy. He should use his youth on good deeds  before  old
age catches up with him. He should use his wealth  and  resources  as  means
for his happiness in the hereafter before he loses them.[iii]

    Brothers and Sisters!
    What we ask from our Lord Almighty in this last Friday of  the  year  is
that may He grant us the ability to carry this blessing of faith  until  our
last breath. May He make our days, months  and  years  bountiful  with  good
deeds. May He makes us His servants who are good and who  make  good  deeds,
who refrain from evil and forbid evil things. May He help us  in  doing  the
deeds that would earn us heaven and avoid the actions that would lead us  to
hell.

-----------------------
[i] Al-Mulk, 67/2.
[ii] Al-Bukhari, To Make the Heart Tender (Ar-Riqaq), 1.
[iii] Hakim, al-Mustadrak, IV, 341.

            Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services


"
85;2018-02-23;"
LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE
DATE  : 23.02.2018


[pic]
   ADDICTION IS A TRAP
   Jumu'ah Mubarak, Dear Brothers and Sisters!
   Our Lord Almighty enjoins in the  verse  I  have  recited:  ""O  you  who
believe! Ward off from yourselves and your  families  a  Fire  (Hell)  whose
fuel is men and stones...""[i]
   Our Prophet (s.a.w.) said in the hadith I have read: ""The clever  person
is the one who subjugates his soul, and works for what is after  death.  And
the incapable is the one  who  follows  his  desires  and  merely  hopes  in
Allah."" [ii]
   Brothers and Sisters!
   Humans are the noblest of all creation; they are the most  valuable  and
most honorable member of the world of  creatures.  Islam  was  sent  to  the
humans for them to  live  a  life  fitting  to  this  value  and  to  attain
happiness in this life and  in  the  Hereafter.  The  goal  of  our  supreme
religion is to protect the life,  property,  mind,  chastity  and  faith  of
humans from  all  evil,  sedition  and  mischief.  Therefore,  Islam  fights
against anything that threatens the life and  property  of  humans,  weakens
their mind and reason, harms their honor  and  descendants  and  takes  away
their freedom of religion and belief. Islam forbids all harmful  habits  and
addictions that disturb the peace of the individuals, family, and society.
   Honorable Believers!
   The Holy Qur'an insistently repeats that the life in  this  world  is  a
trial and those who want  to  be  successful  in  this  trial  must  not  be
captured by their nafs (desires). A  person  who  pursues  temporary  whims,
endless wishes and desires ends in  defeat.  Any  addiction  that  makes  us
forget the importance, value and seriousness of this short life is  a  trap.
Bad habits that waste our time,  money  and  health  are  a  threat  to  our
future.
   Dear Muslims!
   While the Holy Qur'an repeatedly asks us ""Will you not reason?"", how can
a person whose brain is clouded by alcohol and drugs think? While  our  Lord
warns us with the words ""How seldom are you grateful!"",  how  can  a  person
who spends hours in front of a screen detached from life see  the  blessings
around him/her and give thanks to Allah?  While  our  Prophet  (s.a.w)  says
""Sufficient sin for a man is  that  he  neglects  those  he  should  provide
for.""[iii], how can a person who spends the night on gambling  and  computer
games take care of his/her family?
   Brothers and Sisters!
   Addiction breaks down families, wastes our national  wealth  and  shakes
our spirituality to its foundations.  What  a  shame  for  a  human  who  is
created with the highest qualities to leave this world without  using  these
qualities for the benefit of  the  society  and  the  ummah!  Our  children,
unfortunately, start bad habits through imitation, curiosity and  temptation
by their  friends.  Lacking  the  necessary  care  and  support  from  their
families, young people feel lonely and without love, and this makes it  easy
for them to fall into the hands of wicked  criminals.  It  is  our  duty  to
guide them, follow their agendas, and meet their spiritual needs as well  as
their  material  needs.  Our  beloved  Prophet  (s.a.w.)  reminds  us   this
important task by saying ""Your children has a right upon you."" [iv]
   Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
   Our Beloved Prophet said: ""There are two  blessings  which  many  people
lose: Health and free time for doing good."" [v] We should  appreciate  these
two blessings that we notice when we get sick or busy. Let us  keenly  avoid
and advise people to avoid smoking, alcohol and all  kinds  of  drugs  which
are the biggest enemies of the health of our bodies and  souls.  Let  us  be
alert about the internet addiction that swallows our time like a black  hole
and consumes our days by preventing us from  taking  the  time  to  do  good
things. Let us learn and teach how to use  the  technological  possibilities
that Allah has bestowed us in a clever and  conscious  manner.  Let  us  not
forget that good habits,  virtues  and  morality  are  acquired  within  the
family; and that our youth can only stay away from addiction with  our  care
and support.
   Honorable Believers!
   It is our duty to keep our eyes open for the addictions that poison  our
children and the young while entertaining them  such  as  smoking,  alcohol,
drugs, gambling, internet, computers and smartphones. Our Lord warns  us  in
this matter by calling attention to the end of a bad course of events:  ""Yet
they were succeeded by generations (of people) who  lost  all  (thought  of)
prayer and followed (but) their own lusts..."" [vi]
   Let us not forget that our children are our future and  our  descendants
are entrusted to us. For healthy, educated and  conscious  generations,  let
us equip the apples of our eyes, our children, with  our  religion,  culture
and identity so that they can protect themselves from all kinds of evil.
   I would like to conclude this khutbah with the following hadith  of  our
Prophet (s.a.w.): ""The feet of the son of Adam shall not  move  from  before
his Lord on the Day of Judgement, until  he  is  asked  about  five  things:
about his life and what he did with it, about his youth and what he wore  it
out in, about his wealth and how he earned it and spent it  upon,  and  what
he did with what he knew."" [vii]
-----------------------
[i] Tahrim, 66/6.
[ii] Tirmidhi, Sifat al-Qiyamah, 25.
[iii] Abu Dawud, Zakat, 45.
[iv] Muslim, Siyam, 183.
[v] Bukhari, Riqaq, 1.
[vi] Maryam, 19/59.
[vii] Tirmidhi, Sifat al-Qiyamah, 1.

                        Issued by: General Directorate of Religious Services


"
86;2017-07-21;"LOCATION  : GENERAL 

DATE             : 21.07.2017



OUR UNENDING SORROW: 

JERUSALE AND MASJID AL-AQSA

Honorable Believers!

Our Prophet’s (pbuh) wife Maymunah asked him: “O Messenger of Allah! Would you tell us about Baitul Maqdis?” Allah’s Messenger says: “It is the land of the Resurrection and the Gathering. Go and pray there, for one prayer there is like one thousand prayers elsewhere.” When Maymunah asks, “What if I cannot travel and go there, o Messenger of Allah?” the Messenger of Mercy answers: “Then send a gift of oil to light its lamps, for whoever does that is like one who goes there.” 

Venerable Muslims!

Imagine a city that was the home to many prophets’ fight for oneness. Imagine a city that was the qibla of three monotheistic religions. Imagine a city that was deemed sacred and blessed with its name and site. That city is Jerusalem, the holy city, also known as Baitul Maqdis. The cradle of civilizations for thousands of years and an attraction center, Jerusalem and its surrounding region witnessed many prophets like Abraham, Ishmael, Jacob, Joseph, Moses, Solomon, and Jesus. Masjid al-Aqsa, the first qibla of Islam and the place where our Prophet (pbuh) experience Isra and Mi’raj are also in Jerusalem. Allah’s Messenger wanted us to have a spiritual bond with Baitul Maqdis for that reason. He advised us to perform umrah in that city.

Brothers and Sisters!

Jerusalem achieved peace with the conquest of Caliph Umar. Especially during the Ottoman period, Muslims ruled justly and mercifully, never intervening in the life, property and religious freedom of people from different religions. In fact, non-Muslims sought the justice of Islam in resolving disputes among themselves. The best example of our religion’s vast tolerance and embracing understanding is the inscription on the inner wall of Bab el-Khalil. Our ancestors wrote, “La ilahe ilallah, Ibrahim Halilullah,” which means “There is no god but Allah, Ibrahim is His friend.” Thus, they engraved on the walls of Jerusalem the name of Abraham who is considered a prophet by members of all monotheistic religions.





Honorable Believers!

It should be stated regretfully that Jerusalem, which has been the Darussalam or the center of peace and calm in history, has been in grief for a long time. Masjid al-Aqsa, our first qibla, is wounded. Jerusalem is now far away from being the city of peace after experiencing all kinds of transgressions. The ancient city that has in its every corner the collective traces and memories of humankind now longs for peace. The unity, togetherness, and most sacred values of believers are targeted more and more every day in the land of prophets. Innocent people are murdered in cold blood. Muslims are cruelly and barbarically prevented from worshipping in their own mosques. Friday prayer could not be performed at Masjid al-Aqsa last week for the first time since 1967. It should be remembered that there can be no legal grounds, no religious basis, and no humane reason for shutting down a temple. On those who keep people off their temples and destroy those temples, Allah enjoins the following quite clearly: “Who are more unjust than those who prevent the name of Allah from being mentioned in His mosques and strive toward their destruction? It is not for them to enter them except in fear. For them in this world is disgrace, and they will have in the Hereafter a great punishment.”

Honorable Believers!

As our region suffers great pain, the incidents in and around Masjid al-Aqsa have caused tremendous concern for every person with common sense. We believe that the occupation will end at once in this holy land that houses prophets, and reason, moderation, and peace will prevail. It is our greatest wish that common sense comes into action in Jerusalem, the heart of Muslims and the common value of all humankind.

It is a fact that as Muslims there are no embarrassing inhumane practices in our history such as right violations, cruelty, and savagery. However, all the disasters, cruelty, and oppression suffered by our brothers and sisters today teach us a lesson. We must strengthen our brotherhood of faith with the mentality of an Ummah as soon as possible. We must protect the dignity, rights, and gains of one another. Each one of us must work with all our power to make the Ummah of Islam a glorious one again.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

We as a nation have never broken our spiritual ties with Jerusalem and Masjid al-Aqsa throughout history. We cannot. With that mentality, we open our hands in Friday prayer and supplicate to Allah: O Allah! Make us feel in our hearts the pain of all oppressed brothers and sisters in Jerusalem and around the world! Do not let us side with the short-sighted, the unwise, the heartless, and the cruel! O Allah! Do not allow those who attempt to occupy Masjid al-Aqsa and the cities of Islam! Help our Muslim brothers and sisters so they may overcome the hardships they are going through as soon as possible! Grant us to keep justice alive once again as a glorious Ummah! Answer our prayers on this blessed Friday, o Allah!"
87;2017-10-27;"
LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE
DATE  : 27.10.2017

                                                                       [pic]

    TO BE A GRATEFUL SERVANT
    Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters!
    Our Prophet (pbuh) occasionally woke up at night and  prayed.  He  stood
humbly in qiyam (standing) position  for  a  long  time.  He  prostrated  in
tears. He prayed to Allah most sincerely. Our  mother  Aisha  witnessed  his
dedication in awe and asked him: ""O Messenger of  Allah!  Why  do  you  pray
this much even though your God has forgiven your sins in the  past  and  the
future?"" Allah's Messenger (pbuh) gave this meaningful and  wise  answer  to
his dear wife: ""Should I not be a thankful servant, O Aisha?"" [i]

    Honorable Believers!
    We are mere guests in this mortal world. We see the blessings  of  Allah
everywhere we look. We taste His blessings with  every  bite.  We  live  the
life He granted us with each breath. We know that these are all bestowed  on
us.

    Let us stop for a moment and remember the blessings we had in  just  the
last few hours. Let us think about how we reached with  each  one  of  those
blessings. If that blessing was the fruit of a  tree  that  came  from  deep
inside the earth, that means Allah had prepared it  through  several  phases
for us. If it was a drop of water, that means Allah had raised it  from  the
oceans to the clouds, then made it come down to earth just  for  us.  If  it
was the light, then Allah had sent it from deep down the space  through  the
Sun.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    After we saw all these blessing of our Lord Almighty,  let's  see  where
that feeling of gratitude that encircles us would take us! Then we will  see
that being grateful has a special place among all these blessings  that  our
Lord granted us. For this reason, our Lord Almighty enjoins: ""Whoever  gives
thanks, he gives thanks for (the  good  of)  his  ownself.  And  whoever  is
unthankful, then verily, Allah is All-Rich (Free of all  wants),  Worthy  of
all praise."" [ii]

    Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
    Gratitude is appreciating the  blessings  that  Allah  bestowed  on  us.
Gratitude is protecting ourselves from being a  slave  to  our  desires  and
wants, ambition and greed. Gratitude is a sign of  living  on  the  path  of
purpose and wisdom of creation. Gratitude is not to become  deaf  and  blind
to the good deeds of people towards us. Gratitude  also  requires  patiently
enduring the poverty, aside  from  appreciating  the  wealth.  Gratitude  is
seeking refuge in Allah's mercy from his wrath, keeping this verse in  mind:
""And (remember) when your Lord proclaimed: 'If you give thanks, I will  give
you more, but  if  you  are  thankless,  verily!  My  Punishment  is  indeed
severe.'"" [iii]

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Being grateful does not equal saying ""Praise to Allah, thanks be to  our
Lord"". The real gratitude is using each blessing in a  way  that  would  win
Allah's countenance. Every breath we take, our life, mind,  health  and  all
other blessings have a specific gratitude.

    The gratitude for being created as an  honorable  human  is  faith.  The
gratitude of our hearth  is  to  drive  away  hate,  grudge  and  other  bad
feelings from it. The gratitude of our mind is to contemplate  and  consider
the holiness of Allah. The gratitude of our tongue is mentioning Allah.  The
gratitude  of  our  body  is  always  living  in  accordance  with   Allah's
countenance  and  doing  our  prayers.  The  gratitude  of  our  wealth  and
possessions is to give alms and zakat to the needy.  The  gratitude  of  our
knowledge is to be helpful to mankind by educating  students  and  producing
lasting works.

    Honorable Believers!
    Every one of us feel the need to thank a person for his  kindness,  even
if it's a small one. Therefore, do you think  it  would  be  appropriate  to
keep ourselves from being grateful to our Lord, Who  granted  us  all  these
blessings? Would ignoring these blessings be in accordance  with  the  sense
of servitude and the moral of a believer? Of course not.

    My brothers and sisters! Let's not deprive our  minds,  hearts,  tongues
and bodies from the blessing that is gratitude.  May  our  life  be  blessed
with our gratitude. May our gratitude be the reason for more blessings.  May
our praise get us closer to our Lord and elevate us.

    Let me conclude this khutba with a prayer  of  our  Prophet  (pbuh):  ""O
Allah, help me in remembering You, in giving  You  thanks,  and  worshipping
You well."" [iv]
-----------------------
[i] Müslim, Characteristics of The Hypocrites And Rulings Concerning Them,
81; ?bn H?bban, Sahih, II, 36.
[ii] Al Luqman, 31/12.
[iii]
Ibrahi??????????????????????????2???????????????????????????????????????????
?????????????????????????????m, 14/7.
[iv] Abi Dawud, Prayer (Kitab Al-Salat): Detailed Injunctions about Witr
26.

      Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
88;2019-01-04;"
DATE: 04.01.2019
[pic]
    BEING TRUE IN ESSENCE AND WORDS
    Honorable Muslims!
    Allah the Almighty (swt) states in the verses I have  recited:  ""O  you
who have believed, fear Allah and speak words of  appropriate  justice.  He
will [then] amend for you your deeds and forgive you your sins. And whoever
obeys  Allah  and  His  Messenger  has  certainly  attained   the   highest
achievement.""[i]

    Our Beloved Prophet (saw) declares  in  the  hadith  I  have  read:  ""A
combination of blasphemy and faith, lying and  righteousness,  treason  and
trustworthiness cannot coexist in a person's heart together.""[ii]

    Esteemed Believers!
    Islam attaches great importance to the truth,  verity,  and  to  always
telling what is right. It could be seen by the  fact  that  al-Sidq,  which
means truthfulness and honesty, is the first attribute of the prophets. The
first moral virtue that comes to mind when we think of Muslims  is,  again,
truthfulness. Because truthfulness is the light of salvation,  the  essence
of hidayah (guidance), and a requirement of high morality. True word is the
voice of faith; and telling what is right is the principle of the believer.
In this context, our Beloved Prophet (saw) said: ""He who believes in  Allah
and in the last day should either speak good or keep silent.""[iii]

    Dear Muslims!
    Truthfulness is goodness while lying is  evil.  Truthfulness  is  mercy
while lying is a disaster. The right finds its place with truthfulness; and
loses its place with lies. The property acquired  by  truthfulness  becomes
fruitful and blessed. There is no goodness in anything  acquired  by  lies.
Honor and dignity become  permanent  with  truthfulness.  One  attains  the
countenance of Allah (swt) with truthfulness. The punishment of Hell is the
only destination to be reached by lies. In the sight of  Allah  (swt),  the
value of the word is measured by the degree to which it reflects the  right
and the truth. Because word is the interpreter of the heart, and the mirror
of our essence and soul. Our Prophet (saw) warned the Ummah in this  regard
with the following words: ""It is obligatory for you to tell the truth,  for
truth leads to  virtue  and  virtue  leads  to  Paradise.  The  person  who
continues to speak the truth and endeavors to tell the truth is  eventually
recorded as 'truthful' with Allah. And beware of telling a lie for  telling
a lie leads to obscenity and obscenity leads to Hell-Fire. The  person  who
keeps telling lies and endeavors to tell a lie is recorded as  'liar'  with
Allah.""[iv]

    Esteemed Believers!
    Most of the time, a lie burns the  fire  of  discord  in  the  society,
disseminates corruption, ends friendships, causes harm to the innocent  and
the loss of rights. The underlying reason for the damage of  trust  in  the
family, decrease of love and respect, and eventually the destruction of the
families is again, to lie. Confidence in business and trade is gained  only
by truthfulness. A righteous institution ultimately earns benefit for  both
this life and for the Hereafter. Those who  deceive  the  society,  try  to
cover their tricks by fancy words, and do  not  refrain  from  even  giving
false oath for this cause are doomed to go bankrupt  in  both  worlds.  The
Messenger of Allah (saw), who is the best example for the  Ummah  with  his
words and behaviors, was so sensitive about lying  that,  he  forbade  even
lying to children or joking by lying. When he saw a woman calling her child
by saying, ""Come here and I shall give you something."", he asked, ""What did
you intend to give him?"", and as she answered, ""I intended to give him some
dates."", he (saw) said, ""Beware! If you were not to give  him  anything,  a
lie would be recorded against you.""[v]

    Honorable Believers!
    As lying is a sinful behavior, accepting any  heard  news  to  be  true
without searching, and causing the spread of a lie deliberately or not  are
the behaviors that require the same degree of responsibility  in  terms  of
religion and morality. In this regard, Allah the Exalted (swt) warns us  in
the Holy Qur'an as: ""And do not pursue that of which you have no knowledge.
Indeed, the hearing, the sight and the heart - about all those  [one]  will
be questioned.""[vi]

    Valued Believers!
    Let us never talk against anyone's dignity  and  honor  no  matter  what
their religion, race, denomination, and lifestyle are.  Let  us  pursue  the
truth and the verity. Let us adopt truthfulness,  respect  and  kindness  as
our principles. Let us not forget that we will give account  for  each  word
on the Day of Judgment. Let us avoid from lie, which  darkens  and  pollutes
our hearts, and most of the time turns our lives  upside  down.  Let  us  be
true in our essence and our words.
-----------------------
[i] Ahzab, 33/70, 71.
[ii] Ibn Hanbal, II, 349.
[iii] Abu Dawud, Adab, 122, 123.
[iv] Muslim, Birr, 105.
[v] Abu Dawud, Adab, 80.
[vi] Isra, 17/36.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
89;2017-06-16;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 16.06.2017



ZAKAT INCREASES GAINS; USURY CONSUMES IT

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

Our Beloved Prophet (pbuh) one day said: “Avoid the seven great destructive sins!” The companions asked “O Messenger of Allah! What are those seven sins?” The Messenger of Allah gave this answer: “These seven destructive sins are to join others in worship along with Allah, to practice magic, to kill the life which Allah has forbidden, to devour usury, to eat up an orphan's wealth, to flee from the battlefield when faced with the enemy, and to accuse honorable women of adultery.”

Honorable Believers!

There is a gratitude for each blessing that Our Almighty Lord bestowed upon us. The gratitude for us being created as human is faith. The gratitude for our body is prayer. The gratitude for our health and sustenance is fasting. The gratitude for our property, our wealth is zakat, alms, zakat al-fitr. These are all different ways of spending in Allah’s way.

Zakat is a claim on the property of the rich that Allah gives to the needy. It is the hand that a wealthy Muslim extends to his needy and destitute brother. Alms are the manifestation of sincerity and fidelity towards our Lord and also our brothers and sisters. To put it shortly, spending in the way of Allah is to be aware of the fact that the blessings, the wealth is entrusted to us by Allah. It is the means of making perishable earthly possessions eternal. It is also to deeply embrace the fellowship between believers and to experience and maintain it in a most beautiful way.

Dear Muslims in the Mosque!

Zakat and alms are obligatory in our holy religion Islam while usury is forbidden. Usury is to gain unjustly without any work or any effort. Our Lord announces in the Holy Quran the exemplary fate of those who are enslaved by usury:



 “Those who eat usury will not stand (on the Day of Resurrection) except like the standing of a person beaten by Satan leading him to insanity.”

“That is because they say: ‘Trade is just like usury.’” “Whereas Allah has permitted trading and forbidden usury.” 

Brothers and Sisters!

Spending in Allah’s way will bring one the key to heaven. Usury leads one towards Allah’s wrath and brings great loss. Because giving is to share the wealth for the sake of Allah. It is to sacrifice on this path. Usury is to lose the belief that honest effort is sacred.

Dear Believers!

Our Almighty Lord said in the Holy Quran:  “God deprives interest of any blessing, and blights it, but makes alms-giving productive. God does not love any obstinate unbeliever, any obstinate sinner.” 

This verse of our Lord shows us that even though giving seems like it decrease from the wealth, it actually increases it many times more and makes it fruitful. Usury might seem to cause an increase in wealth but it actually reduces and consumes it. Aren’t the numerous defaults happening today, the families being dragged into crisis, the efforts that get lost a result of the usury that is unjust profit?

Esteemed Muslims! 

Then come! Let us seek the ways of becoming one of the righteous by giving the things we love in the way of Allah. Let us strengthen our loyalty to Allah with our zakat, alms and zakat al-fitr. Let us make our Ramadan, our life fruitful with the material and nonmaterial things we share. Let us avoid any kind of unjust and forbidden gain, especially usury. 

Brothers and Sisters!

The sorrow of separation has covered our hearts in these days as we get close to the end of Ramadan; its beginning is mercy, its middle is forgiveness and its ending is salvation from hell. The sacred month of Ramadan gives us the night of Al-Qadr, the night that is better than a thousand months, as a present before it leaves. We are going to observe the night of Al-Qadr on the end of Wednesday next week, which comes every year to elevate us. Come! Let us turn this night, in which our book of Life, the Quran was first revealed, into an opportunity to reflect upon ourselves, to ask forgiveness and mercy for our sins.

I’d like to take this opportunity to congratulate your night of Al-Qadr and I ask Allah to make this blessed night an occasion for goodness."
90;2019-07-26;"
DATE: 26.07.2019
[pic]
                    PHYSICAL PRIVACY AND ISLAMIC DRESSING
    Honorable Muslims!
    In the verse I have just recited, the Almighty Allah  (swt)  states,  ""O
Children of Adam! We have provided for you clothing to cover your  nakedness
and as an adornment. However, the best clothing is  righteousness.  This  is
one of the signs of Allah, so perhaps you will be mindful.""[i]

    In the hadith I have just read, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) says,  ""Allah
is modest and decent, and He covers up flaws. He loves decency and  dressing
(tasattur)...""[ii]

    Honorable Muslims!
    Our bodies, just like our souls, are great blessings bestowed  upon  and
entrusted to us by Allah (swt). Every  believing  man  and  every  believing
woman is obliged to protect it. In this respect, our bodies, just  like  all
blessings bestowed upon us, have rights over us. All believers in  the  know
of the value of the blessings should use their bodies in the  way  of  doing
good deeds and helping spread the good. For there will come a  day  when  we
all will be questioned about for what purposes we  have  used  our  physical
strength, beauty and handsomeness, and skills in the world.

    Honorable Believers!
    On top of the responsibilities towards our bodies comes covering it  and
protecting it from unallowed eyes, and bad words.  Before  everything  else,
it is a religious obligation to cover up one's body. It is  also  an  innate
and natural need to do so.

    Dressing up one's body is done primarily for one's own good  other  than
for others. It is a demonstration of one's self-respect  and  protection  of
privacy.  Covering  up  one's  private  parts  reflects  one's  decency  and
attentiveness to the body. A specific feeling felt by humans  only,  decency
stems from faith, as expressed by the Prophet Muhammad (saw). Covered up  in
a piece of cloth and entrusted to the mother after birth, humans are  washed
clean under another piece of cover and buried shrouded after death.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Just as to their bodies, Muslims need to show the same respect to  other
people. Not only do they need to
cover up their bodies against unallowed  and  unpermitted  stares  by  other
people, they also need to respect their privacy. Aware of their  boundaries,
they should not disturb other people with their stares. The line  ""It  is  a
spiritual merit to look at beautiful women!"" widely  used  colloquially  has
no place in Islam. For all persons have the right to privacy, regardless  of
their appearance. In this respect, the Almighty Allah  (swt)  warns  Muslims
as follows:
                                                                       [pic]
""Tell the believing men to lower their gaze and guard their chastity. That
is purer for them. Surely Allah is All-Aware of what they do.""[iii]
                                                                       [pic]
 ""Tell the believing women to lower their gaze  and  guard  their  chastity,
and not to reveal their adornments except what normally  appears.  Let  them
draw their veils over their chests.""[iv]

    As clearly stated in the verses above, the Almighty Allah (swt) asks all
believing people, man or woman, to pay attention to decency and privacy.  He
declares that turning our gazes from haram and paying attention to  dressing
(tasattur) are duties upon us. Men's clothes that fit  so  tightly,  thereby
also threatening the physical health, are in violation of Islamic  dressing.
The awareness of Islamic dressing is not only about covering  up  the  body,
but also covering up and protecting the heart and mind against all kinds  of
evil, extremism, and what is forbidden (haram).

    Honorable Believers!
    Decency is a highly  valued  virtue  that  beautifies  all  people.  The
inviolability of decency is a shared value for all people. Due diligence  to
it makes both women and men respectable in the same way.  For  all  persons,
whether woman or man, deserve respect.

    Dear Believers!
    Paying attention to privacy is a requirement of  piety  (taqwa),  namely
the sense of respectfulness and respectability towards  Allah  (swt).  Then,
let us not let weaken the connection between us  and  Him,  who  blessed  us
with our bodies. Let us struggle  to  live  a  life  He  would  approve  and
appreciate. Let us be aware that our bodies  are  sacredly  inviolable,  and
our souls graceful and respectable. Let us instill  self-confidence  through
the sense of privacy in our family members  and  particularly  our  children
from early ages on. Let us not forget that virtuous societies are formed  by
people who protect their moral, spiritual, and cultural values.
-----------------------
[i] A'raf, 7/26.
[ii] Nasa'i, Ghusl, 7.
[iii] Nur, 24/30.
[iv] Nur, 24/31.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
91;2019-06-14;"DATE: 14.06.2019



MOSQUES FULL OF CHILDREN, 

CHILDREN FULL OF QUR'ANIC MANNERS

Honorable Believers!

Allah the Almighty (swt) states in the verse I have just recited: “This is a blessed Book which We have revealed to you so that they may contemplate its verses, and people of reason may be mindful.”

Prophet Muhammad (saw) reminded us in the hadith I have just read: “No father can leave a better heritage to his children than good manners.”

Dear Muslims!

Every child is born with the innate inclination to believe in, love, and be connected to Allah (swt). It is human nature to turn towards what is good, prefer what is pleasant, and search for the truth. The inner compass, since childhood, points to what is true and authentic. However, the paths children follow differ, their beliefs are formed, and their manners are changed as they grow up, under the influence of their parents and circle of friends.

Honorable Believers!

Our children are among the most precious blessings bestowed upon us by Allah (swt) that we need to hold in trust. Prophet Muhammad (saw) encourages us to appreciate the value of and look out for our children as rare treasures entrusted to us. There is a delicate balance of rights and responsibilities between parents and children. The greatest right our children have on us is for us to protect them from all kinds of evil by preserving their pure and uncorrupted nature.

Dear Believers!

	Children are the apples of our eyes and hopes of our future, and therefore, we are responsible to meet their both non-material needs, as well as their material needs. Our fundamental duty is to ensure that our children are aware of the Almighty Allah (swt) and the Prophet Muhammad (saw), that they have acquired the habit of worship, and that they are instilled with good manners. We should embellish their innocent hearts and clear minds with knowledge, wisdom, and decency. We should keep them away from all kinds of perverted ideas, immoral behaviors, superstitions, and newly-emerging false forms of religious knowledge. We should exert efforts to rear them as sincere believers who lead their lives with the Holy Qur’an in their hands and iman in their hearts. We should not forget that it is the essential responsibility of each one of us to leave behind a beautiful young generation who is aware of the Book of Allah (swt), has the Messenger of Allah (saw) as role model, and is loyal to the homeland and fellow citizens.

Honorable Believers!

It is among the signs of being a believer to recite the Holy Qur’an finely, understand it in the most correct, way and live by it in every phase of one's life. It will be easier for our children to lead a life as described above if we ensure that they, from their early years on, are able to read the Qur’an, and are familiar with the core values of Islam. Our children are more, than any of us are, inclined to the warm and sincere call of the Qur’an, and to its spiritual offerings. Childhood is the best and most appropriate time to learn our sublime religion, to get the habit of worshipping, and to adopt such virtues as honesty and compassion. If we want to instill the love for the Qur'an in our children, and to ensure that they take the first steps into a life that will continue in the light of the Qur'an, the summer vacation is a unique opportunity.

Dear Muslims!

We would not like our children, who are easily attracted by the technology, to waste their days in front of computer and phone screens. Therefore, it is our duty to save our children from addiction to technology, and to create opportunities to strengthen their mental and physical health. One of the greatest opportunities to help develop the hearts of our children and enrich their dreams and ideals is around the corner. The summer courses are going to start at all of our mosques and Qur'an course centers on Monday, June 17th. Our mosques are going to spring up flowers, and our courses are going to be filled with joy, with our children, with the slogan of “Mosques Full of Children, Children Full of Qur'anic Manners"". In addition to the lessons on iman, worship, and morals, our children will have fun while learning through social and cultural activities. We are waiting for your applications to our mosques and Qur'an courses in order to ensure that our children have ""the most valuable heritage"" of good manners as expressed by Prophet Muhammad (saw). We welcome our children, and pray for a successful, auspicious, happy, and healthy future for all of them."
92;2017-05-05;"
  LOCATION  : GENEL
  DATE            : 05.05.2017
[pic]
                 THE NAME OF PENITENCE AND HOPE: REPENTANCE
  A Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters!
  In the verse I have recited,  the  Almighty  enjoins:  ""O  you  who  have
believed! Repent to Allah with sincere repentance. Perhaps  your  Lord  will
remove from you your misdeeds and  admit  you  into  gardens  beneath  which
rivers flow [on] the Day when Allah will not disgrace the Prophet and  those
who believed with him...""[i]

  Brothers and Sisters!
  One of the beautiful names of Allah the Exalted is at-Tawwab; He  accepts
repentance. He forgives those who seek refuge in His vast grace. He  is  al-
Gaffar; He forgives whomever He wishes and whoever wishes it.
  As stated in the verse [pic], our Lord favors those who repent.  He  does
not turn back hands raised in prayer.  He  does  not  let  down  the  hearts
dearly invoking. He does not leave  destitute  those  who  shed  tears  with
repentance.

  Honorable Believers!
  We are all humans. We live in a world of tests. And in  this  test,  both
the sin and the good deed are for us. We sometimes resist against sins.  And
sometimes act carelessly and make mistakes. But  we  know  that  our  Lord's
gate of mercy is wide open against our sins. The thing we need to do  is  to
avoid persisting  in  mistakes  and  sins.  To  demonstrate  the  virtue  of
correcting  them.  To  take  refuge  in  our  Lord's  grace.  To  seek   His
forgiveness with sincere repentance and heartfelt invocation.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  Repentance is the admission of our helplessness. It is a clear  statement
of the fact that we  sometimes  become  weak  in  our  pact  to  Allah.  The
Almighty taught us the blessing of repentance in the  Holy  Quran  with  the
story of the first human. Adam (as) and his wife, mother  Eve,  repented  to
Allah as such:
[pic]
  ""Our Lord! We have wronged ourselves, and if You do not  forgive  us  and
have mercy upon us, we will surely be among the losers.""[ii]

  Brothers and Sisters!
  Repentance is one's commitment to renew and refresh themselves. It is the
cleansing of minds and lips that get dirty in time amid the  tumult  of  the
world. It is the softening of  darkened  and  hardened  hearts.  It  is  the
calming and quieting of damaged spirits.

  Repentance is a source of solace and hope for us. It is a safe harbor  in
which we can take refuge in times of crisis. Because even if  everyone  else
abandons us when we make mistakes, our Lord never leaves  us.  He  does  not
turn    His    back    on    us    even    if    everyone     else     does.
 [pic] ""Indeed,  Allah  does  not  forgive  association  with  Him,  but  He
forgives what is less than that for whom He wills.""[iii] All we need  to  do
is to remain loyal to our faith in His existence and oneness. To never  give
up on His vast grace. To never deprive ourselves of His forgiveness. All  we
need to do is to sincerely seek His forgiveness when our weaknesses and  sin
overwhelm us.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  We are about to welcome another Bara'at Night which is the  harbinger  of
Ramadan, the season of grace, mercy, and purification. Next Wednesday  night
we will observe Bara'at Night which is  the  15th  night  of  the  month  of
Sha'ban. We will  get  another  unique  opportunity  to  attain  our  Lord's
salvation  and  get  rid  of  all  troubles,  all  mistakes  that  hurt  the
believers, and all the bad things that do not look good on anyone.  Infinite
praise be to Allah the Exalted for granting such  wonderful  opportunity  to
us in a lifetime that goes by so fast. I wish you a  blessed  Bara'at  Night
in advance.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  Our Prophet (pbuh) informed us that repentance on Bara'at Night will  not
be turned down.[iv] Then let us take this opportunity and  repent  never  to
go back to sin again. Let us repent for forgetting about the afterlife  from
time to time in the tumult of the world. Let us  repent  for  sparing  love,
attention, and mercy from even our closest ones from time to  time.  Let  us
repent for the days  we  have  neglected  our  spouses,  our  children,  our
relatives, orphans, homeless people,  and  the  needy.  Let  us  repent  for
failing to abide by the rights of one another, who are entrusted  to  us  by
the Lord; for failing to be the organs of one body and  the  bricks  in  one
building as commanded by our Prophet (pbuh). Let us never forget that  there
is no sinner who will be denied repentance when  he  feels  remorse  because
his sin is big.
-----------------------
[i] At-Tahrim, 66/8.
[ii] Al-A'raf, 7/23.
[iii] An-Nisa, 4/48, 116.
[iv] Ibn Majah""$./01[\?ïßÏïß¿Ï¯?#s_K7&hë[v]hÙVÔ5?CJ\?^JaJmH  sH
&hnºhnº5?CJ\?^JaJmH    sH   &hnº, ?kâmetü's-salavât, 191.

            Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
93;2018-05-25;"
DATE: 25.05.2018
                                                                       [pic]
                  RAMADAN: THE MONTH OF FASTING AND QUR'AN
   Honorable Believers!
   It had been eighteen months after Our Prophet Muhammad (s.a.w)  migrated
to Medina. It was the last days  of  the  month  of  Shaban.  The  following
verses of the Surah al-Baqarah were revealed, which  informed  that  fasting
in Ramadan was made obligatory:


    ""The month of Ramadhan [is that] in which was revealed  the  Qur'an,  a
guidance for the people and clear  proofs  of  guidance  and  criterion.  So
whoever sights [the new moon of] the month, let him fast it.""[i]


   Our beloved Prophet (s.a.w.) also addressed the Ummah on the  pulpit  at
the Masjid al-Nabawi as, ""There has come to you Ramadan,  a  blessed  month,
which Allah, the Mighty and Sublime, has enjoined you to  fast.  In  it  the
gates of heavens are opened and the gates of  Hell  are  closed,  and  every
devil is chained up.""[ii]


   Dear Believers!
   Ramadan, the sultan of  eleven  months,  has  a  special  place  in  our
spiritual life. For Ramadan is the month of fasting and Qur'an.  Ramadan  is
the month of patience, gratitude, repentance and contemplation.  Ramadan  is
the most honorable month, including the Night of Qadr inside, which is  more
blessed than a  thousand  months.  Ramadan  means  worship,  abundance,  and
mercy.  Ramadan  means  obedience,  benevolence,  and  benefaction.  As  Our
Prophet informed, an angel calls on the first night of  Ramadan,  ""O  seeker
of the good; come near (to worship and servitude)! And, O  seeker  of  evil;
stop (committing sins)!""[iii]

   Brothers and Sisters!
   Ramadan finds meaning with fasting. Our fasting,  first  of  all,  is  a
training for patience, willpower, and mercy. It is a  shield  that  protects
us from being enslaved by lust and whims, illicit relishes and desires.  The
following verse indicates that the purpose in fasting  is  to  abstain  from
all kinds of evil and sins, ""O you who have believed, decreed  upon  you  is
fasting as it was  decreed  upon  those  before  you  that  you  may  become
righteous.""[iv] Indeed, Rasulullah (s.a.w.) enjoins, ""Fasting is  a  shield.
So, the person fasting should avoid saying bad words and  fighting.  And  if
anyone fights or quarrels with him, he should say, 'I am fasting.' ""[v]

   Esteemed Believers!
   Ramadan is the month when the Qur'an, our book of  life,  started  being
revealed. The Qur'an is the word of Allah, the book of Allah.  It  is  ""The
most beautiful statement"" [vi] as it came from Allah. As expressed  by  our
Prophet, ""The truest of word is the Book of Allah, and best of guidance  is
the guidance of Muhammad.""[vii] The Holy Qur'an is the guide that shows the
truest path to people in all epochs and in all regions until the last  day.
The Qur'an is a cure for souls and mercy for hearts. The Qur'an teaches  us
Our Lord, informs us  of  our  responsibilities,  and  reminds  us  of  the
afterlife. It teaches the meaning of being a human and secrets to live in a
humane way.

   Honorable Muslims!
   Ramadan is the month of brotherhood, solidarity, and  sharing.  When  we
temporarily abstain from eating and drinking, we sympathize with  the  poor,
we appreciate what we have, and we realize that we need to duly be  grateful
to Allah, the Sustainer (al-Razzaq).

   Ramadan is also a chance to quit bad habits, and to open a new page  for
what is good and beautiful.  Thanks  to  Ramadan,  we  exert  ourselves  for
charity, we invest in goodness, and we stay away from bad words  and  deeds.
We heartily feel unity, solidarity and brotherhood. Our  ties  of  love  and
respect  strengthen.  Awards  and  rewards  of  worshipping,   charity   and
benevolence, performed in this month, are more than that of other months.

   Dear Brothers and Sisters!
   So, let us introduce our tongues, hearts, minds and all our lives to the
beauties  of  Ramadan  and  fasting.  Let  us  make  time  for  reading  and
understanding the Holy Qur'an more than ever. Let  us  repair  our  worn-out
hearts and minds with the light of the Qur'an. Let us fast  with  awareness.
Let us make our tongues, hands, eyes, hearts and all parts of us  fast,  not
only our stomach, such that it protects us from all evil.

   Brothers and Sisters!
   The  primary  one  of  the  important  activities  of  Turkiye   Diyanet
Foundation is educational services. Our foundation carries  out  educational
activities both at home and abroad in order to raise generations  who  truly
understand and live Islam. It provides stipends and educational support  for
thousands of students from 111 countries  within  the  framework  of  Qur'an
Courses, International Imam-Khatib and  Theology  programs.  Today,  in  all
mosques throughout the  country,  you,  dear  Muslims,  will  be  asked  for
donations to be used in educational activities. Also, you can  include  your
zakat and fitra within these donations. May Our  Lord  accept  the  donation
you have made and will make.

   I would like to conclude this khutbah with this hadith  of  Our  Prophet
(s.a.w.):  ""Whoever  establishes  prayers  during  the  nights  of   Ramadan
faithfully out of sincere faith and hoping to attain  Allah's  rewards,  all
his past sins will be forgiven.""[viii]
-----------------------
[i] Baqarah, 2/185.
[ii] Nasa'i, Siyam, 5.
[iii] Tirmidhi, Sawm,1; Ibn Majah, Siyam, 2.
[iv] Baqarah, 2/183.
[v] Bukhari, Sawm, 9; Muslim, Siyam, 29.
[vi] Zumar, 39/23.
[vii] Nasa'i, Salat al-'Idayn, 22.
[viii] Bukhari, Iman, 27.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services


"
94;2017-11-24;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 24.11.2017

	

MAWLID AN-NABI



Peace and Blessings Be Upon You O Messenger of Allah! Peace and Blessings Be Upon You O Beloved of Allah! Peace and Blessings Be upon You O the Prophet Who is The Mercy to the Worlds!

Brothers and Sisters!

We are going to observe Mawlid An-Nabi together on the night that connects Wednesday to Thursday next week. We will once again joyfully celebrate the birth of our Master Muhammad Mustafa (pbuh), who was sent to this world as a mercy to the worlds. May your night be blessed in advance. May Our Almighty Lord never devoid us of the fondness and reverence we have towards The Greatest Messenger. May He never let us stray from his path and from his valuable sunnah for one moment.

Honorable Believers!

The Messenger of Allah is the last prophet who reminds the humanity of their responsibilities and duties. We are honored to be his ummah. He taught us to have an outlook on life and death, on the past and the future that is worthy of a believer. He showed us submission and loyalty, the right and the truth, mercy and conscience, justice and virtue, patience and tolerance with his exemplary life.

Brothers and Sisters!

Our first task as the ummah of our Prophet (pbuh) is to know and understand him correctly. To know and understand him correctly, one must first understand the reason and purpose of creation, humanitarian and moral values, his understanding of life and his merciful and compassionate view. Knowing our Prophet correctly will lead the way for us to understand our book of life, the Quran, better. Because our Holy Book was transformed into a living example by our Prophet.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Our Lord Almighty enjoins: “There has certainly been for you in the Messenger of Allah an excellent pattern for anyone whose hope is in Allah and the Last Day and [who] remembers Allah often.”  Our Prophet (pbuh) stated that he is the prophet of mercy and repentance. 

This verse and hadith shows us that the actual task for us is to understand our Prophet correctly and practice Quran into our lives correctly, just as he taught us by his life. It is to adopt the example and great moral character of our Prophet as a principle for ourselves. It is to endeavor to be an exemplary believer and a good person like him. It is to try our best to be a faithful spouse, a dutiful child, a compassionate grandfather and a merciful father like him. It is to be known as a trusted neighbor, a sincere brother or sister, a faithful relative like him.

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

	Today, mankind is in need of our Prophet’s (pbuh) great moral character and unique example more than ever. Because humanity is swaying in the whirlpool of disturbance and in the darkness of cruelty and injustice. Terror, violence, war and savagery are widespread especially in the Islamic geography because the ideals of our Prophet and his views on existence and humanity are not understood and embraced correctly. People are ruthlessly murdered in Islamic regions every day because the Prophet’s view that is based on not killing, but rejuvenating has been put aside. 

Brothers and Sisters!

		The greatest betrayal against the Prophet (pbuh) today would be the abuse of his holy name to support some dark ideas and the gathering of power and interests by abusing the noble values he presented to humanity. It also would be the shameless exploitation of the pure love and fondness that people have in their hearts for their prophet. It should not be forgotten that the sunnah and the character of our Prophet, his exemplary life and the noble values he passed down on us are trusted on each one of us as believers. May our Lord make us His trustworthy servants who protect what is entrusted to us.

Honorable Believers!

Today is the teachers’ day, to whom we entrust our children and who make great efforts to educate our generations. While I congratulate the day of our esteemed teachers, I also want to remind you that tomorrow is “International Day for the Elimination of Violence against Women”. With the opportunity these two days give us, we should never forget how our Prophet valued education, scholars and women. We should not neglect our tasks and responsibilities.

I want to conclude this khutba with these lines of our poet of independence for our Prophet:

What this world has, all is from him,

People are beholden to him, each and every one,

All humanity is beholden to that innocent man,

O Lord! Gather us on Judgment Day with this belief!"
95;2017-08-04;"
Province    : General
Date   : 04.08.2017


[pic]

                BEING THE DEVOUT SERVANT OF THE MOST MERCIFUL
    My Dear Brothers!
    Once the Prophet (?), when talking to his Sahaba, briefly described  the
good characteristics a Muslim should possess as follows: A believer is  like
a bee which eats that which is pure and wholesome and  lays  that  which  is
pure and wholesome. When it lands on something it does  not  break  or  ruin
it.""[i]

    Dear Believers!
    Our great Lord praises his servants in the Quran al-Karim.  He  promises
them eternal blessing which no eyes have seen, no ears  have  heard  and  no
mind has imagined. Come, and let us today in this Khutbah all  heed  to  the
traits of those servants, who have been blessed  with  praise  of  the  most
Merciful.

    My Brothers!
    The devout servants of the most Merciful are those  who  walk  upon  the
earth with humility. They never act arrogant,  get  full  of  themselves  or
think they are better than others. For they know that the way to  betterment
goes through being dutiful and  responsible  to  Allah.  Getting  proud  and
arrogant, lording over others will only distance the person from  the  Mercy
and pleasure of Allah.

    The devout servants of the most Merciful, [pic]would abstain  from  vain
speech and actions that has no benefit in this world or the  next.  They  do
not heed taunts of the ignorant. They say ""Peace"" and walk  away.  For  they
know that stepping over the  line,  arrogance  and  being  vulgar,  are  not
actions befitting of a believer. What is fitting  of  a  believer  is  being
considerate,  act  respectful,  be  far  sighted  and  not  to  stray   from
moderation. His example in this is  the  warning  of  our  Prophet  (?):  ""A
Muslim cannot be a rude, shameless person who slanders, curses  and  is  bad
mouthed.""[ii]

    My Dear Brothers!
    The devout servants of the most  Merciful  are  those  who  have  submit
themselves to  Allah  from  the  bottom  of  their  hearts.  The  most  open
manifestation of this  submission  is  their  reverent  prostration  in  the
silence of the night. The expressions of their loyalty are the  prayers  and
Istighfar which they direct to Allah with sincerity  in  the  providence  of
the dawn. They are the ones who plead regretfully  from  their  heart  [pic]
""Our Lord, avert from us the punishment of Hell!"" when they sin.

    The devout servants of the most Merciful,
[pic] are neither stingy  nor  wasteful.  They  seek  to  keep  the  balance
between these two in their spendings. They abstain from wasting the  wealth,
time, and health which our great Lord has given as a blessing. They  believe
that one day all blessings that have been given will be brought to  account.
And when necessary they do not back down from any sacrifice for Allah.

     My Dear Brothers!
     The devout servants of the most Merciful are always honest and straight
as the letter Alif. They do not stray  from  the  Sirat  al-Mustaqim  for  a
second. They do not bow before any being  other  than  Allah.  They  reserve
their servitude just to him. They do  not  let  their  minds  or  hearts  be
imprisoned to any mortal. They do not slay a life decreed  Haram  by  Allah.
They do not get involved in adultery. They do not commit actions that  would
harm the honour or Iffah of a human.

     The devout servants of the most Merciful,
[pic]abstain from one of the biggest sins, being a false  witness.  They  do
not corrupt their minds with bad thoughts. They do not  turn  their  tongues
into poisonous arrows by lying  and  slandering.  They  do  not  believe  in
baseless words or get bothered by bad  situations.  For  they  know  all  of
these are the sources of evil, Fitnah and  corruption;  the  reason  of  all
unrest and degeneration. The duty of a believer is  to  always  protect  the
Truth. To always be at the side of the right.  Be  the  interpreter  of  the
truth.

     The devout servants of the most Merciful,
[pic] do not turn blind and deaf when they are reminded  of  the  verses  of
their Lord. They try to understand our book of life, the  Qur'an,  correctly
and  to  live  in  accordance  with  it  in  the  best  possible  way.  They
contemplate the universe we live in and  the  perfect  Ayah  of  Allah,  the
human. They see life and events that happen as lessons.

    My Dear Brothers!
    The devout servants of the most Merciful pray ""Our Lord, grant  us  from
among our wives and offspring comfort to our eyes and  make  us  an  example
for the righteous.""
[pic]   Those will be awarded the  highest  places  of  Paradise  for  their
patience. They will  be  received  therein  with  greetings  and  peace  and
abiding eternally  therein.  What  a  good  settlement  and  residence  this
is![iii]

    How happy is he who can be the devout servant of the most Merciful!  How
happy is he, who lives according to the purpose and wisdom of his  creation,
and wins the pleasure of Allah! How happy is he, who  follows  the  path  of
peace! How happy is he, who changes  this  mortal  world  into  an  immortal
profit!
-----------------------
[i] Ibn Hanbel, II, 199.
[ii] Tirmizî, Birr, 48; Ibn Hanbel, I, 405.
[iii] Al-Furkân, 25/63-76.

      Prepared by: Directorate General Bureau of Religious Services

"
96;2020-02-28;"DATE: 28.02.2020



OUR FIGHT, AND SPIRIT OF UNITY AND SOLIDARITY IN THE CAUSE OF ALLAH

Honorable Muslims!

In the verse I have recited, Allah the Almighty states, “Among the believers are men true to what they promised Allah. Among them is he who has fulfilled his vow [to the death], and among them is he who awaits [his chance]. And they did not alter the terms of their commitment by any alteration.”

In the hadith I have read, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) says, “He who fights that Allah's word should be superior fights in Allah’s cause.”

Dear Believers!

We as a nation are facing great challenges and going through heavy tests today, just as we did in the past. Today, too, we are putting up a restless fight against those powers, who has their conscience blinded and lost their mercy and humanity, and aims to remove us from the stage of the history, just as in the Battle of Gallipoli and the War of Independence in the past. Today, too, we, together with each and every individual of our noble nation regardless of man, woman, young, or elder, will not let anybody pull our national flag down the post, silent our adhans, or tread on our homeland.

It is the unshakable faith we have in Allah (swt) that will allow us to come out as victorious. It is our unconditional love for our homeland, our adhan, our national flag, and our independence. It is the desire to fall martyr in the cause of Allah or live on as a veteran that we have deep in our hearts. This is such a great faith and love for homeland that Allah the Almighty gives the good news to those who, with this great love, have sacrificed their lives in this cause, “And never think of those who have been killed in the cause of Allah as dead. Rather, they are alive with their Lord, receiving provision, rejoicing in what Allah has bestowed upon them of His bounty.”

Dear Muslims!

Our soldiers has been and will always be standing by the oppressed against the oppressors. They are at the battlefronts for the good of the world and shield their chests for humanity. They are mobilized to rush to help of those whose rights are infringed and removed from them.

Our soldiers place faith in the following verse and stand firm by the side of the truth against the falsehood, 

وَقُلْ جَٓاءَ الْحَقُّ وَزَهَقَ الْبَاطِلُۜ اِنَّ الْبَاطِلَ كَانَ زَهُوقاً

“And say, ‘Truth has come, and falsehood has departed. Indeed is falsehood, [by nature], ever bound to depart.’”

Our soldiers run from victory to victory with the heartfelt committment to the verse, 

وَلَا تَهِنُوا وَلَا تَحْزَنُوا وَاَنْتُمُ الْاَعْلَوْنَ اِنْ كُنْتُمْ مُؤْمِن۪ينَ

 “So do not weaken and do not grieve, and you will be superior if you are true believers.”

They say “Stop!” to the graceless attacks of the enemy, satisfying the Prophet Muhammad’s call,

جَاهِدُوا بِأَيْدِيكُمْ وَأَلْسِنَتِكُمْ وَأَمْوَالِكُمْ

“Fight in the cause of Allah with your wealth and lives.”

Dear Believers! 

Yesterday an atrocious attacked targeted our soldiers who were mobilized to bring peace to the terror-torn geographies, hope to those whose hopes were aimed to be destroyed, and stability to those whose lives were set upside down. Our pain is unbearable, our heart broken. May the noble souls of our martyrs be blessed by Allah (swt). May Allah bless our nation with patience for our losses. May Allah bless the injured with a speedy recovery. May Allah never ever let any such sorrow hit us.

Let us not forget this important point that there is no fight out of which we cannot come out as victorious as long as we as a nation clamp tightly together with each other around the values that make us ‘us’. There is no heinous attack that we cannot bear against or no victory that we cannot win as long as we keep alive our spirit of unity, solidarity, and brotherhood. There is no doubt that with the help of Allah, the plans of treachery will be disrupted, the traps and cheats of the oppressors will become thorn in their own sides. Today, too, it will be our noble nation standing by the truth and the right that will be victorious just as in the past. As expressed in the Holy Qur’an, سَيُهْزَمُ الْجَمْعُ وَيُوَلُّونَ الدُّبُرَ “Their assembly will be defeated, and they will turn their backs in retreat.”

Honorable Muslims!

Let us open our hands and hearts to pray Allah in this hour when prayers are accepted. Let us all beg our Exalted Lord (swt).

O Allah! Bestow Your help and victory upon our heroic army, and Your grace and barakah upon our heavenly homeland!

O Allah! Bless our martyrs with Your mercy, our veterans with Your grace, and our nation with Your compassion!

O Lord! Do not let our adhans be silenced! Do not let anybody or anything divide our homeland! Do not let anybody pull our flag down the pole, o Allah! Do not make us bow down before anybody! Protect our soldiers from any kind of evil and harm!

O Lord! Strengthen our unity and solidarity and increase our patience and resoluteness! Ease our pains and griefs and bless our hopes with victory! Amin!"
97;2019-05-17;"
DATE: 17.05.2019
                                    [pic]
            A GOOD MUSLIM ACCORDING TO THE PROPHET MUHAMMAD (SAW)
    Honorable Muslims!
    The Almighty Allah (swt) states in the verse I have just recited: ""O  ye
who believe! Fear Allah as He should be feared, and  die  not  except  in  a
state of Islam.""[i]

    Prophet Muhammad (saw) says in the hadith I have recited: ""A  Muslim  is
he from whose hand and tongue the Muslims are safe.""[ii]

    Dear Muslims!
    The most precious treasure of Muslims is their iman. Iman is the biggest
blessing that will rejoin us with peace in this world and with salvation  in
the Hereafter. The Prophet Muhammad (saw) gives glad  tidings  to  the  ones
who own this blessing: ""Whoever testifies sincerely that  there  is  no  god
but Allah and that Muhammad is the messenger of Allah, Allah would  prohibit
the fire of hell for him.""[iii]

    Iman is an unequalled jewel and a unique opportunity. Iman  is  recovery
for sorrows and shield against sins. It is a power that  protects  Believers
from evil under any circumstances and that  leads  them  to  benevolence.  A
person who values iman should preserve his iman and  exercise  due  care  to
live a life suitable to his iman. Then he will be  closer  to  the  Almighty
Allah (swt) and will  be  released  from  being  slave  of  the  meaningless
desires and nine days' wonders.

    Honorable Muslims!
    The way of strengthening the iman in our  hearts  is  not  to  skip  our
worships, because iman is fed  with  worship.  Worship  is  the  essence  of
servitude and the purpose of the creation of human.  It  is  to  submit  our
condition to the Almighty Allah (swt) without any mediator  and  means.  The
Messenger  of  Allah  (saw)  advices  believers   on   this   issue:   ""Keep
worshipping, establishing fard (obligatory) prayers, giving fard  zakat  and
observing the fasting  in  Ramadan  without  assigning  partners  to  Allah.
Behave towards people in a way you would like to be behaved.""[iv]

    Then the requirements of your loyalty to tawhid and the  iman  to  Allah
(swt) are primarily to perform the fard worships such  as  prayer,  fasting,
zakat and hajj. It is the virtue of Muslims to try  to  receive  consent  of
their Almighty Allah (swt) by means of nafl (supererogatory) worships.

    Honorable Believers!
    What completes iman and worship is only the good morals.  The  Messenger
of Allah (saw) states in a hadith, ""The most complete of  the  believers  in
faith are those with best character.""[v] To adopt moral virtues and to  stay
away from ill tempers are essential responsibilities of believers.

    Believers take our Prophet Muhammad (saw) ""who was only sent to  perfect
good character""[vi]as an example at every stage of their  lives.  They  have
mercy on the young people and show respect to the elders.  They  assure  the
people around  them  and  observe  whatever  entrusted  to  them.  They  are
truthful and do not resort to lies. They are generous and do not be  stingy.
They  behave  towards  their  mother,  father,  spouse,  children  and   all
creatures animate or inanimate with affection and never resort to violence.

    Honorable Believers!
    What a great honour to be a member  of  the  ummah  of  Muhammad  (saw)!
However, being the members of the best ummah selected out of the  family  of
humanity requires responsibility at the same time. When we read the  hadiths
of our Beloved Prophet (saw) we see that he describes a Muslim  as  follows:
A Muslim is person who knows that he will not enter Paradise until  he  have
faith and will not have faith until he loves his brothers.[vii] Muslim is  a
person who becomes happy when he does a favour and gets sad when he does  an
evil.[viii] Muslim does not defame and curse people, does not use  rude  and
bad words and does not be shameless.[ix] He stays  away  from  alcohol,  the
mother of evils, from gambling, which wastes his life,  and  from  adultery,
which  requires  the  wrath  of  Allah  (swt).[x]  Muslim  avoids  assigning
partners to Allah (swt), does not murder people, does not  utilize  interest
and does not take advantage of the wealth of  an  orphan.  Muslim  does  not
slander his brothers and sisters, does not be talebearer and does  not  take
part in fitnah and mischief.[xi]

    Dear Muslims!
    The Messenger of Allah (saw) says in a hadith: ""The best of you  is  the
one from whom people expect good deeds, and from  whose  evil  deeds  people
are safe; the worst of you is the one from whom  people  expect  good  deeds
but from whose evil deeds people are not  safe.""[xii]  Then,  let  us  exert
efforts to be a good Muslim as our Prophet Muhammad (saw) taught us. Let  us
enlighten our hearts with iman. Let us  feed  them  with  worships.  Let  us
polish them with good deeds and good morals. Let us be the key for  goodness
and the lock against evil at every stage of our lives.

    Honorable Believers!
    While ending my khutbah I would like to share an issue with  you.  Under
the leadership of our  Presidency  of  Religious  Affairs  and  our  Turkiye
Diyanet Foundation, services are taken to every corner of  our  country  and
to every part of the world thanks to the  support  of  our  self-sacrificing
nation. Healthy accommodation environments are prepared  for  our  students,
they are provided with scholarship and  educational  and  cultural  support,
our orphan and poor brothers and sisters are supported with free  education.
In this unique climate of the month of Ramadan, you can  be  light  of  hope
for thousands of young  people  by  means  of  zakat,  sadaqah  al-fitr  and
donations and cover for  their  needs.  Within  this  scope,  following  the
Friday prayer, we will resort to your  aids  full  of  love,  affection  and
brotherhood. May the Almighty Allah (swt) accept all  of  our  previous  and
future aids in the presence of Him.
-----------------------
[i] Ali 'Imran, 3/102.
[ii] Muslim, Iman, 65; Bukhari, Iman, 4.
[iii] Bukhari, 'Ilm, 49.
[iv] Ibn Hanbal, VI, 384.
[v] Abu Dawud, Sunnah, 15.
[vi] Ibn Hanbal, II, 381.
[vii] Muslim, Iman, 93.
[viii] Ibn Hanbal, IV, 399.
[ix] Tirmidhi, Birr, 48.
[x] Ibn Majah, Ashriba, 1; Abu Dawud, Ashriba, 5; Bukhari, Qusuf, 2.
[xi] Bukhari, Wasaya, 23; Tabarani, al-Majmua al-Qabir, XII, 340.
[xii] Tirmidhi, Fitan, 76; Ibn Hanbal, II, 368.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
98;2018-09-28;"
DATE: 28.09.2018
                                    [pic]
             MOSQUES, AND LIVES DEDICATED IN SERVICE OF RELIGION

    Jumu'ah Mubarak, Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    The first thing done following the Hijrah to Madinah  by  our  beloved
Prophet (saw), who was sent as a mercy to the worlds, was to have  a  masjid
built there. Right alongside this masjid, which we know by the name  of  al-
Masjid al-Nabawi, he (saw) had a  canopy  built  for  the  lonely  and  poor
companions to take shelter. Those companions who lived in the canopy  called
Suffah spent most of their time  with  the  Messenger  of  Allah  (saw)  and
learned Islam. One day our Prophet (saw) saw his companions sitting  in  two
groups when he entered the  masjid.  In  one  group,  some  companions  were
reciting the Qur'an and praying. In  the  other  group  were  sitting  those
companions who were learning and teaching. After  watching  them  with  eyes
filled with love and mercy, our Prophet (saw) sat near those companions  who
were learning and teaching after saying,  ""Both  of  them  are  good.  These
people are reciting the Qur'an and supplicating to Allah, and  if  He  wills
He will give them, and if He wills He will withhold  from  them.  And  these
people are learning and teaching. Verily I have been sent as a teacher.""[i]

    Honorable Muslims!
    Masjids and mosques have been honorable places for us to worship  Allah,
and acquire knowledge and wisdom  since  the  Asr  al-Sa'adah  (the  Age  of
Bliss). Mosques which are the most favored places in the sight of  Allah[ii]
are sacred places in  which  we  contemplate  Lord (swt)  and  present  our
servitude, du'as, and invocations to Him (swt). Mosques unite the believing
hearts without discrimination of language, color, race,  rank  or  position;
consolidate our unity; and  represent  our  faith  and  independence.  Their
minarets are the symbol of oneness;  their  adhans  are  the  foundation  of
shahadah; their mihrab, pulpit, and minbar are the voice of  the  right  and
truth; and their rows and ranks are the assurance of peace and trust.

    Esteemed Believers!
    People who carried out duties in mosques and served for the religion  of
Islam from their minbar, mihrab,  and  pulpit  were  deemed  worthy  by  our
ancestors to  be  called  as  ""Hadamah  al-Khayrat"",  meaning  ""Servants of
Goodness"".

    Servants of goodness are people who devote their lives  in  service  of
religion. They are those  people  who  work  sincerely  and  seek  only  the
countenance of Allah (swt) for the good they do. A mufti gives direction  to
the spiritual life in cities; a muadhdhin calls humanity to  salvation  with
adhans; an imam leads the prayer in mihrabs; a wa'iz teaches  the  straight
path of Islam from minbars and pulpits. A  Qur'anic  course  teacher  brings
together our children with the Holy Qur'an and the  exemplary  life  of  the
Prophet (saw), and is the beneficiary  of  the  Prophetic  compliment,  ""The
best of you is he who learns the Qur'an  and  teaches  it.""[iii].  They  are
those who try to become the beneficiary of  our  Lord's  (swt)  glad tiding
""And who is better in  speech  than  one  who  invites  to  Allah  and  does
righteousness and says, 'Indeed, I am of the Muslims.'""[iv]

    They are the ones who are with us at every stage of our lives. They  are
there to whisper the divine glad tiding of adhan and iqama in  the  ears  of
our newly born babies. They are there in the most memorable moments  of  our
childhood, and provide guidance at our young  ages  when  guidance  is  most
needed. They are always there with their  prayers  when  we  leave  for  the
military service, when we take a step to  start  a  family,  and  eventually
when we depart from this world for the eternal journey.

    Honorable Believers!
    Every year, the first week of October is celebrated as the Week of the
Mosques and Religious Officials. This year, it will be celebrated with the
theme of ""Mosques, and Lives Dedicated in Service of Religion"", and the
importance and place of mosques in our civilization and the exemplary
people who have dedicated their lives in service of religion will be
highlighted throughout the week. The support and sacrifices of our esteemed
nation for the improvement of our mosques and Qur'anic courses will be
remembered.

    Esteemed Believers!
    I would like to take this opportunity to pray Allah the  Almighty  (swt)
for mercy for our deceased brother and sister religious officials,  and  for
a healthy and peaceful life  for  the  remaining  ones,  who  all  have  put
efforts, from the past to the present day, in  the  material  and  spiritual
reconstruction of our mosques. May the  Lord  Almighty  (swt)  allow  us  to
become a servant of goodness and provide good services for humanity.
-----------------------
[i] Ibn Majah, Sunnah, 17.
[ii] Muslim, Masajid, 288.
[iii] Tirmidhi, Fadhail al-Qur'an, 15.
[iv] Fussilat, 41/33.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
99;2018-05-04;"DATE: 04.05.2018                 FOUNDATIONS – EVER-FLOWING 

FOUNTAINS OF BENEVOLENCE

Honorable Believers!

Umar (r.a) had come into the possession of a date palm orchard in Khaybar. It was the first time in his life that he had such a beautiful orchard. He came into the presence of Allah’s Messenger (s.a.w.) and said, “O the Messenger of Allah! I would like to attain the countenance of Allah with this property, so what do you command me to do with it?” Our Prophet’s counsel on this land has been the keystone for the civilization of foundations for centuries to come. He (s.a.w.) said, “If you like, you may keep the corpus intact and give its produce as Sadaqah.” Thereupon, Umar endowed his orchard with the condition that it should not be sold, impropriated and bequeathed.

Dear Believers!

The divine messages of our sublime book the Holy Qur’an and the exemplary life of our Prophet (s.a.w.) have encouraged Muslims to do charity works throughout the history of Islam. Muslims have strived to perpetuate the charity, adopting as principle the verse from the Qur’an, “Never will you attain the good [reward] until you spend [in the way of Allah] from that which you love. And whatever you spend - indeed, Allah is Knowing of it.”. Both the companions of the Prophet and the following generations acted with the awareness that foundations are ever-flowing fountains of benevolence. Thus, the four corners of the Islamic world have been furnished with foundations – the most precious sources bringing goodness to humanity. 

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Foundation turns into permanent goodness with the wealth spent in hope of winning the love and countenance of Allah. Foundation is to build bridges of mercy and compassion with the fortune gifted to us by our Lord. Foundation is the attempt to transform the wealth entrusted to the believers into a way of worship. Foundation is the name of charity without abashing people, without letting the left hand know of what the right hand gives.



Brothers and Sisters!

Investments in generosity and bestowment casting aside selfishness and ambition turn into continuous merits by means of foundations. Our civilization hosts many foundations providing haven for passengers, food for the poor, jobs for the unemployed, support for those in debt, and family for students. Our foundations are means of home of affection for the orphans, a touch of healing for the sick, a helping hand for the needy, and peace for the elderly. Our historical foundations, established for the protection of the forests and the injured and homeless animals, are unique examples of regarding not only for humans, but also all beings –animate and inanimate alike– with compassion. 

Honorable Believers!

Today, we still benefit from the foundations established by our noble-hearted forefathers at home and abroad. Mosques, fountains, hostelries, caravanserais, barracks, hospitals, libraries and many other charity services continue to exist as the reminders of our ancestors.

Come, let us protect these eminent heirlooms entrusted from the past; let us strengthen our tradition of foundations with a noble heart. Let us look after these sincere-at-heart foundations of ours, established for the ruling of the earth by benevolence and charity, goodness and beauty. 

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Bringing donations from our charitable nation to people in need from all over the world, the Turkiye Diyanet Foundation is building mosques in our country and in the crucial regions of the world. Our nation, enshrining the adhan in their hearts, is showing an intense interest in the charity campaign “One Brick from Me”, which has been initiated recently by the Presidency of Religious Affairs of Turkey and our Foundation, and is still continuing. For this reason, we would like to express our gratitude to our grateful community. May Allah Almighty accept your donations in His rule of excellence. Even the smallest donation you make will be a brick on the walls of a mosque maybe in Kosovo, or in Djibouti, or at a university campus mosque in any city of our country.

I would like to conclude this khutbah with the following hadith from Our Prophet, “When a man dies, his all acts come to an end except three: ongoing charity (sadaqah jariyyah), knowledge (by which people benefit), and a pious son or daughter who prays for him (after he is deceased).”"
100;2017-12-08;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 08.12.2017



Our Bleeding Wound: Al-Quds

Blessed Friday to You, Honorable Believers!

Our Lord Almighty enjoins in the verse I have recited: “Limitless in His glory is He who transported His servant by night from the Inviolable House of Worship (at Mecca) to the Remote House of Worship (,at Al-Quds) - the environs of which We had blessed -so that We might show him some of Our symbols: for, verily, He alone is all-hearing, all-seeing.” 

Our Prophet (pbuh) says in the hadith I have read: “Do not undertake a journey (for religious devotion) to visit any Mosque, but three: this Mosque of mine, the Mosque of al-Haram and the Mosque of Aqsa.” 

Brothers and Sisters!

Al-Quds is the apple of our eyes. Al-Quds is our unceasing longing. Al-Quds is a city where many prophets strived for the cause of tawhid. It is a sacred and blessed city with its name and environs. Al-Quds is Al-Qudsi Ash-Sharif. It is also known as Bayt-al-Maqdis. Many prophets such as Ibrahim, Yaqub, Musa, Sulayman and Isa lived in Al-Quds and its surrounding region, which has been the cradle to many civilizations for thousands of years. The last sacred guest of Al-Quds became our Master Muhammad Mustafa (pbuh) with the event of Isra and Miraj. Moreover, the first kiblah of Islam, Al-Aqsa Mosque, is in Al-Quds.

Al-Quds and Al-Aqsa Mosque are the glad tidings of our Prophet that he entrusted to us. Al-Quds is an honorable city which every believer is attached dearly. Al-Quds is not just a mere piece of land. Al-Quds is not just the cause of those who live around Palestine and Al-Aqsa Mosque, it is a common cause of all Muslims and humanity.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Al-Quds found peace with the conquest of Umar. Muslims governed Al-Quds with a fair and just rule for many years. They respected everyone’s life, property and beliefs. In fact, even non-Muslims sought the justice of Islam for the disputes they had amongst themselves. But Al-Quds, Darussalam, the center of peace and tranquility, has been crestfallen for a long time and bleeding for years. Al-Quds is our bleeding wound and unceasing pain today. Al-Quds has suffered from all kinds of attacks and ceased to be the city of peace. Guns keep firing in the city of prophets. Innocent people are being murdered.

Brothers and Sisters!

Those living in and around Al-Quds are exposed to inhuman practices such as oppression, violence and isolation. People’s freedom of life, belief and thought are attempted against without mercy and their identity and character, dignity and honor are targeted. While it was not long ago that believers were kept away from Mosque of Aqsa, today they are trying to invade Al-Quds. A reckless understanding that totally disregards humanity, ancient traditions and international law is now in an effort to make Al-Quds the capital of Israel. 

Let it be known that such reckless efforts would turn Al-Quds and its region into a land of conflict and disturbance. Such unacceptable attempts are a great blow dealt to the common sense and conscience of humanity. It is a dangerous step towards destroying peace, order and security.

Dear Believers!

Mankind suffers great pains due to negative developments like violence, oppression, war and migration. In addition to all these, such efforts against Al-Quds, far from foresight and discernment, devoid of mercy and conscience, have disturbed everyone with a common sense. Our task against all these is to never consent to these negative developments. It is to never tolerate what is wrong and unjust, wherever in the world and regardless of their victims. 

It is a fact that there are many lessons to be taken from all the disasters, oppression and suffering that our brothers and sisters, the Islamic geography and the humanity are subjected to. Come, let us strengthen our brotherhood of faith with the consciousness of umma as quickly as possible. Let us protect each other's dignity and rights. Let each of us work with all our strength to free ourselves from the difficulties, pains and deprivations that we are in. Let us live our beliefs, our values and teach them to future generations.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Our holy nation has never severed and will not severe the ties of affection with Al-Quds, Al-Aqsa Mosque and our oppressed Palestinian brothers and sisters throughout history. With this in our minds, we open our hands to our Lord in this time of Friday and ask: O Allah! Let us be among those Muslims who feel the pain of all their oppressed brothers and sisters in the world and use everything they have to help them, materially and spiritually! Let us not side with those who lack foresight, discernment, conscience and those who oppress!

O Allah! Do not allow those who try to invade Al-Quds and Islamic cities, those who bring disorder and sabotage peace under the guise of improvement! Accept our prayers for the sake of this holy Friday, o Allah!"
101;2020-01-31;"
DATE: 31.01.2020
[pic]
             FOSTERING A GREATER AWARENESS OF NATURAL DISASTERS
    Honorable Muslims!
    A powerful earthquake hit our country last week. The sorrow and pain  it
caused broke our hearts. Tens of our brothers and sisters lost their  lives.
We all rushed for those people who got injured and lost  their  homes.  Once
again we came face to face with the reality of  natural  disasters.  We  all
wish the Almighty Allah's mercy upon  our  brothers  and  sisters  who  lost
their lives in this calamitous event, may He grant their families and  loved
ones with the best of patience. May He  bless  the  injured  with  a  speedy
recovery. May He enable the  victims  of  the  earthquake  to  recover,  get
better, and hold on to life soon.  May  He  protect  our  people  from  such
natural disasters.

    Dear Believers!
    The universe runs in an order based on the divine laws and rules  called
""Sunnat al-Allah"". The Almighty Allah has put these laws in place  with  His
omnipotent power and knowledge. Earth, air, water, and  fire  each  has  its
specific nature and balance. People need  to  live  in  such  a  way  as  to
protect such nature and balance.

    Earthquakes, too, happen in accordance with the divine laws. People  are
not able to prevent earthquakes, nor are they able to change their time  and
magnitude. They can, however, take certain measures not  to  get  harmed  in
them. Only by taking necessary measures is it possible to minimize the  loss
of life and property  caused  by  natural  disasters  such  as  earthquakes,
floods, and fires.

    Dear Muslims!
    The Almighty Allah states in the Holy Qur'an, ""We will surely  test  you
with something of fear and hunger  and  a  loss  of  wealth  and  lives  and
fruits. Give good tidings to the patient!""[i] Muslims,  then,  live  in  the
know that they will face  various  troubles  in  this  world  of  tests  and
trials. They are aware of their  limits  and  incapabilities,  and  are,  as
servants of Allah, in need  of  Him.  They  make  every  effort  practicably
possible to endure the troubles to come their  way.  They  use  their  mind,
knowledge, and experience, and take necessary precautions. Thereafter,  they
submit themselves to and rely on Allah (swt), as required by the  iman  they
have. Even stronger than before, they come out of the troubles they are  hit
by through patience.  They  pass  the  divine  test  and  trial  by  showing
gratitude  for  the  blessings  and  patience  for  the  hardships.  Prophet
Muhammad (saw) describes this situation of Muslims  as,  ""How  wonderful  is
the case of a believer; there  is  good  for  him  in  everything  and  this
applies only  to  a  believer.  If  prosperity  attends  him,  he  expresses
gratitude to Allah and that is good for him; and if adversity  befalls  him,
he endures it patiently and that is better for him.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    What suits a Muslim is to have a sense of responsibility against natural
disasters. What Allah (swt) has ordained  is  meant  to  happen;  and,  what
falls upon us is to take  necessary  measures  and  rely  on  Him.  In  this
respect, Prophet Muhammad (saw) describes the  stance  Muslims  should  have
against troubles,  ""Allah  dislikes  negligence  and  idleness.  You  should
behave reasonably. However, once there is nothing  left  that  you  can  do,
then say, [pic]'Sufficient is Allah for me.  He  is  the  Best  Disposer  of
affairs.'""[iii]

    So, let us draw lessons from bitter experiences. Let us all get prepared
against natural disasters for a safe and secure life. Let us make right  and
proper moves  in  accordance  with  the  balances  of  the  nature  and  the
realities of the region we live in. Let us  inform  our  family  members  on
disasters and emergencies.

    Dear Muslims!
    Alhamdulillah, today, too, just as in  the  past,  we  heal  our  wounds
together as a nation regardless  of  differences  in  faith,  sects,  ethnic
origins, and ideologies. It is never enough to express our appreciation  for
the support of our state and  the  solidarity  of  our  nation.  Our  noble,
sacrificing, and generous nation are thankfully the addressee  of  the  good
news given by the Prophet Muhammad (saw), ""Allah  will  help  His  slave  so
long as His slave helps his brother.""[iv]
-----------------------
[i] Baqarah, 2/155.
[ii] Muslim, Zuhd, 64.
[iii] Abu Dawud, Aqdiyya, 28.
[iv] Abu Dawud, Adab, 60.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
102;2020-01-10;"
DATE: 10.01.2020
           [pic]SOME DU'AS IN THE WORDS OF PROPHET MUHAMMAD (SAW)
    Honorable Muslims!
    In this temporary world we have some days  we  show  gratitude  for  the
blessings we are bestowed upon and some other days we show patience for  the
troubles we have to endure. We try our best to welcome sorrow and  hardships
as would be appropriate for a Muslim just like we do so  when  it  comes  to
success  and  happiness.  We  are  blessed  with  a  unique  blessing   that
strengthen our faith in and reliance upon Allah (swt), gives us hope  and  a
spirit to try better. That blessing is what is  the  essence  of  the  whole
worships: du'a.

    It is our sincere  entreaty  and  appeal  to  Allah  (swt).  It  is  our
confession that we are weak before His omnipotent power. It is  our  seeking
refuge in His grace and forgiveness. It is our submission  of  servitude  to
Him and asking help from Him.

    Dear Believers!
    In the verse I recited as I began the khutbah the Almighty  Allah  (swt)
states, ""And when My servants ask you, o Muhammad, concerning Me - indeed  I
am near. I respond to the invocation of the supplicant when  he  calls  upon
Me. So let them respond to Me by obedience and believe in Me that  they  may
be rightly guided.""[i]

    One of the names of Allah (swt), al-Mujib, means the answerer of  du'as.
He is Who is closer to us than even our  own  self,  and  hears,  knows  and
responds to all our du'as, whether implied or express.

    Dear Muslims!
    Prophet Muhammad (saw), in all actions of  whom  we  see  his  love  and
loyalty to Allah (swt), was in a constant state of invocation to  Him.   Day
or night, with people around or by himself,  when  happy,  afraid,  or  sad,
when lost in thoughts about the Hereafter, in his home,  by  the  minbar  of
the masjid, during travel, in short in all instances of life he  would  make
du'a. Du'a in his life was like threads interlaced in a piece of fabric.  It
was he who taught us how to make du'a.

    Waking up in the morning, he would start  his  day  with  the  following
du'a, ""O Allah! With Your Power we have  come  to  the  morning,  with  Your
Power we come to the evening, with Your Power we live, and we  die,  and  to
You will we return.""[ii]

    In observance of the approval of Allah (swt)  all  day  long,  he  would
always rely on and trust in Him, and pray, ""O, Allah! Give me what  is  good
for me and choose what is best for me.""[iii]
                                                                       [pic]
""O, Allah! Grant us good both in this world and in the  Hereafter.  Save  us
from the torment of of  hellfire!""[iv]  was  how  he  supplicated  to  Allah
(swt).

    When by gone is the day and down falls the night,  he  would  pray,  ""O,
Allah! I want from You the good out of what will happen tonight and  in  its
aftermath. I seek refuge in You from the evil of what  will  happen  tonight
and in its aftermath.""[v]When he would go to  sleep,  he  would  pray,  ""All
praise and thanks be to You, Who provides us with  food  and  drink,  covers
our needs and shelters us while there are countless people who has no  place
for accommodation and no person to provide for them.""[vi]

    Dear Believers!
    Du'a is the servant's search for refuge in Allah  (swt)  for  remedy  to
sorrows, for protection from all evils,  and  for  safety  against  troubles
whether visible or invisible. In this respect Prophet Muhammad  (saw)  would
seek refuge in Allah (swt) as follows: ""O, Allah! Verily, I seek  refuge  in
You  from  weakness,  laziness,  senility  (of   old   age),   cowardliness,
stinginess and the torment of the grave. Give my soul its  good  and  purify
it, for You are the best to purify it. You  are  its  Guardian  and  Master.
Verily, I seek refuge in You from a heart that is not humble,  a  soul  that
is not satisfied, knowledge that does not benefit and  a  supplication  that
is not answered.""[vii]

    Honorable Muslims!
    Muslims should never give in to the thought that their  supplication  is
not responded to. In this  respect,  Prophet  Muhammad  (saw)  states,  ""The
supplication of every one of  you  will  be  granted  if  he  does  not  get
impatient and say, 'I supplicated to Allah,  but  my  prayer  has  not  been
granted.""[viii] This is because sometimes Allah  (swt)  gives  us  countless
blessings for the sake of our du'a. Some other times He takes  our  troubles
away. Sometimes  He  forgives  our  sins.  Some  other  times  He  gives  us
something better than what we actually want.

    Let us then have faith that all our heartfelt du'as  will  be  certainly
responded to. Let us not be bereft of abundance of divine blessings,  peace,
and confidence. Let us not forget to pray  for  our  families,  loved  ones,
Muslim brothers and sisters, and the oppressed, as much as we pray  for  our
own selves. Let us try to deserve the du'a of  our  parents,  the  patients,
the elderly, and those people in need.

    I would like to conclude this khutbah with Prophet Muhammad's (saw)
following du'a:
                                                                       [pic]
    ""O, Allah! I ask you to bless me with  guidance,  piety,  chastity,  and
contentment.""[ix]
-----------------------
[i] Baqarah, 2/186.
[ii] Tirmidhi, Da'wat, 13.
[iii] Tirmidhi, Da'wat, 85.
[iv] Abu Dawud, Witr, 26.
[v] Muslim, Dhikr, 72.
[vi] Tirmidhi, Daawat, 16.
[vii] Muslim, Dhikr, 73; Nasa'i, Isti'adha, 13.
[viii] Abu Dawud, Witr, 23.
[ix] Muslim, Dhikr, 72.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
103;2018-08-03;"
DATE: 03.08.2018
[pic]
               ETIQUETTE TO FOLLOW IN MOSQUES AND CONGREGATION
    Esteemed Believers!
    Sent as Mercy to the worlds, our beloved Prophet (s.a.w.)  woken  up  to
the last day in his worldly life. He was not able to go to the  masjid  that
morning because of his illness. He cracked  open  the  window  of  his  room
overlooking the masjid and watched for a  while  his  companions  performing
the morning prayer. When he saw the rows of his  companions  performing  the
prayer all together in  awe  under  the  imamah  (leadership)  of  Abu  Bakr
(r.a.), he got happy, smiled and thanked his Lord (s.w.t).[i]

    Honorable Muslims!
    Gathering us with the promise of peace and tranquility, mosques are  the
symbol of Islam and the sign of our unity and amity. With the expression  of
our Beloved Prophet (s.a.w.), mosques are, ""the  most  favorable  places  in
the sight of Allah.""[ii] Mosques are sacred structures  that  call  humanity
to salvation with the adhan; wage war against blasphemy and  ignorance  with
the Mihrab; enable believers to climb up the knowledge and wisdom stairs  of
the  minbar  and  the  pulpit;  and  reinforce  the  brotherhood   and   the
consciousness of being  an  ummah  for  the  believers  who  perform  prayer
shoulder to shoulder in rows.

    Jama'ah is the common name of the believers who  come  together  in  the
presence of Allah with the purpose  of  performing  prayers.  Jama'ah  is  a
religious concept that has deep roots in  our  civilization.  Unfortunately,
an organization that exploited all our religious values and  concepts  tried
to devalue the concept of jama'ah as well in such a way  as  to  deviate  it
from its original meaning, making it the organization's identifying  feature
and causing divergence. It turned that symbol of tawhid and  wahdat  into  a
concept remembered  together  with  corruption,  mischief,  separation,  and
betrayal.  Yet,  jama'ah  in  our  tradition  means  to   unite   with   the
consciousness of tawhid, and  thereby  reaching  amity  in  unity.  In  this
sense, the word ""jama'ah"" contains Muslims of all ages and all classes  from
all walks of life,  including  men-women,  old-young,  rich-poor,  disabled-
abled.

    Dear Believers!
    There are some rules of etiquette to be followed in mosque  individually
and in congregation. The believers, on the way to  mosque  to  purify  their
soul, pay attention to their bodily cleaning, perform ablution  properly  as
required by the following verse: ""O children of Adam,  take  your  adornment
at every masjid, ...""[iii] They ensure that their clothes are clean  and  in
compliance with the satr al-awrah (for clothes to leave no private parts  on
body uncovered), which is a condition of the prayer. The Messenger of  Allah
(s.a.w.) informs that the prayer performed in the mosque in congregation  is
twenty-seven times more meritorious.[iv] A Muslim, who wants to  become  the
beneficiary of the good tiding by the  Messenger  of  Allah  (s.a.w.)  knows
that it is against  the  Sunnah  to  eat  smelly  food  before  going  to  a
mosque.[v] They wear good perfume, do not disturb  any  brother  or  sister,
and avoids any behaviors to obstacle the performance of  prayers  by  others
in the mosque in awe. They pay attention to  not  violating  the  rights  of
others while performing their duty of servitude to Allah. They never  forget
the following warning of our beloved Prophet (s.a.w.) to  the  congregation:
""Beware! Every one  of  you  is  calling  his  Lord.  Do  not  disturb  each
other!...""[vi]

    Honorable Muslims!
    Sermons and khutbas are the sounds of the mosques, which are educational
homes, that invite humanity to have  faith,  wisdom,  and  morals.  Just  as
being in a mosque and in a congregation has  its  rules  and  etiquette,  so
does listening to the khutbah. It is a religious necessity to listen to  the
preacher in awe as khutbah is  preached.  Talking  with  each  other,  being
engaged in other things such as mobile phones cause you to miss the  essence
and message of the khutbah, and to be deprived of its rewards.  Our  Beloved
Prophet (s.a.w.), expressed the sensitivity  that  a  believer  should  show
during the khutbah as follows: ""When the imam  is  delivering  the  khutbah,
even asking your  companion  to  keep  quiet  and  listen  is  an  incorrect
behavior.""[vii]

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Let us  keep  our  mosques  alive  by  making  an  effort  to  join  the
congregation for our prayers. As it  was  in  the  Age  of  Bliss  (Asr  al-
Sa'adah), illuminated with our Beloved Messenger (s.a.w.), let us go to  the
mosques with our families today so that our children can get  familiar  with
the mosque. Let us not distance our children from  the  mosques  because  of
their naughtiness. Let us explain them  the  value  of  being  a  member  of
congregation, and teach them its rules and etiquette. All Muslims,  men  and
women, let us not fail in showing respect to our mosques that we are  heart-
bound. Let us be all ears to listen to the sermon and the recitation of  the
Qur'an. Let us not forget that khutbah is  one  of  the  conditions  of  the
validity and a part  of  Friday  prayer.  Let  us  give  our  attention  and
interest to preacher and the khutbah only.  Let  us  be  one  of  those  who
listen and follow the best of the word. Let us live with  the  awareness  of
being in the presence of Allah and in the state of worshipping constantly.
-----------------------
[i] Bukhari, Adhan, 46, Muslim, Salat, 98.
[ii] Muslim, Masajid, 288.
[iii] A'raf, 7/31.
[iv] Muslim, Masajid, 51.
[v] Bukhari, I'tisam, 24.
[vi] Abu Dawud, Tatawwu, 25.
[vii] Bukhari, Jumu'ah, 36.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
104;2019-06-28;"
DATE: 28.06.2019
[pic]
    A SACRED JOURNEY: HAJJ
    Honorable Believers!
    The Almighty Allah (swt) states in the Holy Qur'an,  ""Surely  the  first
House of worship established for humanity is the one in Makkah -  a  blessed
sanctuary and a guide for  all  people.  In  it  are  clear  signs  and  the
standing place of Ibrahim. Whoever enters it should be safe.  Pilgrimage  to
this House is an obligation by Allah upon whoever is able among people.  And
whoever disbelieves, then surely  Allah  is  not  in  need  of  any  of  His
creation.""[i]

    Dear Believers!
    According to the Prophet Muhammad (saw), hajj is one of the five pillars
on which Islam is established. Hajj means circumambulating  the  Ka'bah  and
standing (waqfah) at Arafat to gain Allah's  (swt)  consent.  It  means  the
gathering of Muslims, after a sacred journey, in the  shade  of  the  Ka'bah
towards which they turn for prayer all around the  world  other  times.  The
Almighty Allah (swt) addresses those Muslims who set out to visit His  House
as follows: ""The Hajj is in appointed months. Whoever commits to  performing
hajj, let them  stay  away  from  intimate  relations,  foul  language,  and
arguments during the hajj. Whatever good you do, Allah fully  knows  of  it.
Take necessary provisions for the journey.  Surely  the  best  provision  is
righteousness (taqwa). O people of reason, be mindful of Me!""[ii]

    Dear Muslims!
    Muslims who commit to performing hajj and set off for  it  wears  ihram,
physically, and taqwa, spiritually. They promise to follow the  commands  of
Allah (swt) and the Prophet Muhammad (saw), and stay away from any  kind  of
sins, wrongdoings, and unpleasant acts. Together with their Muslim  brothers
and sisters of different skin colors, languages, and  countries  of  origin,
they pray reciting talbiyah,
[pic] ""Here I am, o Allah, here I am! I am obedient to  Your  commands!  You
have no partner. Here I am, o Allah! All praise is for  you.  All  blessings
and all sovereignty is yours. You have no partner.""[iii]

    The Prophet Muhammad (saw) says, ""The voice of a  believer  who  recites
talbiyah is accompanied by stones, trees, and even  earth.""[iv]  An  amazing
choir of universe prays along with prospective pilgrims.

    Honorable Believers!
    The glad tiding by the Prophet Muhammad (saw)  is  reciprocated  in  the
hearts of Muslims in their every step during the hajj: ""The reward  of  Hajj
that is accepted by Allah is nothing but  heaven.""[v]  Prospective  pilgrims
who want to be on the receiving end of  this  glad  tiding  climb  to  Mount
Arafat, rehearsing the Day of Judgement. Arafat means  to  know  the  truth,
reach wisdom, and account for oneself before death.

    Pilgrims flood to Muzdalifah after the Arafat waqfah, and then to  Mina.
While Muzdalifah is where they stand for waqfah in the  sight  of  Allah  in
order to gain awareness, Mina is where the expression of forsaking  all  the
worldly blessings and asking for the consent of Allah only is manifested.

    Muslims who stone the Devil at Jamarat actually stone their own  selves,
greeds, and passions that keep inviting them to committing sins. Then,  they
head to the Ka'bah for the tawaf al-ziyarah. Their eyes turn to the  Ka'bah,
their hearts to Allah (swt).

    The animals sacrificed during the hajj are of the signs of Allah  (swt).
But neither their meat nor their blood reach Him. What  is  going  to  reach
Him is our taqwa only.

    Dear Muslims!
    Hajj is literally  a  cornerstone  for  Muslims.  Pilgrims  manifest  on
themselves the Prophet Ibrahim's loyalty, the Prophet  Ismail's  submission,
and Hajar's reliance on Allah  (swt).  They  express  their  willingness  to
sacrifice themselves for the sake of Allah (swt). Pilgrims  who  visits  the
places bearing the Prophet Muhammad's (saw) footprints experience  patience,
gratefulness, revitalization, and tranquility all at the same time.  Muslims
who bring with them taqwa for their sacred  journey  should  stay  away  any
kind of bad words and acts in order not to waste their  taqwa.  Utmost  care
should be paid not to cause any damage to any living being  and  the  nature
during the performance of hajj. Pilgrims leaving from  those  sacred  places
by leaving behind all their past mistakes and sins should never  repeat  the
same mistakes and sins in the remainder of their lives.

    I would like to take this opportunity to pray that  the  Almighty  Allah
(swt) may accept the worships of hajj that members from among our  community
will perform. I would  like  to  conclude  this  khutbah  with  the  Prophet
Muhammad's (saw) following words: ""Those who go on pilgrimage and umrah  are
the messengers of Allah (swt). If they  pray  to  Allah,  He  accepts  their
prayers; and if they ask Allah to forgive  their  sins,  He  forgives  their
sins.""[vi]
-----------------------
[i] Ali 'Imran, 3/96-97.
[ii] Baqarah, 2/197.
[iii] Muslim, Hajj, 19,21.
[iv] Tirmidhi, Hajj, 14.
[v] Bukhari, Umrah, 1.
[vi] Ibn Majah, Manasiq, 5.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services


"
105;2018-03-09;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 09.03.2018

  WOMEN IN ISLAM: JUSTICE, MERCY AND FAIRNESS

Jumu’ah Mubarak, Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Our Almighty Lord enjoins in the verse I have recited: “O mankind! Behold, We have created you all out of a male and a female, and have made you into nations and tribes, so that you might come to know one another. Verily, the noblest of you in the sight of Allah is the one who is most deeply conscious of Him. Behold, Allah has full knowledge and is well acquainted (with all things).” 

Our Prophet (s.a.w.) said in the hadith I have read: “Indeed you have rights over your women, and your women have rights over you.” 

Brothers and Sisters!

Humans have a special place in the sight of Allah since they are intelligent, responsible and the most honorable of all creation. Of course, the creation of human as man and woman with different qualities has many reasons and wisdom behind it. That being said, man and woman share the same honor since they are both human, and take the same responsibility since they are both Allah’s servants. It is the duty of both women and men to live in accordance with Allah’s countenance and to work to spread goodness, justice and mercy and prevent evil, oppression and injustice. Indeed, our Almighty Lord enjoins: “If any do deeds of righteousness, be they male or female and have Faith, they will enter heaven, and not the least injustice will be done to them.” 

Honorable Believers!

There are many verses in the Qur’an about the status of women in society, their value before Allah and their rights. The Qur’an tells us about many women who left a mark in history, starting from Hawwa, mother of humankind. Asiya, with her faith and courage, Maryam, with her chastity and patience and Hajar, with her faithfulness and devotion are shown as examples to us all. Khadija was the first person who believed our Beloved Prophet (s.a.w.) and supported him no matter what. The first woman who became a martyr for Islam with the love of tawhid in her heart was Sumayyah. Aisha was the one who carried the knowledge, the Sunnah and the wisdom from the house of our Prophet to the humankind. The view of our religion, nation, and civilization regarding women under the light of these beautiful examples is always to protect their rights and respectability. Any outdated mentality and cruel attitude towards women are surely the remnants of the period of ignorance (Jahiliyya).

Honorable Believers!

	Each human is born with the most fundamental rights and depriving a person of these rights because of their gender is incompatible with Islam and justice. To feel sorry for the birth of a baby girl, to despise her, to deprive her of education, to marry her forcefully at a young age is simply oppression. However, our Beloved Prophet, the father of four daughters, gave us the good news that our daughters are the means of mercy and forgiveness for us and said: “Whoever is put to trial by these daughters and he treats them generously (with benevolence) then these daughters will act as a shield for him from Hell-Fire.” 

Our mothers are our source of love and our door of prayer. Each mother who works and gives without any expectation in return and under whose feet the heaven is laid deserves goodness and kindness.

Brothers and Sisters!

A verse tells us about the fact that starting a family means finding peace for a man and a woman: “And of His signs is that He created for you from yourselves mates that you may find tranquility in them; and He placed between you affection and mercy. Indeed in that are signs for a people who give thought.”  We carry the burden of earthly life and endure sadness and sorrow together with our spouses, who are the shoulder for us to cry on. They are our life partners with whom we share our home, joy and happiness. Our Prophet (s.a.w.) defines men and women as “two halves that complete each other” . He teaches us an attitude which protects and supports one another and connects us with love and trust. Because a healthy, peaceful and strong society is built together by women and men.

Dear Muslims!

Today humanity goes through a tough trial about women’s rights, just like it does on many other subjects. In all parts of the world, war, violence and oppression affect women more than anyone. Women who are suffering, who were imprisoned and forced to migrate are waiting for help.

On the other hand, as the ummah of the Prophet who said: “Fear Allah concerning women! Verily you have taken them on the security of Allah, and they have been made halal (lawful) unto you by words of Allah (by marriage).” , we often cannot protect his sensitivity, and forget that we must act merciful towards them when in fact we have to follow the path of the Messenger of Allah, who not once raised his hand against a woman. However, sadly, violence, abuse and murders of women keep rising.

Against this dire situation, let us never abandon mercy, justice and fairness when it comes to women. Let us heed the call of our Prophet (s.a.w.) who said: “The best of you are those who are best to their women.”  Let us pray for the believers who protect those entrusted to them:

“Our Lord, grant us from among our wives and offspring comfort to our eyes and make us an example for the righteous.”"
106;2019-12-13;"
DATE: 13.12.2019
                                    [pic]
               SALAH: OUR STRUGGLE TO GETTING CLOSER TO ALLAH
    Honorable Muslims!
    One day the Prophet Muhammad (saw) was having a  conversation  with  his
companions and asked them, ""If there was a river at the door of any  of  you
and he took a bath in it five times a day, would  you  notice  any  dirt  on
him?"" His  companions  replied,  ""Not  a  trace  of  dirt  would  be  left.""
Thereupon said the Prophet Muhammad (saw), ""That is the example of the  five
prayers with which Allah annuls sins.""[i]

    Dear Believers!
    The most deeply-rooted form of worship in the history of prophets, salah
is one of the five pillars of our exalted religion Islam. It is  the  symbol
of turning towards Allah (swt) with  the  soul,  body,  mind,  heart,  love,
respect, and the entire being in short. We as humans can attain  true  peace
if we, acceptantly and in a  heartfelt  manner,  respond  to  Allah's  (swt)
invitation to servitude and perform  the  worship  of  salah.  But  when  we
neglect our salah, thereby causing the connection  between  Him  and  us  to
weaken, then we fall  captive  to  our  worldly  desires,  thereby  becoming
frustrated.

    Dear Muslims!
    Standing in awe of Allah (swt) for salah upon  the  lofty  call  of  the
adhan, Muslims submit their love, devotion,  obedience,  and  submission  to
Him. Salah, in this sense, is the moment  for  Muslims  looking  forward  to
meet Him in the closest manner. It is a holy journey  Muslims  set  out  on,
leaving behind all the worldly rush,  problems,  and  troubles.  It  is  the
desire, of people who have  fallen  far  away  from  the  true  homeland  of
heaven, to return to Him after living a sincere life  without  going  astray
from the true path. In this respect says the Prophet  Muhammad  (saw),  ""The
key to Paradise is salah.""[ii]

    Salah is the time to give thanks and express gratitude to  Allah  (swt).
It is the duty of loyalty for Muslims towards Him, Who  creates,  allows  to
live, feeds with blessings, protects, and forgives.

    Dear Believers!
    In the verse I have  recited  at  the  beginning  of  the  khutbah,  the
Almighty Allah (swt) states, ""Recite, o

Muhammad, what has been revealed to you of the Book  and  establish  prayer.
Indeed, prayer prohibits immorality and wrongdoing, and the  remembrance  of
Allah is greater. And Allah knows that which you do.""[iii] Salah,  then,  is
the struggle to get purified and protected. A Muslim conscious and aware  of
worship is one who values and pays great attention to salah, fulfilling  all
its requirements duly and in awe, from takbir recited at  the  beginning  to
the salam at the end. The awareness of worship is  about  the  awareness  of
being a servant to Allah (swt). It  is  to  live  piously,  mercifully,  and
kindly with the awareness that Allah (swt) always oversees and hears.

    This is why salah does not  only  represent  the  debt  of  worship  for
Muslims, but also their  superior  morals.  People  who  perform  salah  are
protected against any kind of extravagancy, rudeness, and violence.  Because
of  the  strengthened  spirituality  due  to  salah,  they  stay  away  from
behaviors  that  are  against  the  sense  of  shamefulness  and  rules   of
etiquette.

    Dear Muslims!
    In the Qur'an, all people are addressed in the  person  of  the  Prophet
Muhammad (saw) as follows, ""And enjoin prayer upon your  family  and  people
and be steadfast therein. We ask you not for provision; We provide for  you,
and the best outcome is for those of righteousness.""[iv]As required of  this
commandment, the Prophet  Muhammad  (saw)  would  go  to  the  door  of  his
daughter Fatimah  every  morning  and  invite  everybody  in  the  house  to
performing salah, ""O Ahl al-Bayt (the  members  of  the  Prophet's  family)!
Come on, to salah!""[v] We are similarly responsible  to  get  ourselves  and
our families accustomed to performing salah.

    Then, let us, with our families, not remain deprived of  the  chance  to
meet Allah (swt) in the healing, comforting, and calming climate  of  salah.
Let us not neglect performing  salah  which  is  both  ""the  pillar  of  the
religion"" in this world and ""the question to be asked of us to give  account
for"" in the Hereafter. Let us not forget that salah is not a  burden  on  us
but, on the contrary, it is a unique opportunity to get to know and  refresh
our own self, as well as to get mature through  remembering,  thanking,  and
contemplating. I would like to conclude the khutbah with the following  good
news from the Prophet Muhammad (saw), ""Whoever continues  to  perform  five-
times daily salah, knowing that to do so is the commandment  of  Allah,  and
showing due diligence to the salah's ruku', sajdah, wudu',  and  hour,  goes
to heaven.""[vi]
-----------------------
[i] Bukhari, Mawaqit al-Salat, 6.
[ii] Tirmidhi, Taharah, 1.
[iii] Ankabut, 29/45.
[iv] Ta-Ha, 20/132.
[v] Tirmidhi, Tafsir al-Qur'an, 33.
[vi] Ibn Hanbal, IV, 266.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
107;2017-09-08;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 08.09.2017



         TO STAND BY THE OPPRESSED

Blessed Friday to You All, Honorable Muslims!

Our Lord Almighty says in the verse I have recited: “Do not think that Allah is unaware of what the evildoers are doing: He but grants them respite until the Day when their eyes will stare in horror.” 

And our Prophet (pbuh) says in the hadith I have recited: “He who amongst you sees something abominable should modify it with the help of his hand; and if he has not strength enough to do it, then he should do it with his tongue, and if he has not strength enough to do it, (even) then he should (abhor it) from his heart, and that is the least of faith.” 

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Unfortunately, the whole Islamic world observed a sorrowful eid once again. Our hearts were sad, our eyes were tearful. We could not feel the joy of eid deep in our hearts. We couldn’t exactly live the spiritual atmosphere of the Hajj. We couldn’t fully experience the excitement of the sacrifice. Because as the futile conflicts, violence and fights in the Islamic geography continues to sadden us; the oppression, violence and massacre that our brothers and sisters in Rakhine are facing tear our hearts out. The cries of the oppressed and innocent from these faraway lands hurt us deeply.

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

The injustice, false accusations, violence and oppression Muslims are subjected today shocks us all. But what’s worse is the indifference of a big portion of humanity against this situation; the silence of those organizations established to prevent oppression, evil and injustice in the world; the fact that the world is blind and deaf against the earth-shattering cries of the oppressed and the innocent; the fact that the tiny corpses of those washed ashore are ignored while a beached whale makes the news; the loss of mercy and conscience as people are starving to death and as children, women and the elderly are being deported from their homes; the fact that different groups turn a blind eye to the massacres that Muslims face.

Honorable Believers!

Our holy religion considers the murder of a person same as the murder of all humanity. Because our faith teaches us that each human is inherently valuable. A human is worthy because he or she is a sign of Allah. Each person has the right to life, faith, property and dignity. No one could be denied his basic rights and freedoms, or deported from their homeland, or subjected to violence and savagery because of his faith. In our faith, one cannot keep silent against any oppression, let alone perpetrate it. One cannot take the side of the oppressor and turn his back on the oppressed no matter what. Our guiding principle in this matter is this warning of our Prophet (pbuh): “When the people see a wrongdoer and do not prevent him, Allah will soon punish them all.” 

Esteemed Brothers and Sisters! 

We believers cannot give way to despair. We believe that oppressors will get the punishment they deserve, sooner or later. We know that all these unfortunate events will certainly come to an end. As long as we, as the descendants of a nation which became the hope of humanity throughout history, extend our hands to the oppressed and the innocent with a spirit of unity. Let us stand against the oppressors and stand by the oppressed as we did in the past, regardless of their religion, color and geography. Let us stand against every form of oppression even if we are alone, with the belief that our Lord is our greatest helper. Let us always defend the right and the righteous even when the axis of evil come down on us with all its might, knowing that the prayers of the oppressed is our greatest power. Let us never keep silent against injustice.  “The one who does not care about the Muslims is not one of them” . Let us take this hadith to heart and protect our brotherhood. Let us share our joy and sadness, our wealth and poverty with our brothers and sisters.

Honorable Believers!

Let us sincerely pray to our Lord Almighty in this time of Friday: O Allah! Treat our brothers and sisters who struggle for their existence in different parts of the world with your help and mercy! Grant them salvation from hardship! O Allah! Rest the souls of our brothers and sisters who lost their lives in the massacres in Rakhine and other parts of the world! Grant quick recovery for the wounded! O Allah! Help our honorable nation, as they are the conscience of humanity! Grant foresight, insight, peace and tranquility to the realm of Islam and all humanity. O Allah! Let us be those who live humanely, not those who forgot their humanity!"
108;2019-09-20;"
DATE: 20.09.2019
[pic]
    HUMILITY EXALTS US
    Honorable Muslims!
    In the verse I have just recited the Almighty Allah (swt)  states,  ""The
servants of Allah the Most Gracious are those  who  walk  on  the  earth  in
humility...""[i]

    In the hadith I have just read the Prophet Muhammad (saw)  says,  ""Allah
shall exalt humble people on the Day of Judgment for  showing  humility  for
His sake. He shall degrade arrogant  people  on  the  Day  of  Judgment  for
showing disdainful pride.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    Doing  righteous  deeds  and  having  good  morals  are   the   greatest
manifestation of perfect faith in one's life. This is  because  good  morals
are the most valuable asset to illuminate the life in this  world  and  turn
the eternal life in the Hereafter into heaven. We as Muslims believe that  a
life cannot lead to heaven without good morals. On top of these good  morals
comes humility that will exalt us in the presence of Allah.

    Humility is the quality or state of being unpretentious and  modest.  It
means staying away from self-praise and boastfulness. It  means  adopting  a
life free of pride and arrogance. It means showing respect, compassion,  and
mercy to all living beings and treating them gently.

    Dear Muslims!
    The Prophet Muhammad (saw) is the example of humility for us as Muslims.
He led a simple and modest life.[iii] He would value and respect people  for
the sake of being human. He would know that being  humble  was  one  of  the
characteristics of those people to enter to heaven.[iv]  He  would  warn  us
that looking down upon our Muslim brothers and sisters would  be  enough  as
an evil act.[v] Referring, in one occasion, to the fact that humility was  a
personal trait that would exalt people in the presence of  Allah  (swt),  he
said, ""...Allah increases his dignity who is tolerant, and  exalts  him  who
is humble.""[vi]

    Dear Believers!
    Humble Muslims whose role model is the Prophet Muhammad (saw) know  that
the true owner of all the blessings is the Almighty Allah (swt).  They  also
know that all blessings in  their  possession  are  tools  for  them  to  be
tested. They spend all their capabilities in the cause of attaining  Allah's
(swt) consent and approval.  They  never  place  themselves  in  a  superior
position compared to other people, regardless of their  level  of  authority
or status. They believe that the superiority of people in  the  presence  of
Allah (swt) is measured only by their piety.

    Dear Muslims!
    Islam aims to equip Muslim souls with humility on the one hand,  and  on
the other hand, it warns them to be far from being arrogant  to  the  extent
possible. This is because, as expressed  in  the  Prophet  Muhammad's  (saw)
words, ""Arrogance means rejecting the truth and despising people.""[vii]

    Arrogant people think the world turns around them. They  belittle  other
people  and  turn  their  back  on  them.  Muslims,  however,  should  never
depreciate anybody for any reason whatsoever. In this  regard,  the  Prophet
Muhammad (saw) warns us as follows, ""Allah  has  revealed  to  me  that  you
should be humble and that you should not wrong one another.""[viii]

    Dear Believers!
    Muslims, just like in all their affairs, should not go  to  extremes  in
humility. This is because while they are obliged  to  lead  a  humble  life,
they are also responsible to protect their own honor and  dignity,  as  well
as  those  of  their  Muslim  brothers  and  sisters.  They  maintain  their
dignified and temperate stance against people who depreciate  Muslims.  They
do everything in their power to protect Muslims'  honor  and  dignity.  They
take to their hearts the following commandment of the Almighty Allah  (swt),
""Muhammed is the Messenger of Allah. Those  who  are  with  him  are  strong
against unbelievers, but compassionate amongst each other...""[ix]

    Honorable Believers!
    Let us adopt humility in all domains of  our  lives.  Let  us  not  hurt
anybody. Let us not sadden each other by falling for the  temporary  desires
of this mortal world. Let us avoid  arrogance,  haughtiness,  and  hypocrisy
that will turn our world into a prison and our eternal life into  hell.  Let
us not belittle people or make a face at them. Let  us  not  walk  on  earth
arrogantly. Let us not forget that the Almighty Allah (swt)  does  not  like
those people who are arrogant and self-praise themselves.
-----------------------
[i] Furqan, 25/63.
[ii] (Ibn Hanbal, II, 76)
[iii] Muslim, Zuhd, 33.
[iv] (Bukhari, Adab, 61)
[v] (Muslim, Birr, 32)
[vi] Muslim, Birr, 69.
[vii] Muslim, Iman, 147.
[viii] Muslim, Jannah, 64.
[ix] Fath, 48/29.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services


"
109;2017-04-07;"LOCATION  : NATIONWIDE

DATE             : 07.04.2017





     PERSECUTION DOESN’T LAST FOREVER

A Blessed Friday to You, Dear Brothers and Sisters!

In the verse I have recited, the Almighty Lord enjoins: “And fear a trial which will not strike those who have wronged among you exclusively, and know that Allah is severe in penalty.”

Our Beloved Prophet (pbuh) makes the following warning to all of us in the hadith I have read: “If people see an oppressor and do not stop his oppression, Allah will surely bring a wrath overall to them.”

Brothers and Sisters!

The region of Islam has been surrounded by dark clouds for a long time. While tens of thousands of children die as a result of the famine and drought going on in Africa on one side, unfortunately tens of thousands more approach death. On the other side, hundreds of thousands of people have lost their lives in the war that has been going on nearby us. Women, children, and innocents continue to die under bombs and chemical weapons.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Just a few days ago, we witnessed in Syria’s city of Idlib a devastating massacre for everyone who has not lost their mercy and conscience. We sadly heard the heartbreaking cries of children targeted by chemical weapons. But this savagery is just as terrible as people keeping silent about it. Making no effort to stop it is a much heavier sin. It is a fact that what is worse than innocents losing their lives is that humankind losing their conscience, becoming senseless every passing day against the troubles experience, the pain suffered, the oppression endured.

Brothers and Sisters!

We are ashamed of our humanity in the face of this horror as believers who have believed in Islam. We are shaken in the face of the Merciful Prophet’s (pbuh) warning,

 

meaning  “There’s no salvation for you before you stop the oppression of the oppressor.” We deeply feel the shame of failing to duly do our duty of humanity, our responsibility of brotherhood towards the persecuted. But in any way we know that we must be with the persecuted in unison without losing faith, hope, and courage and stand against the persecutors.

Brothers and Sisters!

Let us not forget that when evil becomes ordinary and violence is not minded, oppression does not only hurt the persecuted but also surrounds the entire humankind. Every person gets its share from the sin of global persecution. That’s why everyone who witnesses injustice must stand against it. They must work to wipe away oppression and not be content with only being sad and grieving about it.

Brothers and Sisters!

We believe that these massacres, this lawless and dark war shall, too, end one day. We know that no rule built upon the blood of innocents can stand. It shall not. Justice and righteousness shall find life once again Allah willing, in this region where there is no stop to the shedding of tears and blood. The persecutors shall get the punishment they deserve in this world and the next. Because in the words of Allah’s Messenger (pbuh); 

there is no curtain between Allah and the curse of the oppressed. 

Brothers and Sisters! 

Let us raise our hands to our Almighty Lord in this holy time, in this sacred shrine, and sincerely supplicate to Him: O Allah! Stop this disgraceful assault at once that crushes innocent people, mothers, and children! Grant foresight, sagacity, conscience, and mercy to humankind! Do not let us forget our brotherhood! Do not let us be among those who remain silent against oppression and injustice! 

O Allah, grant mercy upon brothers and sisters who have lost their lives in massacres in Syria and in various parts of the world! Grant a speedy recovery to the injured! Grant help to Muslim brothers and sisters so they may overcome their troubles as soon as possible! Do not spare your assistance and favor from our glorious nation that has shouldered the conscience of the humankind!"
110;2018-10-26;"
DATE: 26.10.2018
[pic]
                      COMPASSION AND KINDNESS LANGUAGE
                                IN THE FAMILY
    Honorable Muslims!
    Islam has put an end to any kind of bad words and  habits  of  jahiliyya
(period of ignorance), and built an ""age of bliss"", in which faith and  good
morality prevail. The Companions of the Prophet (saw), which were the  first
to embrace of Islam, were a distinguished group consisting  of  good-natured
and  eloquent  people  with  good  intentions.  What  befits  the  following
generations of them and to us today is to follow the footsteps of the  noble
Companions (ra). We should reflect their lifestyle shaped according  to  the
Qur'an and developed according to the Sunnah; and be the  pioneers  of  good
morality, compassion, and mercy.

    Valuable Believers!
    Our closest people deserve to hear the most beautiful words from us. Our
family is  most  worthy  of  courtesy,  tolerance,  they  deserve  the  most
attentive attitudes with love and  respect.  In  this  regard,  our  Prophet
(saw) said, ""The best of you is the one who is best to his family, and I  am
the best of you to my family...""[i]

    It is invaluable that  the  Messenger  of  Allah  (saw),  portrayed  his
relationship with his own family established on kindness and beneficence  as
an example to us. Because family is the warmest atmosphere in which  we  can
experience love, peace and trust throughout our lives.

    Esteemed Believers!
    Through our families, Allah the Almighty (swt) grants us the pleasure of
being grandparents, spouses, children, grandchildren, brothers, or  sisters.
Family is the beauty of the mother's heart, and the  abundance  of  father's
home. It is the depth of love and loyalty between spouses. It is  the  width
of the reverence and kindness that  children  show  to  their  parents.  Our
Almighty Lord (swt) informs us of the importance of a precious  treasure  as
family in the Holy Qur'an as, ""And of His signs is that He created  for  you
from yourselves mates that you may find tranquility in them; and  He  placed
between you, affection and mercy. Indeed, in that are  signs  for  a  people
who give thought.""[ii]

    Honorable Muslims!
    A peaceful family is established with love and  sacrifice.  It  is  kept
alive with justice and conscience. It is protected by friendship and  mercy.
Even in the most  troubled  moments,  a  couple  of  words  of  conciliation
tighten the bonds in the family back. If  respect  towards  each  individual
prevails in a family, mercy speaks while violence quiets. In a family  where
all people, women and men, are put on the shield of mercy, no one  can  hurt
one another even through implication.

    Indeed, our Beloved Prophet (saw) never hurt anyone throughout his life.
He was always understanding, patient, kind and tolerant towards  his  wives.
He invited us to see  the  positive  aspects  and  be  fair  by  saying,  ""A
believer should not hate his/her spouse; if  they  dislike  one  of  his/her
characteristics, he/she will be pleased with another.""[iii]

    Honorable Muslims!
    Good believers appreciate the value of the family members who suffer the
difficulties and sorrows  of  life  with  them  as  well  as  sharing  their
happiness. They realize that they  are  entrusted  to  us  besides  being  a
blessing of Allah for us. They  comprehend  that  being  a  believer,  which
means being a person ""from whose hand and tongue people  are  safe"",  begins
in the family.

    A good spouse is committed to  the  promise  s/he  made  when  s/he  got
married; they adhere to their covenant.  A  good  father  is  loved  in  his
family for his just and merciful behaviors. He walks with family members  on
the way of good, always in unity, arm-in-arm, and shoulder to shoulder.

    Dear Muslims!
    Peace and happiness in the  family  becomes  permanent  through  healthy
communication. Our Beloved Prophet (saw) said, ""...he who believes in  Allah
and in the last day should speak good  or  keep  silence.""[iv],  and  always
recommended believers  to  speak  of  good  and  pursue  the  good.  As  the
addressees of this advice, we should not withhold  our  smiling  face,  kind
words, appreciation, and gratitude from our family.

    Esteemed Believers!
    Let us once again remember the value of our family, with whom  we  spend
the life journey together, with its ups and downs. Let  us  be  affectionate
and kind to our spouses and children. Let us not cut off our nose  to  spite
our face. Let us  neither  hurt  people  nor  get  hurt  ourselves.  On  the
contrary, let us adopt being merciful and virtuous to everybody and  in  any
case as a principle in our lives. Let us not be the cause of unrest  in  the
family, but the guarantee of happiness and trust.  Let  us  keep  on  saying
this prayer that in taught to us by our Lord (swt) in the Holy Qur'an:  ""Our
Lord, grant us from among our wives and offspring comfort to our  eyes,  and
make us an example for the righteous.'""[v]
-----------------------
[i] Tirmidhi, Manaqib, 63.
[ii] Rum, 30/21.
[iii] Muslim, Rada', 61.
[iv] Abu Dawud, Adab, 122, 123.
[v] Furqan, 25/74.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
111;2017-07-28;"
LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE
DATE  : 28.07.2017

[pic]

            ALLAH IS THE ONE WHO CREATES, GIVES LIFE AND GUIDANCE
    A Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters!
    Despite all the efforts of our Prophet (pbuh), the pagans of  Mecca  did
not abandon their false beliefs and their habits that  did  not  fit  within
the boundaries of honor and dignity. They did not come to accept the  belief
in Tawheed, the fact that there is no god other than  Allah.  One  day  they
came to our Prophet and said, ""Tell us about your  Lord!""  After  that,  Our
Almighty Lord has revealed the Surah Al-Ikhlas, which  describes  the  faith
of Tawheed in a concise way and introduces Himself to mankind  in  the  most
beautiful way:

    [pic] ""Say: 'He is Allah, the One and Only'""[pic] ""God the Eternal,  the
Uncaused Cause of All Being."" [pic]  ""He  begets  not,  and  neither  is  He
begotten."" [pic] ""And there is nothing that could be compared with Him""[i]


    Honorable Believers!
    Our Book, Holy Qur'an, is a book that describes our  Lord  Allah  to  us
from cover to cover. It is  a  handbook  of  guidance  that  teaches  us  to
believe in Him, to surrender to Him, to worship Him; that shows us the  ways
towards a humane life and peace. Now I want to share  with  you  in  today's
khutba the verses[ii] of the Surah Ash-Shu'ara, which describes our Lord  to
us in the most beautiful way.

    Venerable Believers!
    Our Almighty Lord enjoins:  That is to say, Our Lord is the creator  and
the guide. Through His prophets  and  books,  He  shows  us  the  sirat  al-
mustaqim - the straight path. Our task is to be the followers of this  path.
It is to stay out of evil and to spread goodness on earth within our power.

    Our Lord enjoins: [pic] That is to say, Allah is the One who  favors  us
each drop of the water we drink and each bite of the food we eat.  Our  task
is to seek halal sustenance. It is not to forget that  each  blessing,  each
opportunity is entrusted to us by our Lord. It is to be  able  to  see  both
wealth and poverty as a test. Just as our Prophet (pbuh) said, it is  to  be
grateful  by  saying:  ""All  praise  and  thanks  be   to   Allah   in   all
circumstances."" [iii]

    Our Almighty Lord enjoins: [pic] That is to say, Allah is the healer  of
illnesses. He blesses the suffering with remedies. He is  the  help  to  the
helpless, hope to the hopeless. Our task is to never  give  the  opportunity
to those who want to  exploit  our  beliefs,  our  sincerity,  our  feelings
through our hardships and despair. It is to take refuge only in  our  Lord's
mercy. It is to place our trust in Him only. It is  to  endure  illness  and
calamity with patience, fortitude and  submission;  knowing  that  they  are
trials for us.

    Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
    Our Lord enjoins: [pic] That is to say, Allah is the sole owner of  life
and death. He is the One who gives life, and who is going to  take  it  when
the time comes. Our Lord is going to revive us after we die. He is going  to
question us for our actions. He is going to give everyone what they  exactly
deserve. Our task is to stay true to our faith to the very last  breath.  It
is to make our life blessed with righteous deeds. It  is  to  be  ready  for
death and the day of judgment at all times.

    Allah wants us to hope for his mercy  by  enjoining:  [pic]  Because  He
never lets down those who stay true to their faith, those who  surrender  to
Him with all their heart. Our task is not to insist on  sins  and  mistakes.
It is to take refuge in our Lord's name, At-Tawwab, with repentance that  is
the recognition of our helplessness and manifestation of our  penitence.  It
is to pay no attention to those who promise us eternal salvation. It  is  to
remember that our salvation depends only on the will of our Lord,  with  the
guidance of Qur'an and as a result  of  a  life  that  is  lived  under  the
teachings of our Prophet (pbuh).

    Brothers and Sisters!
    I want to conclude this khutba with the prayer taught to us in Surah Ash-
Shu'ara through the mouth of Prophet Ibrahim: ""O our Lord! Bestow wisdom  on
us, and join us with the righteous! Grant us an honorable mention  in  later
generations! Place us among the inheritors of the Garden of Delight! Do  not
put us to shame on the Day when all shall be raised from the dead!""

-----------------------
[i] Al-Ikhlas, 112/1-4.
[ii] Ash-Shu'ara, 26/78-82.
[iii] Abu Dawud, Good Manners and Form, 97, 98.

                       Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
112;2018-12-28;"
DATE: 28.12.2018
                                    [pic]
                             LIVING A LIFE WITH
                       THE AWARENESS OF RESPONSIBILITY
    Honorable Muslims!
    In the verse that I recited, Our Sublime Lord declares that: ""Every soul
will taste death, and you will only be given  your  [full]  compensation  on
the Day of Resurrection. So,  he  who  is  drawn  away  from  the  Fire  and
admitted to Paradise has attained [his desire]. And  what  is  the  life  of
this world except the enjoyment of delusion.""[i]

    In the honorable hadith that I read Our Dear Prophet (s.a.w.) says: ""The
clever person is the one who subjugates his  soul  and  works  for  what  is
after death. And the incapable is  the  one  who  follows  his  desires  and
merely hopes in Allah.""[ii]

    Esteemed Believers!
    Our Lord created death and life to test us [as to] which of us  is  best
in deed.[iii] In the eternal world, what will turn into good news of  heaven
or torment of hell is what we have done during this line of  life,  or  what
we have neglected and abandoned. We all see that we live by  the  time  that
flows like water and every day we are  running  out  of  our  life  capital.
Every minute passes us away from our youth and brings us one step closer  to
maturity and even old age. We're moving towards the day  of  our  death  and
judgement that we do not know when, where and how  we  are  going  to  face,
inevitable ending.

    Valuable Muslims!
    Our Sublime Lord in The Holy Qur'an, declares that, ""Does man think that
he will be left neglected?""[iv]. This verse warns us that all the  blessings
of our Lord, especially life, also  require  responsibility.  Like  all  the
blessings that we are incapable to give their due  thanks,  our  life  is  a
trust to us from Our Lord. So, we are responsible for where and for what  we
spend our life. In the words of Our Beloved Prophet (s.a.w.), there are  two
blessings which many people lose: (They are) Health and free time for  doing
good.[v] Yet, the times spent with the awareness of  responsibility  towards
Allah turn into earnings and save the  owner  from  the  frustration.  Those
lives are blessed which believing Allah and abiding by the Sunnah, the  life
of the Messenger of Allah. The lives  adorned  with  goodness,  beneficence,
virtue and beautiful morality, flourishes.

    Valuable Believers!
    We are leaving behind another year of our life, where  we  are  sent  to
develop a peaceful  and  just  world  that  is  appropriate  to  our  Lord's
contentment. These days in which the calendars are changed are an  important
opportunity for us to account for the  past.  To  review  our  mistakes,  to
repent to our sins, to make new and correct decisions,  to  open  immaculate
pages of our lives, it is a rare opportunity. Otherwise,  the  new  year  is
not a time  period  for  forgetting  our  religious  and  moral  values  and
displaying behaviors that are incompatible with our national  and  spiritual
sensibilities.

    Esteemed Believers!
    Let us ask ourselves as we enter a new year based on Christian calendar:
Are we able to place the faith and determination to win our  contentment  of
Our Lord in the center of our lives? Or did we go after our desires? Did  we
spend our power and strength, our knowledge and  labor,  our  mind  and  our
experience for the sake of exalting Islamic values, human and moral  values?
Or did we prioritize our daily desires and  personal  expectations?  In  our
heart, have we included mercy, justice, humility  and  wisdom?  Or  have  we
succumbed to arrogance, stinginess, envy and showing off and  pretending  to
do good actions, without having the real intention  for  doing  it?  Did  we
connect faithfully to the  divine  edict  of  Our  Lord?  ""O  you  who  have
believed, indeed, intoxicants, gambling, [sacrificing on] stone  alters  [to
other than Allah], and divining arrows are but defilement from the  work  of
Satan, so avoid it that you may be successful.""[vi] Did we  get  our  hands-
off evil? Do we keep our tongue away from sinister words? Did we  clear  our
mind of bad thoughts? Did we fill our heart with the love of Allah? Have  we
been able to protect the rights of our parents, our  spouse,  our  children?
When was the last time we caress an orphan's head? Which  of  our  neighbors
did we ask about their wellbeing? Which elderly heart we conciliated?  Which
poor person's need did we eliminate?

    Valuable Muslims!
    Let's decide to equip our remaining life with good and  beautiful  deeds
that will earn our Lord's contentment.  Let  us  not  forget  the  honorable
responsibility of being a human, the weight  of  shouldering  the  trust  of
Allah and the proximity of the day of the judgement.  Let's  not  waste  our
time. Let's stay away  from  null  and  useless  jobs.  Let's  give  up  our
mistakes and errors. Let's multiply our worship,  good  deeds  and  charity.
Then every year of our life will become a true  milestone  for  us,  a  real
possibility and hope.
-----------------------
[i] Âl-i Imran, 3/185.
[ii] Tirmidhi, Description of the Day of Judgement, 25.
[iii] Mulk, 67/2.
[iv] K?yâme, 75/36.
[v] Bukhari, To make the Heart Tender, 1.
6 Mâide
5/??????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????
?90.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services


"
113;2018-09-21;"
DATE: 21.09.2018
                                    [pic]

           MESSAGES TO BELIEVERS FROM THE BEAUTIFUL NAMES OF ALLAH
    Esteemed Believers!
    We as Muslims recite the last three verses of the Surah  al-Hashr  after
the  fajr  (morning)  and  maghrib  (evening)  prayers.  We  think  of   the
existence, oneness, and exaltedness of Allah (swt),  and  glorify  Him  with
His Asma al-Husna  (the  Most  Beautiful  Names).  We  seek  to  become  the
beneficiaries of the Prophet's (saw) glad tiding that angels will  pray  for
those who recite these verses in the morning and in the evening.[i]


    Valuable Muslims!
    The last three verses of the Surah al-Hashr starts with the  precept  of
oneness of Allah that reads as, [pic] ""He is Allah, other  than  Whom  there
is no deity"". It teaches every human being that  they  need  to  acknowledge
this truth by heart and be sincerely devoted to Allah (swt).


     [pic] Our Lord knows all things, visible or invisible. He is al-Rahman,
most merciful for all people  in  the  world.  He  is  al-Rahim,  especially
merciful for the believers in the Hereafter.


    Believers live their life knowing that Allah (swt) sees them at any time
and  at  any  place,  and  knows  their  all  intentions  as  we   believers
acknowledge that our Lord is closer to us than our jugular vein[ii]


    Esteemed Brothers and Sisters!
    Allah (swt) introduces Himself to us with His names as follows:[pic] Our
Lord is al-Malik, the Only Owner of Sovereignty. To  him  belongs  existence
and  non-existence.  It  is  He  who  entrusts  all  the  blessings  in  our
possession.  Believers  live  their  life  with  the  awareness  that  every
blessing in their possession is entrusted to them by Allah  (swt).  They  do
not fall captive to possessions, high ranks or  positions,  and  fortune  or
fame. On  the  contrary,  they  believe  that  they  will  account  for  all
blessings  they  have  had,  so  they  observe  and  respect  the  entrusted
blessings.


    Allah the Almighty (swt) is al Quddus, far from any kind of  deficiency.
He has the absolute  perfection.  He  is  al-Salam,  the  Source  of  Peace.
Believers, therefore, seek to establish  peace  and  quiet  particularly  in
their family, and in any area of their life as well.


    Allah the Almighty (swt) is al Mu'min, the Giver  of  Security  and  the
Preserver of Safety. He is the Bestower of Faith for those  who  open  their
hearts. He is al-Muhaymin, the Guardian of Faith and  the  Overseer  of  all
things. In the face of all worldly troubles, He (swt)  is  Whom  we  depend,
seek refuge in, beg and pray with our hands open for.


    He is al-Aziz, the only Victorious, the Real Owner of glory and fame. He
is al-Jabbar, the One Who performs what He wills in every  situation,  heals
the wounds and grieves the troubles. He is  al-Mutakabbir;  greatness  suits
only Him; He has no match in greatness. Everyone is helpless  and  incapable
before Him. [pic] Our Lord (swt) is free from any kind of  imperfection,  He
has no match or counterpart.


    Honorable Muslims!
    In the last verse of Surah al-Hashr, our  Almighty  Lord  (swt)  states:
[pic] Allah (swt) is He Who creates what He  wills  in  the  form  He  wills
uniquely  without  an  example.  He  (swt)   determines   the   shapes   and
characteristics of creatures.  Believers  look  out  for  their  disposition
bestowed by their Lord until their last breath. They know that the  valuable
thing in the presence of Allah (swt) is not appearance, wealth  or  property
but a perfect faith, a kind heart, righteous deeds and good  morality.  They
protect their heart from the evil such as grudge,  hatred,  corruption,  and
envy.


    [pic] The most beautiful names belong to Him (swt). We supplicate  Allah
(swt) with His most beautiful names. Our  Prophet  (saw)  said,  ""Allah  has
ninety-nine names. Whoever learns them  and  counts  by  acting  accordingly
will go to Paradise.""[iii]. Comprehending the meaning of our Lord's Asma al-
Husna and acting accordingly must be our purpose.


    [pic]

    Whatever is in the heavens and on earth  all  exalt  and  glorify  Allah
(swt). To Him (swt) belongs the absolute power, judgement, and  wisdom.  Our
duty is to glorify our Almighty Lord and to submit  to  Him  with  both  our
words and attitudes in compliance with His consent.


    Esteemed Brothers and Sisters!
    The necessity of faith in Allah is not  associating  anything  with  Him
(swt), and not bowing down before any other power. It is  never  to  neglect
the duties of servitude which are the  indicators  of  submission  to  Allah
(swt).


    Let us all pray to Allah (swt) wholeheartedly on this  blessed  hour  of
Friday and say: Our Lord! Allow us to become of your servants  who  properly
believe in you, who sincerely devote themselves  to  Islam,  understand  and
live the truths you have taught in Surah al-Hashr! Do not deprive us of  the
guidance of the Holy Qur'an, the exemplary  life  of  our  Prophet  Muhammad
Mustafa (saw) even for a blink of an eye!


    O Lord! Grant a life full of health, welfare, and peace  on  our  heroic
veterans, who risked their lives with the wish  of  martyrdom,  and  honored
with the rank of being a veteran!

    O Allah! Have mercy on our noble martyrs who sacrificed their lives  for
the sake of religion, homeland, and sacred values!
-----------------------
[i] Tirmidhi, Fadhail al-Qur'an, 22.
[ii] Qaf, 50/16.
[iii] Bukhari, Shurut, 18.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
114;2017-07-14;"
  LOCATION    :  NATIONWIDE
  DATE               : 14.07.2017


                                    [pic]

         THE GLORIOUS RESISTANCE THAT SALAS BORE WITNESS: 15 TEMMUZ

  Honorable Believers!
  In the verse I have recited, Allah Almighty enjoins: ""O you who  believe!
Remember Allah's favor on you when a people had determined to stretch  forth
their hands towards you, but He  withheld  their  hands  from  you,  and  be
careful of (your duty to) Allah; and on Allah let the believers rely.""[i]

  Brothers and Sisters!
  This verse was actually revealed to inform how Allah the Exalted assisted
and supported the army of Islam  with  His  angles  in  the  Battle  of  the
Trench. But Allah's assurance always was realized  in  many  turning  points
throughout history. It came true in Manzikert, in Çanakkale, in Sakarya,  in
Dumlup?nar. And as a nation, we  witnessed  a  year  ago  on  July  15  that
Allah's assurance was realized. That  night,  we  faced  a  big  attempt  of
treason and invasion as a  country  and  nation.  On  that  dark  night,  we
witnessed once again that Allah did not spare His favor, grace,  assistance,
and blessing from us. For that  reason,  our  most  important  duty  on  the
anniversary of July 15 is to never  forget  Allah's  favor  and  grace,  His
mercy  and  assistance.  As  believers  who  overcame  this  great  calamity
shoulder to shoulder, we must always thank Allah,  show  gratitude  to  Him,
and prostrate ourselves before Him.

  Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
  Another fact we must never forget is the prayers and  supplications  said
in tears that night by  oppressed,  aggrieved,  and  deprived  brothers  and
sisters around the  world  who  have  pinned  their  hopes  on  us.  We  all
witnessed that night that from Gaza to Sarajevo, Kirkuk  to  Somalia,  Sudan
to Pakistan, the steppes of  Asia  to  the  other  end  of  Africa  all  the
oppressed, the downtrodden, the deprived, the immigrants, and  the  refugees
of the world prayed for our nation. They shed tears in  prostration  praying
""Do not let the last bastion of Islam's Ummah  fall.""  That  night,  we  all
experienced the meaning of our Beloved Prophet's (pbuh)  hadith,  ""Believers
are like building blocks of a structure. They make sure the survival of  one
another.""[ii]

  Venerable Muslims!
  Another fact we must keep alive in our minds at all times is  the  spirit
of unity, togetherness, and solidarity that our nation and  state  displayed
hand in hand with our youth and elders, women and men. We all  witnessed  on
July 15 that our glorious nation took to the streets upon the  call  of  our
statesmen  to  defend  their  own  homeland,   rights,   law,   free   will,
independence, and freedom with takbir on their lips,  sala  in  their  ears,
and the desire for martyrdom in  their  hearts.  That  night,  our  glorious
nation showed the entire world once again that magnificent spirit  described
in our National Anthem: ""What madman shall put me  in  chains?  I  defy  the
very idea! I'm like the roaring flood; trampling my banks and overcoming  my
body!"" Particularly the  fact  that  our  youth  performed  ablution  saying
""bismillah,"" left home reciting the Kalima Shahadat,  and  took  to  streets
with ""Allahu Akbar"" chants was the  biggest  hope  for  the  future  of  our
nation.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  Another point we must always remember is that  the  salas  sounding  from
minarets that night kept us well and alive  as  a  nation  and  aroused  our
spiritual feelings and collective consciousness and  will.  Salas  witnessed
how a nation reared up and banded together around its  values.  Because  our
greatest strength that  makes  us  a  nation  and  that  delivered  us  from
darkness into light that night is our unwavering faith in Allah. It  is  our
will to never bow to any other power than Him.

  Honorable Believers!
  Another point we must never forget is that the treason  and  invasion  we
faced that night was committed under the cover of religion. We witnessed  on
the night of July 15 that a network of treason that exploited this  nation's
religion, faith, values, sentiments, charity, alms, and zakat for  40  years
by pretending to be good-doers targeted the very existence of our nation.  A
movement of discord that wasted several  generations  by  stealing  people's
children aimed at the survival of our country for  the  goals  of  invaders.
This invasion attempt showed us once again that  we  must  learn  our  great
religion from accurate sources. We must experience Islam  in  the  best  way
under the guidance of Quran and Sunnah. We must not veer away from the  path
that built civilizations throughout history. We must not build such a  grand
truth as religion  upon  individuals.  We  must  not  abandon  the  path  of
knowledge and wisdom so that we never experience  such  evil  and  treachery
again and bow to movements of evil that disguise themselves in the color  of
goodness.

  Brothers and Sisters!
  Lastly, another fact we must not  forget  is  to  always  gratefully  and
fondly remember our  great  martyrs  who  sacrificed  their  lives  for  our
values,  and  our  veterans  who  carry  their  wounds  like  a   medal   of
independence. May Allah rest the soul of our martyrs! May He let  them  join
the martyrs of Badr, Uhud, Trench, Manzikert, Çanakkale,  and  Sakarya.  May
He reward and cure all our veterans! And May He never let us veer away  from
their path!
-----------------------
[i] Al-Ma'idah, 5/11.
[ii] Bukhari, Salât, 88; Muslim, Birr ve S?la, 65.

           Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
115;2019-09-27;"
DATE: 27.09.2019
[pic]
    MOSQUESAND LIFE
    Honorable Muslims!
    In the verse I have just recited, the Almighty Allah (swt) states,  ""The
mosques of Allah are only to be maintained by those  who  believe  in  Allah
and the Last Day and establish prayer and give zakah and do not fear  except
Allah, for it is expected that those will be of the [rightly] guided.""[i]

    In the hadith I have just recited,  the  Prophet  Muhammad  (saw)  says,
""...The most beloved places on Earth to Allah are its mosques.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    The Islamic civilization is the one centered around the mosque.  Mosques
are holy places that have from the past to the  present  borne  witness  the
social life itself and where the Islamic places develop and  Muslims  unite.
The mosque is the heart of our residential areas, the spirit of our  cities,
and the safe haven for our noble nation and the Muslim ummah. They  are  not
only places for worship,  but  also  hubs  where  our  history,  literature,
customs and traditions, and culture are intertwined.

    Dear Muslims!
    The Prophet Muhammad (saw) placed a special emphasis on building mosques
and masjids. Upon the hijrah from Makkah to Madinah, he first of all,  built
the Masjid al-Nabawi. He turned Yathrib into Madinah,  and  the  Masjid  al-
Nabawi into the cradle of science and knowledge. That way,  the  Prophet  of
Mercy actually  designed  a  city  model  centered  around  the  mosque  and
established strong ties between the mosque and the life. It was  the  Masjid
al-Nabawi where he laid the foundation  of  the  Islamic  civilization  that
has, since the Asr al-Saadah, spread  justice,  wisdom,  compassion,  peace,
safety and security, and knowledge throughout its reach.  In  the  Suffa,  a
special section in  the  Masjid  al-Nabawi,  a  group  of  young  and  self-
sacrificing companions who  devoted  themselves  to  knowledge  and  worship
turned out to  be  the  forerunners  of  a  benevolent  generation.  On  one
occasion, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) gave the good  news  that  Allah  would
let those people whose hearts were connected to masjids enjoy the  shade  of
the sky on the Last  Day.[iii]In  this  regard,  he  encouraged  Muslims  to
enhance and improve mosques that are the apple of  the  eyes  of  cities  by
saying, ""Whoever builds a masjid for Allah,  Allah  will  build  for  him  a
house like it in heaven.""[iv]

    Dear Believers!
    Just as we  need  to  eat,  drink,  and  work,  and  just  as  they  are
significant, it is also necessary and valuable to center  our  lives  around
mosques. This is because mosques are exceptional places where we can  listen
to our own self in the rush of the daily life, and under the domes of  which
we can submit our  servitude  to  Allah  (swt).  They  help  us  as  Muslims
strengthen our brotherhood and consolidate our unity and togetherness.  They
are blessed places that unite our bodies, as well as our  hearts,  as  clear
of all kinds of self-centeredness. Mosques, for all  of  us,  are  sometimes
places  of  peace  and  tranquility,  and  sometimes  sources  of  hope  and
consolation.

    Dear Muslims!
    The sound of adhan rising from the minarets does not  only  call  us  to
performing prayer five times a day.  Mosques,  together  with  their  adhan,
minaret, dome, mihrab, and minbar,  invite  people  to  servitude,  worship,
piety, knowledge, and good morals as well. Then, Muslims, who  submit  their
servitude to Allah (swt) by standing in prayer,  should  be  aware  that  He
oversees them outside mosques as well. Standing side by  side  in  the  same
row with iman and ikhlas, they are responsible to protect and take  care  of
their brotherly relations. Muslims, who enhance and  improve  mosques,  also
protect and beautify the  environment  they  live.  They  do  not  damage  a
growing plant by itself, nor do they harm an  ant  in  pursuit  of  its  own
sustenance. Muslims, who keep their  mosques  clean,  also  keep  clean  the
world, the entirety of which is made a masjid by Allah (swt).

    Dear Muslims!
    How sad it is that today, when we are taken down by getting isolated and
alienated, our mosques are gradually losing  their  position  of  being  the
heart of cities. However, the only places  that  will  welcome  us,  like  a
compassionate mother's embracing her child, are our mosques.  Our  exhausted
souls will rest in mosques, our spirituality will get stronger  in  mosques,
and the answer to our search for the meaning of anything will  be  found  in
mosques.

    Then, come! Let us center our lives around the  mosques  again.  Let  us
take a break from our busyness during the prayer times,  whether  we  are  a
superior or a subordinate, an employer or an employee, a business  owner  or
a student of any walk of life. Let us all, women or  men  and  children  and
old people, go to mosques and flourish in mosques.  Let  us  not  leave  our
mosques unattended and abandoned. Let us attain true peace by  standing  for
prayer in mosques for Allah (swt). Let us not forget  that  mosques  are  in
the center of life and full of life.

    Dear Believers!
    As in each year, this year,  too,  the  week  of  1-7  October  will  be
celebrated as ""the Mosques and Religious  Officials  Week"".  We  will  share
with our society the meaning and values added to our  life  by  the  mosques
and religious officials through this year's theme  ""Mosques  and  Life"".  We
will remember with  gratitude  our  charity-loving  nation's  sacrifices  to
enhance and improve our mosques.

    I would like to take this opportunity to wish  Allah's  mercy  upon  the
deceased religious officials, who guide our life  starting  with  adhan  and
ending with salah, and the deceased members of our  congregation,  which  is
the most valuable asset of our mosques, and to wish health and a  long  life
for those alive yet. May Allah never leave  our  homeland  without  mosques,
our mosques without congregation, and our minarets without adhan.
-----------------------
[i] Tawbah, 9/18.
[ii] Muslim, Masajid, 288.
[iii] Muslim, Zakat, 91.
[iv] Muslim, Zuhd, 44.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
116;2018-10-12;"
DATE: 12.10.2018
                                    [pic]
           ALLAH THE ALMIGHTY GIVES EACH RIGHTHOLDER THEIR RIGHTS
    Esteemed Believers!
    Following the Hijrah, our Beloved Prophet (saw) declared  the  muhajirun
and the ansar brothers. Salman al-Farsi (ra) and Abu Darda (ra)  were  among
the  Companions  between  whom  the  bonds  of  spiritual  brotherhood  were
established. After being honored with Islam, Abu Darda (ra) decided  not  to
engage in anything but worship Allah (swt). He  quit  commercial  activities
and even began to neglect his family.  Seeing  his  situation,  Salman  (ra)
warned his brother Abu Darda (ra) with the following words: ""Your  Lord  has
a right upon you. Your soul has a right upon you. Your family  has  a  right
upon you. So, give every rightholder their  rights!""  When  Abu  Darda  (ra)
conveyed these words of Salman to our Prophet (saw), The Messenger of  Allah
(saw) said, ""Salman has spoken the truth.""[i]

    Honorable Muslims!
    The  source  of  the  rights  is  Allah  (swt).  To  Him  (swt)  belongs
everything; He (swt) is the Owner of the earth, and the heaven. Allah  (swt)
is the One Who created us from nothing, and Who bestows  upon  us  countless
blessings. Therefore, it is He (swt) Whose rights we must observe most.  Our
Prophet (saw) informed us of our responsibility towards our Lord  (swt)  and
the reward we would get when we have carried  out  this  responsibility  as:
""The right of Allah upon His servants  is,  to  worship  Him  alone  and  to
associate none in worship with Him. If they do so, their  right  upon  Allah
is not to punish them, and let them in the Heaven.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    After servitude to Allah (swt) comes the  observing  of  the  rights  of
parents, who are the reason  of  our  creation,  in  terms  of  significance
before Him (swt), as stated in the Holy Qur'an: ""And your Lord  has  decreed
that you not worship except Him, and to  parents,  good  treatment.  Whether
one or both reach old age [while] with you, say not to them  [so  much  as],
'uff' and do not repel them but speak to them a noble word.""[iii]

    As parents have rights upon their children, children  have  rights  upon
parents as well. It is our children's right upon us to feed them with  halal
food, to raise them as morally good individuals who  are  heartily  attached
to their religion, beneficial to their homeland, nation,  and  humanity.  In
this respect, the Messenger of Allah (saw) stated in a hadith: ""There is  no
gift that a father gives his child more valuable than good manners.""[iv]

    Honorable Muslims!
    Regardless of religion, race, or gender, every person has the right to
life. It is a great sin to take a life, to violate the right to life of
women, children, and innocent people for whatever reason except the
boundaries determined by Allah (swt). Our Lord (swt) commands as follows in
this regard: ""But whoever kills a believer intentionally - his recompense
is Hell, wherein he will abide eternally, and Allah has become angry with
him and has cursed him and has prepared for him a great punishment.""[v]

    Esteemed Muslims!
    According to our religion, we should approach not only humans  but  also
animals with compassion and mercy. The consequence  of  persecuting  animals
and ignoring their  rights  to  life  will  result  in  devastation  in  the
afterlife. Indeed, the Prophet of Mercy (saw) told a woman who kept  captive
a cat and caused it to die of hunger that would go to hell because  of  this
cruelty[vi], on the other hand, informed man who gave  water  to  a  thirsty
dog that he would be forgiven by Allah  because  an  action  as  such  would
please Him.[vii]

    Esteemed Believers!
    It is stated in the Holy Qur'an, the book of truth and right, that: ""And
from their properties was [given] the right of the [needy] petitioner and
the deprived.""[viii] The believers who are conscious that the needy have
right in their wealth never hesitate to help the poor, the indigent, the
orphan, and the forlorn. They are moderate in their expenditures, and avoid
waste and vanity. They prefer simplicity and frugality. They know that the
inhabitants of the earth have rights even in a morsel of bread.

    Valuable Believers!
    We also have responsibilities to the society we live in. To fulfill
them, each of us should protect the rights of the public as well as the
rights of individuals since the violation of rights is the greatest threat
to the peace and brotherhood of a society. Behaviors such as condoning
violence, polluting the environment, disobeying traffic rules, consuming
electricity illegally, stockpiling, damaging the public property result in
social tension and loss. Our Prophet (saw) describes the extent of this
loss to the Hereafter as: ""Neither gold nor silver money is available on
the day of Judgment. Therefore, the rewards of those who have wronged their
brothers are taken from them and given to the wronged person. If they do
not have any rewards, then some of the sins of the wronged are taken and
given to them.""[ix]

    Brothers and Sisters!
    Let us get prepared for the Day of Judgment, the day we shall be
returned to Allah (swt), and that everyone shall be given exactly what they
have deserved. Let us take refuge in Allah (swt) from defrauding, asking
for what is not ours, and doing injustice by not giving the people their
rights. Let us become sincere servants, respectful children, compassionate
parents, and loyal spouses. Let us love the created for the sake of the
Creator (swt), and show mercy to them.
-----------------------
[i] Bukhari, Sawm, 51.
[ii] Ibn Hanbal, V, 239.
[iii] Isra, 17/23.
[iv] Tirmidhi, Birr wa Sila, 33.
[v] Nisa, 4/93.
[vi] Bukhari, Bad' al-Khalq, 16.
[vii] Bukhari, Musaqat, 9.
[viii] Dhariyat, 51/19.
[ix] Tirmidhi, Sifat al-Qiyamah, 2.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
117;2020-02-07;"
DATE: 07.02.2020
[pic]

         AL-QUDS (JERUSALEM) IS AN ISLAMIC LAND AND BELONGS TO ISLAM
    Honorable Muslims!
    One day Prophet Muhammad's wife Maymunah asked him, ""Tell  us  something
about Bayt al-Maqdis."" He (saw) said, ""That is the  place  of  resurrection.
Go and pray there! For one prayer  performed  there  is  like  one  thousand
prayers performed elsewhere."" When she asked him, ""What if I  cannot  travel
and go there?"", he replied, ""Then send a gift of  olive  oil  to  light  its
lamps. For whoever does that is like one who goes there.""[i]

    Dear Believers!
    Al-Quds is a universal value that bears  witness  to  the  most  deeply-
rooted human heritage. It is the symbol of a stance that reflects  faith,  a
direction that is aligned with the divine revelation,  and  a  turn  towards
affection. It is an  Islamic  city,  home  to  countless  memories  of  many
prophets. The first qibla of Muslims, al-Masjid al-Aqsa, is  there.  In  the
hadith I recited as I  began  the  khutbah,  Prophet  Muhammad  (saw)  says,
""Mounts are not saddled for except to travel to three masjids  for  worship:
Al-Masjid Al-Haram, this Masjid of mine, and al-Masjid Al-Aqsa.""[ii]

    Dear Muslims!
    Al-Quds is referred to as ""dar al-salam (Jerusalem)"", namely the land of
peace. Al-Quds has been the symbol of freedom and justice under  the  Muslim
rule for centuries. It was ruled as a land on which  not  only  Muslims  but
also all people of any faith could freely perform their  worships  and  live
in peace.

    Since its  invasion  and  occupation,  however,  al-Quds  has  lost  its
peaceful  and  tranquil  atmosphere.  Al-Quds  is  woeful.  Overshadowed  by
conflicts, insults, and oppression, al-Masjid al-Aqsa  is  in  sorrow.  This
occupation actually targets the unity,  solidarity,  and  sacred  values  of
Muslims. It prevents Muslims from worshipping  in  their  own  land  and  in
their own mosques. However, in the Holy Qur'an it is  stated  of  those  who
damage the masjids of Allah and prevent Muslims from worshipping,  ""And  who
are more unjust than  those  who  prevent  the  name  of  Allah  from  being
mentioned in His mosques and strive toward their destruction. It is not  for
them to enter them except in fear. For them in this world is  disgrace,  and
they will have in the Hereafter a great punishment.""[iii]

    Dear Believers!
    To occupy Palestine and al-Quds means actually to prevent peace not only
in the region but also across the world  by  creating  chaos.  To  fuel  the
turmoil and feed on war-waging means actually to turn one's back  on  mercy,
conscience, and compassion. To force Muslims out of  al-Quds,  a  city  that
has  throughout  the  history  embraced  all  humanity,  means  actually  to
disregard the laws, rights and honor of all humanity.

    As the cry-outs of the oppressed  people  reach  the  clouds,  the  only
solution is for Prophet Muhammad's ummah to come together and stand  against
the oppression and occupation. For  only  when  they  unite  their  faithful
stances and capabilities, Muslims will form the fairest  and  most  merciful
force in the world. They will be the shared hope of all humanity that is  in
search  of  fairness  and  trust.  Let  us  not  forget  that,  for  Prophet
Muhammad's ummah, al-Quds is an opportunity  to  save  Muslims'  untouchable
land and their distorted unity. Al-Quds is  also  the  cause  for  rendering
prosperous the devastated life in the world, in all quarters  of  which  run
blood and tear.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Jerusalem (al-Quds) is an Islamic  land  and  belongs  to  Muslims.  Our
honorable nation has a deep  love  for  al-Quds  and  takes  Masjid  al-Aqsa
dearer than their own life and property. Just as in the  past,  today,  too,
the  helping  hand  of  our  nation  is  extended  out  for  our   oppressed
Palestinian brothers and sisters who have for years  been  safeguarding  the
Masjid al-Aqsa.
-----------------------
[i] Ibn Majah, Iqamah, 196; Abu Dawud, Salat, 14.
[ii] Bukhari, Fadhl al-Salat, 1.
[iii] Baqarah, 2/114.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
118;2019-01-11;"
DATE: 11.01.2019
[pic]
          MAN'S JOURNEY TO PERFECTION: ISLAM, FAITH AND BENEFICENCE
    Honorable Muslims!
    One day while the Prophet (s.a.w.) was sitting with  the  companions,  a
man came up, whose clothes were extremely white, whose  hair  was  extremely
black, upon whom traces of traveling could not be seen,  and  whom  none  of
the companions knew, who sat down close to the Prophet (s.a.w.)  and  asked,
'What is Islam?' Allah's  Messenger  (s.a.w.)  replied: ""To  worship  Allah
Alone and none else, to  offer  prayers  perfectly  to  pay  the  compulsory
charity (Zakat) and to observe fasts during the month of  Ramadan,  and  you
perform the hajj of the House if you are able to take a way to it.""

    He said, 'You have told the truth,' Companions were amazed at him asking
and [then] telling that He told the truth. Then he further asked,  'Tell  me
about Iman/faith.' Allah's Messenger (s.a.w.) replied: ""Faith is to believe
in  Allah,  His  angels,  His  Books,  His  Apostles,  and  to  believe   in
Resurrection, and that you believe the Decree, the good of it  and  the  bad
of it."" He said again, 'You have told the truth,'  Then  he  further  asked,
'Tell me about Ihsan/ beneficence.' Allah's Messenger (s.a.w.) replied: ""To
worship Allah as if you see Him, and if you cannot  achieve  this  state  of
devotion then you must consider that He is looking at you.""  He  also  asked
some questions about the apocalypse and left.  Our  Dear  Prophet  (s.a.w.),
told Omar (r.a.) who witnessed the event: 'That was  Gabriel  who  came  to
teach you, your religion.'[i]

    Valuable Believers!
    Faith is the affirmation of Allah's existence and  unity  and  what  Our
Prophet brought from Almighty Allah, with the heart and the language.  Faith
is the bond of love and trust between the servant and Allah.  Faith  is  the
loyalty and sincerity promise of man who  knows  the  purpose  of  creation.
What is befitting to human beings, is to stand by this promise  and  fulfill
its requirements.

    Valuable Muslims!
    Islam is to live as we believe and to reflect faith  on  our  lives.  To
worship Allah with complete submission,  to  devote  all  our  material  and
spiritual existence to His way, to obey his orders, to  avoid  prohibitions.
It is this Muslim's loyalty to Allah in His words, deeds and behaviors,  and
his willingness not to associate anything with Him.

    Valuable Muslims!
    The beneficence in the Gabriel hadith is the awareness of servitude  and
the peak of beautiful morality. Beneficence is to feel the presence  of  Our
Lord in every moment of life, who declares that ""...We  are  closer  to  him
than [his] jugular vein.""[ii] This is to live in the presence  of  Our  Lord
in divine supervision and blessings, in accordance with the ""...He  is  with
you wherever you are. And Allah, of what you do, is Seeing""[iii]  verse,  in
the spirit of needing His favors and His support.

    Esteemed Believers!
    To believe, to carry out the worship of  Islam,  and  to  act  with  the
consciousness of beneficence, is like steps that complement  each  other.  A
person who believes in Allah and the verities that He has revealed  will  of
course strive to be a sincere Muslim by  not  disrupting  or  hindering  his
worship. The indispensable necessity of faith and worship is  to  have  good
morals. The person who believes but does not perfect  it  with  worship  and
good morality, is in a misadventure.  A  person  who  is  not  crowning  his
morality with faith and worship will  be  deprived  of  the  contentment  of
Allah. Anyone who is worshipping, but who has a weakness in terms  of  faith
and morals, cannot see the benefits of the worship which remains as  only  a
form, not the full content  of  worship.  Therefore,  every  person  who  is
pleased being a servant of Allah, Islam as a religion, Muhammad (s.a.w.)  as
the Prophet, should beautify their faith, worship, and morality  altogether.
That is when the believer will receive  this  herald  of  the  Holy  Qur'an:
""Indeed, they who  have  believed  and  done  righteous  deeds  and  humbled
themselves to their Lord - those are the companions of Paradise;  they  will
abide eternally therein.""[iv]

    Honorable Muslims!
    Let us not deprive our soul of a blessing such as faith, a food such  as
worship, a consciousness  like  beneficence.  Because  all  kinds  of  good,
auspiciousness and the base of verity, the meaning of being human,  and  the
value of servitude are hidden in these three ores.

    Let's be sincere and diligent on the road to servitude. Let us  keep  in
mind that every word that is poured out of our tongue, every  work  that  is
out of our hands, every view we see with our eyes, every step we take has  a
return on the level of Supreme Allah.

    I conclude my khutbah with the prayer of Our Dear Prophet  (s.a.w.):  ""O
Allah, guide me to the best of deeds and the best of manners, for  none  can
guide to the best of them but You. And protect me from  bad  deeds  and  bad
manners, for none can protect against them but You.""[v]
-----------------------
[i] Bukhari, Belief, 37.
[ii] Qâf, 50/16.
[iii] Hadîd, 57/4.
[iv] Hûd, 11/23.
[v] Nasâi, Commencement of the Prayer, 16.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
119;2017-11-17;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 17.11.2017

	



THE RELIGION BEFORE ALLAH IS ISLAM

Blessed Friday to You All, Brothers and Sisters!

A Jewish young man working in the service of the Messenger of Allah (pbuh) contracted a grave illness. Our Prophet, the example of fidelity, visited this young man in his deathbed. The Messenger of Mercy could not find it in his heart to let this young man leave the world like this and he invited him once again to become a Muslim, with a tone full of mercy. The young man hesitantly looked at his father. It was obvious that he was afraid of his family’s reaction if he became a Muslim. But the result was not as he feared and his father asked him to accept this kind invitation of Allah’s Messenger. Then the young man recited the Testimony of Faith and was honored with Islam. Extremely happy about this situation, our Prophet stated his gratefulness like this: “Praises be to Allah, Who saved the boy from the fire through me.” 

Honorable Believers!

Our Lord Almighty enjoins in the verse I have recited at the beginning of this khutba:  
 “Truly, The religion before Allah is Islam.” 

Our Prophet (pbuh) says in the holy hadith I have recited: “There is none who testifies sincerely that none has the right to be worshipped but Allah and Muhammad is his Apostle, except that Allah, will save him from the Hell-fire.”  

Brothers and Sisters!

Starting with Prophet Adam, all prophets invited the humanity to only submit to and worship Allah the One and Only. In times when people strayed away from the faith of Tawhid and nearly forgot the reason and wisdom of their creation, our Lord Almighty repeated His invitation through the prophets. The last Messenger of this holy cause was our Prophet Muhammad Mustafa, sent as a mercy to the worlds.  Just like the prophets before him, he invited people to only believe in and worship Allah, to the right and the truth, to knowledge and wisdom, to morality and virtue.
 “This day have I perfected your religion for you, completed my favor upon you, and have chosen for you Islam as your religion.”   Just as it is stated in this verse, Islam was perfected with the Greatest Messenger. He taught humanity the ways of reaching happiness in this world and hereafter.

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

We believe that all prophets are the servants and messengers of Allah and also believe in the original books that were sent through them. Again, we know and believe that the only religion valid before Allah until the Day of Judgement is Islam. The eternal salvation of all mankind is only possible by submitting to Allah’s last religion, namely Islam. The happiness in this world and hereafter depends upon the belief in the rejuvenating messages of the Quran and the unique example of our Prophet.

Each believer who recites the Testimony of Faith with all his heart, who comes into the presence of Allah with obedience, good deeds, charity and goodness will be honored with our Lord’s mercy. Whoever does not accept Allah the Almighty as his Lord, Islam as his religion, Muhammad Mustafa (pbuh) as his Prophet and Quran as his book is wronged themselves. Our Almighty Lord, in the Qur'an, enjoins:



 “And whoever seeks a religion other than Islam, it will never be accepted of him, and in the Hereafter he will be one of the losers”

Honorable Believers!

Those who can not tolerate the spread of Islam throughout the world and settle into the hearts of people have always engaged in various attempts against our religion. Islam is the hope of salvation for all mankind and a religion of mercy and compassion, peace and trust. But certain people try to defame Islam through unjust accusations like terror and violence. In many parts of the world, Muslims are exposed to practices that are incompatible with conscience and justice such as marginalization, discrimination, oppression, violence and persecution. Islamophobia spreads rapidly each passing day.

Brothers and Sisters!

Throughout history, the attempts on harming and destroying our religion, our values and our beliefs have done no harm, and with Allah’s will, are going to do no harm to the truth of Islam. As long as we know the value of our religion despite all these unfortunate events; offer our thanks to our Lord Who granted us this religion and learn our holy religion through authentic knowledge based on Quran and sunnah and teach it to future generations. As long as we properly practice the Islamic principles of faith, prayer and morality and be a good example for humanity. Let us protect our faith and prayers, brotherhood and fondness, in short, all our values together.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

I want to conclude with these prayers Quran taught us:

“Our Lord! Let not our hearts deviate (from the truth) after You have guided us, and grant us mercy from You. Truly, You are the Bestower” 

“Our Lord! Forgive us our sins and our transgressions, establish our feet firmly, and give us victory over the disbelieving folk.”"
120;2018-11-16;"
DATE: 16.11.2018
[pic]
                               MAWLID AL-NABI
                       (THE BIRTH OF PROPHET MUHAMMAD)
    Esteemed Believers!
    We will attain the anniversary of the Mawlid al-Nabi, which is  the  day
our Beloved Prophet (saw) honored the world, on Monday night next week.  All
praise be to our Lord (swt) for bestowing us the bliss of  being  the  ummah
of Muhammad. May peace, greetings and blessings be  upon  our  Prophet,  the
cause of mercy and guidance to humankind, to his family and companions.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Allah the Almighty introduces our Prophet (saw) as: ""O  Prophet,  indeed
We have sent you as a witness and a bringer of good tidings  and  a  warner.
And one who invites  to  Allah,  by  His  permission,  and  an  illuminating
lamp.""[i] Our Prophet is a witness to the right and  the  verity,  he  is  a
bringer of good tidings on the path of goodness, and a  warner  against  the
falsehood. He is the  one  who  conveyed  the  Holy  Qur'an  to  the  ummah,
explained and taught it by living himself accordingly. He  is  the  one  who
invited humanity to serenity, peace, and justice.  The  Messenger  of  Allah
(saw) is also the one who  led  the  ummah  in  every  phase  of  his  life,
directed to the right way and enlightened our path in this  world  of  tests
by being a guide to us.

    Valued Believers!
    For those who believe in Allah and seek His countenance, and who want to
be august and happy in both  worlds,  Muhammad  Mustafa  (saw)  is  ""uswatun
hasanah"", the most beautiful example. It is stated  by  our  Lord  (swt)  as
follows: ""There has certainly been for you in  the  Messenger  of  Allah  an
excellent pattern for anyone whose hope is in Allah and  the  Last  Day  and
[who] remembers Allah often.""[ii]

    The  Companions  (ra),  who  were  educated  by  him  observing  such  a
distinguished example,  have  become  the  symbols  of  faith  and  justice,
knowledge and wisdom, courage and mercy. Each member of the Islamic  society
that he built was dignified by leaving behind the darkness of the  jahiliyya
(age of ignorance), and they delivered the  revelation's  message  of  peace
and trust wherever they went.

    Dear Muslims!
    The Messenger of Allah (saw) was a decent young before  his  prophethood
as well. Those who first recognized Muhammad, who was known as ""Muhammad al-
Amin (Muhammad the Reliable) in his society, were also the young  people  of
the time. His honest, virtuous,  conscientious  and  just  persona  was  the
greatest assurance for the youth. Our Prophet (saw), who  taught  his  young
companions to live with perfect faith, righteous deeds, and  good  morality,
raised them as role models that would shine on the horizon of humanity.

    Esteemed Believers!
    Our Prophet (saw) is a unique example for us also in  understanding  the
young people and preparing them for the  future.  He  (saw)  always  trusted
young people, gave them responsibility,  paid  attention  their  ideas,  and
corrected their mistakes without hurting them. When the Prophet  (saw)  sent
Mus'ab to Madinah as a teacher, Mu'adh to Yemen as a judge, appointed  Usama
to be commander of the army, and left Ali (ra), before setting out  for  the
Hijrah with the carry-on food that Asma gave him, in  his  own  bed  to  buy
time, they were all young.

    Young Brothers/Sisters!
    The Messenger of Allah (saw) stated, ""Allah loves the young one, who  is
not  subject  to  his/her  desire,  who  does  not  deviate  from  what   is
right.""[iii]. Today, just like the young companions, you are  going  through
the most fertile years of your life capital.  Even  though  there  are  many
deceptive and diverting fake attractions around you that may drag  you  away
from the  truth,  you  should  always  rely  on  the  power  of  faith,  the
motivation of worship, and the value of morality. You need  to  expend  your
youth energy in the efforts that are  appropriate  for  the  contentment  of
your Lord, and you need to take the Prophet (saw) as  your  guide  and  role
model. For it is you who are going to strive to help goodness  dominate  the
world and find a cure for the bleeding wounds of humanity!  For  it  is  you
who are the burgeoning hope of this noble homeland, this great  nation,  and
the ummah of the Prophet Muhammad (saw)!

    Valued Believers!
    The birthday of our Beloved Prophet, the 12th night of the month of Rabi
al-Awwal in the Hijri calendar, falls on November 19 this year. The week  of
that night will be celebrated as ""Mawlid al-Nabi Week"".  The  Presidency  of
Religious Affairs has determined the theme of the  week  for  this  year  as
""The Prophet Muhammad and the Youth"" We will take this  opportunity  to  get
to  know  our  Prophet  (saw)  more  closely,  understand  him  better,  and
particularly take as example his communication with the  young  people,  and
look for solutions in his Sunnah  to  address  the  problems  of  our  young
people. May the Week of Mawlid al-Nabi bring  auspiciousness  to  our  noble
nation and all the Islamic world. Amin!
-----------------------
[i] Ahzab, 33/45,46.
[ii] Ahzab, 33/21.
[iii] Ahmad ibn Hanbal, IV, 151.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
121;2018-07-29;"
DATE: 29.07.2018

  [pic]

     GIVING A BEAUTIFUL NAME - ONE OF THE RIGHTS OF CHILDREN ON PARENTS

                 Jumu'ah Mubarak Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Our Prophet (s.a.w)  attached  great  importance  on  paying  regard  to
Islamic values at every step of life. Because, he was a Prophet, sent to  us
to teach the awareness of servitude, grace and elegance. His sensitivity  to
make each moment of his life meaningful manifested  itself  even  in  naming
babies. Such that he named his  two  beloved  grandsons  Hasan  and  Husain,
meaning beautiful, graceful and nice. While doing this,  he  first  embraced
them with affection. Then he recited the Adhan  to  their  right  ears,  and
Iqamah to their left ears.  And  he  prayed  for  these  babies  to  have  a
benevolent and blessed life.[i]

    Brothers and Sisters!
    With that Adhan and Iqamah, our Prophet (s.a.w) was actually  whispering
the purpose of life to the ears of the baby.  He  was  preaching  faith  and
Islam, in short, tawhid to him. He was teaching that he should be a  servant
to only Allah throughout his  life.  The  Messenger  of  Allah  (s.a.w)  was
giving a direction for the baby with the nice and meaningful name  he  gave.
He was advising to be in the service of benevolence  and  goodness  all  his
life.

    Honorable Believers!
    As expressed in the Qur'an, our children are the light of our eyes,  and
the felicity of our hearts.  They are both a blessing and  a  trust  of  our
Lord to us. Every baby is special and  every  baby  is  dear  regardless  of
their sex. Allah  created  him  as  the  most  honorable  creature  and  His
vicegerent on earth, and entrusted to us, adults. This  baby,  for  whom  we
will work so that he can be a peaceful servant and a good  person,  deserves
a proper welcome. One of the first steps in this welcoming is giving  him  a
beautiful name.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    As babies start to know the worldly blessings in his mother's  arms,  he
also acquires an identity with his name that will reach towards the  eternal
life. Our Prophet (s.a.w) said, ""On the Day  of  Resurrection  you  will  be
called by your names and by your father's names, so give your children  good
names.""[ii]


    This hadith teaches us that people deserve names which have a  beautiful
pronunciation and a beautiful meaning. As much as people's  bodies,  dignity
and honor are respectable, their names are  also  respectable,  and  deserve
esteem. Let alone giving a person a name  which  he  will  dislike  all  his
life, even calling someone with an offensive nickname is  forbidden  in  our
religion. Our Lord Almighty warns us in this issue as,  ""Do  not  call  each
other by [offensive] nicknames.""[iii]

    Estimable Muslims!
    Names are the reflections of a faith, a civilization, and a culture. The
importance  attached  by  our  civilization,  inspired  by  the  perspicuous
religion of Islam, is  obvious.  Our  nation  have  taken  pride  in  giving
children the names of great people, who put their  stamps  on  history,  our
Prophet being in the first place.

    In our tradition, a name is, first of  all,  a  factor  that  reminds  a
person of his value as a human being, the meaning of his existence, and  his
civilization. Sounding nice alone is not a  name's  worth.  It  should  also
have a meaning that will reach the bearer to moral  perfection  and  a  high
personality. In this sense, our Prophet changed the names  that  disregarded
the Islamic faith and personal dignity, and connotated violence and  hatred.


    Brothers and Sisters!
    Let us give our  children  meaningful  names  that  is  suited  for  our
religious and national values, and that will remind them at all  times  that
they are Muslims. Let us not forget that as much as we are  responsible  for
feeding and  educating  them,  we  are  also  responsible  for  giving  them
beautiful names. Let us remember that  names  contradicting  our  faith  and
culture will destroy their world of values. Let us give our children  names,
which instill in them morality, good  manners,  awareness  and  ideals,  and
navigate  them  like  a  compass  to  goodness,  beauty,   and   benevolence
throughout their lives.

-----------------------
[i] Bukhari, Manaqib al-Ansar, 45; Adab, 109; Adab al-Mufrad, 286.
[ii] Abu Dawud, Adab, 61.
[iii] Hujurat, 49/11.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
122;2019-11-22;"
DATE: 22.11.2019
                [pic] THE ISLAMIC ATTITUDE TOWARDS CALAMITIES
    Honorable Muslims!
    One day the Prophet Muhammad (saw) saw a woman crying out  loud  by  the
grave of her deceased child. ""Fear Allah and be  patient!"",  he  advised  to
the sorrowful mother. ""Mind your own business! What has troubled me has  not
troubled you!"", said the woman, failing to  recognize  him  because  of  her
pain. A while later when she realized  that  it  was  the  Prophet  Muhammad
(saw) who advised her to  do  so,  she  went  near  him  and  expressed  her
apologies. Then came the following striking advice  from  him,  [pic]  ""True
patience is that which comes at the first blow.""[i]

    Dear Believers!
    It is inevitable that all of  us  have  troubles,  pains,  sorrows,  and
material and spiritual problems in life. This is the reason why  this  world
is called ""the world of trials"".  In  this  respect,  the  Prophet  Muhammad
(saw) endured the worst of such trials that we strive  to  come  through  in
our own lives. He lost his father before he was even born,  and  his  mother
when he was only six years old, and had to grow  up  without  a  father  and
mother. Moreover, he suffered the loss of  his  beloved  wife  and  his  six
children. He, together with a  handful  of  believers,  had  to  endure  the
polytheists' merciless pressures, tortures, restrictions,  and  exclusionary
behaviors. Despite all these troubles and problems, he never lost his  faith
and hopes, always sought refuge in Allah, and asked only Him  for  help.  He
embraced mercy other than violence, and never  resorted  to  solutions  that
Allah would disapprove.

    Dear Muslims!
    In the verse I have  recited  at  the  beginning  of  the  khutbah,  the
Almighty Allah (swt) states, ""We will surely  test  you  with  something  of
fear and hunger and a loss of wealth and lives and  fruits,  but  give  good
tidings to the patient!""[ii]

    None of us naturally would like to encounter hardships. But  as  Muslims
we all know that while there are good times in life, we also have bad  times
as a part of our trial in this world. Allah  the  Almighty  (swt)  tests  us
through depriving us of our possessions at  times,  and  through  giving  us
plenty of blessings at other times. It is therefore important for us not  to
lose control and go rebellious in  the  face  of  problems,  but  rather  be
patient and remain composed. We act  in  line  with  the  common  sense  and
reason.

We fulfill our responsibilities to overcome the problems. We seek wisdom  in
and draw lessons from all troubles for our life in this world  and  for  the
one in the Hereafter. We self-question ourselves regarding our mistakes  and
failures in order not to experience similar problems again. We  consult  the
knowledgable and experienced people, and then rely on Allah  (swt)  for  the
consequences.

    Dear Believers!
    In one occasion the Prophet Muhammad (saw) said, ""How wonderful  is  the
case of a believer; there is good for him in  everything  and  this  applies
only to a believer. If prosperity attends him,  he  expresses  gratitude  to
Allah and that is good for him; and if adversity befalls him, he endures  it
patiently and that is better for him.""[iii]

    Holding on to life both in good  times  and  in  bad  times  and  taking
strength from our connection to Allah, then, is a sign of the beauty of  the
faith we have. It is cruel for people to turn their  despair  into  violence
and vent their anger on women and children in overwhelming  situations.  Any
problem, disagreement, or overwhelming situation cannot  be  an  excuse  for
violence against women. For that matter, violence  means  to  infringe  upon
the rights of people and to poison family members by sowing  seeds  of  pain
and hatred. Muslims, however, should remain to be  such  people  from  whose
hand and tongue can come mercy only and  who  instill  peace  and  trust  in
their environment. It is  never  a  solution  to  harm  oneself  and  family
members in the face of problems. Islam does not approve  hurting  the  lives
of people or taking one's own life that  is  entrusted  by  Allah,  even  to
cease the pain. This is because if there is a problem, so is  Allah  as  the
Solver of problems. ""Allah is the best Protector and Helper!""[iv]  If  there
are troubles, there are also  friends,  neighbors,  and  relatives  to  find
solutions to them. ""The believers are but brothers!""[v]

    Dear Muslims!
    Let us not turn our pains into rebellion  and  oppression.  Let  us  not
forget that our patient and strong stance  against  our  problems  indicates
that there will be much easiness for us before Allah (swt). We are  here  in
this world to have faith and do good deeds.  Let  us  remember  the  Prophet
Muhammad's (saw) hope-increasing and comforting words, ""All  troubles,  even
if it is the pricking of a thorn, that befall a  Muslim  serve  for  his/her
sins to be forgiven.""[vi] Let us not give up  our  hopes  that  Allah  shall
help us and be merciful to us. Let us pray to Allah (swt) in  the  words  of
the Prophet Muhammad (saw), ""We belong to Allah and to Him we shall  return.
O Allah! Compensate me in my affliction, recompense  my  loss  and  give  me
something better in exchange for it.""[vii]

-----------------------
[i] Bukhari, Jana'iz, 31.
[ii] Baqarah, 2/155.
[iii] Muslim, Zuhd, 64.
[iv] Anfal, 8/40.
[v] Hujurat, 49/10.
[vi] Bukhari, Marda, 1.
[vii] Muslim, Jana'iz, 4.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
123;2018-07-22;"
  : 22.07.2018


             [pic]SUMMER COURSES OF QUR'AN AND THEIR IMPORTANCE
               Jumu'ah Mubarak Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

In the verse I have recited, Our Lord  Almighty  enjoins,  ""Alif,  Lam,  Ra.
[This is] a Book which We have revealed  to  you,  [O  Muhammad],  that  you
might bring mankind out of darknesses into the light by permission of  their
Lord - to the path of the Exalted in Might, the  Praiseworthy  -  Allah,  to
whom  belongs  whatever  is  in  the  heavens  and  whatever   is   on   the
earth....""[i]

    And in the hadith I have read, our Beloved Prophet (s.a.w.) says,  ""When
a man dies, his acts come to  an  end  except  for  three:  sadaqah  jariyah
(ceaseless  charity),  knowledge  by  which  people  benefit,  or  a   pious
descendant, who prays for him.""[ii]

    Brothers and Sisters!
    Our Lord Almighty has bestowed an excellent book upon  humanity  through
our Prophet -Mercy to the Worlds. This book has taught us the reason of  our
creation and the purpose of our existence. It heralded us  that  life  would
find meaning with faith and humankind would be  exalted  with  servitude  to
Allah. Believers have instilled this book in  their  minds  and  hearts  for
fourteen centuries. They have committed themselves to it  with  a  steadfast
faith and a profound attachment. This book is the Holy Qur'an-our guide  for
the truth and the formula for salvation.

    Honorable Believers!
    The Holy Qur'an is the greatest gift  from  Our  Almighty  Lord  to  us,
believers. The Holy Qur'an is  the  most  exalted  trust  from  our  Beloved
Prophet (s.a.w.). Therefore we,  as  believers,  illuminate  our  minds  and
hearts with its light. We build our present and future under  its  guidance.
We strive to teach our  children  -the  light  of  our  life-  its  merciful
messages, its halals and harams.

    Because we know that our children are the  greatest  trusts  from  Allah
Almighty. It is the most important duty for all parents  to  raise  them  as
generations who are conscious of themselves and their Lord,  who  are  aware
of their responsibilities, who  are  beneficial  to  their  nation  and  the
humanity. As enjoined by this hadith of our Prophet (s.a.w.), ""There  is  no
gift that a father gives his child more virtuous  than  good  manners.""[iii]
Our biggest inheritance for our children is to teach them  about  faith  and
Islam, and to equip them with good morals.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    Another period of time is starting to raise dutiful generations, and  to
introduce our children  -apples  of  our  eyes-  with  the  Qur'an  and  the
exemplary life of our Prophet (s.a.w.). Our Qur'an  courses  will  start  on
June 25 and continue until August 17. Our mosques  will  become  a  home  of
education for millions of children with the  motto  ""Sound  of  Children  at
Mosque, Joy of the Country.""

    Our children will be more acquainted with our Lord.  They  will  instill
faith and Islam in their taintless hearts. They will know  the  Holy  Qur'an
and the exemplary life of our Prophet more closely. They will  grasp  deeper
integrity and honesty, compassion and mercy, love and respect, fairness  and
justice, sharing and solidarity, brotherhood and affection, in short,  moral
values, as commanded by the Qur'an and exemplified by the Prophet  with  his
actions. They will feel  the  value  of  loving  books,  the  importance  of
reading and science. They will meet at mosques, which  are  symbols  of  our
independence. They will hear even closer the adhan - the  vibrant  sound  of
unity. They  will  learn  worshiping  to  protect  their  tender  minds  and
immaculate nature from evils.

    Dear Muslims!
    Let us take advantage of summer Qur'an courses to  be  started  at  each
mosque. Let us, as parents, encourage our children to attend these  courses!
Let us not deprive them of the light of the Qur'an. Let us strive to  become
examples for our children to read and understand the Qur'an, to  ponder  and
draw lessons from it, and  to  make  it  our  guide  in  our  life.  Let  us
strengthen our ties with books, and  add  peace  and  wisdom  in  our  lives
thanks to the reading halls. Let us exert  ourselves  to  raise  generations
who shape their lives by following our Holy Book and our Prophet.

    I would like to conclude this khutbah with the following hadith from our
Prophet, ""The best of you is he who learns the Qur'an and teaches it.""[iv]

-----------------------
[i] Ibrahim, 14/1-2.
[ii] Muslim, Wasiyyah, 14.
[iii] Tirmidhi, Birr, 33.
[iv] Tirmidhi, Fadhail al-Qur'an, 15

                        General Directorate of Religious Services

"
124;2019-04-05;"
DATE: 05.04.2019
[pic]
                                           MUSLIMS ARE BENEFICENT NEIGHBOURS
    Dear Muslims!
    Allah the Almighty (swt) states in the verse I have just recited: ""Serve
Allah, and join  not  any  partners  with  him.  And  do  good  to  parents,
kinsfolk, orphans, those in need, neighbours who are  near,  neighbours  who
are strangers, the companion by your side, the wayfarer (ye meet), and  what
your  right  hands  possess.  For  Allah  loveth  not  the   arrogant,   the
vainglorious.""[i]

    The Messenger of Allah (saw) states in the hadith I have read: ""The best
neighbour  in  Allah's  estimation  is  the  one  who   is   best   to   his
neighbour.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    Neighbourhood is an inseparable part of our social life. Our  neighbours
are the people with whom we encounter  every  day,  to  whose  soothing  and
assuring salaam we are accustomed, and who stand by us  when  we  need.  Our
village, quarter, district, province, and country also have neighbours.  The
main principle in all neighbourhood relations is equity, kindness,  respect,
and mercy. A  neighbour  who  has  ethical  virtues,  respects  humanitarian
values and protects honour and dignity  of  his  neighbour  is  one  of  the
biggest blessings of the life in this world.

    Honorable Muslims!
    So many rights have neighbours upon each other that Our Beloved  Prophet
(saw) states: ""Gabriel kept on commending the neighbour  to  me  so  that  I
thought he would make an heir.""[iii]  Favouring  the  neighbours  and  being
nice to them, with the expression of Our Prophet (saw), is  a  necessity  of
being a believer.[iv]

    Believers  do  not  leave  their  neighbours  alone  and  helpless,   in
accordance with the maturity of their faith. They support  their  neighbours
both materially and spiritually for whatever they need. So much  so  that  a
believer woman knows while even cooking  that  it  is  the  Prophet's  (saw)
recommendation to add some extra water to the soup for  the  favour  of  her
neighbour. It is a neighbourhood duty to share  good  and  bad  days,  visit
them when they are sick, be present at their funeral and look out for  their
family members in case of their death.

    Dear Believers!
    How sorrowful it is that so many neighbours who live under the  roof  of
the same apartment building and lean on the same wall  in  the  evenings  do
not know each other today. Neighbours deny each other to even a salaam,  the
pains suffered are heard after days and happiness stays within the walls  of
houses. Today's people neglect their souls and hearts  and  fail  to  notice
the neighbourhood relations that can help to solve their problems. With  the
weakening   of   neighbourhood   relations,    unfortunately,    our    good
characteristics such as knowing, understanding,  tolerating,  and  forgiving
each other are disappearing.

    Honorable Believers!
    Let us this Friday, we the believers, question to what extent we  comply
with neighbourhood ethics and rights. Let  us  not  neglect  to  salaam  our
neighbours warmly and sincerely, ask how the children are, and smile to  the
young people. Let us share grieves and happiness of our neighbours.  Let  us
pay attention to the graveness of the  warning  of  Our  Prophet  (saw)  who
says: ""He will not enter Paradise whose neighbour is  not  secure  from  his
wrongful conduct.""[v] Let us show ultimate sensitivity  not  to  damage  our
neighbours by our hands or words. Let us accept the hadith  of  Our  Prophet
(saw), ""A man is not a believer who fills his stomach  while  his  neighbour
is hungry""[vi] as touchstone. Who was the last neighbour  of  ours  that  we
visited or hosted in our house? Let us ask ourselves.

    Dear Muslims!
    Establishing good relations with neighbours is a necessity of our  faith
just like worship. Our ethics require making the senses  of  love,  respect,
cooperation and solidarity dominant in our neighbourhood relations.

    Let us ask the goodness of  our  neighbour  just  like  we  ask  it  for
ourselves. Let us protect our neighbour from the evil that we do not  desire
for ourselves. Let our hearts be neighbour, as well as our bodies.
-----------------------
[i] Al-Nisâ, 4/36.
[ii] Dârimî, Siyer, 3; Tirmizî, Birr, 28.
[iii] Tirmizî, Birr, 28.
[iv] 0[pic]bn Mâce, Zühd, 24; Tirmizî, Zühd, 2.
[v] Muslim, Îmân, 73.
[vi] Beyhakî, es-Sünenü l-kübrâ, X, 7.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services



 ?bn Mâce, Zühd, 24; Tirmizî, Zühd, 2.
[vii] Muslim, Îmân, 73.
[viii] Beyhakî, es-Sünenü'l-kübrâ, X, 7.
General Directorate of Religious Services

"
125;2019-02-22;"
DATE : 22.02.2019
                                    [pic]
             TAKING GOOD CARE OF THE ELDERLY MAKES LIFE BLESSED
    Dear Muslims!
    It was the day Makkah was conquered and the longing had come to  an  end
when the Prophet Muhammad and his companions could return to their  hometown
from which they were exiled years ago. Muslims were all hugging  each  other
with joy and relief, and thanking Allah for blessing them with such  a  day.
As soon as they arrived in the city, the  Prophet  Muhammad's  loyal  friend
Abu Bakr went directly to his father. He had a great wish for his father  to
become a Muslim, so he took him to the Prophet Muhammad. Seeing  Abu  Bakr's
father Abu Quhafa, with his hair and beard gray and his eyes blinded due  to
the old age, the Prophet Muhammad, with  his  usual  humble  and  respectful
manner, said, ""Would not it have been better if you had left  him  home  and
we had gone to him?""[i]

    Honorable Believers!
    Life is much like the seasons in a year  and  has  its  spring,  summer,
fall, and winter. Every stage of life has  its  own  niceties.  Each  is  an
opportunity for Muslims as servants of Allah to add  meaning  and  value  to
life through good  deeds,  worshipping,  and  servitude  to  Him.  The  most
valuable stage of life, during which people attain the pleasure  of  feeling
mature and perfectness, is the old age stage. It is the  stage  of  full  of
wisdom where the body is exhausted, but the soul is stronger than ever  with
experience acquired until then.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Allah particularly answers  the  prayers  of  the  elderly,  and  offers
blessings to them. They link the  past  to  the  future,  handing  down  our
national and immaterial values and culture to future generations.  They  are
the pillars of our homes and the source of blessings. With their  hair  gray
and their posture arched, they are sources of mercy and compassion  for  the
society. There is no richer and better person than an elderly who has  lived
a life as aware of the value of health and years gone by,  as  expressed  in
the words of the Prophet Muhammad when they asked him  about  who  the  best
person  among  people  was,  ""...Whose  life  is  long  and  his  deeds  are
good.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    People are in constant need of keeping contact  with  their  family  and
environment, and maintain relations with others. Such a need and  dependency
is felt even more during the old age. Excluding the elderly from the joy  of
life and from the society leads them to unhappiness and loneliness.  On  the
other hand, the elderly who are respected, taken care of, and  consulted  to
feel peaceful and secure, as well as  they  do  not  feel  the  distress  of
loneliness and abandonment.

    Honorable Believers!
    On top of people who deserve and need our care, love, and  support  come
our parents, as expressed in the words of the Prophet Muhammad, ""The  Lord's
pleasure is in the parent's  pleasure,  and  the  Lord's  anger  is  in  the
parent's anger.""[iii] The compassion and affection that we will show to  our
parents are of particular importance in their  old  age  when  they  need  a
peaceful home. To be by their side, to meet their needs, and  to  be  prayed
by them are among the  most  important  opportunities  for  us  to  get  the
approval of Allah.

    It is a grave act of disloyalty to leave and abandon  one's  parents  in
their old age.  In  this  respect,  the  Prophet  Muhammad  pointed  to  the
misfortune of a person, who would not be able to enter  the  heaven  because
of not getting the approval of either of his/her parents in  old  age,  ""Let
him be humbled into dust.""[iv]

    Dear Muslims!
    Being a reasonable person requires us to see the journey of our own life
in those of the elderly.  Just  as  yesterday's  young  people  are  today's
elderly, today's young people will be  the  elderly  of  tomorrow.  In  this
respect, Allah says, ""Allah is the one who created you from  weakness,  then
made after weakness strength, then made after strength  weakness  and  white
hair. He creates what He wills, and He is the Knowing, the Competent.""[v]

    Then, let us take care of our old people who prepared us for  life  when
we were young. Let us fulfill  our  responsibilities  to  make  their  lives
easier, and let us benefit from their experiences. Let us  not  forget  that
respect for our elderly will bless our life. I would  like  to  conclude  my
khutbah with the following hadith of the Prophet Muhammad, ""No young  person
honors an elder due to his age, except that Allah appoints for him, one  who
will honor him at that age.""[vi]
-----------------------
[i] Ibn Hanbal, VI, 350.
[ii] Tirmidhi, Zuhd, 21.
[iii] Tirmidhi, Birr, 3.
[iv] Muslim, Birr, 10.
[v] Qur'an 30:54.
[vi] Tirmidhi, Birr, 75.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
126;2017-12-01;"
LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE
DATE  : 01.12.2017

                     [pic]FRIDAY: THE BEST DAY ON WHICH
                              THE SUN HAS RISEN
   Honorable brothers and sisters who gathered together in this holy mosque
to perform the Friday prayer which is among the  principles  of  Islam.  May
your Friday be blessed, and your day be beneficial!
   It was a Friday, just like this. Our Prophet (pbuh) finally got close to
Medina after the arduous journey of hegira that lasted  for  days.  When  he
reached the place called ""Ranuna"" near Medina, the time  for  Friday  prayer
had come.  The Messenger of Mercy delivered the  khutba  to  the  crowd  who
came to welcome him with excitement.  He  became  the  imam  for  the  first
Friday prayer. Our Prophet (pbuh)  said  this  to  us  all  in  that  khutba
through his  companions:  ""Now  then,  O  people,  advance  good  works  for
yourselves before you die. You know, by Allah, each one of  you  will  leave
this world behind. Then Allah will ask you: 'Did my Messenger  not  come  to
you and inform you of My Message? Did I  not  bestow  on  you  property  and
graces? So, what have you advanced for  yourself?'...  Whoever  can  protect
himself from the Hell-Fire, let him do so in his power. Let him do  it  with
half a date, or even just with a good word."" [i]

   Brothers and Sisters!
   Today is Friday. Today is the Eid of our week. We live each Friday  with
a great joy. We experience a  joy  and  excitement  that  is  impossible  to
describe. Because Friday is an exceptional day that allows us to  rejuvenate
weekly and hold on to life again. Friday is the  day  when  our  souls  find
peace after getting suffocated by all kinds of complexities of life.  It  is
the period when our hearts become clear and find  themselves  after  getting
exhausted by all kinds of difficulties.

   Dear Brothers and Sisters!
   Our Lord Almighty enjoins in the Quran: ""O you  who  believe!  When  the
call is proclaimed for the  prayer  on  the  day  of  Friday,  come  to  the
remembrance of Allah and leave off business (and every  other  thing),  that
is better for you if you did but know!"" [ii] In this respect, Friday is  the
name of us standing before Allah Almighty, free from  everyday  occupations,
from all kinds of worldly concerns. Just  as  we  show  our  submission  and
loyalty to our Lord in our prayers five times  a  day,  we  strengthen  this
determination of ours in the Friday prayer. We renew our oath  of  servitude
every Friday. We offer our prayers and good deeds that we  made  during  the
week once again to our Lord in this meeting.

   Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
   Friday is the time of accounting for us. It is the moment  of  reviewing
our course and clearing  ourselves  from  the  sins  that  we  knowingly  or
unknowingly committed. Friday is just the right time for us to  take  refuge
in Allah's limitless mercy and compassion knowing  that  the  prayers  would
not be turned down.

   Friday is the day when we shout  out  loud  our  unity  and  solidarity,
brotherhood and friendship.  We,  young  and  old,  man  and  women,  gather
together in  mosques  in  the  Friday  prayer  with  the  same  faith,  same
intention and the same ideals. We  listen  to  the  khutbas  delivered  from
these minbars that are the seats of our Prophet. We  socialize  once  again,
in our joy and sadness. We all  together  experience  the  joy  of  being  a
servant of Allah, being brothers and sisters, sharing and cooperation,  with
our hearts and souls.

   Honorable Believers!
   To quote our Prophet, Friday is the best day on which the sun has risen.
[iii] Therefore, Friday is one of  the  symbols  of  our  Holy  Religion  of
Islam. Friday is mercy. Friday is blessing. Friday is peace.  The  fact  is,
every day, every second that we have  is  precious  in  our  faith.  Because
Allah Almighty created the time and granted it as  a  blessing  to  us.  And
what's important before Allah is not how we refer to time or  what  we  call
the days; it is how we put our time to good use.  It  is  whether  we  spent
every breath in accordance with our Lord's countenance.  It  is  whether  we
transformed our short life into an eternal reward or not.

   Dear Brothers and Sisters!
   The expression of ""Black Friday"" we have heard often recently  disturbed
us all as believers. Because in our faith, all days  belong  to  Allah.  The
morning  of  each  day  is  the  awakening  for  a   bright   future.   Such
disrespectful expressions and approaches that target the symbol of  a  faith
and disregard its members have no place in our tradition  and  customs.  The
fact that a sacred concept of a religion is abused as a means  of  limitless
consumption is just unacceptable.

   Brothers and Sisters!
   As believers, our task against the  face  of  such  efforts  that  could
create a negative perception in the minds is to hold fast to our  faith  and
values. The most important duty we have for the  humanity  is  to  represent
and convey correctly the Quran that is  our  guide  to  salvation,  and  Our
Prophet who is the Mercy to the Worlds, to the best of  our  abilities.  Let
us not forget that the help of Allah will be with us as long  as  we  strive
for this cause.

-----------------------
[i] Ibn Hisham, Seerah, III, 30.
[ii] Al-Jumu'ah, 62/9.
[iii] Sahih Muslim, The Book of Prayer - Friday, 18.

            Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
127;2017-11-03;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 03.11.2017

	



SUNNAH: THE PROPHETIC GUIDANCE

Honorable Believers!

Our Lord Almighty enjoins in the verse I have recited: “Say (O Prophet): ‘If you love Allah, follow me, (and) Allah will love you and forgive you your sins; for Allah is much-forgiving, a dispenser of grace.’ ” 

Our Prophet (pbuh) says in the hadith I have recited: “I have left behind over you that which if you hold fast to it, you will never go astray: the book of Allah and the sunnah of His prophet.” 

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

One of the fundamentals of belief is the belief in the prophets. As believers, we accept all commissioned prophets from Adam to our Prophet Muhammad Mustafa (pbuh). We believe in our Prophet and all that he proclaimed. We sincerely express this belief in the kalima shahada (confession of faith) and kalima tawhid (confession of Allah’s oneness), which are oral testimonies of our faith. We know and believe that without the belief in our Prophet, there could be no belief in tawhid (oneness). One cannot be a true believer without loving the Prophet more than everyone and everything. We know and believe that one cannot live Islam truly without following his authentic sunnah.

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

We learn our holy religion Islam from two main sources. The first one is our guide to salvation: the Quran. The second one is the noble sunnah of our Prophet which enlightens the ages. Just like there is no faith in Allah without faith in prophets; it is not possible to truly understand Quran and practice it in our lives without the exemplary life, character, authentic sunnah and hadiths of our Prophet. Because Quran was revealed to our Prophet; it was understood with him and reflected to the real life through his example.

Brothers and Sisters! 

Our Lord Almighty says in the Quran, “O you who believe! Believe in Allah, and His Messenger…” and enjoins us to believe in Him and His Messenger together. He also says,  “O you who believe! Obey Allah and obey the Messenger…” and enjoins us to submit to Him while following His Messenger. As stated in our Holy Book Quran, following our Prophet is directly related and connected with the love for Allah. Thus, a faith without respect for the Prophet would make one neither a believer, nor a Muslim.

Honorable Believers!

Our Prophet is a source of mercy and guidance sent to all mankind. He told us about the reason of our existence. He taught us to properly worship Allah in the right way and the way to earn His countenance. He invited us to virtue and goodness with his words and his character.

It is a fact that, if a believer seeks happiness in this world and hereafter, then he must follow the authentic sunnah of our Prophet (pbuh). Truly following the sunnah begins with understanding Quran correctly as our Prophet proclaimed it and practicing it in our lives. Following the sunnah leads to a profound heart, an open mind, an exalted soul and a virtuous character. Following the sunnah is to stand firm against ignorance and indolence, spite and hatred, violence and discord. It is to pursue supreme ideals always in order to leave a more livable world to the future generations. To follow the sunnah is to dress ourselves in sagacity and perception, loyalty and reliability, patience and strength, mercy and compassion, respect and love, and more importantly, in morality.

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

Telling the exemplary life of our Prophet to us, the sunnah and hadiths are the common heritage of all believers. Every believer who loves our Prophet, who embraces His example and walks in His path, belongs in the fellowship of the sunnah. No individual or group has the right to regard themselves as the sole protectors of the sunnah. Likewise, the understandings and attempts on discrediting and excluding the sunnah are just futile efforts. It should not be forgotten that marginalizing and separatist discourses based on the holy sunnah of Allah’s Messenger (pbuh) would harm our brotherhood, our fondness, our unity and solidarity.

How happy is the one who walks on the path of Allah and His Messenger Muhammad Mustafa (pbuh)! How happy is the one who follows Allah’s Book and the sunnah of His Messenger!

Salutations and peace be upon you O Messenger of Allah! Salutations and peace be upon you O the Beloved of Allah!

Brothers and Sisters!

I ask compassion from our Lord Almighty for the honorable martyrs who sacrificed their lives yesterday for the continuity and peace of our nation; and I offer my condolences to our nation and their next of kin; and wish them patience. May our Lord Almighty never separate us from the values that our martyrs gave their lives for."
128;2019-06-07;"
DATE: 07.06.2019
                    [pic]BEING A FAMILY AND REMAINING AS
                                  A FAMILY
    Honorable Muslims!
    Allah the Almighty (swt) states in the verse I have just  recited:  ""And
among His  Signs  is  this,  that  He  created  for  you  mates  from  among
yourselves, that ye may dwell in tranquility with them, and He has put  love
and mercy between your (hearts): Verily in that  are  Signs  for  those  who
reflect.""[i]

    The Prophet Muhammad (saw) said in the hadith I have read: ""The best  of
you is he who is best to his family, and I am  the  best  among  you  to  my
family.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    Allah the Exalted (swt) sent human, the most  precious  being,  to  this
world in two different genders as man and woman. He created  a  strong  bond
of love and compassion between them to be spouses and to  start  a  peaceful
family. He bestowed  upon  them  a  family  atmosphere  in  which  they  can
cooperate in benevolence and feel safe.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Getting married and establishing a family,  first  of  all,  inheres  in
human nature by creation. While Allah the Exalted (swt) encourages  marriage
for man  and  woman  with  the  command  ""Marry  those  among  you  who  are
single.""[iii],  He  also  advises  the  whole  society,   especially   their
relatives, to support those who are in the age of marriage.

    Starting a family is also a Sunnah of our Prophet (saw).  The  Messenger
of Allah (saw) said in a  hadith:  ""Marriage  is  part  of  my  Sunnah,  and
whoever does not follow my Sunnah has nothing to do with me.""[iv] It  is  an
honor and reason for gratitude for  every  human  being  to  have  a  decent
marriage by correct way and in a manner appropriate to his  nature.  Because
our Prophet (saw) stated, ""O young men, whoever among you can afford to  get
married, let him do so.""[v], and expressed, ""Marriage is  the  best  way  to
turn eyes away from haraam, and protect the honor.""[vi]

    Dear Believers!
Living in a family is a blessing that gives trust and  happiness  to  people
of all ages. What other blessing can substitute for  the  taste  of  a  warm
home, its affectionate hand that solves  one's  problems,  and  its  support
that adds meaning to life? Spouses who build  their  family  life  on  sound
grounds will be happy not only in this world but also in the Hereafter,  and
they will take each other to heaven.

    Being a family does not mean just living under the same roof. Family  is
also a togetherness in feeling, ideal, hope, and thought. It  means  spouses
to be friends and compete in benevolence and taqwa. Being  a  family  is  to
live a life that complies with the consent of Allah (swt). It  is  to  share
both joy and grief, and both richness and poverty. It  is  to  overcome  all
kinds of difficulties together and to be a  compassionate  spouse,  a  loyal
lover, a merciful parent, and a good child.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Remaining as a family is as much important  as  starting  a  family.  To
value and protect one's family are the  duties  of  every  male  and  female
Muslim. Remaining as a family means that the spouses cover each  other  like
a garment, protect each other from all kinds of  evil,  and  integrate  each
other with love and care. For this reason, the Almighty Allah (swt)  states:
""They are your garments and ye are their garments.""[vii]

    Remaining as a family requires  leaving  the  mistakes  and  flaws  that
threaten home. A believer tries to be tolerant and forgiving, and act  in  a
patient and persistent  manner  in  his/her  family.  In  this  regard,  our
Beloved Prophet (saw)  recommends:  ""A  Muslim  man  must  not  bear  hatred
against his Muslim wife as she has an unlikeable temper;  because  she  must
have many other tempers that he will like.""[viii]

    Remaining as a family is possible only if each woman, man, elder person,
and young person fulfill their responsibilities and observe  the  rights  of
others as well as their own rights. It requires thinking about the  benefits
of the family under any circumstance rather than  one's  own  interest.  Our
Prophet Muhammad (saw) says, ""It is enough sin for a man not  to  give  food
to the one whom he is supposed to feed.""[ix]

    Dear Believers!
    Let us exert efforts to have a family where love and joy get barakah and
sadness and sorrow disappear. Let us  introduce  our  youth  to  a  family's
strong and sincere spirit. Let us present  a  family  atmosphere  that  will
give peace to our children and spouse. Let us appreciate the  value  of  our
family. Let us remember that our family is the trust  of  Allah  (swt),  and
that people will firstly account for their behavior towards  their  parents,
spouses, and children in the Hereafter.
-----------------------
[i] Rum, 30/21.
[ii] Tirmidhi, Manaqib, 63.
[iii] Nur, 24/32.
[iv] Ibn Majah, Nikah, 1.
[v] Bukhari, Nikah, 3; Muslim, Nikah, 1.
[vi] Bukhari, Nikah, 3; Muslim, Nikah, 1.
[vii] Baqarah, 2/187.
[viii] Muslim, Rada', 61.
[ix] Abu Dawud, Zakat, 45.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services


"
129;2017-05-19;"
   LOCATION  : NATIONWIDE
   DATE             : 19.05.2017


                                    [pic]

   TRUE FREEDOM: SERVING ALLAH

   Honorable Believers!
   In the verse I have recited, the Almighty enjoins: ""Allah is your  Lord,
there is no god but He; the Creator of all things, therefore serve Him,  and
He has charge of all things.""[i]

   In the hadith I have recited, our Prophet (pbuh) says: ""There are  three
qualities for which anyone who is characterized  by  them  will  relish  the
savor of faith: that he loves man and he does not love him but  for  Allah's
sake alone; he is to whom Allah and His Messenger are dearer than all  else;
he who prefers to be thrown into fire  than  to  return  to  unbelief  after
Allah has rescued him out of it.""[ii]

   Dear Brothers and Sisters!
   The biggest goal of our religion is to elevate us with faith  in  Allah.
To make us free with serving Him and dedicating ourselves  to  Him.  Because
in our faith, true freedom  is  serving  Allah.  True  freedom  is  avoiding
serving other servants. True will is avoiding yielding to  the  desires  and
passion of the soul.

   Brothers and Sisters!
   Faith is the greatest freedom. The believer is the one whose  spirit  is
free. Because the believer only bows before his Lord. He never serves  other
servants. He knows that bowing  before  anyone  other  than  Allah,  serving
other servants is slavery.  The  believer  devotes  himself  to  everlasting
truth rather than mortal humans. He does not act  blind,  deaf,  and  silent
against the truth. He does not dull his heart and will to the point  of  not
seeing the good and right. He does not hold any love  in  his  heart  dearer
than the love for Allah and His Messenger. He knows that doing that  is  the
biggest of misdeeds. It means associating partners with Allah. And  that  is
the greatest injustice.[iii]

   Honorable Believers!
   The believer endeavors to only do things that will be favored by  Allah.
He knows that making choices that will lead to His wrath means  hurting  his
freedom.

   The believer does not fall into the clutches of temporary blessings  and
deceptive joys of the world. He knows that being  the  slave  of  fancy  and
desire means losing freedom.

   The believer is the one who is aware that he has  been  created  as  the
most honorable of beings. He knows  that  his  faith  will  eternalize  this
honor.  The  believer's  guidance  for  life  is  the  Sublime  Quran  which
separates right from wrong, truth from falsehood, and sin  from  good  deed.
The Prophet of Mercy, the only leader of  the  humankind,  is  the  one  who
leads the way for the believer. A  mind  that  contemplates  Allah  is  what
makes the believer valuable by Allah. A heart that holds  Allah's  love  and
favor over all else. An abundant life spent with good deeds.

   Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
   Unfortunately, we live in  a  world  today  where  material  things  are
prioritized over  spirituality  and  minds  are  tumbled  by  all  sorts  of
advertisements and remarks. We are going through a period  where  fancy  and
desires are stirred up and triggered. In such a  world  where  earning  more
and consuming more is encouraged, it  is  without  a  doubt  that  our  true
capital is our freedom that we have from our faith. Our  true  gain  is  our
austerity stemming from our faith. Our true wealth is our  good  deeds,  the
reflection of our faith upon life. Our true superiority is our awareness  of
our faith and values.

   Brothers and Sisters!
   Before I finish my khutbah, I would like to  share  with  you  something
about  our  mosques,  the  places  where  our  servitude  and  devotion  are
manifested. Serving with the effort  to  reach  our  nation's  helping  hand
across the world, our  Diyanet  Foundation  has  built  a  great  number  of
mosques with your help in our country and region of affection from  past  to
present. Your help will be asked for today at  mosques  nationwide  for  the
Cyprus  Hala  Sultan  Mosque,  Kyrgyzstan  Bishkek  Mosque,  Albania  Tirana
Central Mosque, Djibouti Sultan Abdulhamit Han II Mosque  and  Complex.  May
the Almighty accept all the help you have given and will give. May He  grant
us to be among those honored by the news in the  hadith  ""Whoever  builds  a
mosque for Allah, Allah grants him a similar mansion in  paradise.""[iv]  May
He make our mosques build hearts, reinforce our unity and  brotherhood,  and
elevate our dignity and honor.
   I would like to finish my khutbah with this verse: ""(O  Muhammad!)  Say:
'What would my Lord care for you if not for your supplication?'""[v]
-----------------------
[i] Al-An'am, 6/102.
[ii] Muslim, Îmân, 67.
[iii] Al-Baqarah, 2/54, 57; Al-A'raf, 7/177; Hud, 11/101.
[iv] Muslim, Zühd, 44.
[v] Al-Furqan, 25/77.

Written by: General Directorate of  Religious Services

"
130;2019-07-12;"DATE: 12.07.2019



COMMEMORATION OF THE JULY 15 AND COMPREHENSION OF THE BETRAYAL

Honorable Muslims!

		The Almighty Allah (swt) states in the verse I have quoted, “Who does more wrong than those who fabricate lies against Allah, or deny His revelations? Indeed, the wicked will never succeed.”

In this respect, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) said, “I leave behind me two things, and if you follow these you will never go astray. They are the Qur'an and the Sunnah.”

Dear Believers!

Our nation came safely through an existential challenge three years ago. The terrorist organization FETO, which has, under the guise of serving for Allah's (swt) cause, exploited the resources and values of our nation for years, finally attacked the independence and future existence of our nation. However, our nation, which has throughout the history overcome countless betrayals thanks to its resoluteness, courage, and self-sacrificing nature, did not let this invasion attempt succeed, too, with the help of Allah (swt). Today, once again and always, we as a nation express our endless gratefulness to the Almighty Allah (swt) for helping us.

Honorable Muslims!

Those people who tried to demolish our nation's parliament and drag our young people and future generations to captivity on the July 15 did all of it under the veil of being religious. While they appeared to teach about and call to the religion of Islam, and to be in the service of the ummah, all that they did actually was to pave the way for corruption. Such corruptors are referred to in the Holy Qur'an as follows, “When they are told, “Do not spread corruption on the Earth,"" they reply, “We are only peace-makers!” Indeed, it is they who are the corruptors, but they fail to perceive it.”

Honorable Believers!

Could there be a worse danger than spreading tumult, sedition and corruption disguised as peacemaking?

This is referred to in the words of the Prophet Muhammad (saw) as follows, “Whoever deceives us is not one of us.” Then, could there be a more serious crime than deceit, invasion, and exploitation through the instrumentality of the religion?

Let us not forget that the terrorist organization FETO, which used the methods of disguising itself, sailing under false colors, hypocrisy, lies, threats, and blackmailing to remain standing, has never been a religious organization.

The FETO is a terrorist organization that tried to create a so-called moderate Islam through dreams, mysteries, and insidious plots.

Honorable Believers!

No knowledge in contradiction of the Qur'an and the Sunnah is of religious value. All understandings and approaches are deviant other than the middle-of-the-road approach and the straight path (mustaqim) followed by the majority of Muslims since the time of the Prophet's Companions.

According to Islam, there is no authority “innocence and incontrovertible” other than the Prophet Muhammad. Muslims, therefore, cannot entrust their reasoning, will, and disposition to other people blindly.

Muslims are but brothers. Damaging the unity of the ummah with arrogance, hypocrisy, corruption, and slander, and giving way to discord cannot be accepted.

Dear Muslims!

While we remember the July 15, we should comprehend the betrayal, and bring to mind our responsibilities. We should lead a life guided by the Holy Qur'an and the Sunnah of the Prophet Muhammad (saw). We should not give opportunity for those who abuse the religion for their personal interests. We should protect the Anatolian wisdom that has been accumulating on this land for centuries and is the power to keep our religious life standing.

We should be awake and alert against those who aim to exploit our religion, language, ethnicity, and innate richness, in order not to relive the bitter experience on the July 15. We should together stand against the acts of hypocrisy by those who want to drag our nation into sedition and corruption. We should regard the property of each other as our own property, the rights of each other as our own rights, and the honor and dignity of each other as our own honor and dignity. We should not behave in such a way as to cause our peace, trust, and brotherhood to be damaged. We should make no compromise on our unity and solidarity.

We should pay attention that our children learn the authentic religious knowledge through true methods and techniques from competent persons for the future existence of our state and nation, and for the well-being of the Prophet Muhammad's (saw) ummah. We should be careful about the people to whom we entrust our children, as well as with whom they are friends, where they spend their time, and what they learn about the religion.

On this occasion of the anniversary of the July 15, we remember, wishing Allah's mercy upon and deeply felt gratefulness for, our martyrs who sacrificed their lives for the cause of the homeland and our veterans who proudly carry their wounds like a liberty medal."
131;2019-02-08;"DATE: 08.02.2019



WORSHIP: AWARENESS OF 

SERVITUDE TO ALLAH

Dear Believers!

In the verse I have recited, the Almighty Allah commands, “Worship your Lord until there comes to you the certainty (death).”

In the hadith I have recited, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) says, “The acts most pleasing to Allah are those which are done most continuously, even if they amount to little.”

Honorable Muslims!

Allah created human so they only worship Him. Servitude, or worshipping, means being fully aware of Him, connected to Him in heart, having faith in Him, and doing good deeds. The essence of servitude to Allah is to obey Him knowingly and willingly, as well as worship Him sincerely.

Honorable Believers!

Worship is the sign of the believer and the reflection of the faith on life. It is an indication of the desire to be closer to Allah and of the effort to become a good servant. It is the finest manifestation of love and devotion to the Almighty Allah. It is the expression of gratitude for the blessings and favors bestowed upon us by Him. It is to seek refuge in and to submit ourselves to Him, Whose forgiveness and mercy has no limits.

Dear Muslims!

People in servitude to Allah not only earn rewards for their worship, but also acquire several good dispositions and habits. Above all, worship raises in people the awareness of being always under supervision of Allah. It directs people to what is good, what is pleasant, and what is right. In fact, people who perform salah, knowing that they stand before Allah just as we will soon, feel responsibility. The salah they perform in awe of Allah distances them from extremisms and unpleasant deeds.

Similarly, fasting strengthens our willpower and increases our patience, in addition to enabling us to earn rewards of worship. It protects us from being a slave of our nafs, fancy and zeal, extending our hand for haram, and uttering unpleasant and evil words.



General Directorate of Religious Services

General Directorate of Religious ServicesWorship of hajj and umrah instills the love of tawhid and sense of being a member of the Ummah while it reminds us of the Day of Judgment and its hardships. Every Muslim who removes and leaves behind casual daily clothes and puts ihram on for hajj and umrah makes sense of the fact that what is valuable before Allah is not property, authority, or position owned, but faith, worship, and good morality. Coming from all around the world with different languages, colors, and ethnicities, they stand shoulder to shoulder and feel deep in heart the divine appeal, “The believers are but brothers.” .

Zakat, sadaqah, and infaq, which are among the most valuable worships, purify and bless—increase the barakah of—the property. They enrich our heart, decrease our rush for worldly property, and increase our gratitude. Who saves oneself from self-centeredness and tightfistedness enjoys the taste of brotherhood when they share with other what they have in hand.

Offering a sacrifice helps Muslims get closer to Allah, allowing them to re-experience the Prophet Ibrahim’s loyalty and his son Ismail’s submission.

Honorable Muslims!

Humans, created to be in servitude to Allah, strive to deserve Allah’s approval through obligatory and supererogatory worships, aim to earn His contentment, and obtain His love. Ultimately, they receive The Almighty Allah's mercy, help, and protection. In a hadith qudsi, Allah states, “…the most beloved things with which My servant comes nearer to Me, is what I have enjoined upon him; and My slave keeps on coming closer to Me through performing Nawafil (praying or doing extra deeds besides what is obligatory) till I love him, so I become his sense of hearing with which he hears, and his sense of sight with which he sees, and his hand with which he grips, and his leg with which he walks; and if he asks Me, I will give him, and if he asks My protection (Refuge), I will protect him; (i.e. give him My Refuge)…”

Dear Believers!

In addition to the obligatory worships as daily prayers and fasting, any act done with good intention and sincerity in the hope of attaining Allah’s approval is regarded as worship. It is also a form of worship to maintain peace and trust in family at home, to make orphans and forlorn people happy, and to seek remedies for the problems of those in need. It is form of worship to work in order to provide our sustenance through halal ways, to say good words to people, and to be a compatible person. It is a form of worship to be honest in trade, to exchange greetings, and, even, to remove an obstacle that is tormenting people.

Honorable Muslims!

Being in servitude to Allah, which is the meaning and the purpose of our existence in the world, is an honor for us. We should fulfil our responsibilities with due diligence to be deserving of such honor. We should strive to keep alive the sense of servitude to Allah for our life. We should embellish our life with worships, good deeds and good morality. Let us always remember that Allah is always with us."
132;2018-08-24;"
DATE: 24.08.2018
            [pic] EFFORT IS FROM BELIEVERS, VICTORY IS FROM ALLAH
    Honorable Muslims!
    Our Almighty Lord (s.w.t.) commands in the verse I  have  recited,  ""And
obey Allah and His Messenger, and do not dispute  and  [thus]  lose  courage
and [then] your strength would depart; and  be  patient.  Indeed,  Allah  is
with the patient.""[i]

    Our Prophet (s.a.w.) says in the hadith I have read,  ""Strive  in  jihad
with your hands, your tongues and your wealth.""[ii]

    Esteemed Muslims!
    Homeland is the land on which people live in peace and safety  with  the
honor of being free. It is the country of those who write history  with  the
same courage, who sacrifice their lives for the same values, and  who  build
the future with the same  ideals.  Homeland  is  the  legacy  of  those  who
attained the honor of being a martyr to protect their glory and future,  and
those who sacrificed their existence and became veterans.

    Our ancestors  have  defended  these  sacred  lands  for  centuries  and
struggled heroically against oppression and  cruelty  with  their  faith  in
Allah and love for the homeland. This noble nation, whose  only  aim  is  to
not let the enemy touch their sacred values, has never let  any  harm  reach
their dignity and honor. The victories of  Malazgirt,  Otlukbeli,  Çald?ran,
Mercidab?k, Mohac, Sakarya and the Great Offensive, which left  their  marks
on history and are commemorated in August annually, bear witness to it.

    These auspicious victories have shown that effort is from believers, and
victory is from  Allah  (s.w.t.).  The  hearts  which  beat  to  attain  the
countenance of Him (s.w.t.) and make goodness prevail the  earth  can  never
be enslaved. Those who have designs against the unity and solidarity of  our
nation, who worships Allah only, are doomed to be disgraced  and  destroyed.
Our flag will continue to wave and our adhan will  continue  to  echo  until
the lights of the last home on these lands go off.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Today, we must put on the  consciousness  of  victory  in  the  face  of
attempts to  oppress  our  country  and  compel  the  Islamic  geography  to
surrender.  The  consciousness  of  victory  means  to  show  patience   and
perseverance  against  difficulties.  It  means  to  leave  the   conflicts,
disputes and intrigues that consume this nation,  resembling  a  deep-rooted
grand plane tree. It means to be alert  to  those  who  want  to  shake  our
brotherhood and disrupt our affection.

    Our noble nation, with their insightfulness and with the aid  of  Allah,
will stop the traitors today  as  well,  just  as  they  made  the  powerful
nations of the world kneel in the past despite the heaviest conditions.  Our
noble nation will fearlessly resist any kind of economic  and  technological
attack today as well, just as they used their chests  as  a  shield  against
the July 15 invasion attempt. After all, there is only one truth  that  does
not change even though the name, time, place, and conditions of  the  battle
between right and wrong change, which is the divine decree of:
[pic]
""O you who have believed, if you support Allah,  He  will  support  you  and
plant firmly your feet.""[iii]

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Let us strengthen our loyalty, submission and trust  in  Allah  (s.w.t.)
for the perpetuity of our nation.  Let  us  wholeheartedly  believe  in  the
verse of our Almighty Lord (s.w.t.):
[pic]
""Do not weaken and do not grieve, and  you  will  be  superior  if  you  are
[true] believers.""[iv] Let us protect our  national  wealth,  moral  values,
labor, products, and the future of our children. Let us pay extra  attention
to be economical, to spend as needed and moderately, and to stay  away  from
extravagance more than ever.

    My Brothers and Sisters!
    History witnesses that Allah Almighty (s.w.t.) will not  leave  helpless
our noble nation, who deems protecting their religion and  homeland  as  the
most supreme duty. The mercy and grace of Allah (s.w.t.) will be with  those
who stand by the oppressed, the refugee, and the immigrant.

    O our Lord who has been holding these lands as a home  for  Muslims  for
centuries, honored this nation many times with being  martyrs  and  veterans
and thus made this people children of  martyrs!  Allow  us  to  put  on  the
consciousness of victory, to hold on to  each  other  in  any  material  and
spiritual sense, to overcome difficulties, and  to  live  on  this  land  as
brothers and sisters forever! AMEEN.
-----------------------
[i] Anfal, 8/46.
[ii] Nasa'i, Jihad, 48.
[iii] Muhammad, 47/7.
[iv] Al-i 'Imran, 3/139.


 hÑ1>hðdý5?CJ\?aJmH     sH   ""hÑ1>h*""5?CJ\?aJmH    sH    ""hÑ1>hðaz5?CJ\?aJmH
          sH    ""hÑ1>h:A?5?CJ\?aJmH   sH    ,hÑ1>h¹)YB*[v]CJ\?^JaJmH   phÿsH
                  jhi5?CJU[pic]\?aJhi5?CJaJmH sH    hÑ1>hùLÎ5?CJaJmH      sH
     hÑ1>hèsä5?CJaJmH sH    hÑ1>hàRGeneral Directorate of Religious Services

"
133;2018-08-17;"
DATE: 17.08.2018
[pic]
CEASELESS CHARITY (SADAQAH
                                  JARIYAH)
    Honorable Muslims!
    In the verse  I  have  recited,  our  Almighty  Lord  (s.w.t.)  enjoins,
""Indeed, the men who practice charity and the  women  who  practice  charity
and [they who] have loaned Allah a goodly loan - it will be  multiplied  for
them, and they will have a noble reward.""[i]

    And our Prophet (s.a.w.) says in the hadith I have read, ""On the Day  of
Resurrection, the shade of the believer is the charity he gave.""[ii]

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    All the blessings we have are bestowed upon us by Allah  (s.w.t.).  They
are entrusted to us by our Lord (s.w.t.). These blessings are  at  the  same
time a trial for all of us. Using the blessings our  Lord  (s.w.t.)  created
for us in the direction of His countenance  is  a  requirement  of  being  a
believer[iii] and putting on the consciousness of taqwa (piety)[iv].  It  is
an indispensable condition to reach goodness.  In  this  regard,  Allah  the
Almighty (s.w.t.) states, ""Never will you attain  the  good  [reward]  until
you spend [in the way of Allah] from that which you love. And  whatever  you
spend-indeed, Allah is Knowing of it.""[v]

    Esteemed Believers!
    Ceaseless charity (sadaqah jariyah) is to leave behind a charity  to  be
benefitted by people for generations. It is to turn the  goods  and  wealth,
which are the blessings of Allah, into worship. It is to  prefer  generosity
and benevolence over selfishness and worldly desires. It is a  virtuous  act
to use what we have for the  benefit  of  society  instead  of  wasting  and
consuming them for ourselves only. It  is  to  make  the  temporary  worldly
blessings  an  occasion  for  earning  the  eternal  life.  It  ensures  the
permanence of our good deeds,  charitable  works,  and  aids,  and  provides
their rewards to be continuous. In this sense,  ceaseless  charity  actually
means to do a favor to ourselves in the future as well as today.

    Our Almighty Lord (s.w.t.) says in the  Holy  Qur'an,  ""...And  whatever
good you [believers] spend is for yourselves, and you do  not  spend  except
seeking the countenance of Allah. And whatever you spend of good -  it  will
be fully repaid to you, and you will not be  wronged.""[vi]  In  that  sense,
any act of goodness that builds the future means investing in the  Hereafter
as well as this world.

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Sadaqah jariyah refers to the endeavour to do charitable  works  without
being limited to a particular time  or  place.  It  indicates  the  wish  to
ensure that one's book of deeds continues to record  the  deeds  even  after
death. This is explained by the Messenger  of  Allah  (s.a.w.)  as  follows,
""When a man dies, his deeds come to an end except for three things:  Sadaqah
jariyah, knowledge by which people  benefit,  and  a  pious  descendant  who
prays for him.""[vii]

    Honorable Brothers and sisters!
    Islamic civilization has for centuries  been  the  pioneer  of  charity,
goodness, benevolence, and beneficence. Many mosques, fountains,  hospitals,
libraries, bridges and schools built by our ancestors with the intention  of
offering a ceaseless charity continue to keep goodness alive  in  our  lives
today. Alhamdulillah, our nation  is  well  aware  of  both  preserving  the
legacy of  our  ancestors  and  bequeathing  long-lasting  works  to  future
generations. Our nation has always been attentive to sadaqah jariyah,  which
represents reliability, sincerity, prudence, and  spending  moderately.  The
caring and open hand of this honourable nation spreads goodness not only  in
our country but also on all four corners  of  the  world.  Constructions  of
thousands of mosques where the adhan echoes all around from  their  minarets
as the symbol of Islam, and the ummah stands shoulder  to  shoulder  in  the
same row under the same qubbah are completed thanks to the  efforts  of  our
nation.  Believing  sincerely  that  charitable  works  help  increase   the
blessings bestowed upon us, our  nation  always  felt  the  support  of  the
rising du'as from those mosques whenever in the face of a difficulty.

    Esteemed Muslims!
    Consolidating our unity, amity and  fraternity,  the  mosques  are  holy
places that bring us together, inspire  faith  in  our  hearts  and  provide
safety  to  where  we  live  both  in  good  and  bad  days.  The   greatest
supplication of our nation, who has considered constructing  and  developing
the masjids of Allah one of the most honorable works to do,  is  to  not  be
left without the mosques, the sounds  of  adhan,  the  fatherland,  and  the
flag. We have full faith in  you  that  you  will  not  leave  helpless  the
ongoing constructions of mosques in Turkey and  abroad  today  as  well.  We
hope to become the beneficiary of the good tiding by our  Prophet  (s.a.w.):
""Those who build a mosque for Allah, Allah will build for them a house  like
that in Paradise.""[viii]
-----------------------
[i] Hadid, 57/18.
[ii] Ibn Hanbal, IV, 233.
[iii] Baqarah, 2/3.
[iv] Al-i 'Imran, 3/134.
[v] Al-i 'Imran, 3/92.
[vi] Baqarah, 2/272.
[vii] Muslim, Wasiyyah, 14.
[viii] Muslim, Zuhd wa Raqa'iq, 44.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
134;2019-10-11;"
TAR?H: 11.10.2019
                                    [pic]

                  TODAY IS THE DAY OF UNITY AND SOLIDARITY
    Honorable Muslims!
    In the verse I have just recited, Allah the Almighty (swt) states,  ""The
ones who have believed, emigrated and striven in the  cause  of  Allah  with
their wealth and their lives are greater in rank in the sight of  Allah.  It
is those who are the attainers of success.""[i]

    In the hadith I have just recited, the Prophet Muhammad (saw)  says,  ""O
people! Do not desire an encounter with the enemy. Pray to  Allah  to  grant
you security. But when you encounter the enemy, be patient  and  firm.  Know
this well that the Heaven is under the shades of swords.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    We as the Turkish nation have overcome numerous  challenges.  Those  who
want to remove us from the stage of the  history  have  never  given  up  on
their cause. However, those who set their eyes on our homeland,  every  inch
of which is watered by the blood of  our  noble  martyrs,  and  who  aim  to
scatter our nation are doomed to lose today, too, just as in the  past.  For
we have that irrepressible power to make us victorious against our  enemies.
The source of our irrepressible power is our unshakable faith in Allah,  our
strong attachment to the sublime religion of Islam, and our  deep  love  for
our homeland, national flag, and independence.

    Dear Muslims!
    Muslims cannot approve and  tolerate  when  the  sacred  and  inviolable
values of Islam are aimed to be trodden. They  rather  honorably  strive  to
vanish all kinds of evil and ensure that peace prevails.  This  is  how  our
heroic nation have throughout its history fought  in  this  cause.  All  our
efforts have been to ensure a peaceful, safe,  and  secure  environment.  We
have not set an eye on anybody's homeland; however, we have  put  forth  our
chests full of and firm on faith as a shield against whosoever  has  set  an
eye on our homeland.  We  have  never  let  our  enemies  set  foot  on  our
homeland, never let them bring down our national flag, and  never  let  them
stop our adhans from being echoed in our skies.



    Dear Believers!
    Unfortunately, the world today was turned into a place full of dark  and
evil traps. Those who  claimed  to  bring  so-called  independence  to  some
places have rather invaded those places. Innocent people  have  been  forced
to leave their homes. The very young and tender corpses of children hit  the
shores. Those who plan to dig pits of fire in all around the  Islamic  world
have used weapons of sedition, terrorism, and betrayal to cause brothers  to
hit one another. Using various plots, plans, tricks  and  traps,  they  have
targeted our existence and future survival,  as  well  as  our  freedom  and
future. They have attempted to bring us, our noble nation to have  been  the
flagbearer of the Muslim ummah for hundreds of years, to our knees.

    Honorable Believers!
    Notwithstanding all these challenges, we, together as our men and women,
young and old people, in short with every fellow national,  will  fight  for
diminishing the evil and for establishing  the  good  on  earth.  Our  noble
nation  will  overturn  all  the  dark  plots  through  their  insight   and
foresight. Just as in the past, today, too, our nation will continue  to  be
the remedy for the remediless people, be there  for  those  people  who  has
nobody by their side, and be the hope and safe haven for the victimized  and
the refugees.

    If need be, we put up with hunger and thirst; however, never do we  make
any concessions on our freedom, independence, honor, and grace. We make  any
sacrifice and stand straight against any attack against  our  homeland,  our
sacred values, our unity and solidarity. Never do  we  forsake  an  inch  of
this heavenly homeland and let the enemy have it.

    Then, let us not give any opportunity to those who  aim  to  set  us  as
nation against each other. Let us continue  to  interlock  our  hearts  with
being brothers and sisters in faith. Let  us  be  awake  and  alert  against
those who fuel terrorism, sedition, and discord.  Let us avoid any  word  or
action that might damage our resolution, affection for  each  other,  unity,
and harmony.

    Come, let us open our hands and pray to Allah the Almighty (swt) in this
hour of this blessed Friday when prayers are accepted:

    O Lord! Do not  let  them  succeed  who  target  our  grace  and  honor,
independence and future survival and who set their  eyes  on  our  existence
and homeland!
    Help our heroic army mobilized for our nation's security and peace,  and
for the region's peace and prosperity!
    Protect each and every soldier of  our  army  against  all  dangers  and
traps! With Your Might and Help, let us come through as  victorious  in  our
cause to vanish sedition and terrorism!
-----------------------
[i] Tawbah, 9/20.
[ii] Bukhari, Jihad, 112; Muslim, Jihad wa Siyar, 20.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
135;2020-01-03;"
DATE: 03.01.2020
[pic]
    HUMAN, FAITH AND LIFE
    Honorable Muslims!
    In the verse I have recited, Allah the Almighty (swt) states,  ""We  have
indeed created man in the best of moulds, then do We abase him (to  be)  the
lowest of the low, Except such as believe and do righteous deeds:  for  they
shall have a reward unfailing.""[i]

    The Prophet Muhammad (saw) said in the hadith I have  read,  ""Those  who
are content with Allah as their Lord, with  Islam  as  their  religion,  and
with Muhammad as their Prophet has found the taste of faith (iman).""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    Allah the Exalted (swt), the one and only Owner of  the  earth  and  the
heavens, has created human in a perfect form. He has bestowed  upon  them  a
mind to distinguish between right and wrong, and a conscience to guide  them
on the path to goodness. As a strong and conscious being with free will  and
sense of responsibility, human is the treasure of the universe.

    Allah the Almighty (swt), who has created human  from  nothing,  bestows
upon them blessings to feed them, and protects them, and wants them to  have
faith and do good deeds. The reason for the existence of humans is  to  bear
the amanah as a servant, and  to  make  the  world  a  peaceful,  fair,  and
livable home for humanity.

    Dear Muslims!
    Humankind has quite superior qualities, privileged power and  abilities.
They can intend to do good and manage life in a good  way  thanks  to  those
qualities. But they can also desire  evil  and  spread  cruelty  around  the
world. As they can build a  happy  world  with  their  patient,  determined,
peaceful and fair attitudes, they can  also  endanger  both  themselves  and
their surroundings with  their  ignorant,  selfish,  ambitious,  hasty,  and
ungrateful attitudes.

    Therefore, our Lord  (swt)  never  gives  rein  to  human.  He  has  not
abandoned the universe after creating it. Allah  (swt)  always  sees,  looks
after, and manages. He never leaves human alone, deprived of blessings,  and
helpless in the life. He is with us each  moment;  closer  to  us  than  our
jugular vein. The greatest support of Allah the Almighty (swt) to us is  the
guidance He gives us through His Prophet and His Book.

    Dear Believers!
    The divine law that is sent by Allah (swt) to humanity  as  a  guide,  a
light of life, and a source of salvation which invites men of  understanding
to accept the guide of salvation brought by our Prophet is called  religion.
Religion came into being with the first human,  and  will  exist  until  the
last day. We all know as believers who came together in this holy masjid  in
this hour of Friday that ""The Religion  before  Allah  is  Islam.""[iii]  All
humans until the Day of Resurrection are obliged to be one of the  Ummah  of
our Beloved Prophet (saw), and to respond to his  invitation.  Because,  ""If
anyone desires a religion other than Islam, never will  it  be  accepted  of
him; and in the Hereafter he will be in the ranks of  those  who  have  lost
(all spiritual good).""[iv]

    Religion is the soundest source  of  knowledge  where  people  can  find
answers to their questions, and  solutions  to  their  problems.  Those  who
believe by responding the invitation of the religion  have  given  the  best
decision of their life. They have been honored  by  becoming  Muslims.  They
turned to Allah (swt)  with  their  own  choice  voluntarily  without  being
forced. They have sincerely accepted the commands and prohibitions  of  Him.
From that moment on, they are expected to fulfill the requirements of  their
faith, and to live as a believer does.

    Dear Muslims!
    Islam is a unique system of faith, worship, and morality.  [pic]  Taking
the kalimah al-shahadah by uttering these words  is  to  open  the  gate  to
faith, hope, and happiness both for the world and the Hereafter.  Those  who
enter through this gate perform their prayers  regularly  and  meticulously.
Prayer (salah) is the pillar of our religion and the light  of  our  hearts.
They fast zestfully and patiently. Fasting is the shield protecting us  from
being captive to our  nafs  and  to  Satan.  They  pay  their  alms  (zakat)
sincerely and kindly. Zakat is the  bridge  turning  the  ephemeral  worldly
belongings into eternal gain and brotherhood. They  fulfill  their  duty  of
hajj devotedly and submissively.  Hajj  is  the  holy  journey  which  makes
people meet with themselves and other faithful hearts around the Ka'bah.

    The aim of worship in Islam is to enable people  to  establish  a  sound
communication with themselves, with Allah (swt), and with all other  beings.
For this reason, each worship requires to be completed with  good  morality.
A way of life befitting to Muslims can  be  lived  by  observing  the  moral
principles as well as the worships. It is an  indispensable  requirement  of
being Muslim to observe the rights, to not let cruelty  and  oppression,  to
spread mercy  and  prevent  violence.  Making  life  blessed  with  justice,
honesty,  humbleness  and  generosity  is  the  essential  of   a   Muslim's
personality. Let us not forget that those whose minds are  with  the  truth,
whose hearts are with goodness and whose possibilities are  with  beneficial
deeds will fulfill the requirement of their faith.

    May the Almighty Allah (swt) accept all the donations we have made up to
now and we will make from now on.
-----------------------
[i] Tin, 95/4-6.
[ii] Muslim, Iman, 56.
[iii] Al-i 'Imran, 3/19.
[iv] Al-i 'Imran, 3/85.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
136;2018-02-02;"
LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE
DATE  : 02.02.2018

                                    [pic]

                       THE TWO MAIN SOURCES OF ISLAM:
                          THE QUR'AN AND THE SUNNAH
    Jumu'ah Mubarak, Honorable Believers!
    Our Almighty Lord enjoins in the verse I have recited: ""O you  who  have
believed, respond to Allah and to the Messenger when he calls  you  to  that
which gives you life. And know that Allah intervenes between a man  and  his
heart and that to Him you will be gathered."" [i]

    Our Prophet (s.a.w.) said in the hadith  I  have  read:  ""I  am  leaving
behind two things to you. As long as you hold to them tightly, you will  not
go astray. They are the Book of Allah and the Sunnah of His Prophet.""[ii]

    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    The Holy Qur'an is the power and guide that constructs our world and our
afterlife, our present and our future. Our Prophet's  Sunnah  is  where  the
Qur'an  meets  with  life,  and  becomes  comprehensible  and   practicable.
Therefore, we have been learning the sure religion of Islam from  these  two
main sources for fourteen centuries.

    The Holy Qur'an commands us to believe in our Prophet besides the belief
in Allah. It asks obedience to the Prophet right after obedience  to  Allah.
Because our Prophet (s.a.w.) is the one who conveyed  and  taught  our  Holy
Book to us. The Qur'an has been transformed into  a  lifestyle  through  his
exemplary life. Those who organize their lives in the light  of  the  Qur'an
and in  the  unique  leadership  of  our  Prophet  would  never  lose  their
direction.

    Honorable Believers!
    The Holy Qur'an, the Book of our purpose of existence,  commands  us  to
believe in Allah and be a servant only to Him. Our Prophet  (s.a.w.)  showed
us the real faith as he did not bow before any power except  Allah,  and  he
displayed  a  dignified  and  honorable  stance  in  all  circumstances  and
situations.

    The Holy Qur'an commands us prayers which keep our faith alive and bring
us closer to Allah. And through his life,  our  Prophet  taught  us  how  to
pray, how to fast, how to pay zakat, how to perform the pilgrimage  and  how
to worship our Lord.

    The Qur'an commands us to enjoin what is good and forbid what  is  evil,
to defend the right and the truth, to be  trustworthy,  to  have  compassion
and mercy, in short to become honored with morality. Our Prophet  became  an
example to all of us about how to be a good  believer  by  practicing  these
virtues.

    Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
    The history is our witness that we have always been attached to our Holy
Book heartedly. We have felt  a  deep  fondness  towards  the  Messenger  of
Allah. We have been an honorable ummah and an example to  humanity  as  long
as we correctly understood and practiced the peaceful messages of  the  Holy
Qur'an and the Sunnah of our Prophet. But when we became unable  to  reflect
this devotion and  fondness  to  our  actions,  when  we  strayed  from  the
knowledge, wisdom, and determination that the Qur'an and the Prophet ask  of
us, then we lost our power and  weakened.  When  we  began  to  neglect  the
supreme spirit and ideals  that  the  Qur'an  and  the  Sunnah  want  us  to
achieve, then we got stuck in the swamp of ignorance.

    Dear Muslims!
    There is only one way for  us  to  free  ourselves  from  the  pain  and
difficulties we have been suffering and once again  become  an  ummah  which
offers peace, tranquility, and civilization to the humankind.  This  way  is
to hold tightly to the Qur'an and the Sunnah as the believers  of  our  Holy
Book and the ummah of our Beloved Prophet. It  is  to  make  no  concessions
from these two sources in learning and practicing  our  religion  correctly.
It is to be aware of those who try to put a wedge  between  the  Qur'an  and
the Sunnah, and those who try to obtain power and interest by abusing  these
most sacred values of ours. It is to make efforts to raise  generations  who
look at the world through the last Book of Allah and the pure Sunnah of  the
Prophet, who are devoted to their  religion  and  nation  with  a  sense  of
loyalty.

    Esteemed Brothers and Sisters!
    It is our duty to raise and educate  our  children  with  the  sense  of
faith, the love of prayer and the consciousness of morality  which  are  fed
by the Qur'an and the Sunnah. It is our goal  to  ensure  that  they  become
good persons and exemplary believers. I would like to  remind  you  esteemed
believers an important issue that could serve this goal: As  you  know,  The
Holy Qur'an, The Life of Our  Prophet  and  Basic  Religious  Knowledge  are
given as selective courses in our schools. We should be attentive to  ensure
our children to select these courses. Let us not  forget  that  our  beloved
children are entrusted to us by our Lord and it  is  our  responsibility  to
raise them to live  in  accordance  with  the  consent  of  Allah.  May  our
Almighty  Lord  make  our  children  dutiful  towards  their   parents   and
beneficial to their religion, nation and the humanity.
-----------------------
[i] Anfal, 8/24.
[ii] Muwatta Malik, The Decree, 3.
            Issued by: General Directorate of Religious Services


"
137;2019-12-20;"
DATE: 20.12.2019
[pic]

    TAQWA: THE BEST PROVISION
    Honorable Muslims!
    The Prophet Muhammad (saw) had appointed one  of  his  young  companions
Muadh ibn Jabal as ambassador to Yemen. He set out with him as he was  going
to bid farewell, and offered him some recommendations. Muadh was riding  and
the Prophet Muhammad (saw) was walking next to him.  Before  concluding  his
recommendations, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) said, ""O Muadh! Perhaps you  may
not see me again next year, except visit this masjid or my grave.""  Saddened
because of having to be separated from the  Prophet  Muhammad  (saw),  Muadh
started to cry upon those words. The Messenger of Allah (saw) turned  facing
Madinah and said, ""The most superior people in my eyes,  regardless  of  who
they are and what status and authority they may have, are the ones who  have
taqwa.""[i]

    Dear Believers!
    Taqwa  is  to  live  in  the  know  of  one's  material  and   spiritual
responsibilities  as  a  servant  of  Allah  (swt).  It  is  to   obey   His
commandments and earn His approval. It is to turn away from  those  acts  to
earn His disapproval, and seek refuge in the shade of His mercy.  It  is  to
follow in the Prophet Muhammad's (saw) footsteps, whom  the  Almighty  Allah
(swt) sent to us as the perfect role model and the unique guide.

    Dear Muslims!
    Only through taqwa is it possible for people  to  be  honored  with  the
divine mercy and protection. In the verse I have recited  at  the  beginning
of the khutbah, the Almighty Allah (swt) states, ""O  believers!  Fear  Allah
as He should be feared and do not die except as  Muslims  in  submission  to
Him.""[ii]

    Proper taqwa takes people to always feel as if they are in the  presence
of Allah (swt), to not show a lack of respect for Him, and to obey Him  with
deep love. Taqwa, in this sense, is to be  concerned  about  doing  acts  to
earn Allah's (swt) wrath and appearing with a face down before  Him.  It  is
to make preparations in this  world  for  the  life  in  the  Hereafter,  as
commanded by the verse, ""O believers! Fear Allah. Let  every  soul  look  to
what it has put forth for tomorrow.""[iii]



    Dear Believers!
    One day the Prophet Muhammad (saw) pointed his chest and repeated  three
times, ""Taqwa is right here.""[iv] Taqwa is in the heart, right,  but  it  is
reflected on the body, in the words and behaviors. The comforting effect  of
taqwa manifests itself in our worships, good deeds,  and  good  morals.  Our
awareness of taqwa is increased when we avoid what is  evil  and  forbidden,
and matures and reaches perfection through honesty and sincerity.

    Taqwa is like the shield of Muslims. It is the shiver felt in the heart,
the voice heard in the conscience. The barrier set up against the sins,  and
the bridge towards the  merits...  Then,  Muslims  who  have  taqwa  thereby
protect their hearts from sedition and corrupiton, their  tongue  from  lies
and slanders, and their eyes  from  what  is  forbidden.  Their  hands  from
unfairness, and their feet from racing for the evil... Let  alone  knowingly
committing a sin, they do not even fall in two minds about going for  things
that may potentially lead to committing a  sin.  This  is  because  a  truly
pious Muslim knows that  observing  the  commandments  and  prohibitions  of
Allah (swt) will  bring  happiness  in  this  world  and  salvation  in  the
Hereafter.

    Dear Muslims!
    Taqwa is the only measure to determine our value in the sight  of  Allah
(swt). This is because the superiority according to Islam  does  not  depend
on one's property, status and authority, profession, race, or  gender.  This
is pointed out clearly in the verse, ""The most noble of you in the sight  of
Allah is the most righteous of you.""[v] The most virtuous of people are  the
ones who are honored with faith, have the clothing of taqwa on, a  perfectly
clean heart and a record of good deeds.  These  are  the  people  with  whom
Allah (swt) is together. Their friend He  is.  For  them  are  prepared  the
Paradise and all the unique blessings in it.[vi]

    Dear Believers!
    The Almighty Allah (swt) states, ""Take provisions, but indeed, the  best
provision is taqwa. Fear Me, o you who understand.""[vii]

Then let us enrich our temporary life in this mortal world with  taqwa.  Let
us continue to avoid evil and always  be  good  and  do  good.  Let  us  not
frustrate our life in this world and in the Hereafter by trying  to  satisfy
the insatiable desires of our nafs and by falling for  the  Satan's  deceit.
Let us not forget that one day we will give account for every  word  out  of
our mouth and for every deed we do. I would like  to  conclude  the  khutbah
with the following hadith of the Prophet  Muhammad  (saw),  ""Have  taqwa  of
Allah wherever you are, and if you do evil knowingly or unknowingly,  follow
it with a good one to wipe the former out, and treat the  people  with  good
behavior.""[viii]
-----------------------
[i] Ibn Hanbal, V, 236.
[ii] Al-i 'Imran, 3/102.
[iii] Hashr, 59/18.
[iv] Ibn Hanbal, III, 134.
[v] Hujurat, 49/13.
[vi] Nahl, 16:128; Jathiyah, 45/19; Ra'd, 13:35.
[vii] Baqarah, 2/197.
[viii] Tirmidhi, Birr, 55.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
138;2017-04-28;"LOCATION   : NATIONWIDE

DATE              : 28.04.2017



THE BRIDGE OF TRUST AND LOVE: GREETING

Salutations to souls that believe Allah and His Messenger!

A blessed Friday to you, honorable Brothers and Sisters!

In the verse I have recited, the Almighty enjoins: “And when you are greeted with a greeting, greet in return with one better than it or at least return it. Indeed, Allah  takes careful account of all things.”

In the hadith I have recited, our Prophet (pbuh) says: “You shall not enter Paradise so long as you do not affirm belief! And you will not believe as long as you do not love one another! Should I not direct you to a thing which, if you do, will foster love amongst you: Give currency to greeting one another!”

Brothers and Sisters!

One of the names of the Almighty Lord is “As-Salam.” He is the source of peace and prosperity. That’s why we utter His name “Salam” after every prayer. We say: “Allahumma antas salam wa minkas salam tabrakta Ya dhal Jalali wal ikram!” It means: “O Allah, You are peace; peace, safety, and security comes from You. Blessed are You O Possessor of Glory and Honor!” We pray to our Lord that he may guide us to salvation and the true path, and let us live in peace and safety.

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

Greeting is a symbol of the believer. It is the name of quiet and safety, being far away from fear, concern, worry, and danger. For that reason, we greet all believers we know or not, and we form bonds of trust and love. We say “salam alaykum” or “may Allah’s peace be upon you” when we begin talking, and show our goodwill in prayer

Greeting is the assurance we give to others that we are their friends and no harm will come from us. It is the oath of remaining brothers and forgetting about grievances and hatred. Because a greeting accompanied with a smile wipes away concerns and grievances. It unites the hearts, leads to compassion and kindness.

Brothers and Sisters!

Greeting is not an ordinary gesture, it’s not a daily habit. It is a precious key that opens locked doors and mends hearts. That’s why when the Prophet (pbuh) reached Medina after his Hijrah journey, he said this to the crowd that welcomed him with jubilation: “O you people!”  “Spread the greeting!”  “Feed the needy!”  “Keep in touch with relatives!”  “Perform prayer while people are sleeping!”  “And you will enter paradise in peace!” 

Brothers and Sisters!

Our Graceful Prophet always greeted people during his lifetime. He greeted everyone – women, men, elderlies, and children alike. He said, “The person favored most by Allah is the one who initiates the greeting.” He even greeted the residents of the cemetery, and wished them well-being.

Well, brothers and sisters, if we have such a prophet, how can we pretend to not know our next door neighbors and pass by them? How can we spare the greeting from our relatives and close ones? How can we ignore the poor, the orphans, and the homeless who are entrusted to us? Remember that sparing Allah’s greeting is the worst type of stinginess. Those who worry that “If I greet him I will end up owing him something” must know that the believer ends up owing when he does not greet. Because our Prophet mentioned greeting among the rights of Muslims on other Muslims.

Honorable Believers!

The language of greeting is universal. Because our Lord’s name Salam has surrounded the whole realm. A person needs greeting regardless of their color, race, denomination, disposition. Time and distance cannot stop the wind of well-being. Greetings and prayers we send to fellow Muslims, the oppressed and victims find their destination just like every greeting we send from distant places to Medina and to our Prophet reaches him. 

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

May the Exalted make peace and safety prevail over our country, Islam’s cities, and the whole world. May He make it easy for us to turn our faith into peace and peace into safety. May Allah’s peace, grace, abundance, and prosperity be upon all of us."
139;2017-06-02;"LOCATION  : NATIONWIDE

DATE             : 02.06.2017                



HUNGER OF FASTING CURES GREED

A Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters!

Infinite gratitude to Allah Almighty as He has granted us once again to reach Holy Ramadan, the season of grace and mercy. Salutations and peace to our Prophet and Allah’s Messenger who taught us that fasting is a school and a friend that mends our spirit.

Brothers and Sisters! 

To the humankind who falls into the hands of desire and fancy and gets dragged into the swirl of ambition and cupidity, Allah the Exalted asks this crucial question:  “Where are you going?” “Where are you going, oh, humans? Are you aware of your path?” 

In this blessed Ramadan, the month of Quran, we must once again ask ourselves that question. We must shake and pull ourselves together with it. And we must ruminate over the answer.

Honorable Believers!

Ramadan is one of the best periods of time in which the answers we can give to this question are experienced in person. Because Ramadan reminds us of what we have forgotten. It calls us to contemplate. Ramadan calms down our spirit with Quran, prayer, remembrance, repentance, alms, and supplication. Fasting leaves us hungry from imsak to iftar, thus curing greed which is another type of hunger and the source of all evil. Its origin is described in the Quran as “takathur” (boasting with abundance and competing for it). Allah Almighty enjoins us this fact in Surat at-Takathur:

 “Competition in worldly increase diverts you until you visit the graveyards.”  “No! You are going to know. Then no! You are going to know.”  “No! If you only knew with knowledge of certainty.”  “You will surely see the Hellfire (if you do not stop your greed and competing in boasting with abundance).” 

 “Then you will surely see it with the eye of certainty.”  “Then you will surely be asked that Day about pleasure.”

Brothers and Sisters!

One day when our Prophet (pbuh) recited this surat, he followed up with this question upon which every single one of us must contemplate: “The son of Adam says: ‘My wealth, my wealth.’ And do you own anything except what you give in charity, such that you’ve spent it, or what you eat, such that you’ve finished it, or you wear, such that you’ve worn it out?”

Brothers and Sisters! 

Avarice and greed are the source of all evil from which the humankind suffers. Isn’t the greed of global powers the reason for the bloodshed and suffering in our region? Isn’t it greed and nothing else that causes the balance of the universe to be disturbed, the nature to be ruined and the environment to be polluted, and the future of human species to be risked by modifying plants and seeds?

Brothers and Sisters!

As they come upon us to enlighten our hearts and cities every year in such an atmosphere, Ramadan and fasting offer us a great opportunity to get rid of greed, desire, and avarice. Ramadan and fasting remind us that our belongings do not actually belong to us, material and spiritual blessings are all but a test. They make us realize that the world is temporary, what’s permanent and everlasting is the afterlife. Ramadan teaches us to share and fasting teaches us to thank and be grateful. Ramadan inculcates us that real wealth is not the abundance of our fortune but the contentment of our hearts. It declares that the way to have bliss on the earth and salvation in the afterlife is not piling up wealth but winning hearts and 	accumulating prayers.

Then come, Dear Brothers and Sisters, Let us allow fasting and other worships we perform to let us deliver from greed and make us grateful and thankful believers. Let us surrender our hearts to Ramadan.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

In these days as we experience the joy of Ramadan, we have been devastated as a nation upon hearing the news of martyrs fallen. Our children became martyrs for us to have a peaceful Ramadan and for the sake of our unity and togetherness, our peace and well-being, and our values. I wish Allah’s mercy upon our honorable martyrs, and a swift recovery to our veterans. May Allah grant patience and fortitude to our nation and to the families of our martyrs. Condolences to our nation."
140;2017-03-10;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 10.03.2017



ONLY THROUGH GOODNESS WE CAN PREVENT EVIL

Honorable Believers!

Vabisa, a companion of our Prophet (pbuh), was a new Muslim. Vabisa, unable to grasp the merciful and graceful messages of Islam, wanted to ask some questions to our Prophet (pbuh). One of these questions was about what is good and what is evil. He went to the Messenger of Allah to ask him questions. He reached Prophet Muhammad (pbuh), about whom he said “no other company would give me greater joy”. The Messenger of Mercy noticed him approaching and said “Come closer Vabisa!” After listening to his question, he gave this answer: “Vabisa! Consult your heart and your conscience about good and evil! Because goodness is what gives your heart peace and your conscience comfort. Evil is what gives your heart unrest and your conscience worry and doubt, even if other people approve of it.” 

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

Goodness is existence, evil is emptiness. Goodness is peace. Evil is darkness. Goodness is to seek our Lord’s countenance. Evil is to walk step by step towards His anger. Goodness is the behavior befitting to the traits of having a sound mind, a sound heart and a sound nature, that is the trait of being the most honorable of all creation. Evil is the behavior that lowers a person, the atrocity that reduces his worth both in the sight of Allah and other people. Goodness is a noble trait our Great Lord has put within the fitrah (natural disposition) of man. Evil is a black spot that stains the heart. Goodness is the loyalty towards Allah Almighty, owner of the purest nature of man. Evil is to lose this loyalty. Goodness is the greatest power that will wipe evil and malice off the earth. Evil is destined to become vanquished and defeated against goodness.

Brothers and Sisters!

Our Holy Book first tells us about what goodness is not, before telling us what it is.

لَيْسَ الْبِرَّ اَنْ تُوَلُّوا وُجُوهَكُمْ قِبَلَ الْمَشْرِقِ وَالْمَغْرِبِ meaning “Goodness is not that you turn your faces toward the east or the west.” It does not consider it goodness to reduce prayers to mere formalism and be pious just to be seen by people.

The Holy Qur’an defines the real goodness as follows: True goodness is, مَنْ اٰمَنَ بِاللّٰهِ وَالْيَوْمِ الْاٰخِرِ وَالْمَلٰٓئِكَةِ وَالْكِتَابِ وَالنَّبِيّ۪نَۚ in other words it is to believe in Our Lord, who delivers us from all evil. It is to believe in the Last Day, the angels, the Book and the prophets. 

وَاٰتَى الْمَالَ عَلٰى حُبِّه۪ ذَوِي الْقُرْبٰى وَالْيَتَامٰى وَالْمَسَاك۪ينَ وَابْنَ السَّب۪يلِ وَالسَّٓائِل۪ينَ وَفِي الرِّقَابِۚ

True goodness is to give wealth, in spite of love for it, to the needy, orphans and the poor. It is to free man from all kinds of slavery. True goodness is, وَاَقَامَ الصَّلٰوةَ وَاٰتَى الزَّكٰوةَۚ to establish prayer. It is to give zakat willingly. True goodness is, وَالْمُوفُونَ بِعَهْدِهِمْ to fulfill ones promise when one promise, to be attentive to one’s trust. True goodness is, وَالَّذ۪ينَ صَبَرُوا ابْتِغَٓاءَ وَجْهِ رَبِّهِمْ to be patient during ease and hardship, only to seek the countenance of Allah.

True goodness is, وَيَدْرَؤُ۫نَ بِالْحَسَنَةِ السَّيِّئَةَ to be able to avert evil through good, destroy it through good. Because a believer is the one who devotes his life to the good and gives his life meaning through good. A Muslim is the one who stands against all kinds of evil with his hand, mouth, heart and body and soul. 

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

I regret to tell you that goodness today remains in the background compared with evil. Evil keeps surrounding our world day by day. At an alarming rate, mankind loses his conscience, justice, rightness and compassion for the sake of following his desire, passion and lust. He becomes an entity who does not help anyone but himself. He forgets that true help, true goodness is the one that you give to others.

Brothers and Sisters!

As believers with a cause to spread goodness and prevent evil, we have a very important responsibility. Regardless of the circumstances, we have to keep the belief that there are still good people in this world alive. We must never let evil defeat goodness. We must not forget that serving the goodness and preventing the evil lead to happiness in this life and hereafter.

Brothers and Sisters!

As pilgrims on the path of goodness we pray to our Lord in this sacred hour with open hands: O Lord! Grant us the ability and power to remove all evil surrounding our region and all mankind! Grant us help to build a world together where goodness prevails! Enable us to leave a better, more livable earth to future generations!"
141;2017-09-29;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 29.09.2017



THE MOSQUE, THE CITY
AND THE CIVILIZATION

Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters!

Please come! Let us remember the day of Asurah, which we are going to observe tomorrow, and Karbala, which has drowned us in sorrow for centuries. Let us remember Husain, one of the two distinguished grandchildren of Allah’s Messenger, the dearest to the believers, the master of the martyrs and the young in heaven. Let us send prayers and salutations to the Greatest Messenger and his people of the house.

Brothers and Sisters!

Please come! Let us also remember in today’s khutba the mosque and the Mosques and Religious Officials Week, which we have been celebrating for nearly a quarter century. Let’s seek the ways of placing the mosques at the center of the city and our lives, and turn them into cradles of civilization again. Let us consider once again how important the mosques are in our lives.

Honorable Brothers and Sisters!

Our Lord Almighty says in the verse I have recited at the beginning of this khutba: “The Mosques of Allah shall be maintained only by those who believe in Allah and the Last Day; perform As-Salat (Iqamat-as-Salat), and give Zakat and fear none but Allah. It is they who are expected to be on true guidance.” 

Our Prophet (pbuh) says in the hadith I have recited at the beginning of this khutba: “The parts of land dearest to Allah are its mosques.” 

Honorable Believers!

Mosques are the heart of the Islamic civilization. In our civilization, not having a mosque or a place of worship in a city is unthinkable. When our Prophet (pbuh) arrived in Medina, he immediately built the Al-Masjid an-Nabawi (Prophet’s Mosque) in the heart of Medina with the help of his companions. Al-Masjid an-Nabawi became the center of Madina and the cradle of civilization. Values such as science, knowledge, morality, justice, love, respect, compassion and mercy spread from this blessed place like waves across the world. From that day until today, the Islamic cities have been built and shaped around the mosques. In short, the mosque has been the soul of the city.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

The mosque is life for us believers. For in the mosques, we feel very deeply the pleasure of bowing before Allah and being a servant only to Him. The mosques pull us away from the endless bustle of life, their spiritual climate gives us a new awareness and put us back. They educate us by patiently working on our emotions and thoughts. For this reason, the mosques are the places of knowledge, wisdom, and morality for us always. They are the schools where we learn Our Lord, Our Religion, Our Book, Our Prophet, brotherhood, and life.

Mosques are the places that unite our hearts in the presence of the Most Beneficent. The mosques are built so that we’d carry the sense of unity we feel in the mosques when we stand together in rows and when we bow together in ruku and sajdah to our society. Mosques are built so that we’d carry the conscience of “the trustworthy believers” to whom people trust that no harm will come from them, and the conscience of “role model” that people admire to our homes, neighborhoods, our country and all humanity.

Venerable Brothers and Sisters!

The mosques are symbols of independence for Islamic cities. They are the symbols of tawhid (oneness) with their minarets. They are the expression of martyrdom with their adhans. They are the centers that could revive and raise a nation with their salas. They are the places of knowledge, wisdom and attainment with their minbars. They are the voices of the right and the truth with their pulpits. Their mihrabs are the places of battle against all kinds of evil such as anger, grudge, hatred, and sins that try to conquer our hearts.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

The Presidency of Religious Affairs has set the theme of the Mosques and Religious Officials Week this year as “The Mosque, The City and The Civilization”. During the week, the importance of the mosque in the revival of a believer, the soul of a city and the birth of a civilization will be emphasized through various programs. We will be reminded that restoring the mosques to their state in the Age of Bliss is a task for all believers.

I wish that the Mosques and Religious Officials Week will bring blessings. I wish for health and peace for the brothers and sisters who served the mosques, and I ask mercy from our Lord for those who passed away. May our Lord let our hearts, minds and bodies embrace the mosques. May our Lord never deprive us of the adhans, as their witnessing is the foundation of religion."
142;2018-01-05;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 05.01.2018



OUR HEAVEN ON EARTH: THE FAMILY

Blessed Friday to You, Honorable Believers!

A young girl came to our Prophet (pbuh) and said: “O Messenger of Allah! My father wants me to marry his brother's son against my will.” The Messenger of Mercy immediately called the father because he wanted to listen to his side of the story and grant the girl the freedom to choose if he really wanted to marry her without asking her first. The young girl felt safe after this development and said: “O Messenger of Allah! I came to you to find out whether women have a say in marriage.” 

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

With this behavior, our Prophet (pbuh) suggested that a woman should be consulted and give her consent before marriage, the most important decision of her life. Indeed, he said: “Do not give your daughters in marriage without their consent.”  And this event was just one of the many examples that shows the place, honor and value of women before our Prophet.

Honorable Believers!

Our supreme religion Islam attaches great importance to a healthy marriage and a happy family. Our Prophet (pbuh) gave marriage a deep meaning and a great soul. Because marriage in our religion is a heavy agreement and breaking it is a great sin. Marriage is the oath that the spouses give one another to share a life, holding the name of Allah Almighty as witness. Marriage is a moral and legal responsibility that both women and men assume together with their consent and free will.

In our culture and traditions, marriage is more than bringing two person under a roof. On the contrary, marriage is a solid foundation established for protecting the society and future generations. Being a family is to share a life with love and respect, compassion and mercy, care and sensibility. Being a family is to face all kinds of troubles of the world together. It is to live the joy and sorrow, wealth and poverty together. Being a family is forming a whole through faithfulness and self-sacrifice, through thick and thin.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

We want our families to be our heaven on the earth. We ask our Lord when we start a family: “O Allah! Bless this agreement and make it sacred. Unite this couple with feelings of intimacy, fondness and fidelity. Just like You did with Adam and Hawwa, our Prophet and Khadija, Ali and Fatima.”

We take the steps to the marriage, which gives our lives meaning and makes it bountiful, in the presence of our parents, relatives and neighbors, brothers and sisters, and our loved ones. We also make people witnesses to our marriage that we started with the name of our Lord, with the intention to make it last a lifetime.

And we ground the foundations of our warm homes on the capacity, mutual consent, love and fidelity of the couples to be married. Because marriage is not a relationship of one-sided interest. On the contrary, marriage is about a couple deciding their future together. No one has the authority and right to capture another person’s will, to claim ownership over her or him, and to determine her or his future. Allah is the sole owner of souls. And in the words of our Prophet, the husband and wife are entrusted to one another.

Honorable Believers!

Despite all this, occasionally people could give children in marriage who do not have the ability to distinguish between right and wrong, good and evil. Moreover, some groups try to ground these false perceptions and practices arising from ignorance and irresponsibility to the religion.

It is a fact that in Islam, marriage is a serious step that is closed to arbitrary and random practices. Marriage requires consciousness and responsibility. In our religion, freedom of will is required for responsibility, punishment and reward. It is absolutely impermissible in our religion to take away the right of a person to live his or her life with dignity, and in particular to expose children to various kinds of abuse. There is no religious and scientific legitimacy, no foundation for a child who is not yet aware of her responsibility for her Lord and her environment to be forced into marriage. It is unacceptable to try to marry a girl who has not reached the age of understanding how to build a home, be a wife and a mother. The rights of both sides in marriage must be observed in order to ensure the permanence of peace and happiness in the family, in the direction of our religion’s principles and our Prophet’s (pbuh) sunnah.

Brothers and Sisters!

I want to conclude this khutba with a verse and a hadith:

Our Lord Almighty enjoins in the Quran: “And among His Signs is this, that He created for you wives from among yourselves, that you may find repose in them, and He has put between you affection and mercy. Verily, in that are indeed signs for a people who reflect.” 

Our Prophet (pbuh) says: “Select (fit) women (in respect of character) for your seed, and marry (your) equals and give (your daughters) in marriage to them.”"
143;2019-08-09;"
DATE: 09.08.2019
                                    [pic]
               BELIEVERS: THE GUARANTEE OF A PEACEFUL SOCIETY
    Dear Muslims!
    The most basic principle which sustains a society and helps it  live  in
peace is justice. The verse of ""O ye  who  believe!  Stand  out  firmly  for
Allah, as witnesses to fair dealing.""[i] points out the fact  that  being  a
believer requires to stand by the truth. Justice is also the most  important
balance element and the guarantee of social life.
    Trust is  another  must-have  principle  that  is  needed  in  order  to
implement peace in a society. Believers assure  all  people  by  taking  the
example of their Prophet  called  as  Muhammad  al-Amin  (the  Trustworthy).
Because the Messenger of Allah (saw) described them as,  ""True  Muslims  are
the ones from whose tongues and hands Muslims are safe.  And  believers  are
persons  trusted  by  other  people  for   safety   of   their   lives   and
properties.""[ii]
    Honorable Believers!
    Another principle of establishment of a peaceful  and  safe  society  is
righteousness. Being  sincere  and  honest  is  a  requirement  of  being  a
believer. Believers are frank and transparent. They tell exactly  what  they
think. Their intentions  and  deeds  are  consistent  with  each  other.  In
accordance with the [pic] ""Therefore stand firm (in the  straight  Path)  as
thou art commanded.""[iii] Command of the Almighty Allah (swt),  not  leaving
the right path is the slogan of believers. Believers  do  not  lie,  do  not
defame, and do not violate rights of others!
    Dear Muslims!
    One of the  most  harmful  behaviors  which  damages  the  conscious  of
solidarity of a society and leaves the door open for duality  is  prejudice.
Prejudice means to slander people without basing on  any  proof  and  ground
and to build assumptions on evil thoughts. However, just like the lives  and
properties of believers, also their honor  and  chastity  are  entrusted  to
each other. The law of brotherhood and  the  ethics  of  brotherhood  should
dominate over the relationship between them. It is a requirement of iman  to
have good intentions towards your believer brothers and sisters.  Allah  the
Exalted (swt) warns believers as follows in  the  verse  I  recited  at  the
beginning of my khutbah,
                                                                       [pic]
    ""O ye who believe! Avoid suspicion as much (as possible): for  suspicion
in some cases is a sin...""[iv]
    Honorable Believers!
    The religion of Islam also prohibits  spying  on  secret  conditions  of
people and disclosing  them  to  others  just  as  it  prohibits  prejudice.
Criticizing each other maliciously, saying bad  words  behind  each  other's
back, and disclosing mistakes and shames of  your  brother  and  sister  are
haram in  Islam.  Because  all  these  ill  tempers  cause  the  unrest  and
corruption to become widespread and the people who do not trust  each  other
to establish an unrestful and chaotic society. It  is  impossible  for  such
society to sustain and look future with hope. With His command of, [pic]
     ""And spy not on each other, nor speak ill of each  other  behind  their
backs ...""[v] the  Almighty  Allah  invites  us  to  be  sensitive  on  this
subject. Otherwise, the destination will be disappointment in the world  and
regret in the Hereafter. However, Allah the Exalted informs  us  as  follows
about the fact that Devil will drive a wedge between believers  who  do  not
say the true and beautiful words, ""Say  to  My  servants  that  they  should
(only) say those things that are best: for Satan doth sow dissensions  among
them: For Satan is to man an avowed enemy.""[vi]
    Dear Believers!
    The Beloved Prophet Muhammad (saw) stated, ""It is enough sin for  a  man
to speak of everything  that  he  hears.""[vii]  By  sharing  an  information
before  checking  its  correctness  you  become  an  instrument  to   spread
groundless words and feed lies and slanders. Allah the Exalted (swt)  states
in the Holy Qur'an as follows,
                                                                       [pic]
    ""O ye who believe! If a wicked  person  comes  to  you  with  any  news,
ascertain the truth....""[viii]
    Believers  do  not  rely  on  groundless  news  and  comments   released
irresponsibly and unconsciously. They stay away from  saying  a  word  about
the honor and chastity of innocent people  just  like  they  run  away  from
fire. They know that  they  will  account  for  every  word  uttered,  every
comment written, and every deed committed by them. They apply this verse  of
Allah (swt) to their lives, ""And pursue not  that  of  which  thou  hast  no
knowledge; for every act of hearing, or of seeing, or of  (feeling  in)  the
heart will be enquired into (on the Day of Reckoning).""[ix]
    Honorable Muslims!
    Let us be tied to our divine book the Holy Qur'an and the sunnah of  our
Prophet Muhammad Mustafa (saw) in order to establish a peaceful,  safe,  and
powerful society. Starting from our family, let us spread,  live,  and  make
others live the conscious of tawhid, the conscious of brotherhood, and  good
morals. Let us stay away from all kinds of behaviors that  will  weaken  the
bonds between us and make us mistrustful against each  other.  Let  us  work
altogether for a peaceful environment in which spouses,  parents,  children,
chiefs, civil servants, workers, employers, neighbors,  relatives,  friends,
fellows, and in short all the members of the society trust each  other.  Let
us not forget the following warning of Prophet Muhammad (saw) not  even  for
a moment, ""Do not hate each other, do not envy each other, do not turn  away
from each other, but rather be servants of Allah as brothers.""[x]
    Dear Believers!
    I would like to remind you an important point as we approach to the  Eid
al-Adha. Most of us are going to set off to spend the eid with  our  beloved
ones. We need to be extra careful because of  the  intense  traffic  on  the
ways we will use to go and come back.  Because  our  several  citizens  lose
their lives and many families disappear  in  accidents  that  occur  due  to
improper passing, close follow-up, and tiredness. For this reason,  I  would
like to invite all our brothers and sisters to abide by  traffic  rules  and
act patiently, thoughtfully, and carefully.
-----------------------
[i]   Maidah, 5/8.
[ii]   Tirmidhi, Iman, 12.
[iii]   Hud, 11/112.
[iv]   Hujurat, 49/12.
[v]   Hujurat, 49/12.
[vi]   Isra, 17/53.
[vii]    Abu Dawud, Adab, 80.
[viii]   Hujurat, 49/6.
[ix]   Isra, 17/36.
[x]  Bukhari, Adab, 62.
                                    General Directorate of Religious Affairs


"
144;2017-08-11;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 11.08.2017



THE TRUTHS WE LEARN
FROM AYAT-AL KURSI

A Blessed Friday to You, Brothers and Sisters!

There is a magnificent verse in the Holy Quran that is called Ayat al-Kursi (The Throne Verse). In this verse, our Lord introduces Himself to us in a concise manner. He gives examples from His beautiful names. Our Prophet (pbuh) recommends us to recite this verse by saying: “Those who recite Ayat al-Kursi after a prayer will stay under Allah’s protection until the next one.”  Let us listen the truths that our Lord teaches us in Ayat al-Kursi in today’s khutba.

Honorable Believers!

The first truth that our Lord teaches us in Ayat al-Kursi is  that there is no god but Allah. We are all servants of Allah. We are helpless against His might. We are all in need of his help, mercy and forgiveness. He is our only sanctuary, only support that we could open our hands and ask for mercy against many troubles of this world. Our task is to be a rightful servant to our Lord. It is to stay on the straight path, As-Sirat Al-Mustaqim, that the Quran and our Prophet (pbuh) guide us towards.

Brothers and Sisters!

Our Lord is . He is ever-living, eternal. He is the One who gives and takes life. He is the sustainer of all existence. Our task is to live our lives conscious that the world is mortal and this life is merely entrusted to us. 

 Allah is beyond the attributes of His creation. He knows and commands our every moment and every action. Our task is to never forget that our Lord is nearer to us than our jugular vein.



Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services

Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services To Him belongs whatever is in the universe. The Dominion, The Sovereignty and The Blessing are His. Wealth and poverty, abundance and scarcity all came from Him. Our task is to have a tongue that recites, a heart that thanks and a mind that contemplates under any circumstances.

Nobody could help us or harm us except with His permission. What would give us value in the sight of Allah is our good deeds and our faith, submission and loyalty towards Him. Our task is to stay true to our pact of faith with our Lord. It is to submit to His approval only our good deeds, our penitence and prayers.

Honorable Believers!

Another truth Ayat al-Kursi teaches us is , meaning nothing will be hidden from our Lord or be a secret to Him. He knows every word that comes of our mouth, each feeling in our hearts and every thought in our minds. Our task is to refrain from evil with all of our being. It is to make our hands, tongue, mind and heart a center and servant of goodness.

 Our Lord is the only source of knowledge and truth. We know only what He teaches us. We hear only what He allows us to hear. We speak only what He allows us to speak. We see only what He allows us to see. Our task is always to be on the side of what is right. It is to be the speaker of the truth. It is to remove obstacles on the way of the truth within our power. It is to be aware of those who deceives people by disguising as a good person.

 Our Lord’s might, supremacy, greatness and knowledge encompasses all. He is the One who rules over everything without any weariness. Our task is to be a servant and pray only and only for the Lord of the Worlds. It is not to worship any other. Because  Allah is the Most High, the Most Great. We recite this truth in each rakat of our prayers. We say in our rukus (bowings) and in our sujuds (prostrations) , meaning we praise our Lord by saying “How Perfect is my Lord! You are beyond any flaw.”

Honorable Brothers and Sisters! 

Come! Let us contemplate the profound meaning within Ayat al-Kursi. Let this verse that we recite every day be a verbal expression of our pact of faith with our Lord. Shielding us against evil, let this verse that we recite after prayers protect us from the malice, calamity and troubles of the wicked. May our Lord never allow us to leave the truths of Ayat al-Kursi, the principles of our Holy Book."
145;2019-04-19;"
DATE: 19.04.2019
[pic]
    LAILAT AL-BARA'AH
    Dear Muslims!
    Time is one of the greatest blessings  granted  by  the  Almighty  Allah
(swt) to His servants. Time is a field of  possibilities  and  opportunities
which surrounds a man's life story  entirely.  Therefore,  it  is  a  unique
wealth, every moment of which is precious and worthy of spending  well.  The
ones who value and do not waste their time and the ones who are  subject  to
the guidance of the Messenger of  Allah  (saw)  by  pursuing  Allah's  (swt)
consent at every stage of their lives are going  to  be  honoured  with  the
gift of the Almighty Allah (swt). Wasting time is the biggest loss  and  the
biggest frustration for a man.

    Honorable Believers!
    Regardless of any specific month, day or  hour,  every  moment  of  ours
spent with the awareness of servitude to Allah (swt) is valuable. But  there
are certain times that are bestowed as the times of  divine  grace  and  are
conduced to the acceptance of prays and the  absolution.  These  periods  of
time are signs of the infinite mercy of Allah (swt) on the people.  Here  is
the Lailat al-Bara'ah that we shall comprehend this evening, it  is  one  of
such valuable times.

    Dear Muslims!
    The sacred months of Rajab and  Shaban  prepare  us  for  the  month  of
Ramadan, both spiritually and  physically.  The  first  one,  the  month  of
Rajab, is blessed with Lailat al-Ragaib and  Lailat  al-Mi'raj.  The  middle
one, the month of Shaban, leads to forgiveness and mercy by means of  Lailat
al-Bara'ah. The Messenger of Allah (saw) gave us the glad tidings  that  the
worship, pray, and entreaty to be performed on Lailat al-Bara'ah  are  going
to conduce to our absolution by saying, ""Spend  the  fifteenth  day  of  the
month of Shaban by observing a fast. And its night in prayer. Because,  when
the sun sets at that night, Allah Ta'ala manifests Himself  at  the  nearest
heaven in a state which we cannot know of, and until the  time  of  dawn  He
says, 'Is there nobody asking for forgiveness? Forgive  I  shall!  Is  there
nobody asking for sustenance? Sustenance I shall give him! Is  there  nobody
suffering a calamity? Felicity I shall give him!...""[i]

    Honorable Believers!
    Lailat al-Bara'ah is a time to open a path towards al-Rahman (swt)  from
the deepest part of our hearts. Lailat al-Bara'ah is high  time  for  us  to
repent and seek Allah's (swt) mercy and forgiveness by turning to Him.

    The most basic requirement of benefitting from this blessed night is  to
get ourselves away  from  the  turmoil  of  life  a  bit  and  question  our
servitudes. It is to ask ourselves the questions of 'What I  am  busy  with,
which goal do I live for, and where do my  intentions  and  deeds  bring  me
to?' It is to turn to our inner world, review our past, and contemplate.  It
is to promise the Almighty Allah (swt) to be an obedient servant and a  good
person. It is to ensure redemption from the cravings  of  our  nafs  and  to
repent of our mistakes and sins. Then, tonight is  going  to  turn  into  an
opportunity in real sense for us and salvation is going to be  our  bara'ah.
Thus, the Almighty Allah (swt) states in the Holy Qur'an  by  addressing  to
the Prophet Muhammad (saw), ""When those come to  thee  who  believe  in  Our
Signs, say: ''Peace be on you; Your Lord hath  inscribed  for  Himself  (the
rule of) mercy: verily, if any of you did evil in ignorance, and  thereafter
repented,  and  amended  (His  conduct),  lo!  He  is  Oft-Forgiving,   Most
Merciful.'""[ii]

    Dear Believers!
    Let us benefit from the teaching and barakah (abundance) of  this  night
to receive the bara'ah of salvation in eternal life. Let us  pursue  Allah's
(swt) consent in each breath. Let  us  shape  our  lives  according  to  the
guidance of the Qur'an and the Sunnah. Let us remember that every moment  of
ours that we do not spend with the awareness of servitude to Allah (swt)  is
going to return to us as damage and loss.

    With this occasion, I would like to congratulate your Lailat al-Bara'ah.
May the Almighty Allah (swt) let this holy night  bring  prosperity  to  our
noble nation, to the Islam world and to all humanity.
-----------------------
[i] Ibn Majah, Iqamat, 191.
[ii] An'am 6/54.

                                   Directorate General of Religious Services

"
146;2017-12-22;"
LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE
DATE  : 22.12.2017
[pic]
                       SENSITIVITY TO HALAL AND HARAM
   Blessed Friday to You, Honorable Believers!
   Our Lord Almighty enjoins in the  verse  I  have  recited:  ""O  you  who
believe! Intoxicants (all kinds of alcoholic  drinks),  gambling,  Al-Ansab,
and Al-Azlam (arrows for seeking luck or decision)  are  an  abomination  of
Shaitan's (Satan) handiwork. So avoid (strictly all) that  (abomination)  in
order that you may be successful."" [i]

   Our Prophet (pbuh) said in the holy hadith I have read: ""What is  lawful
is evident and what is unlawful is evident, and  in  between  them  are  the
things doubtful which many people do not know.  So  he  who  guards  against
doubtful things keeps his religion and honor blameless, and he who  indulges
in doubtful things indulges in fact in unlawful things...""[ii]

   Brothers and Sisters!
   Our Lord Almighty created mankind as the most honorable of all creation.
He set some boundaries for mankind to protect his  pure  nature  and  ensure
his eternal  salvation.  We  call  these  boundaries  that  we  should  obey
throughout our lives halal and haram.

   Halal are the beautiful things that are in accordance  with  the  reason
and purpose of creation. Haram are the ugly things that harm  and  hurt  the
honor and dignity of the mankind, the respected creation of our Lord.  Halal
are  the  words,  behaviors  and  attitudes   in   accordance   with   Allah
countenance. Haram are the evil things that  would  bring  upon  our  Lord's
wrath and people's condemnation.

   Dear Believers!
   To pay regard to halal indicates our faith towards Allah, in other words
our loyalty towards the oath of servitude we gave to Him.  To  get  involved
in haram is to ignore that oath. Seeking halal is an effort  towards  living
a decent, upright, and honorable life. Indulging in haram is a  state  where
the mind and heart is clouded, where  a  person  is  a  slave  to  the  vain
desires and wants.

   The closer a person is to halal, the closer  he  is  to  peace.  Walking
towards haram ends in regret and misery.

   The result of a life wasted by losing the sensitivity to halal-haram  is
disappointment.

   Dear Brothers and Sisters!
   In our religion, nobody has the authority  to  define  halal  and  haram
according to their wishes. Every  believer  who  believes  in  the  merciful
messages of the Holy Quran and walks  on  the  noble  path  of  our  Prophet
(pbuh) must be sensitive to  halal-haram.  A  believer,  by  requirement  of
faith, is a person who loves  his  Lord,  knows  his  boundaries  and  knows
himself. He cannot lose his conscience and mercy and hurt any  creature.  He
cannot hurt the  dignity  of  himself  and  others  by  acting  insensitive,
disrespectful and unvirtuous.

   A believer cannot waste his limited breaths in this transitory world  on
unfair gains  such  as  fortune-telling,  gambling,  luck  games,  interest,
bribe, usury, and theft. He cannot poison the body Allah  entrusted  to  him
with alcohol and drugs. He cannot harm his health with non-halal  foods  and
drinks.

   A believer is such a person that he cannot  touch  the  property  of  an
orphan. He cannot be unjust towards the rights  of  another  person  or  the
public. He cannot treat his wife and children, his  parents,  neighbors  and
relatives badly. He cannot stain his tongue with bad  words,  slander,  lies
and perjury. He can never betray someone's trust and break his  promise.  He
cannot pursue sedition and malice and spread corruption on earth.

   Esteemed Brothers and Sisters!
   As believers, let us look at our  attitude  towards  the  boundaries  of
halal and haram. Let each of us ask ourselves these questions: Do we live  a
life within the scope of halal-haram sensitivity? Or are we in  a  situation
where our perception is paralyzed? Do we put our  happiness  in  this  world
and hereafter in danger by not caring about sins and not avoiding haram?  Or
are we able to leave  our  faults  back  never  to  return  with  a  sincere
repentance?

   Dear Brothers and Sisters!
   Let us not forget, what is fitting for a believer is to be aware against
halal and haram. People could make  mistakes.  But  the  most  sagacious  of
those who make mistakes are the ones who turn back  from  these  faults  and
repent.

   I want to conclude this khutba with this prayer of our  Prophet  (pbuh):
""O Allah! Set me apart from my sins as the East and West are set apart  from
each other and clean me from sins as a white garment is  cleaned  of  dirt!""
[iii]

-----------------------
[i] Al-Maidah, 5/90.
[ii] Al-Bukhari, Book of Faith, 39; Sahih Muslim, The Book of Musaqa, 107.
[iii] Al-Bukhari, Book of Call to Prayers, 89.

                                Written by: General Directorate of Religious
                                                                    Services


"
147;2019-06-04;"
DATE: 04.06.2019
[pic]
    EID AL-FITR
    Honorable Muslims!
    We are grateful to reach once again the month of Ramadan whose beginning
is mercy, middle is  forgiveness,  and  end  is  salvation  from  the  hell.
Although we are sad that this blessed month has ended, we are also happy  to
have this morning of eid, with the  feelings  of  fidelity  and  brotherhood
spread all over the nation in waves. May endless praise  and  thanks  be  to
the Almighty Allah (swt) who has let us reach the eid. May salat  and  salam
be upon our Prophet Muhammad Mustafa (saw) who describes the  days  of  eids
as the days of joy, happiness and remembrance of Allah (swt).  Eid  Mubarak!
I wish you all a happy eid!

    Dear Believers!
    We endeavored to seek the consent of Allah (swt)  day  and  night,  with
fasting, tarawih and so on throughout the month  of  Ramadan.  We  tried  to
worship more, increase our acts of benevolence, increase  our  patience  and
repentance, and nourish ourselves with the Qur'an, and be  embellished  with
taqwa (piety). While  practicing  the  Sunnah  of  our  Prophet  (saw)  with
muqabala, we shared our food with our loved ones and the people in  need  at
iftar tables. We prayed that our zakat and sadaqah save us from  the  hunger
for wealth and property, and from the greed of the world. While we felt  the
joy of being ummah in our mosques where takbirs and salawats were heard,  we
also refreshed our awareness of servitude to Allah  (swt)  with  itikaf.  We
reviewed the past years, repented for our  mistakes  and  sins,  and  sought
refuge in the forgiveness of al-Rahman. Alhamdulillah, in the end of such  a
bountiful and blessed month, we have reached the morning of the eid.

    Honorable Muslims!
    Eid is a bestowal of Allah the Exalted (swt) to His servants who  fasted
in the month of Ramadan. Today is the time to come close to each  other,  to
open the doors of our hearts and homes, and to share  our  happiness.  Today
is the time to bring the hope, gratitude, and joy of being  a  believer  who
rejoined with the eid to all the places we go.

    Then, let us experience this joy with our parents, who  deserve  respect
and kindness most, with our wives who are our faithful  companions  and  the
witnesses of our bad and good days,  and  with  our  children  who  are  the
little sources of joy and hope in our houses. Let us  visit  family  elders,
relatives, neighbors, and friends.

    Let us ask each patient around us of their condition, and make each  old
person around us happy. Let us add meaning to our eid with the smile of  the
orphans, and people in need and lonely.

    In the morning of this eid, let us  end  the  resentments  and  offenses
between us as brothers and sisters with whom we  turn  to  the  same  qiblah
shoulder to shoulder. Let us strengthen the bonds  of  affection  and  trust
between us by obeying the divine command of [pic]  ""The  believers  are  but
brothers.""[i]

    Let us remember our relatives who passed away and our  glorious  martyrs
who sacrificed their lives for our blessed homeland. Let us raise our  hands
and beg to Allah (swt) for our Muslim brothers and sisters in  trouble,  and
pray that Allah (swt) let them experience the eids to which they  will  also
reach in peace, tranquility, and security.

    Dear Muslims!
    We are bidding farewell to another month of Ramadan. We  know  that  our
duty of servitude to Allah (swt) is not limited  to  the  month  of  Ramadan
only. The mosques must be filled with people not only at  tarawih  but  also
five times a day; the tables of the people in need must be filled with  food
not only at iftar but also all the time; and the  vitality  of  fasting  and
the generosity of sadaqah should  be  spread  over  the  year.  Indeed,  the
Almighty Allah (swt) invites us to spend every moment of our lives with  the
consciousness of servitude by stating in the Holy  Qur'an,  ""And  serve  thy
Lord until there come unto thee the hour that is certain.""[ii]

    In accordance with this command of Allah (swt) and by responding to this
divine invitation, let us continue the good traits we  have  gained  in  the
month of Ramadan throughout our lives. Although the  month  of  Ramadan  has
come to an end, may the barakah  and  sincerity  of  the  month  of  Ramadan
always be in our lives.
    With these thoughts and feelings, I would like to wish a  happy  eid  to
the entire Muslim world, primarily our nation. May Allah the Almighty  (swt)
let this eid bring goodness to humanity.

    I would like to conclude my khutbah with this hadith of Prophet Muhammad
(saw): ""O people! Spread salaam amongst you, share foods  with  each  other,
observe your kinship relations and establish prayer while  people  sleep  so
that you can enter heaven safely.""[iii]
-----------------------
[i] Hujurat, 49/10.
[ii] Hijr, 15/99.
[iii] Tirmidhi, Sifat al-Qiyamah, 42.


                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
148;2018-06-08;"DATE : 8.06.2018



ENJOY, WASTE NOT

Jum’uah Mubarak Esteemed Believers!

One day, our Beloved Prophet (s.a.w.) dropped by his dear relative, Sa’d ibn Abi Waqqas. Sa’d was performing ablution at that moment. He must, apparently, have used much water, so our Prophet said, “What is this extravagance?” Then Sa’d asked “Can there be any extravagance in ablution?” and our Beloved Prophet (s.a.w.) replied, “Yes, even if you are on the bank of a flowing river.” 

Honorable Believers!

Our Beloved Prophet (s.a.w.) knew the value of blessings Allah granted us, and he reminded his companions of them at each occasion. He taught us using what we have in moderation, whether we are in opulence or deprivation, and made us refrain from extravagance. For extravagance is to use lavishly any blessing and opportunity, from food and beverage to clothing, time, and health, and to lose balance and moderation. It is to spoil oneself, their surrounding and the universe. Extravagance is to digress from our conscience of existence and purpose of creation. It is also to disrespect Allah Almighty’s attribution of Razzaq – the Sustainer. 

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

One of the greatest calamities pervading the earth today is extravagance. It is a vital mistake to waste away and spend unnecessarily while there are millions of people are in the grip of hunger, poverty, and misery. While the oppressed people struggle even in want of basic necessities like bread and water, it is inequitable to waste even small portions of food.

Dear Brothers and Sisters!

Extravagance does not only pertain to one’s goods and possessions. The greatest extravagance for human beings is to forget why they were created and for what purpose they should spend their life. It is failure to bring together the blessing of reason with faith and wisdom. It is to waste one’s body, strength, and willpower for futile pursuits instead of goodness and truth. It is to use their knowledge and experience for the destruction of humanity, rather than to the benefit of them. 

	Brothers and Sisters!

	Today, a mentality which promotes more earning and more consuming claiming that the more earning and spending, the more valuable people will be, is being more popular. A lifestyle with blazonry and pomposity, spending on luxury and vanity is brought forward. Thus, humanity is consuming its spiritual values and purpose of living by dedicating their lives on consuming rather than producing.

Whereas our book of life, the Qur’an, highlights that humans come into this world with the purpose of construction and correction, and that they need to maintain moderation, thrift, and balance for both worldly life and the afterlife. When defining believers, Our Lord Almighty enjoins, “And [they are] those who, when they spend, do so not excessively or sparingly but are ever, between that, [justly] moderate.” Our Prophet (s.a.w) also expressed that we should acquire an ethics of consumption as such, “Eat, drink, clothe and give alms without arrogance and extravagance.” 

Esteemed Muslims!

Let us know the value of all blessings Our Almighty Lord bestowed upon us. Let us not waste any blessing extravagantly. Let us not waste our time. Let us avoid what is more than needed in the way we eat, drink, dress and spend. Let us protect our natural resources and our natural assets. Let us remember that we will be kept liable for each blessing granted to us. Let us shield ourselves with the morality of sharing and helping, without getting spoilt on blessings, and spending lavishly and irresponsibly. Let us observe the balance Our Lord has set for life and the universe. Let us remember that when breached, this balance will cost us the abundance in our life, and peace in society, and damage ourselves and the generations to come. Let us not forget that blessings are limited while our wishes and desires are unlimited. 

Brothers and Sisters!

The night of Sunday into Monday, inshaallah, we will observe the Laylat al-Qadr, the night when our Holy Book, the Qur’an started to be revealed. Let us treasure this night, which is better than one thousand months. Let us review our lives, repenting on our sins, and question ourselves again. With this occasion, I celebrate your Night of Qadr now, and I pray to Allah Almighty that it bring much goodness for our country, our nation and the entire Islamic world."
149;2019-08-16;"DATE: 16.08.2019



PREPAREDNESS AGAINST DISASTERS FOR A SAFE AND SECURE LIFE

Honorable Muslims!

In the verse I have just recited the Almighty Allah (swt) states, “Corruption has appeared throughout the land and sea by [reason of] what the hands of people have earned so He may let them taste part of [the consequence of] what they have done that perhaps they will return [to righteousness].”

In the hadith I have just read the Prophet Muhammad (saw) says, ""Even if it were the prick he receives from a thorn, but that Allah expiates some of his sins for that.""

Dear Believers!

We have come from Allah (swt) and to Him we will return. We are conscious of the fact that Allah (swt) puts all of us to a variety of tests in this world. We wholeheartedly believe that the life in this world is temporary and that in the Hereafter is eternal. We display gratitude to Allah (swt) for the blessings, and patience and resoluteness for the troubles. In Him we trust and on Him we rely. However, we as human beings still keep trying to fulfil our responsibilities against natural disasters.

Honorable Muslims!

Allah (swt) has created the entire nature as a whole, from the largest galaxies to the tiniest little ants, and oversees everything at all times. On His ruling and laws depend the hilarious harmony and balance of the nature. 

Sometimes it is not only the nature that is upset by some disasters, but also the lives of people, in a bitter way. Throughout the history disasters such as earthquakes, floods, landslides, and fires have resulted in many losses of life and property.  The pain caused by the earthquakes and floods in the near past of our country is still fresh in our hearts.





Dear Believers!

Allah (swt) commands people, “And cause not corruption upon the earth after its reformation.” By people who irresponsibly waste the nature, cut the trees in forests for personal benefits, pollute the air and water, desertify the earth is disturbed the balance on Earth. The majority of the bitter results of disasters are due mostly to our own mistakes and neglects. In this regard states the Almighty Allah (swt), “And whatever strikes you of disaster - it is for what your hands have earned; but He pardons much.”

Dear Muslims!

Muslims have absolute faith that what Allah (swt) has preordained will eventually take place. They are aware, however, that the natural phenomena take place in accordance with the divine order and laws on a cause and effect basis. They do not simply rely on the fact that ""What Allah (swt) wills happens."" by ignoring the importance of exerting efforts and seeking opportunities for desired results. They watch their steps in terms of harmfulness to the nature and avoid acts that invite disasters. They show due diligence in their works, and take necessary measures. Only after deploying material and non-material means and fulfilling their responsibilities do they wait for Allah's (swt) decision. As the Prophet Muhammad (saw) expresses, “They first tie their camels and then place their trust in Allah.”

Dear Believers!

Let us take necessary measures for a secure life. Let us be conscious of and prepared for disasters. Let us take into consideration the location for constructing residential places in terms of risk of earthquake, landslides, and floods. Let us inform our family members on disasters and emergencies. Let us apply to provincial directorates of the Disasters and Emergency Management Presidency of Turkey, for first aid training, information and support.

May Allah's (swt) mercy be upon our fellow citizens who have lost their lives in disasters occurring in our country, and particularly upon those who have lost their lives in the 1999 Marmara Earthquake, the 20th anniversary of which we will commemorate tomorrow. May the Almighty Allah (swt) protect us, our nation, and Muslim world against all kinds of disasters. May He also allow us to take necessary lessons from the past disasters, to fulfill our responsibilities, and lead a peaceful and secure life."
150;2018-02-09;"LOCATION	: NATIONWIDE

	DATE	: 09.02.2018



WASTAGE IS A RELIGIOUS

 AND MORAL FAILURE

Jumu’ah Mubarak, Honorable Believers!

It was one of the days of heat and famine in Madinah. Our Prophet (s.a.w.) went to visit one of his Companions with Abu Bakr and Omar. The Companion was extremely happy about the visit of these valuable guests since the honor of having the Messenger of Allah (s.a.w.) as a guest was an opportunity of mercy and blessing for him. His guests sat under a tree and he offered ripe dates and cool water to them, the most beautiful blessings he then had in his home. The Messenger of Mercy gave thanks to Allah after eating the date and drinking the water, and said: “By the One in Whose Hand is my soul! This is among the favors which you shall be asked about on the Day of Judgement. Cool shade, tasty ripe dates, and cool water.” 

Honorable Believers!

Our Prophet (s.a.w.) remembered and reminded us that we are going to give account for the blessings even at times of scarcity. He taught about knowing the value of every blessing and abstaining from being wasteful both in wealth and in poverty. Because wasting is forbidden in our religion. Wasting is a lack of respect towards Allah Almighty’s name, Ar-Razzaq (The Total Provider). Therefore, our Lord enjoins in the Holy Qur’an when He tells us about Muslims: “(They are) those who, when they spend, are not extravagant and not niggardly, but hold a just balance between those extremes.” Our Prophet explained that there is morality in consumption as: “Eat, clothe yourselves and give charity without being arrogant and extravagant.” 

Esteemed Brothers and Sisters!

Wastage is to use the blessings and means we have extravagantly, to squander them away, to spend them like they will not run out. Wastage is ingratitude towards the blessings Allah Almighty granted to us and it is such a comprehensive concept that it should not be confined to our dinner tables only.

For example, the inability to combine the blessing of intellect with the blessing of wisdom and faith is the greatest waste for a human. To squander away this very short life of ours with futile activities that do not benefit us in this world and in the Hereafter is the waste of time. To put our body and mind in danger with bad habits is the waste of health. And not to use our knowledge and experience for the good of humanity is the waste of knowledge.

To ungraciously pollute the soil from which we are created and fed, the water that is our source of life, and the air that we need in each breath, is the waste of nature.

To turn the earth, which is entrusted to us, into a prisoner of badness, instead of leaving the future generations a prosperous and livable environment, is the waste of the universe we live in.

Esteemed Muslims!

I regret to say that we live in a world of waste today. Extravagance has surrounded almost every moment of our lives. Humanity is encouraged to earn and consume more and more. In a world where spending is presented as the meaning of life, our understanding of consumption is also quickly deteriorating. While a piece of bread can feed us for a day, about 5 million bread are wasted in our country every day. The annual waste of 18 million tons of fruits and vegetables create massive piles of garbage. As a result of all these, we not only waste 214 billion Liras per year, but also our efforts, our wealth, and more importantly our future.

Yet nearly ten million people die each year from the lack of a piece of bread or even a drop of water. In this case, as the hope of the needy, the downtrodden, and the poor; we have a great responsibility in the fight against wastage. We all need to support the campaign of fighting against wastage started in our country.

Brothers and Sisters!

Let us not forget that every blessing which Allah has given to us is both a test and a trust. Let us pay attention to ensure these blessings allow us to reach happiness in this world and in the Hereafter. Let us be conscientious, balanced and consistent in every action of ours. Let us abstain from luxury and excess in our eating habits, in our clothing, and in our expenses. Let us not forget that extravagancy drives us into failure and draw us away from the consent of Allah each passing day.

Esteemed Brothers and Sisters!

Let me conclude this khutbah with this supplication that our Prophet (s.a.w.) taught us: “O Allah, forgive us our faults, our ignorance, our immoderation in our concerns. And Thou art better aware (of our affairs) than ourselves. O Allah, grant us forgiveness (of the faults which we committed) seriously or otherwise and which we committed inadvertently and deliberately.”"
151;2019-03-08;"
DATE: 08.03.2019
[pic]
    GOODNESS INCREASES WHEN SHARED
    Dear Muslims!
    Nine years had passed since  the Prophet Muhammad's  (saw)  Hijrah  to
Madinah. Islam was spreading in waves, and the souls thirsty  of  faith  was
flowing toward Madinah. Among those souls heading to  Madinah  al-Munawwarah
to enter into Islam was a man named Vabisa. Having recited the  Kalimah  al-
Shahadah and got the honor of  becoming  a  Muslim,  he  asked  the  Prophet
Muhammad (saw) about what the good and the evil meant. The Prophet  Muhammad
(saw) held his three fingers together, tapped on Vabisa's chest,  and  said,
""Goodness is the thing that brings your heart to  peace  and  what  you  are
comfortable with. Evil is the thing that makes you  feel  uneasy,  doubtful,
suspicious, and anxious even if people gave you a fatwa.""[i]

    Honorable Believers!
    Goodness means to have faith in Allah, in the Last Day, in  the  angels,
in the divine books, and in the prophets, as expressed by the  Holy  Qur'an,
which is the guide  of  our  lives.  It  means  to  ensure  one's  faith  is
accompanied by good deeds. It means to spend  from  one's  loved  properties
for the close ones, for the orphan, for the poor, for those  who  were  lost
in a journey, and, in short, for all those in  need.  It  means  to  perform
prayer, to pay alms, and to keep a given promise. It means to show  patience
in straitened circumstances, in illness, and in wartime, and to be  thankful
to Allah in wealth and health.[ii]

    Honorable Muslims!
    Goodness is one's most profitable gain and the most valuable inheritance
in life. It means to give an ear to the voice of a  compassionate  soul,  to
be a brother for the orphan, the source of happiness for the poor,  and  the
helpers for the refugees and the immigrants. It means to give  a  hand,  and
open one's house and heart for  the  oppressed.  It  means  to  protect  the
environment and not even hurt an ant. It means to treat compassionately  all
created beings for the sake of the Creator. It means to  share  one's  food,
pray, love, and sorrow.

    Dear Muslims!
    Nothing can and should surpass the approval of Allah (swt) in value  for
Muslims. They pursue  goodness  and  good  deeds  without  expecting  to  be
appreciated by other people, and falling for  arrogance,  boastfulness,  and
pretentiousness. They seek out opportunities to be  a  source  of  goodness,
motivated by the feelings of mercy and  compassion  as  blessings  by  Allah
(swt). To earn the approval of Allah (swt), they  spend  all  the  blessings
entrusted to them by Him again in His cause.

    They are aware that they can be considered good  only  when  they  spend
what they love most in Allah's cause. They fight against  evil  by  inviting
to good and by increasing goodness. They take the following  commandment  of
Allah as their mantra for life, ""And not equal are the  good  deed  and  the
bad. Repel [evil] by that [deed] which is  better;  and  thereupon  the  one
whom between you and him is enmity [will become] as though he was a  devoted
friend.""[iii]

    Honorable Believers!
    It is deeply saddening that evil is all over the world today  and  those
investing in it cause great sufferings for humanity. Muslims are exposed  to
oppression, pressure, and violence in the oppressed corners of  the  Islamic
geography. Particularly, women and children who are  squirming  in  despair,
imprisoned, forced to migrate are breaking our hearts despite the fact  that
women are our mothers who teach us the unrequited  good  by  stretching  the
wings of compassion  upon  us.  They  are  our  spouses  who  work  for  the
proliferation of goodness in our homes, for the happiness and peace to  take
root. They are our daughters as the light of our eyes and  our  prayers  for
goodness in both worlds. To hurt them, to condemn them to a world devoid  of
compassion and justice, to make them victims and oppressed are both a  grave
sin.

    Dear Believers!
    Every good deed done, even if small, is precious. One can do  many  good
deeds with one's hand, tongue, asset, knowledge,  and  experience.  Even  if
small as the size of a date palm, the Almighty Allah  (swt)makes  it  larger
as Mount Uhud, as long as humans favor the good and take  the  side  of  the
good, endeavor to let the good prevail the world  by  standing  against  the
evil, wars, poverty, and violence. In this respect, the Messenger  of  Allah
(saw) says, ""He who amongst you sees something abominable should  modify  it
with the help of his hand; and if he has not strength enough to do it,  then
he should do it with his tongue, and if he has not  strength  enough  to  do
it, (even) then he should (abhor it) from his heart, and that is  the  least
of faith.""[iv]

    Honorable Muslims!
    Let us follow in the footsteps of the good, the betterment, the justice,
and the compassion. Let us stand against  the  evil,  the  depravement,  the
oppression, the sedition, and the violence. It is the good that will  change
the world and save the future. Let us not forget that Allah (swt), the Lord
of the Worlds, will certainly support those who endeavor to spread the  good
in the world, and will never leave them alone, nor unaided.
-----------------------
[i] Darimi, Buyu, 2.
[ii] Baqarah, 2/177.
[iii] Fussilat, 41/34.
[iv] Muslim, Îman, 78.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
152;2019-04-12;"
DATE: 12.04.2019
                                    [pic]
                    IMAN AND ITS REFLECTIONS ON OUR LIVES
    Dear Muslims!
    Iman means to believe in heart in the existence  and  oneness  of  Allah
(swt), His angels, divine books, prophets, the Last Day, and that  qada  and
qadar are controlled by Him. It  means  to  acknowledge  through  heart  and
testify through tongue all the verities conveyed to people  by  the  Prophet
Muhammad (saw).

    Honorable Believers!
    In the case of the Prophet Adam (as), iman means not losing  one's  hope
and not giving up on the struggle to deserve the Heaven despite failure.  It
means the spirit to stand up on one's feet again to make it to  the  end  of
the road despite toppling down along the  way.  It  means  constructing  the
ship of survival and salvation in the case of the Prophet Nuh (as).   For  a
Muslim who gets on the board of the ship of iman, just by  having  faith  in
their Lord, will reach the eternal salvation after dropping  anchor  by  the
port of peace.

    Iman is the remedy in the Prophet Ayyub's (as) house of suffering. It is
the justice manifested at the Prophet  Dawud's  (as)  tribunal.  It  is  the
knowledge and wisdom in the Prophet Sulayman's (as) realm. A person  who  is
put on a trial through dire straits sometimes and wealthiness  other  times,
should not forget that they  have  the  capability  to  pass  through  those
trials. For Allah (swt) holds a person responsible only to the  extent  they
can afford. He certainly provides a way out when there appears to be no  way
out.

    Honorable                                                     Believers!




    Iman is manifested in the morals and manners of the Prophet Yusuf  (as),
and in the patience and prayers of the  Prophet  Yaqub  (as).  Iman  is  the
source of the submission  exhibited  by  the  Prophet  Ismail  (as)  through
agreeing to his life being sacrificed by his  father,  and  by  the  Prophet
Ibrahim (as) through agreeing to sacrificing the life of  his  beloved  son.
It is a great uncompromisable and indispensible cause like in  the  case  of
the Prophet Muhammad Mustafa (saw), in whose right hand the Sun  is  offered
and the Moon in his left hand.

    Dear Muslims!
    Iman is not a set of words, or emotions that cannot be manifested in the
course of life. It is a unique power, springing up in  heart  and  spreading
all over the body, and being exhibited in the actions.  There  is  a  strong
tie between iman and all the aspects of life. In this respect,  the  Prophet
Muhammad (saw) referred to  this  fact  when  he  said,  ""Iman  has  seventy
something branches. ""The most virtuous of them is 'La ilaha illallah  (there
is none worthy of worship except Allah)' and the least of which is  removing
something harmful from the road.[pic] And modesty (al-haya') is a branch  of
faith.""[i]

    Dear Believers!
    Iman is reflected on the essence of a person. It adds meaning  to  life.
It draws a direction to follow. It helps to establish  good  relations  with
oneself, their family, society, and all the world of existence. It  instills
the consciousness  to  live  a  life  in  accordance  with  the  purpose  of
creation.

    It is manifested in one's words and actions. Mu'min (believer) is a good-
mannered person from whose tongue and hand people are safe. They  speak  the
truth when they talk. They have good intentions,  are  humble,  honest,  and
merciful. They know that only that way they can  get  to  and  keep  on  the
right path.

    Iman is reflected on the face of a Muslim. A mu'min who  is  aware  that
exchanging a smile with people is regarded as sadaqa  looks  through  loving
and compassionate eyes. It refers to barakah (abundance) when manifested  in
one's livelihood, happiness in one's home, and salvation in the entirety  of
life.

    Dear Muslims!
    Having iman in heart truly and living a life in fulfillment of what iman
requires one to do is the only way  of  becoming  a  Muslim  and  of  having
rewards in the Hereafter. Then, let us embellish our iman  with  good  deeds
and good morals, which will turn the world into a peaceful  place,  and  the
Hereafter into paradise. Let us endeavor to live  up  to  and  keep  up  the
values we believe.

    I would like to conclude this khutbah with the  following  statement  of
Allah the Almighty (swt) in which He gives glad tidings to people  who  have
iman and live up to the requirements of  it,  ""Whoever  does  righteousness,
whether male or female, while he is a believer - We will  surely  cause  him
to live a good life, and We will surely  give  them  their  reward  [in  the
Hereafter] according to the best of what they used to do.""[ii]
-----------------------
[i] (Nasa'i, Iman, 16)
[ii] Nahl, 16/97.
                                   General Directorate of Religious Services



"
153;2017-09-01;"
LOCATION    : NATIONWIDE
DATE  : 01.09.2017
[pic]
   THE MANIFESTATION OF FAITH AND ISLAM: REFRAINING FROM FRIVOLOUS THINGS
    Honorable Brothers and Sisters! A Blessed Friday and Eid to you all.
    Praise be to our Lord Almighty who granted us Muslims the  joy  of  this
Eid and let us reach this holy Eid, this Friday. Salutations  and  peace  be
to our Prophet who taught us the faith, Islam, prayers  and  morals,  thanks
and praise.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    Our Lord Almighty says in the verse I have recited: ""And when they  hear
vain talk, they turn away therefrom and say: Unto us shall be accounted  our
deeds, and unto you, your deeds. Peace be to you - (but)  we  seek  not  the
ignorant."" [i]

    Our Prophet (pbuh) says in the hadith I have recited:  ""Surely,  of  the
excellence of a person's Islam is that  he  leaves  what  does  not  concern
him."" [ii]

    Brothers and Sisters!
    Today is a great day where we observe two feasts at once. Today  is  the
day of joy which our Lord gifted us to allow us to unite and socialize,  and
to let our brothers feel our compassion towards them. Today is  a  bountiful
and blessed day  where  talbiyahs  are  mixed  with  takbeers,  prayers  and
invocations.

    Honorable Believers!
    Eids are not just days of joy, merriness and  vacation.  Eids  are  also
days that give meaning to a believer's life and get him closer to  his  Lord
and his  brothers.  These  are  the  days  where  peace  and  happiness  are
multiplied  among  Muslims  through  sharing  and  sadness  and  sorrow  are
decreased through helping each other. We, as Muslims, are going  to  observe
this Eid with this mindset. We will try to live each  moment  of  our  lives
and this Eid with words and behaviors that our Lord would  approve.  Because
a believer is a person who refrains  from  words,  attitudes  and  behaviors
that are of no help to himself, his kith and kin or humanity.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    To believe is to take responsibility. In this sense, each blessing  that
is given to us demands a praise. Each opportunity  that  is  granted  to  us
brings  a  responsibility  with   it.   Utilizing   and   protecting   these
opportunities and resources in the way of our  Lord's  countenance  and  for
the good of humanity is the most important responsibility that we have.

    In this context, our tongue should not turn to lies but  to  truth.  Our
words should not articulate falsehood but truth. Our eyes  should  not  seek
sedition and malice, but amelioration and peace.  Our  hands  should  always
reach for the good, not the bad. Our minds  should  give  off  goodness  and
beauty around us, not evilness and ugliness. Our hearts  should  not  spread
hatred and grudge but love and affection.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    The Messenger of Allah (pbuh) said: ""The feet of the son of  Adam  shall
not move from before his Lord on the Day of Judgement,  until  he  is  asked
about five things: about his life and what he did with it, about  his  youth
and what he wore it out in, about his wealth and how he earned it and  spent
it upon, and what he did with what he knew."" [iii]

    Venerable Muslims!
    As one can understand from this hadith, we are all heading towards a day
of judgement with speed. Our only capital in this journey is  our  life,  so
precious that we couldn't afford to  waste  a  second  of  it.  Our  biggest
strength in this journey is our faith and submission to Allah. Our  earnings
are our good deeds and actions. To waste all of this, to spend them  all  in
vain would be our biggest loss and defeat.

    Our task in this journey of life is to  refrain  from  frivolous  words,
attitudes and behaviors. Because frivolous  words  and  behaviors  keep  our
minds needlessly busy, damage our reputation and character, and  over  time,
make us their prisoners. Occupations that do not help us in this  world  and
hereafter will not bring us  goodness,  blessings  and  kindness.  Just  the
opposite, it will kill our time and consume our life.

    Brothers and Sisters!
    Nowadays, some frivolous and time  consuming  tv  shows,  web-sites  and
games have nearly created an industry of uselessness. Such occupations  that
add no benefit to this  world  and  hereafter  drives  a  person  away  from
himself, his environment and his Lord. They alienate him  to  his  brothers.
But a Muslim only feels the blessing of time  when  he  turns  towards  good
deeds that are useful for both realms. A Muslim will  become  honorable  and
be respected to the extent that he displays words, attitudes  and  behaviors
worthy of his humanity.

    Honorable Brothers and Sisters!
    I want to conclude the khutba with this prayer that our  Prophet  (pbuh)
taught us: ""O Allah! I seek refuge in You from the evil of my  hearing;  the
evil of my sight; the evil of my tongue; and from  the  evil  of  my  heart""
[iv] O Lord! Protect us from all these!

-----------------------
[i] Al-Qasas, 28/55.
[ii] At-Tirmidhi, Chapters on Zuhd, 11.
[iii] At-Tirmidhi, Chapters on the description of the Day of Judgement, Ar-
Riqaq, and Al-Wara', 1.
[iv] Sahih al-Jami No. 1303.

                       Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services


"
154;2017-02-03;"
  LOCATION        : NATIONWIDE
  DATE : 03.02.2017
[pic]
    MARRIAGE AS A PACT, AGREEMENT, AND OATH
    Honorable Believers!
    In the verse I have recited, the Almighty Lord enjoins: ""O mankind, fear
your Lord, who created you from one soul and created from it  its  mate  and
dispersed from both of them many men and  women.  And  fear  Allah,  through
whom you ask one another, and the wombs  that  bore  you.  Indeed  Allah  is
ever, over you, an Observer.""[i]
    In the hadith I have read, our Prophet (pbuh) says: ""The most mature  of
believers are those best in character. And the best of  you  are  those  who
treat their wives in the best way.""[ii]
    Brothers and Sisters!
    The Almighty enjoins ?????????? ???????? ????????? ???????? in Surah an-
Nisa. He called the pledge that couples  take  when  starting  a  family  in
marriage an ""oath."" The oath is such a significant,  major  thing  that  our
Lord also called our vow of servitude to Him an ""oath."" He also  called  the
commitment prophets gave him  in  calling  people  to  the  right  path  and
guiding them an ""oath.""
    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    Marriage is not just a formal ritual that brings two bodies together. It
is the promise couples make to one another to share a  lifetime  with  Allah
Almighty as their witness. It is a pact, it is an agreement, and  it  is  an
oath. For it is a pact and a treaty, i.e. a contract, it brings us  a  moral
responsibility.  For  it  is  an   agreement,   it   brings   us   a   legal
responsibility. For it is  an  oath,  it  reminds  couples  that  they  have
promised not only each other but also Allah, and they are under liability.
    Brothers and Sisters!
    The basis of family, which is founded upon  the  oath  in  marriage,  is
loyalty. Being  a  family  necessitates  couples  to  remain  loyal  to  one
another, in good times,  in  bad  times,  in  wealth,  and  in  poverty.  It
requires them to look after one another's rights.
    In the basis of family lies the awareness of having been entrusted  your
significant other by Allah. When  they  take  the  oath  in  marriage,  they
actually make a commitment to Allah that they will  protect  what  they  are
entrusted with. They declare that they will not hurt their couples  who  are
just as precious as them, they will not degrade  them,  and  they  will  not
breach Allah's trust.
    As stated in the verse ???????? ??????????  ?????????  ???????????  love
and grace lie at the core of family. Because  a  family  adorned  with  such
characteristics will be surrounded by Allah's favor. It turns into  paradise
for its members.
    Brothers and Sisters!
    It must be regretfully stated that many families that should  be  turned
into paradise with loyalty and love can be senselessly  transformed  into  a
realm of torment. Some spouses may over time lose the virtue of  abiding  by
their oath which is a grave thing to do. Some may over time get deprived  of
the awareness to protect what they have been entrusted with.  Families  that
have been founded with oaths and pacts may be swirled into the whirlpool  of
infidelity, lovelessness, and mercilessness. However, the  believer  is  the
one who adopts  love,  compassion,  and  mercy  into  their  character.  The
believer is the one who, in the words of  our  Holy  Book  ???????????  ????
???????????????? ???????????? ????????? , they never  break  their  vows  or
breach the trust of Allah.[iii]
    Dear Brothers and Sisters!
    It is a fact that the family institution faces multiple  dangers  today.
Especially the violation of family privacy and the  practical  encouragement
of partners living together without being married in some media  have  major
damage in our understanding and life of family. Also, the  exploitation  and
disregard of family values in certain programs  airing  under  the  name  of
matchmaking  disgraces  the  family  institution.  Moreover,  there   is   a
considerable  amount  of  murders  committed,  lives  falling  apart,  homes
breaking, hopes fading because of betrayal, infidelity, and violence.
    The most saddening  thing  is  that  innocent  children  and  women  are
affected the most as victims from  these  incidents.  For  example,  602,982
couples married in 2015 in our country while 131,830 divorced. As  a  result
of the divorces, 109,978 children  have  been  deprived  of  their  mothers'
compassion and their fathers' mercy.
      Brothers and Sisters!
      These are scary numbers for the followers of a religion that considers
loyalty and love as the fundamental principles of a family. Then  come!  Let
us protect our families, the great blessing  of  our  Lord,  which  are  our
source of peace and love. Let us protect what's been entrusted  to  us.  Let
us make our spouses  and  children  the  light  of  our  eyes.  And  let  us
supplicate to our Lord on this holy time of Friday with the prayer  we  said
when we started our families:
      O Allah! Give our families love,  respect,  loyalty,  well-being,  and
abundance! Unite our  families  with  ties  of  familiarity,  fondness,  and
faithfulness. Protect  our  homes  from  hatred,  discord,  infidelity,  and
division. Grant us the peace and happiness of  Prophet  Adam  and  Eve,  our
Prophet (pbuh) and our mother Khadija, Caliph Ali and mother Fatima!
-----------------------
[i] An-Nisa, 4/1.
[ii] Tirmidhi, Radâ', 11.
[iii] Al-Mu'minun, 23/8.
            Written by: General Directorate of Religious Services

"
155;2019-08-23;"
DATE: 23.08.2019
[pic]
    SOCIAL HARMS OF INTEREST
    Dear Muslims!
    It was tenth year of hijrah and  the  last  year  of  prophecy.  Prophet
Muhammad (saw) set off from Medina and arrived Arafat  with  his  companions
in order to perform hajj obligation. There,  he  recited  his  khutbah  that
will be known as ''The Last Sermon'' after years.  He  gave  recommendations
that will enlighten the road of humanity.  He warned his ummah against  some
harams and deviations. One of the issues which was  irreversibly  prohibited
by the Messenger  of  Allah  (saw)  in  the  Last  Sermon  by  saying,  ""All
practices of the days of ignorance are now under my feet,"" was interest. By
declaring that he trampled on all kind of interest, Prophet  Muhammad  (saw)
addressed to the believers as follows, ""All dues  of  interest  shall  stand
cancelled.""[i]

    Honorable Believers!
    Interest means taking the money lent to  someone  back  at  the  end  of
certain period and by adding some  money  to  the  initial  capital.  It  is
illegal, unreturned, and unmerited extra money that is  paid  by  debtor  to
creditor compulsorily. It means having an unearned gain without  turning  an
honest penny and exerting efforts. It means turning the  trouble  of  people
who are in need into opportunity.

    Dear Muslims!
    Islam declares all kinds of interest as haram definitely.  It  considers
the operations with interest as one  of  the  greatest  sins.  However,  the
Almighty Allah  (swt)  warns  believers  in  the  verse  I  recited  in  the
beginning of my khutbah as follows, ""O ye who  believe!  Devour  not  usury,
doubled and multiplied; but fear Allah that ye may (really) prosper.""[ii]

    Honorable Believers!
    All commands and prohibitions of Allah is for the good of His  servants.
They are for their peace in the world and the happiness  in  the  Hereafter.
Prohibition of  interest  in  Islam  has  many  wisdoms  in  terms  of  both
individual and society.

    Interest decreases the baraqah of not only the  property  but  also  the
life. Interest cause many bankruptcies suicides,  dissolution  of  families,
and wasted lives. Low-incomers and the poor are degraded  in  the  societies
in which interest is common. The gap between the  rich  and  the  poor  goes
deeper day by day. Virtuous behaviors such as lending  for  the  consent  of
Allah (swt),  solidarity,  sympathy,  mercy,  compassion,  benefaction,  and
infaq are eliminated. Religious and moral values  are  damaged.  Sensitivity
to halal and haram weakens. Consequently,  trying  to  make  profit  without
considering whether it is legal cause great unrests in society.





    Dear Muslims!
    Although a person who makes operations  with  interest  thinks  that  he
makes profit effortlessly and  easily,  in  fact,  he  is  deemed  to  lose.
However, the Almighty Allah (swt) points out this fact in  the  Holy  Qur'an
as follows, ""Allah will deprive usury of all growth but will  give  increase
for  deeds  of  charity,  for  He  loveth  not  creatures   ungrateful   and
wicked.""[iii] Because the property of those who give zakat and sadaqah  gets
baraqah and increases. They benefit from  their  wealth.  Their  hearts  are
filled with peace and their book of deeds is filled with rewards.  Interest,
on the contrary, eliminates the baraqah of a wealth. Its owner  cannot  make
any profit out of it other than sins.  It sets  up  the  bankruptcy  of  its
owner both  spiritually  and  materially.   The  Messenger  of  Allah  (saw)
expressed that interest made its owner lose eventually  as  follows,  ""Those
who increase their property by way of interest  cannot  benefit  from  their
property.""[iv]

    Honorable Believers!
    Our supreme religion commands us to earn  halal  money  for  sustenance.
Prophet Muhammad (saw) said, ""No one can eat a food that is  more  favorable
than their own gain.""[v]

    I am sorry to say that operations with interest are sometimes  evaluated
as a part of trade today as it was in  the  period  of  negligence  and  the
ideas and practices indicating the indispensability of trade  are  tried  to
be extended. However, trade and interest are  completely  different  things.
So, the Holy Qur'an  states,  ""Allah  hath  permitted  trade  and  forbidden
usury.""[vi] For this, our responsibility is to act extremely  sensitive  not
to make use of interest while trading.

    Dear Muslims!
    The frustration to be faced by those who do  not  give  up  on  interest
despite all the warnings from our religion is informed in  the  Holy  Qur'an
as follows, ""Those who devour usury will not  stand  except  as  stands  one
whom the Evil One by his touch hath driven to madness, that is because  they
say: 'Trade is like usury'...""[vii]

    Then, let us stay away from the disaster of interest which has been  one
the  biggest  means  of  exploitation  and  oppression  in   economic   life
throughout the history. Let us understand that we cannot  benefit  from  the
property gained by interest. In this temporary world life,  let  us  try  to
earn halal money and spend it for halal ways  rather  than  trying  to  earn
more money. Let us always remember that we will not be  able  to  leave  the
presence of Allah (swt) before accounting for how we earned and for what  we
spent our property, on the Day of Judgment. I  would  like  to  conclude  my
khutbah with this warning of Allah the Exalted  (swt),  O  ye  who  believe!
Fear Allah, and give up what remains of your demand for  usury,  if  ye  are
indeed believers. If ye do it not, take notice of war, from  Allah  and  His
Messenger: But if ye turn back, ye shall have your capital  sums;  deal  not
unjustly, and ye shall not be dealth with unjustly.[viii]
-----------------------
[i] Muslim, Hajj, 147.
[ii] Al 'Imran, 3/130.
[iii] Baqarah, 2/276.
[iv] Ibn Majah, Trade, 58.
[v] Bukhari, Spell, 15.
[vi] Baqarah, 2/275.
[vii] Baqarah, 2/275.
[viii] Baqarah, 2/278-279.
                                    General Directorate of Religious Affairs

"
156;2019-11-29;"
DATE: 29.11.2019
[pic]
    SINCERITY: THE ESSENCE OF FAITH
    Honorable Muslims!
    In the verse I have  just  recited  the  Almighty  Allah  (swt)  states,
""Indeed, We have sent down to you the  Book  in  truth.  So  worship  Allah,
offering Him sincere devotion.""[i]

    In this respect, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) says, ""Allah does not accept
any deed except that which is purely for Him and for His sake.""[ii]

    Dear Believers!

    The essence of the sublime religion Islam is sincerity. Whether  or  not
our words and actions have any value  before  Allah  (swt)  depends  on  our
sincerity. Sincerity is to have heartfelt faith in Allah (swt) and  to  live
a life seeking His approval only, without expecting any worldly  benefit  in
return, as required by such faith. It is to treat in good way and  intention
all living and non-living beings. It is to either seem as you are or  be  as
you seem.

    Dear Muslims!
    In one occasion the Prophet Muhammad  (saw)  said,  [pic]  ""Religion  is
sincerity."" When his companions asked ""To whom, o Rasulullah?"", he  replied,
""To Allah, to His Book, to His Messenger, to  the  leaders  (imams)  of  the
Muslims, and to all Muslims.""[iii]

    Religion should remind us of sincerity, as we understand from his words.
It is not possible to view Islam as apart from ikhlas  (purity),  sincerity,
good faith, and clean hearts.

    Muslims worship Allah (swt) sincerely. They worship Him alone, they pray
Him alone, and they ask for His help alone. They adhere to the Holy  Qur'an,
the best of words, sincerely. They strive  to  engrave  the  letter  of  the
Qur'an in their memory, and implement its rules in their lives. They  devote
themselves to the Prophet Muhammad (saw) steadfastly. They, with  deep  love
and sincerity, take him as a role model and try to  live  the  way  he  did.
They observe the rights  of  people  in  order  for  the  establishment  and
prevalence of peace and security in the society in  which  they  live.  They
uphold the truth, rule of law, and justice in all areas, from  education  to
commerce and from family to  broader  circles  of  the  society,  under  any
circumstances. They sincerely fulfill  their  responsibilities  towards  all
people in their environment, regardless of their title, gender, or age.

    They are aware of the fact that each Muslim is an  honorable  member  of
the Prophet Muhammad's ummah. They  treat  generously  all  Muslims  without
discrimination on any ground such as gender, race, skin-color, or  language.
For them no profit is more valuable  than  arms  wide  open  with  brotherly
feelings of affection and  compassion,  and  sincere  prayers  uttered  with
brotherly sympathy.

    Dear Believers!
    Ostentation and show-off are the greatest reasons to cause people to  be
captives of their ambitions and to  cast  a  shadow  over  their  sincerity.
Islam orders that our words and actions be free from any kind of deceit  and
far from any play of interests. It advises us to ""do good in  expectance  of
its outcomes  from  Allah  only"".  It  makes  clear  that  people  who  make
concessions on honesty and sincerity and  who  think  they  derive  benefits
from people by deceiving them are actually doomed to lose. This  is  because
all that those pretentious people will derive as benefit, who only  seek  to
show off to others  what  they  do,  is  loss  in  this  world  and  in  the
Hereafter.

    Dear Muslims!
    In one occasion, the Prophet Muhammad (saw) warned us, ""Allah  does  not
look at your outward appearance and your wealth but He looks  only  at  your
hearts and your deeds.""[iv] Then, let us ensure that our  hearts  are  clean
and our deeds are sincere if we want to be decent Muslims and good  servants
of Allah (swt). Let us set getting  the  approval  of  Allah  (swt)  as  the
purpose of our lives. Let us never forget that He  is  All-Seeing  and  All-
Knowing of what we do openly and secretly, and that He does and will  reward
our deeds if done sincerely only.  Let  us  turn  away  from  pomposity  and
hypocrisy. Let us all pray to Allah in the Prophet Muhammad's  (saw)  words,
""O Allah, our Lord, and Lord of everything! Make me and  my  family  sincere
to You at every moment in this world and in the Hereafter.  O  Possessor  of
glory and honor!""[v]
-----------------------
[i] Zumar, 39/2.
[ii] Nasa'i, Jihad, 24.
[iii] Muslim, Iman, 95.
[iv] Muslim, Birr, 34.
[v] Abu Dawud, Witr, 25.

                                   General Directorate of Religious Services

"
